["This 32 inch Rainbow Reacher is designed as a light duty and low cost reacher which anyone could use. Perfect for reaching into nooks and crannies, grabbing things you can't quite reach or don't want to touch. The flexible rubber cups and jaw grip small and large items up to 3 pounds. A handy hook and loop strap is included so your Rainbow Reacher will always be close at hand, in the kitchen, office, laundry room or work shop. Weighs only 4 oz. Fingers opens to 4.5 inches with non-latex cups. 32 inch Rainbow Reacher Features: Light duty and low cost reacher. Flexible rubber cups. Handy hook and loop strap is included. Perfect for reaching into any small place. 32 inch Rainbow Reacher Specifications: Holds items up to 3 lbs. Weighs 4 oz. Fingers open to 4.5 inches.", "The Ergonomic Reacher with Rotating Claw is designed to be easy to use. The reacher is lightweight and features two rubber cushion tips. The \"claw\" opening rotates for both horizontal and vertical use. An attached magnet on the handle end will pick up light metal objects. Ergonomic Reacher with Rotating Claw Features: Ergonomically designed trigger and handle make it easy to use. The \"Claw\" rotates for horizontal and vertical use. Ergonomic Reacher with Rotating Claw Specifications: Lightweight - 4 oz. to 6 oz. Rubber cushion tips. 2 1/2 inch jaw opening. Length - 18 inches.", "The Ergonomic Reacher with Rotating Claw is designed to be easy to use. The reacher is lightweight and features two rubber cushion tips. The \"claw\" opening rotates for both horizontal and vertical use. An attached magnet on the handle end will pick up light metal objects. Ergonomic Reacher with Rotating Claw Features: Ergonomically designed trigger and handle make it easy to use. The \"Claw\" rotates for horizontal and vertical use. Ergonomic Reacher with Rotating Claw Specifications: Lightweight - 4 oz. to 6 oz. Rubber cushion tips. 2 1/2 inch jaw opening. Length - 27 inches.", "People with pain and, or, limited use of their hands will find using this 15 inch Playing Card Holder easier than trying to hold multiple cards in one hand. The unique slot design allows cards to be easily added or removed. The extended front of the holder provides a convenient place to keep pencils while playing card games. Playing Card Holder 15 inch Features: People with pain and/or limited use of their hands will find using this holder much easier than trying to hold multiple cards in one hand. The slot is designed so that cards can be easily added or removed. Also holds recipes or memos. Pencils and small coins fit on the extended front of the holder. Playing Card Holder 15 inch Specifications: Measures 2 x 1 3/8 x 15\" (5.1 x 3.5 x 38 cm).", "Universal Carry-All Pouch with Pockets features multiple handy storage compartments. Washable navy denim fabric. Hook and loop closures secures walker bag to walker, wheelchair or bedrail. Bottom ties prevent bag from swinging when used as a walker bag. Large front opening pocket with 3 smaller attached pockets. Reinforced bottom and sides. Carry-All Pouch with Pockets measures 9 1/2 x 13 inches x 1 inch wide overall. Large front opening pocket measures 8 x 13 inches. Three attached front pockets: one large pocket measures 6 x 6 inches, two smaller pockets measure 2 1/2 x 6 inches. Carry-All Pouch with Pockets Features: Multiple handy storage compartments. Washable navy denim fabric. Hook and loop closures. Bottom ties prevent bag from swinging. Large front opening pocket. 3 smaller attached pockets. Carry-All Pouch with Pockets Specifications: 9 1/2 x 13 inches x 1 inch wide overall. Large front pocket- 8 x 13 inches. One large pocket-6 x 6 inches. Two smaller pockets- 2 1/2 x 6 inches.", "Action Polymer Heel and Elbow Pads 1/4 inch is recommended for people at risk or diagnosed with compromised skin disorders. Pad allows clients taking medication that affects skin integrity or persons who are prone to skin tears or abrasions, to continue daily activities or to sleep comfortably. For use on either heels or elbows. Sold as a pair. Action Polymer Heel and Elbow Pads 1/4 inch Features: Contours to shape of elbow or heel. Won't rub or irritate. Fits snuggly and comfortably while allowing one to move freely. Action Polymer Heel and Elbow Pads 1/4 inch Specifications: Sold as a pair. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "The Cane Wrist Strap Helps keep your cane at your side, and eliminates the awkwardness of trying to find a place to set it down. A black wrist strap connects to a rubber strip that fits most standard wood and aluminum canes. Cane Wrist Strap Features: Black 9½\" loop strap. Attaches easily to the shaft of most wood and aluminum canes by sliding over the tip of the cane. Allows you to comfortably wear the Cane Strap around your wrist while the cane is in use.", "This 11 inch long flexible Bedside Beverage Holder clamps onto bed rails from 3/4 inch up to 1 inch in diameter to hold glasses, cups, cans, or bottles. Arm is easily adjustable for versatile positioning. Bedside Beverage Holder Features: Holds glasses, cups, cans, or bottles. Adjustable arm. Bedside Beverage Holder Specifications: Length - 11 inches. Clamps on rails from 3/4 inch to 1 inch in diameter.", "The Bed Caddie enables people with general weakness or decreased back strength to pull themselves up to a sitting position in bed using the 3 tiered ladder system. This unique device has cushioned grip handles and is made of durable nylon. The Bed Caddie ergonomic buckle design allows for easy attachment to the bed and accommodates most metal framed and wood framed beds. Bed Caddie Features: 5 inch cushioned grip handles. Ergonomic buckle design. Easy attachment to the bed. 3 tiered ladder system. Bed Caddie Specifications: Accommodates most metal framed and wood framed beds. Weight Capacity: 300 lbs. Strap Length: Adjustable 48 ? 84 inches. Length between handles: 12 inches. Easy Assembly (No Tools Required) Loop the lower BedCaddie strap around the bed frame. Snap the easy connect buckle into place. Adjust the strap length so that the first handle lies at waist level when lying in bed.", "The 32 inch EZ Reachers with round silicone tips provide a powerful and secure grip with delicate sensitivity. Constructed of lightweight aluminum with a stainless steel spring mechanism for heavy-duty use. The handle is comfortable to hold and has an easy-to-operate pistol grip full finger trigger. EZ Reachers will handle objects of different shapes and sizes up to 5 lbs. The jaws open to 4.5 inches wide.32 inch model weighs 10 1/2 oz. 32 inch EZ Reacher Features: Round silicone tips provide a powerful and secure grip. Constructed of lightweight aluminum. Stainless steel spring mechanism for heavy-duty use. 32 inch EZ Reacher Specifications: Lift objects up to 5 lbs. Jaws open to 4.5 inches wide. 32 inch model weighs 10 1/2 oz.", "This Clear Polycarbonate Plate Guard prevents food from being pushed off the plate. The high rim makes scooping food onto utensils easier. Great for individuals with low vision, use of only one hand or with tremors to keep food on plate. The internal grove attaches to the rim of the plate. The 1 1/4 inch plastic rail is dishwasher safe. Large size fits onto plates with a diameter of 8 to 9 inches. Large Clear Plate Guard Features: Can be used discreetly while dining out. Makes scooping food onto utensils easier. Dishwasher safe! Large Clear Plate Guard Specifications: Fits: Plates with a diameter of 8 to 9 inches. Measures: 1 1/4 inch high. Material: clear plastic.", "The Button and Zipper Aid has a specially formed stainless steel wire loop that is inserted through the clothing eyelet and hooks over the button to allow it to be pulled back through the eyelet. Wooden handle is 5/8 inch x 7 3/4 inch long. Button and Zipper Aid Features: Wooden handle. Stainless steel wire loop. Button and Zipper Aid Specifications: Length- 5/8 inch x 7 3/4 in.", "Our prize-winning range of ergonomically designed body care products are all carefully balanced to provide maximum power with minimal effort and strain on hands, arms and shoulders. Each product has a unique shape that makes reaching even easier. The handles are oval and have a rough surface so as to provide a secure grip. Body Care Long Handle Hair Washer is used instead of the fingers to apply shampoo and massage the scalp. The shaft and handle are of the same design as the body washer, making it easier for the user to reach the head without putting strain on the hands, shoulders or arms.The Hair Washer is ergonomically designed to reach the entire scalp during shampooing. Nodules massage hair clean. The handle is constructed from lightweight polypropylene - weighs only 4 oz. It's the ideal hygienic aid for people with limited grasp or upper extremity range of motion. 14 1/2 inches long. Body Care Long Handle Hair Washer Features: Replaces fingers when shampooing. Provides the extra length to reach the head without putting strain on the hands, shoulders or arms. Nodules massage hair clean. Body Care Long Handle Hair Washer Specifications: Length- 14 1/2 inches. Weight- 4 oz.", "The Bed Rail Advantage Traveler offers a helping hand to a sitting position in bed. No assembly required - pops out of box ready to be placed on any bed. Quality steel construction - heavy duty steel with powder coat provides long lasting quality. Portable handle folds down for storage and portability. Safety strap secures base to mattress. Foam Grip provides comfortable cushion grip; closed cell foam is easy to sanitize. Fits on either side of the bed.Includes a free Bed Rail Advantage Organizer - a $19.95 value!Ships via UPS Ground. Bed Rail Advantage Traveler Features: Quality steel construction. Folding portable handle folds down for easy storage. Safety strap secures base to mattress. Fits on either side of the bed. Foam Grip provides comfortable grip. Includes a free Bed Rail Advantage Organizer. Bed Rail Advantage Traveler Specifications: No assembly required. Weight Capacity: 400 lbs. Rail Height: 22?. Rail Width: 17?. Base Dimensions: 21? x 17?. Weight of product: 8 lbs.", "32 inch Folding EZ Reacher with SAF-T-Lok with round silicone tips provide a powerful and secure grip with delicate sensitivity. Constructed of lightweight aluminum with a steel spring mechanism for heavy-duty use. The handle is comfortable to hold and has an easy-to-operate pistol grip full finger trigger. EZ Reachers will handle objects of different shapes and sizes up to 5 lbs. The jaws open to 4.5 inches wide. The 32 inch Folding EZ Reacher with SAF-T-Lok has an on/off lever locking mechanism to hold the jaws securely around the item being retrieved. A flip of the thumb releases the lock. 32 inch Folding EZ Reacher with SAF-T-Lok Features: Reacher FOLDS in half for easy storage, also very mobile. Stainless steel fingers will not rust. Constructed of lightweight aluminum. Round silicone tips. Easy-to-operate pistol grip full finger trigger. Automatic locking mechanism. 32 inch Folding EZ Reacher with SAF-T-Lok Specifications: Jaws open to 4.5 inches wide. Holds objects up to 5 lbs. Length 32 inches extended, 16.5 inches folded. Satin finish aluminum is lightweight (10.5oz) and strong", "The Big Button Universal Remote has large buttons and bold easy to read characters that make this remote user friendly! The extra large frame is easy to grasp and difficult to misplace. Features a touch sensitive lighted keypad for operation in the dark. The Big Button Universal Remote replaces up to 4 standard remotes and can be used with any combination of TVs, VCRs, and cable boxes. (Batteries not included). Big Button Universal Remote Features: Large bold buttons. Easy to read characters. Lighted keypad. Replaces up to 4 standard remotes. Extra large easy to grasp frame. Big Button Universal Remote Specifications: 2 1/4 inches wide. 9 1/2 inches long. 1 1/2 inches deep. Requires 2 AA batteries.(Batteries not included).", "The 42 inch EZ Reacher with SAF-T-Lok with round silicone tips provides a powerful and secure grip with delicate sensitivity. Constructed of lightweight aluminum with a stainless steel spring mechanism for heavy-duty use. The handle is comfortable to hold and has an easy-to-operate pistol grip full finger trigger. EZ Reachers will handle objects of different shapes and sizes up to 5 lbs. The jaws open to 4.5 inches wide. The locking model has an on/off lever locking mechanism to hold the jaws securely around the item being retrieved. A flip of the thumb releases the lock. Optional wrist support provides added arm support for people with limited strength. 42 inch EZ Reacher with SAF-T-Lok Features: Round silicone tips. Constructed of lightweight aluminum. Has a stainless steel spring mechanism for heavy-duty use. Handle is comfortable to hold. Easy-to-operate pistol grip full finger trigger. Provides a powerful and secure grip. 42 inch EZ Reacher with SAF-T-Lok Specifications: Holds up to 5 lbs. Jaws open to 4.5 inches wide. 42 inch model with lock weighs 12 oz.", "The Comfort Cape is a lightweight, durable fabric tray which is positioned between the back of the individuals head and the shampoo sink behind them. The device is flexible and has the ability to conform over and around any chair. It is firm enough to hold its shape while fastening. Multiple neck sizes assure a comfortable fit.Adjusts to the neck with buckle fasteners and hook-and-loop straps for a snug fit. Allows individuals to remain upright in a comfortable seated position while reducing risk of back strain for the caregiver. Measures 3 inches deep, 23 inches wide, 25 inches long. Royal Blue. Comfort Cape Features: Reduces risk of back pain. Buckle fasteners and hook-and-loop straps. Lightweight, durable fabric tray. Has the ability to conform over and around any chair. Comfort Cape Specifications: Measures 3 in. deep, 23 in. wide, 25 in. long. Royal Blue. Made in the USA.", "Hands Free Card Holders are designed to be free standing on tabletop or to fit comfortably in your hand. Blue plastic Hands Free Card Holders hold up to 15 cards securely. (Playing cards not included). Hands Free Card Holders Features: Will securely hold up to 15 cards. Cards slide in and out easily. Hands Free Card Holders Specifications: Package of 2.", "Use this 54 inch Rainbow Belt to provide assistance for individuals when walking, standing, or sitting. The 2 inch wide cotton belt features a metal buckle with teeth for secure closing and easy adjusting. Machine washable. 54 inch Rainbow Belt Features: Made from cotton. Metal buckle has teeth. Holds securely around the patient. Adjusts easily. 54 inch Rainbow Belt Specifications: 2 inches wide. Machine washable.", "This Big Lamp Switch knob has three large spokes to create more leverage for turning lamp switches. Just unscrew and remove your regular switch and replace with this one. Fits most standard lamps. Big Lamp Switch is 2 inches in diameter. Big Lamp Switch Features: Three large spokes. Creates more leverage for turning lamp switches. Big Lamp Switch Specifications: 2 inches in diameter. Comes in a package of 3.", "Bathe independently with the Body Care Long Handled Back Scrubber . Ergonomically designed back scrubber enables people with limited arm, shoulder and hand movement to reach all over the back. Features an ergonomically designed handle made from lightweight polypropylene with an anti-slip, rubber-like surface. Body Care Back Scrubber ergonomic design makes it easier to get all over the back. Lightweight back scrubber is carefully balanced to minimize stress on joints and muscles. Detachable nylon wash cloth with a polythene lining washes effectively without absorbing water. As a result, the back scrubber will always stay balanced ? even when wet. Removeable washcloth is machine washable. Back Scrubber is 30 in. long, 11 1/4 in. deep, weighs 7.1 oz. Body Care Long Handle Back Scrubber Features: Enables people with limited movement to reach all over the back. Made from lightweight polypropylene. Anti-slip, rubber-like handle. Balanced to provide maximum power with minimal effort and strain-even when wet. Body Care Long Handle Back Scrubber Specifications: Length- 30 in. Deep- 11 1/4 in. Weight- 7.1 oz.", "Use this 72 inch Rainbow Belt to provide assistance for individuals when walking, standing, or sitting. The 2 inch wide cotton belt features a metal buckle with teeth for secure closing and easy adjusting. Machine washable. 72 inch Rainbow Belt Features: Made from cotton. Metal buckle has teeth. Holds securely around the patient. Adjusts easily. 72 inch Rainbow Belt Specifications: 2 inches wide. Machine washable.", "Optional Action Basic Cover for 1/2 and 5/8 inch Adaptive Flat Pads are only available for 1/2 and 5/8 inch Adaptive Flat Pads. If a 1/2 inch or 5/8 inch Adaptive Flat Pad is used for a seating cushion, pad must be used with an Action brand cover for warranty to be in force. Action Basic Cover for 1/2 and 5/8 inch Adaptive Flat Pads Features: Soft black pontae fabric. Non skid bottom. Zippers on 3 sides. Removable and washable. This is a non-returnable hygiene item.", "Body Care Long Handle Comb has firm curved bristles designed follow the shape of the head. This means that the handle can be held close to the body without losing power or reach. Body Care Long Handle Comb and brushes are great for people with limited arm or hand movement. Anti-slip handles are ergonomically designed to lie against user's entire palm. Contoured design is both attractive and functional. Made of polypropylene. Body Care Long Handle Comb 12 inch Features: Firm curved bristles. Handle is designed to lie against user's entire palm. Anti-slip handles. Attractive and functional contoured design.", "Adjustable blanket support lifts up blankets to protect sensitive skin and keep the weight of blankets off of feet. The lightweight aluminum frame has a base that easily inserts between the mattress and box springs. Height adjusts up to 19 in. Lowers to the mattress top when not in use. Frame measures 20 in. long by 6 in. wide. Adjustable Blanket Support Features: Lightweight aluminum frame. The base easily inserts between the mattress and box springs. Adjustable height. Adjustable Blanket Support Specifications: Height adjusts up to 19 in. Frame measures 20 in. long by 6 in. wide.", "These Adult Terry Cloth Bibs are made of absorbent, poly cotton terry cloth fused to a waterproof vinyl backing. These leakproof vinyl-backed terry cloth adult bibs are reinforced with cotton binding. The vinyl backing prevents food and fluids from leaking through, helping to keep clothing dry and clean. Machine washable. Laundering instructions: Don't use chlorine bleach, dry bibs at 150 degrees or lower.Choose from neck opening closures with snaps or Velcro hook and loop. These Adult Terry Cloth Bibs measure 18 inches wide and 30 inches long. Generous size and extra long length provides better clothing protection. Adult Terry Cloth Bibs Features: Bigger size, and extra length. Better clothing protection. Made of soft absorbent polycotton terry. Full waterproof vinyl backing. Adult Terry Cloth Bibs Specifications: Measures 18 inches wide x 30 inches long. Choose from neck closure with snaps or Velcro (R)hook and loop. One per package.", "These Book holder replacement pegs are placed in the appropriate holes on the Roberts Book Holder to accommodate the width and thickness of the material. The pegs keep the book in position and prevent unwanted flipping of the pages while allowing for ease in turning pages. Package of 2 pegs. Book holder replacement pegs Features: Keep book in position. Prevent unwanted flipping of the pages. Book holder replacement pegs Specifications: Package of 2 pegs.", "Smaller size Armrest Pocket Bag fits on manual wheelchair armrests without interference with rear wheelchair wheels. This wheelchair armrest pouch is ideal for carrying keys, cell phones, wallets, and other small items. This armrest bag will fits both wheelchair armrests and scooter armrests. It attaches to most armrests using a unique \"soft to the skin\" mounting system, and can be mounted on inside or outside of armrest. Measures 11 inches wide x 5 inches long x 3 inches deep. Armrest Pocket Bag Features: Single pocket for easy storage. Holds keys, cell phones, wallets, pencils, small journal, pictures, pens, a small book, and other necessary items. Can be mounted on inside or outside of armrest. Armrest Pocket Bag Specifications: Measures: 11 x 5 x 3 inches. Material: water resistant fabric. Made: in USA. Color: black.", "The Deluxe Seatback Bag is our most popular wheelchair bag and has several storage compartments to separate belongings. This wheelchair seat back bag features 6 different storage areas to let you keep things separate so you have better access to what you need most often. Included with this wheelchair bag are adjustable straps that convert the bag to fit scooter seat backs and wheelchair push handles. This seatback bag is constructed of high quality water-resistant fabric with durable nylon webbing straps and is made in the U.S.A. Measures 14 inches wide x 16 inches high x 4 inches deep. Deluxe Seatback Bag Features: 6 different storage areas. Adjustable straps. Fits both wheelchairs and scooters. Deluxe Seatback Bag Specifications: Material: High quality water-resistant fabric./li> Color: Black. Measures: 14 x 16 x 4 inches. Made in: U.S.A. Includes: Adjustable straps.", "The Cane Carrier allows you to store your straight cane on the back of your wheelchair or scooter. No more laying it across your lap! Constructed of high quality water resistant fabric. Made in U.S.A. Specify carrier for chairs with or without push handles. Cane holder for scooter style seats has harness straps that go over the back of the seat. Cane holder for wheelchairs with push handles has straps that hook over the push handles. Cane Carrier Features: High quality water resistant fabric. Holds cane on the back of wheelchair or scooter.", "The Arthro Thumbs Up Cup is a lightweight and durable insulated plastic cup designed for people with limited strength or coordination. Finger joints can be used to their greatest mechanical advantage because of two backward tilt handles and thumb rests. Use with hot or cold liquids. Microwave safe and top-rack dishwasher safe. Cup holds 8 ounces of liquids. Plastic lid with spout included. Arthro Thumbs Up Cup Features: Two backward tilt handles and thumb rests. Lightweight and durable insulated plastic cup. Use with hot or cold liquids. Arthro Thumbs Up Cup Specifications: Cup holds 8 ounces of liquids. Plastic lid with spout included.", "Door Knob Extender provides extra leverage so less pressure is needed to turn a doorknob.Five inch doorknob extension handle converts a doorknob into a door lever providing extra leverage for people with limited hand function. The Doorknob Extender fits over a standard doorknob and allows complete access to keyholes. A cord or string can be inserted through the unique handle slot, making doorknobs easier to access for people with limited reach. Can be installed using only a screwdriver - no special tools required. Easy to clean. Cream beige color. Door Knob Extender Package of 2 Features: Provides extra leverage. Fits over a standard doorknob. Allows complete access to keyholes. Easy to clean. Door Knob Extender Package of 2 Specifications: Length - five inches. Cream beige color.", "Unique Door Knob Gripper slips over the existing knob or faucet to provide a slip-free, graspable surface. This door knob accessory is designed to assist individuals with limited hand strength or grasping ability in turning standard round door knobs. Door knob grippers are ideal for people with limited hand strength. Glows in the dark for nighttime location. Door Knob Gripper Features: Provide a slip-free, graspable surface. Minimizes hand stress. Glows in the dark. Door Knob Gripper Specifications: Fits over a knob or faucet. Measures 1.5 inches long x 2.13 inches in diameter. Color: white.", "The Autosqueeze Eye Drop Bottle Squeezer makes squeezing eye drop bottles easier by providing extra leverage. Clips onto most eye drop bottles to aid in applying eye drops. Autosqueeze is ideal for people with weak or arthritic fingers. Remove cap from the eye drop bottle, slide the Autosqueeze around the neck of the bottle. Apply eye drops by gently squeezing Autosqueeze. Replace the cap on the eye drop bottle when done, without removing Autosqueeze. Autosqueeze Eye Drop Bottle Squeezer Features: Provides extra leverage. Ideal for people with weak or arthritic fingers. Autosqueeze Eye Drop Bottle Squeezer Specifications: Remove cap from bottle before sliding on autosqueeze.", "The Down-in-Front Underseat Bag is a single pocket bag that mounts around the framework of your wheelchair. This under seat pouch can be removed quickly with quick release buckles. It is a great bag for wheelchairs with no arm rests for storing items under your wheelchair seat. Constructed of high quality, water-resistant fabric. Made in U.S.A. Measures 11 inches wide x 6 inches long x 3 inches deep. Down-in-Front Underseat Bag Features: Single pocket bag. High quality, water-resistant fabric. Down-in-Front Underseat Bag Specifications: Length - 11 inches. width - 6 inches. Depth - 3 inches.", "The Bath Kit is ideal for people who have difficulty bending and reaching their feet. Soft foot brush mounted on extra long handle. Total is length 22 inches. Includes 2 toe sponges and 2 round sponges to screw on end of handle. Great value.* No extra replacement sponges. Bath Kit Includes: 2 toe sponges. 2 round sponges. Soft foot brush mounted on extra long handle.", "Dr. Joseph's Footbrush Kit is a great tool for people with limited bending. 25 inch long handle with 3 1/4 inch soft, nylon-bristled scrub brush attached. Wedge-tipped sponge measures 1 x 2 1/2 inches for cleaning between toes. Two sponges are included. Replacement sponges are available separately in a package of three. Dr. Joseph's Footbrush Kit Features: Wedge-tipped sponge. Long handle. Two included sponges. Scrub brush is attached. Dr. Joseph's Footbrush Kit Specifications: Handle length- 25 in.", "Drinking Straw Holder clips on to the lip of glasses and cups. Straw angle can be adjusted by use of different holes. Accepts all straw sizes. Stainless steel spring clamp and holder. Eliminates the need to hold the straw. Drinking Straw Holder Features: Stainless steel. Clamps on edge of glass. Drinking Straw Holder Specifications: Holds large diameter straws.", "Winner of Best New Product, Medtrade West April 2001Prescribed by Doctors & Recommended by Health professionals. Fits over 170 million vehicles in North America.The Auto Handy Bar Transfer Aid device locks securely, and reliably, into position. In addition, it is easy to insert and remove, and it is strong, durable and affordable. The material is forged steel with corrosion resistant plating. At just 0.7 lb., and measuring approx. 9 in. long, the Handybar™ is sufficiently lightweight, and compact, for it to be carried around in a handbag or pack. The precisely shaped nose locks the Handybar securely into position with little effort and enables it to be removed just as easily. It is also cranked, or bent, over its length to enable it to be reversed to give just the right height and angle of grip for getting in and out of a vehicle. Smaller, more compact cars tend to be lower down, closer to the ground making it even more difficult to get in and out of them. Fortunately, the U-type striker plate is one of the most rugged components in a vehicle being designed to keep the door closed in the event of a side-impact crash. There is a striker on each of the door pillars enabling the Handybar to be used by both the driver and passengers.Includes seat belt cutter and side window breaker. Weight limit 350 lbs. Auto Handy Bar Transfer Aid Features: Handle helps getting in and out of cars. Can be used on either side of the vehicle. Precisely shaped nose locks securely into position. Small enough to fit into a handbag or pack. Auto Handy Bar Transfer Aid Specifications: Handy bar hooks/locks onto the striker of a car. Weight -0.7 lb. 9 inches long. Weight limit 350 lbs. Fits 95% of all newer cars.", "Dycem Bottle Opener is made of non-slip Dycem material. Dome shaped and soft, this device provides a powerful grip allowing individuals with decreased strength and function to easily open pill bottles and other screw-top bottles. Can be used with the fingers or by pressing down on the top of the lid with the palm of the hand and turning. If a Dycem Non-Slip Mat is placed under the bottle, users can open bottles with one hand. Dycem Bottle Opener Features: Made of non-slip material. Provides a powerful grip. Opens pill bottles and other screw-top bottles. Dycem Bottle Opener Specifications: Will open bottle lids up to 1.6 inches in diameter. Color choices - Blue.", "Offers the most recommended ADL items for patients recovering from hip or knee surgery. Hip kits are a must have for people who have had or are getting ready to have hip or knee surgery. Basic Hip Kit with 26 inch Ergo Plus Reacher Features: Recommended ADL equipment for patients recovering from hip/knee surgery or injury. Essential items to have if you are preparing for hip or knee surgery. Also for people who suffer from limited motion or arthritis. Save money by purchasing the kit. Basic Hip Kit includes: 1 Sock Aid with Foam Handles. Black Elastic Shoe Laces 24 inch package of 2 pair. White Elastic Shoe Laces 24 inch package of 2 pair. 1 Ergo Plus 26 inch Reacher. 1 Economy Dressing Stick. 1 Stainless Steel Shoe Horn 24 inch. 1 Long Handle Contoured Bath Sponge 18 inch.", "Action Polymer Heel and Elbow Pads 1/2 inch is recommended for people at risk or diagnosed with compromised skin disorders. Pad allows clients taking medication that affects skin integrity or persons who are prone to skin tears or abrasions, to continue daily activities or to sleep comfortably. For use on either heels or elbows. Sold as a pair. Action Polymer Heel and Elbow Pads 1/2 inch Features: Contours to shape of elbow or heel. Won't rub or irritate. Fits snuggly and comfortably while allowing one to move freely. Action Polymer Heel and Elbow Pads 1/2 inch Specifications: Sold as a pair. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "The Easi-Grip Carving Fork easily pierces many meats and aids in holding food while cutting. Carving Fork measures 5 3/4 inches long.The handles of Easi-Grip Knives and Utensils are molded in a soft feel plastic, which gives a firm comfortable grip in either hand. The stainless steel tools are setat 90 degrees from the handle, keeping the hand and wrist in a neutral stress free position. Easi-Grip Knives and Kitchen Tools are supremely comfortable for everyone to use, but will be particularly beneficial for those with arthritis, Repetitive Strain Injury, Carpal Tunnel Syndrome or other conditions which weaken the hand and wrist. All items are dishwasher safe. Easi-Grip Carving Fork Features: Blade is set at 90 degrees from the handle. Unique handle keeps hand and wrist in a stress free position. Easi-Grip Carving Fork Specifications: Length - 5 3/4 in. Dishwasher safe.", "The Easi-Grip Carving Knife easily slices through many varieties of meats. Carving Knife has an 8 inch long x 1 inch wide smooth edge blade.The handles of Easi-Grip Knives and Utensils are molded in a soft feel plastic, which gives a firm comfortable grip in either hand. The stainless steel tools are setat 90 degrees from the handle, keeping the hand and wrist in a neutral stress free position. Easi-Grip Knives and Kitchen Tools are supremely comfortable for everyone to use, but will be particularly beneficial for those with arthritis, Repetitive Strain Injury, Carpal Tunnel Syndrome or other conditions which weaken the hand and wrist. All items are dishwasher safe. Easi-Grip Carving Knife Features: Soft feel plastic handles. Smooth edge blade cuts through any meat. Angle of handle keeps arm, wrist, and hand in a stress free position. Easi-Grip Carving Knife Specifications: Blade Length - 8 in. Blade Width - 1 in. Dishwasher safe.", "Offers the most recommended ADL items for patients recovering from hip surgery. Hip kits are a must have for people who have had or are getting ready to have hip or knee surgery. Basic Hip Kit with 32 inch Ergo Plus Reacher Features: Recommended ADL equipment for patients recovering from hip/knee surgery or injury. Essential items to have if you are preparing for hip or knee surgery. Also for people who suffer from limited motion or arthritis. Basic Hip Kit includes: 1 Sock Aid with Foam Handles. Black Elastic Shoe Laces 24 inch package of 2 pair. White Elastic Shoe Laces 24 inch package of 2 pair. 1 Ergo Plus Reacher 32 inch. 1 Dressing Stick. 1 Stainless Steel Shoe Horn 24 inch. 1 Long Handle Contoured Bath Sponge 18 inch.", "The Easi-Grip Cheese Slicer measures 5 inches long x 2 inches wide.The handles of Easi-Grip Knives and Utensils are molded in a soft feel plastic, which gives a firm comfortable grip in either hand. The stainless steel tools are setat 90 degrees from the handle, keeping the hand and wrist in a neutral stress free position. Easi-Grip Knives and Kitchen Tools are supremely comfortable for everyone to use, but will be particularly beneficial for those with arthritis, Repetitive Strain Injury, Carpal Tunnel Syndrome or other conditions which weaken the hand and wrist. All items are dishwasher safe. Easi-Grip Cheese Slicer Features: Soft feel plastic handle. Angle of handle keeps arm, wrist, and hand in a stress free position. Easi-Grip Cheese Slicer Specifications: Length - 5 in. Width - 2 in.", "The Clear Rigid Plexiglas Re-Usable Straws are eighteen inches long. These re-usable drinking straws are made of rigid Plexiglas and can be heated with a heat gun to reshape as desired. The large 1/4 inch diameter straw can be used for soups. Package of 5. Clear Rigid Plexiglas Re-Usable Straw Features: Re-shape-able. Re-Usable. Clear plexiglas. Clear Rigid Plexiglas Re-Usable Straw Specifications: 1/4 inch diameter. Package of 5. 18 in. length. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "The Chef's Knife has a high quality stainless steel blade with a smooth sharp edge which is useful for cutting or chopping food.The Chef's knife also has an easy-to-grip contoured closed handle with blades set at an angle to minimise wrist movement for the user. The handle has been designed to counter-balance the weight of the knife whilst also being aesthetically pleasing. Dishwasher safe. Blade length 203mm. Weight 165g. Chef's Knife Features: High quality stainless steel blade. Smooth sharp edge. Easy-to-grip contoured closed handle. Minimized wrist movement. Dishwasher safe. Chef's Knife Specifications: Blade length 203mm. Weight 165g.", "The Commuter Cushion with Basic Cover offers basic pressure and shear reduction for low risk users at an affordable price. Combined 1/2 inch Akton Polymer and 1 3/4 inch foam are sealed in a waterproof film for incontinence protection. Total thickness: 2 1/4 in. The Basic Cover is made of a durable stretch knit material. Soft black pontae fabric, non skid bottom, zippered on 3 sides, removable and washable. Replacement covers and custom sizes available by special request. Shipping UPS Ground Commuter Cushion with Basic Cover Features: Pressure and shear reduction. Waterproof film barrier. Combines Akton Polymer and foam. Requires low maintenance. Cover is soft black pontae fabric. Non skid bottom. Zippered on 3 sides. Removable and washable. Commuter Cushion with Basic Cover Specifications: Total thickness: 2 1/4 in. Replacement covers and custom sizes available by special request. This is a non-returnable hygiene item.", "The Bed Cane makes movement in and out of a bed easy with its steady support. The 19 x 23 in. wood base fits between the mattress and box springs. The Bed Cane allows you to use both hands to sit up on the side of the bed and then also offers a means to maintain your balance while rising to a standing position. The reversible handle installs on either side of the bed and has a comfortable cushion grip. The shaft, with a durable powder coat finish, adjusts from 19 to 22 in. high, adapts for your needs and for varying mattress thicknesses, and is also collapsible for transporting anywhere. 350 lb. capacity.Includes free Bed Cane Organizer - a $19.95 value. Bed Cane Features: Makes getting in and out of a bed easy with its steady support. Allows you to use both hands to sit up on the side of the bed. Offers a means to maintain your balance while rising to a standing position. Bed Cane Specifications: 19 x 23 in. wood base fits between the mattress and box springs. Handle installs on either side of the bed. Adjusts from 19 to 22 in. high. Weight Capacity: 350 lbs. Rail Width: 15?. Weight of product:12lbs. Ships UPS Ground. Oversize/overweight item. Frequently Asked Questions: How does it attach to the bed? A safety strap loops around the bed frame on the opposite side of the bed and secures it to the bed frame. Fits up to King sized beds Does it work on a Craftmatic or adjustable bed? Yes, just secure the bed rail above or below where the bed folds. Can it be used on a hospital bed? Yes How hard is it to assemble? It assembles quickly with 3 bolts and a safety pin Is it height adjustable? Yes. The rail adjusts in height from 19? to 22? Assembly: Installs in minutes with 3 bolts and safety pin.", "The Easi Grip Garden Tools Set of 3 includes an Easi Grip- fork, trowel ,and cultivator. Each tool has an ergonomically angled handle to keep the hand and wrist in a natural position, taking the strain and discomfort out of gardening. The stainless steel metal section helps prevent soil adhesion. The soft feel non-slip grip prevents the tools from turning in the hand, giving a firmer grip even in wet conditions. Easi Grip Garden Trowel Features: Stainless steel metal prevents soil adhesion. Keeps hand and wrist in a natural and comfortable position. Soft feel non-slip grip - Even when wet! Easi Grip Garden Trowel Specifications: Set includes - fork, trowel, and cultivator.", "The Clear Zipper Pull attaches to zip tabs to provide a discrete extended handle that is easy to grasp. It may be helpful for individuals with arthritis or limited finger dexterity. No pinch required.The Zipper pull consists of a nylon loop with a clip to attach to the zip tab. Place the thumb or finger in the loop and pull for easy opening and closing of zips. The clear loop can be tucked out of sight or removed and placed in a pocket when not in use. 3 per package. Clear Zipper Pull Features: Discrete extended handle. Easy to grasp. Clear loop can be tucked out of sight or removed. Clear Zipper Pull Specifications: 3 per package. Zipper must have a hole to attach the Clear Zipper Pull.", "Coiler Elastic Shoe Laces are coiled elastic shoelaces designed to convert any shoe to a slip on for people who have difficulty tying shoes. Great for individuals who have decreased finger dexterity or who are unable to bend or reach to tie shoes. They have no pressure points and allow natural movement. Fits up to eight pairs of eyelets. Sold in pairs. Coiler Elastic Shoe Laces Features: No pressure points. Allow natural movement. Fits up to eight pairs of eyelets. Coiler Elastic Shoe Laces Specifications: Colors-White, Tan, Brown, or Black. Sold in pairs.", "People with limited use of their fingers and hands will benefit from this double-duty dressing aid. The handy built-up soft grip rubber handle of the Button Aid and Zipper Pull has a formed wire buttoning aid at one end and a brass hook at the other end for pulling zipper tabs. 8 ¾ inch long. Button Aid and Zipper Pull Features: Handy built-up soft grip rubber handle. Formed wire buttoning aid. Brass hook for pulling zippers. Button Aid and Zipper Pull Specifications: Length 8 ¾ inch long.", "Action Wrist Wrap provides wrist control without impeding hand function. Use during athletic competition, for support during computer tasks to reduce symptoms of Carpal Tunnel Syndrome, and to reduce symptoms of arthritis or ligament sprains.Soft support limits only the ends of wrist motion.Breathable, washable, nylon/spandex with skin protective foam lining. Four way stretch material offers adjustable compression, will not roll or bind, and stays comfortable all day. Choose this flexible Action Wrist Wrap for mild Carpal Tunnel Syndrome, wrist sprains and ligament injuries. Measure circumference at wrist. Can be used on ether right or left wrist. Action Wrist Wrap Features: Gain wrist control without impeding hand function. Reduction of Carpal Tunnel Syndrome, arthritis and ligament sprains. Breathable, washable, nylon/spandex with skin protective foam lining. Four way stretch material. Action Wrist Wrap Specifications: Fits right or left. Small/Medium 6 - 7 1/4 in. Medium/Large 7 1/4 - 8 1/2 in.", "The Tri-Core orthopedic cervical support pillow is prized for its effectiveness in correctly aligning the spine and supporting the neck in its natural position to help relieve headaches, neck pain for side and back sleepers alike. Its patented overall design: a unique trapezoid center and two neck lobes which cushion the head and support the neck, make it the highest quality cervical support pillow available.The Tri-Core Mid Size Gentle Support Pillow is a slightly smaller version of the popular Tri-Core Pillow. Offering great comfort and support for small adults and young teens.The Tri-Core is the fiber support pillow most recommended by the medical professionals who commonly treat neck and head pain. Most users experience a positive difference within days of using the cervical pillow, while others may require up to two weeks before their neck and back muscles adjust to their proper position.Choose from firm or gentle support. Core Mid Size Gentle Support Pillow Features: Supports neck to relieve pain, restore natural curvature. Provides support and anatomical alignment. Comfort for back and side sleepers. Core Mid Size Gentle Support Pillow Specifications: Fits standard pillowcase. Made with premium quality fiber. Measures: 22 x 15 in. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "The Cord Zipper Pull makes dressing easier by giving the user control of zippers. A split ring is attached through the hole in the zipper tab and the hook on the end of the pull engages the ring. When the zipper is fully closed or open, the hook is disengaged. Ten 1/4\" (.7 cm) diameter split rings are included for hooking to zipper tabs.Zipper must have a hole to attach the Cord Zipper Pull.Made of sturdy nylon cord with a hand loop and metal hook 18\" (46 cm) long. Cord Zipper Pull Features: Makes dressing and undressing easy!! Gives the user control of zipper. Cord Zipper Pull Specifications: Length 18 in. Ten 1/4\" (.7 cm) diameter split rings are included.", "Easi Grip Tweezers are stainless steel tweezers that are lightweight and require only a gentle squeeze in the palm of the hand. Looped handle reopens when released. Easi Grip Tweezers Features: Easy to grasp looped handle. Stainless steel tweezers. Lightweight. Easi Grip Tweezers Specifications: Length - 7.5 in. Weight - .06 oz.", "Wrap around Action ThumbSling \"hugs\" the CMC joint to reduce subluxation and grinding pain. Choose this flexible thumb wrap for CMC joint arthritis and ligament injuries. Four-way stretch material conforms to the palm without adding bulk. Wrap-round sling supports the thumb and assists in maintaining web space to reduce CMC subluxation. Great for all day support and for use during racquet sports and golf. Combines a soft, secure hold with a moisture transfer system to keep skin clean and dry. Four way stretch provides even compression and an intimate fit. Non-slip foam lining and four way stretch provides even compression that will not roll or bind. Measure around the hand at the base of the fingers (circumference at MP's).Small/Medium fits 6 - 7 1/4 inches.Medium/Large fits 7 1/4 - 9 1/4 inches.Specify size and Left or Right. Action ThumbSling Features: Reduction of subluxation and grinding pain. Healing of arthritis and ligament injuries. Four-way stretch material. Wrap-round sling supports. A soft, secure hold with a moisture transfer system. Non-sip foam lining. Action ThumbSling Specifications: Small/Medium fits 6 - 7 1/4 inches. Medium/Large fits 7 1/4 - 9 1/4 inches.", "Coated surface of the Easy Slider 18 inch Shoehorn makes it easy for the foot to slide into the shoe. Textured grip handle is easy to grasp. Enameled steel shaft. Easy Slider 18 inch Shoehorn Features: Textured grip handle is easy to grasp. Easy Slider 18 inch Shoehorn Specifications: Enameled steel shaft. Length: 18 inches.", "The Crutch Carrier is used for carrying forearm or underarm type crutches on the back of your wheelchair or scooter. This crutch holder features a hook-and-loop strap to secure crutches. It is constructed of high quality water resistant fabric and is made in U.S.A. Choose from crutch holder for chairs with push handles or chairs without push handles. For chairs with push handles, the straps loop over the push handles. For scooter style seats, the harness straps over the back of the seat. Crutch Carrier Specifications: Material: Water resistant fabric. Made in: U.S.A. Color: Black. Options: For chairs with push handles or without push handles. Crutch Carrier Features: Hook-and-loop strap to secure crutches. Water resistant fabric. Carries both forearm and under arm style crutches.", "Blue Terry Hand Grips are 100% cotton terry with thick foam padding. Designed to minimize hand discomfort when using a walker or crutch. Simply wrap cover around a standard handle and secure with the hook-and-loop fasteners. Measure 6 x 7 inches. Sold in pairs. Blue Terry Walker and Crutch Hand Grips Features: 100% cotton terry fabric. Thick foam padding. Minimizes hand discomfort while using a walker or crutch. Hook-and-loop fasteners. Blue Terry Walker and Crutch Hand Grips Specifications: Measure 6 x 7 inches. Velcro strip 3/4 inch wide. Fits 1 inch diameter tubing. Sold in pairs.", "Our prize-winning range of ergonomically designed body care products are all carefully balanced to provide maximum power with minimal effort and strain on hands, arms and shoulders. Each product has a unique shape that makes reaching even easier. The handles are oval and have a rough surface so as to provide a secure grip.Use this Body Care Long Handle Body Washer to wash your body independently. People with a limited reach can now have the power to wash their shoulders, arms and neck. Ergonomic design makes it easier to get at all parts of the body. The washcloth is removable and made from a special material that washes effectively without absorbing water. The removeable washcloth is made of nylon with polythene inner lining does not absorb water and remains light weight. This means the washer stays light and balanced even when wet. Wash cloths are machine washable. The shape of the Long Handle Body Washer makes effective use of the power of the shoulders, arms and hands. The ergonomic design makes it easier to get at all parts of the body. It has a removable wash cloth that washes effectively without absorbing water. This means the washer stays light and balanced even when wet. Body Care Long Handle Body Washer measures 15 inches long, weighs 4 oz. Body Care Long Handle Body Washer Features: People with limited reach can now wash their shoulders, arms and neck. Washer stays light and balanced even when wet. Removable washcloth that washes effectively without absorbing water. Body Care Long Handle Body Washer Specifications: Length- 15 inches. Weight- 4 0z. Wash cloths are machine washable.", "The Crescent Pillow Mate cervical pillow gently cradles the neck. Crescent shape provides support for cervical alignment without forward flexion.Made of hypoallergenic polyester fiber. Measures 14x 12x3in. Choose from white polyester/cotton cover or blue satin cover. Crescent Pillow Mate Features: Gently cradles the neck. Support for cervical alignment. Crescent Pillow Mate Specifications: Measures: 14 x 12 x 3 in. Choose from white polyester/cotton cover or blue satin cover. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "Use this 60 inch Rainbow Belt to provide assistance for individuals when walking, standing, or sitting. The 2 inch wide cotton belt features a metal buckle with teeth for secure closing and easy adjusting. Machine washable. 60 inch Rainbow Belt Features: Made from cotton. Metal buckle has teeth. Holds securely around the patient. Adjusts easily. 60 inch Rainbow Belt Specifications: 2 inches wide. Machine washable.", "The Deluxe Saddle Armrest Bag has a large convenient storage area with a zippered interior pocket and added outside pockets. This armrest pouch fits both wheelchair and scooter style arm rests. It attaches using unique \"soft to the skin\" mounting system and can be mounted on inside or outside of the armrest. Measures 10 inches wide x 8 inches long x 3 inches deep. Deluxe Saddle Armrest Bag Features: Mounts on inside or outside of armrest. Large convenient storage area. Zippered interior and exterior pockets. Fits wheelchair and scooter arm rests. Deluxe Saddle Armrest Bag Specifications: Measures: 10 x 8 x 3 inches. Material: Water resistant fabric. Color: Black. Made in: USA.", "The Big Lamp Switch knob has three large spokes to create more leverage for turning lamp switches. Just unscrew and remove your regular switch and replace with this one. Fits most standard lamps. Big Lamp Switch is 2 inches in diameter. Big Lamp Switch Features: Three large spokes. Creates more leverage for turning lamp switches. Big Lamp Switch Specifications: 2 inches in diameter.", "The Gray Double Sided Quilted Walker Bags allow you to carry mail, newspapers, or personal items while using your walker. These decorative cotton tote bags have pockets in the front and back that are held in place by hook-and-loop closures. Machine wash and tumble dry. Pockets measure 13 x 9 inches. Available in Printed Blue or Printed Burgundy and Solid Gray or Solid Burgundy. Gray Double Sided Quilted Walker Bag Features: Conveniently hangs over walker crossbar. Machine wash and tumble dry. Gray Double Sided Quilted Walker Bag Specifications: Pocket dimensions: 13 inches x 9 inches. Length: 15.5 inches. Width: 6.5 inches. Depth: 1.5 inches. Color: Solid Gray.", "The Dress EZ Dressing Aid combines a dressing stick and long handled shoehorn. Features an S-hook at one end and shoehorn at the other, with a 1-inch foam grip handle. A great benefit to people who have restricted movements that hinder dressing. Use the Dress EZ Dressing Aid to reach clothes hangers from clothing rods high in closets, pick up clothing from the floor or reach shoes from under the bed. Choose from 24 or 30 inch lengths. Dress EZ Dressing Aid Features: Combines a dressing stick and long handled shoehorn. S-hook at one end. Shoehorn at the other. Dress EZ Dressing Aid Specifications: 1-inch foam grip handle. Choose from 24 or 30 inch lengths.", "Body Care Long Handle Brush has firm curved bristles designed follow the shape of the head. This means that the handle can be held close to the body without losing power or reach. Body Care Long Handle Brushes and Combs are great for people with limited arm or hand movement. Anti-slip handles are ergonomically designed to lie against user's entire palm. Contoured design is both attractive and functional. Made of polypropylene. Body Care Long Handle Brush 12 inch Features: Firm curved bristles. Handle is designed to lie against user's entire palm. Anti-slip handles. Attractive and functional contoured design.", "Improve your circulation while you enjoy the comfort! The Elevating Leg Rest helps relieve the discomfort from swollen legs and ankles, varicose veins, or phlebitis. Designed to help maintain the \"pelvic tilt\" position that eases stress on the spine. The Elevating Leg Rest helps to decrease pressure and muscle tension on the lower back. Constructed of polyurethane foam for lasting comfort and support. Measures 20 x 26 x 8 inches. White polycotton zippered covers are easily removed for machine washing. Made in the USA. **Oversize item $2.00 extra shipping is included in the price. Elevating Leg Rest Features: Helps relieve the discomfort from swollen legs and ankles, varicose veins, or phlebitis. Helps to decrease pressure and muscle tension on the lower back. Elevating Leg Rest Specifications: Measures 20 x 26 x 8 inches. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "Body Care Long Handle Comb has firm curved bristles designed follow the shape of the head. This means that the handle can be held close to the body without losing power or reach. Body Care Long Handle Comb and brushes are great for people with limited arm or hand movement. Anti-slip handles are ergonomically designed to lie against user's entire palm. Contoured design is both attractive and functional. Made of polypropylene. Body Care Long Handle Comb 14 inch Features: Firm curved bristles. Handle is designed to lie against user's entire palm. Anti-slip handles. Attractive and functional contoured design.", "The Deluxe Sock Aid is an ideal gift for anyone who has difficulty bending due to back problems or total hip replacement surgery. Flexible plastic sheet contours comfortably around your heel and keeps your sock open for your foot to enter. Inside is lined with nylon to reduce friction, and outside lined with terrycloth to hold the sock firmly until it is on the foot. Pull the sock onto your foot by pulling the cloth straps that are attached to the upper end of the plastic sheet. Washable. Deluxe Sock Aid Features: Flexible plastic sheet contours to your heel. Nylon reduces friction. Deluxe Sock Aid Specifications: Washable.", "The high quality stainless steel blade of the Ergonomic Carving Knife has a scalloped rather than a smooth blade to help it stay sharp longer. The Knife has an easy to grip contoured closed handle with blades set at an angle to minimize wrist movement for the user. The handle has been designed to counterbalance the weight of the knife while also being aesthetically pleasing. Blade length is 203mm. Weight 155g.Dishwasher safe. Ergonomic Carving Knife Features: Minimizes wrist movement for the user. Scalloped blade stays sharp longer. Handle is designed to counterbalance the weight of the knife. Ergonomic Carving Knife Specifications: Blade length is 203mm. Weight 155g.", "Deluxe Scooter Tiller Bag includes front zippered pocket, front mesh pocket, side pocket and inside pocket. Less expensive and more secure than a scooter tiller basket. Can be mounted on front or behind of scooter tiller to provide convenient storage. Constructed of high quality water resistent fabric. Made in U.S.A. Measures 9 inches wide x 12 inches long x 3 inches deep. Deluxe Scooter Tiller Bag Features: Front zippered pocket. Side pocket. Inside pocket. High quality water resistent fabric. Deluxe Scooter Tiller Bag Specifications: Can be mounted on front or behind scooter tiller. Width - 9 inches. Length - 12 inches. Depth - 3 inches.", "Disposable Lids for Bowls are Optional lids for weighted or insulated bowls. Plastic disposable lids. Package of 20.", "The Car Caddie is a unique product that offers you a helping hand in or out of a car, van, or truck. Made of quality nylon material that loops around your car window and adjusts for varying heights of vehicle windows, to meet your needs. Just pull on the comfortable cushion grip when you need assistance in or out of your vehicle. Car Caddie Features: Made of quality nylon material. Adjusts to the height of your window. Comfortable cushion hand grip.", "The Dress EZ Dressing Aid combines a dressing stick and long handled shoehorn. Features an S-hook at one end and shoehorn at the other, with a 1-inch foam grip handle. A great benefit to people who have restricted movements that hinder dressing. Use the Dress EZ Dressing Aid to reach clothes hangers from clothing rods high in closets, pick up clothing from the floor or reach shoes from under the bed. Choose from 24 or 30 inch lengths. Dress EZ Dressing Aid Features: Combines a dressing stick and long handled shoehorn. S-hook at one end. Shoehorn at the other. Dress EZ Dressing Aid Specifications: 1-inch foam grip handle. Choose from 24 or 30 inch lengths.", "The Long Reach Garden Tool Cultivator is the solution for gardeners who work in a seated position to reach ground level without bending over. The Ergonomically angled handle keeps the hand and wrist in a natural and comfortable position, while the length of the tool eliminates the strain on the back and shoulders of those who garden in a seated position. The \"Soft feel\" non-slip grip handle gives greater comfort and control, even when wet!Due to the working position and increase weight of the long reach tools, we recommend using the Arm Support Cuff with them. Long Reach Garden Cultivator Features: Non-slip grip handles. Keeps hand and wrist in a natural position. Eliminates strain while gardening. Long Reach Garden Cultivator Specifications: Length - 32 in. Weight - 18 oz.", "The Long Reach Garden Tool Trowel is the solution for gardeners who work in a seated position to reach ground level without bending over. The Ergonomically angled handle keeps the hand and wrist in a natural and comfortable position, while the length of the tool eliminates the strain on the back and shoulders of those who garden in a seated position. The \"Soft feel\" non-slip grip handle gives greater comfort and control, even when wet!Due to the working position and increase weight of the long reach tools, we recommend using the Arm Support Cuff with them. Long Reach Garden Tool Trowel Features: Non-slip grip handles. Keeps hand and wrist in a natural position. Eliminates strain while gardening. Long Reach Garden Tool Trowel Specifications: Length - 34 in. Weight - 20 oz.", "People with pain and, or, limited use of their hands will find using this 10 inch Playing Card Holder easier than trying to hold multiple cards in one hand. The unique slot design allows cards to be easily added or removed. The extended front of the holder provides a convenient place to keep pencils while playing card games. Playing Card Holder 10 inch Features: People with pain and/or limited use of their hands will find using this holder much easier than trying to hold multiple cards in one hand. The slot is designed so that cards can be easily added or removed. Also holds recipes or memos. Pencils and small coins fit on the extended front of the holder. Playing Card Holder 10 inch Specifications: Measures 2\" x 1 3/8\" x 10\".", "The Easi Grip Long Reach Garden Tools Set of 4 are the solution for gardeners who work in a seated position to reach ground level without bending over. The Ergonomically angled handle keeps the hand and wrist in a natural and comfortable position, while the length of the tool eliminates the strain on the back and shoulders of those who garden in a seated position. The \"Soft feel\" non-slip grip handle gives greater comfort and control, even when wet!Due to the working position and increase weight of the long reach tools, we recommend using the Arm Support Cuff with them. Easi Grip Long Reach Garden Tools Set of 4 Features: Non-slip grip handles. Keeps hand and wrist in a natural position. Eliminates strain while gardening. Easi Grip Long Reach Garden Tools Set of 4 Specifications: Set of 4 includes one of each : cultivator,fork, trowel, and hoe. Arm Support Cuff is not included.", "Dycem Non-Slip Jar Opener is made of non-slip Dycem® material. This jar opener provides a soft, sure grip on bottles and jars. Handy kitchen aid to release stubborn jar lids. Flexible so it fits most sizes of jars and ensures a good seal when closing. Opens lids up to 4 inches (10cm) in diameter. Wash in soapy water to retain tackiness. Measures 4 1/2 inch diameter x 2 inches high. Shown in photo with a Dycem non slip mat to hold jar in place - great for one handed users. Dycem Jar Opener Features: Made of non-slip material. Provides a soft, sure grip on bottles and jars. Flexible rubber. Dycem Jar Opener Specifications: Opens lids up to 4 inches. Color choices - Blue.", "The ErgoTek Plus 26 inch Reacher features a unique hook trigger that provides easy operation and allows you to hang the reacher by the trigger on a walker or wheelchair. The ergonomic textured handle and trigger allows the heel of your hand and fingers to be in a more natural position when using this reacher. The jaws of the 26 inch Ergo Tek Plus Reacher open to 3 1/4 inches for grasping larger objects such as 15 oz cans. You can use the magnetic tip for picking up small metal objects, such as paper clips. You can use the clip for storing the reacher on round tubing of a walker, wheelchair or bedside rail. The Ergo Tek Plus 26 inch Reacher weighs 6.2 oz., making it lightweight and ideal for picking up clothes when dressing. ErgoTek Plus™ 26 inch Reacher Features: Only 8 oz of pressure is required at the trigger to close the jaws. Lightweight and durable aluminum reacher. Ideal for picking up cans, dressing and other activities of daily living. Unique hook trigger. Includes magnetic tip, clip for storing, and pulling post. ErgoTek Plus™ 26 inch Reacher Specifications: Jaws open: 3 1/4 inches. Length: 26 inches. Weight: 6.2 oz.", "A unique feature of the Easy Out Tube Squeezer allows the last drop to be squeezed from the nozzle of the tube after the tube has been expelled up to the collar. Ideal for toothpastes, lotions, salves, silicones, and other household products. Package of 2. Easy Out Tube Squeezer Features: Helps squeezes tubes flat from the bottom up. Allows the last drop to be squeezed from the tube. Easy Out Tube Squeezer Specifications: Package of 2.", "The 32 inch EZ Reacher with SAF-T-LOK has round silicone tips that provide a powerful and secure grip with delicate sensitivity. Constructed of lightweight aluminum with a stainless steel spring mechanism for heavy-duty use. The handle is comfortable to hold and has an easy-to-operate pistol grip full finger trigger. EZ Reachers will handle objects of different shapes and sizes up to 5 lbs. The jaws open to 4.5 inches wide. The locking model has an on/off lever locking mechanism to hold the jaws securely around the item being retrieved. A flip of the thumb releases the lock. Optional wrist support provides added arm support for people with limited strength. 32 inch model with lock weighs 11 1/2 oz. 32 inch EZ Reacher with SAF-T-LOK Features: Round silicone tips that provide a powerful and secure grip. Constructed of lightweight aluminum. Has a steel spring mechanism for heavy-duty use. Handle is comfortable to hold. Easy-to-operate pistol grip full finger trigger. 32 inch EZ Reacher with SAF-T-LOK Specifications: Holds up to 5 lbs. 32 inch model with lock weighs 11 1/2 oz. Jaws open to 4.5 inches wide.", "The Easy Opener opens bottle caps, pull tabs, and box tops easily with minimal stress. Multipurpose opener features a spade shaped blade for opening boxes, tab for pulling open soda can pop tops, and a center round rubber grip for opening plastic drink bottles. Dishwasher safe. Easy Opener Features: Easily opens bottle caps, pull tabs, and even those impossible box tops! Helps provide leverage to minimize stress. Easy Opener Specifications: Dishwasher safe. Dimensions: 5.5 inches long, 2 inches wide, 1 inch high. Color: white.", "Use this 48 inch Rainbow Gait Belt to provide assistance for individuals when walking, standing, or sitting. The 2 inch wide cotton belt features a metal buckle with teeth for secure closing and easy adjusting. Machine washable. 48 inch Rainbow Belt Features: Made from cotton. Metal buckle has teeth. Holds securely around the patient. Adjusts easily. 48 inch Rainbow Belt Specifications: 2 inches wide. Machine washable.", "The Centurian Cushion with Basic Cover offers pressure and shear reduction for the moderate risk user. Combined layers of 5/8 inch Akton Polymer and 5/8 inch foam are sealed in a waterproof film barrier for complete protection. Offering significant comfort for active clients who need a light to medium weight cushion with low maintenance, the Centurian Cushion with Basic Cover is also the first choice of long term care facilities for decubitus prevention and treatment. The Basic Cover is sold with the Centurian. The Basic Cover is made of a durable stretch knit material. Soft black pontae fabric, zippered on three sides, removable and washable. An Incontinent Cover is also available for an additional charge. ** (You can order the Incontinent Cover instead of OR in addition to the Basic Cover).The Centurian Cushion with Basic Cover total thickness is 1 1/4 inches. Custom sizes also available - please contact us by phone for a custom size quote. Toll free number 1.877.750.0376. Shipping via UPS Ground. Centurion Cushion with Basic Cover Features: Pressure and shear reduction. Waterproof film barrier. Combines Akton Polymer and foam. Requires low maintenance. Decubitus prevention and treatment. Cover is durable stretch knit material. Soft black pontae fabric. Zippered on three sides. Removable and washable. Centurion Cushion with Basic Cover Specifications: Cover is sold with the Centurian. Total thickness is 1 1/4 inches. Incontinent Cover is available. Custom sizes available call toll free 1-877-750-0376. This is a non-returnable hygiene item.", "Our Economy Hip Kit with 32 inch Economy Reacher includes 4 of the most recommended ADL items for patients recovering from total hip replacement surgery or total knee surgery. A ideal kit of items for people recovering from surgery or injury. Includes items to help the user remain independent when bathing, dressing and performing other activities at home. Conveniently provides the ADL items most often suggested by physical therapists or occupational therapists. Economy Hip Kit with 32 inch Economy Reacher Features: Kit features recommended ADL items for patients recovering from hip/knee surgery or injury. An essential item to have if you are preparing for hip or knee surgery. Also for people who suffer from limited motion or arthritis. Economy Hip Kit with 32 inch Economy Reacher includes one each: Long Handle Contoured Sponge. Sock Aid with Cords and Foam Handles. Long Handle 18 inch Shoe Horn. 32 inch Economy Reacher.", "These bright yellow Easy Glide Walker Tips simply fit over the rubber tips on the back legs of a walker to instantly glide over any surface. The Walker Tips are ideal for front wheeled walkers. Bright colored tips also help with visibility on uneven surfaces. Attach without tools on 1 1/8 inch standard tips. Easy Glide Walker Tips Features: Easy to see Bright yellow color! Easily fit over the rubber tips of walkers. Easy Glide Walker Tips Specifications: NO tools needed for attachment. Fit on 1 1/8 inch standard tips.", "The Easi-Grip Forked Knife features a forked end that aids in holding food. Forked Knife has a 6 inch curved blade.The handles of Easi-Grip Knives and Utensils are molded in a soft feel plastic, which gives a firm comfortable grip in either hand. The stainless steel tools are setat 90 degrees from the handle, keeping the hand and wrist in a neutral stress free position. Easi-Grip Knives and Kitchen Tools are supremely comfortable for everyone to use, but will be particularly beneficial for those with arthritis, Repetitive Strain Injury, Carpal Tunnel Syndrome or other conditions which weaken the hand and wrist. All items are dishwasher safe. Easi-Grip Forked Knife Features: Soft feel plastic handles. Angle of handle keeps arm, wrist, and hand in a stress free position. Easi-Grip Forked Knife Specifications: Blade Length - 6 in. Dishwasher safe.", "The Easi Grip Garden Tools Trowel has an ergonomically angled handle to keep the hand and wrist in a natural position, taking the strain and discomfort out of gardening. The stainless steel metal section helps prevent soil adhesion. The soft feel non-slip grip prevents the tools from turning in the hand, giving a firmer grip even in wet conditions. Easi Grip Garden Trowel Features: Stainless steel metal prevents soil adhesion. Angled handle. Keeps hand and wrist in a natural position. Soft feel non-slip grip. Easi Grip Garden Trowel Specifications: Length- 10 in. Weight- 9 oz. The Easi Grip Garden Trowel can be used with the plug-in arm support cuff which allows the strength of the forearm to also be used.", "Our Economy Hip Kit with Economy Reacher features recommended ADL items for patients recovering from hip or knee surgery or injury. A must for people recovering from total hip replacement or total knee replacement surgery. Includes items to help the user remain independent when bathing, dressing and doing other activities at home. Conveniently provides the ADL items needed after hip surgery, the items most often suggested by therapists. Economy Hip Kit with Economy Reacher Features: Kit features recommended ADL items for patients recovering from hip/knee surgery or injury. An essential item to have if you are preparing for hip or knee surgery. Also for people who suffer from limited motion or arthritis. Economy Hip Kit with Economy Reacher includes one each: Sock Aid with Foam Handles AMCSA2001. Long Handle Contoured Sponge NC28645. Dressing Stick AMCDS1001. Plastic Shoehorn 16 1/4 inch ASN232. Economy 26 inch Reacher AMC326.", "The Easi Grip Garden Tools Fork has an ergonomically angled handle to keep the hand and wrist in a natural position, taking the strain and discomfort out of gardening.The stainless steel metal section helps prevent soil adhesion. The soft feel non-slip grip prevents the tools from turning in the hand, giving a firmer grip even in wet conditions. Easi Grip Garden Fork Features: Stainless steel metal prevents soil adhesion. Angled handle. Keeps hand and wrist in a natural position. Soft feel non-slip grip. Easi Grip Garden Fork Specifications: Length- 10 in. Weight- 9 oz. The Easi Grip Garden Fork can be used with the plug-in arm support cuff which allows the strength of the forearm to also be used.", "The Long 32 inch Economy Reacher is lightweight and easier to grip than other reachers. Made of anodized aluminum with a high-impact plastic handle, trigger and extra-depth jaw. Only 7oz of pressure is required at the trigger to close the jaws. Jaws open to 2.75 inches for grasping larger objects such as 15 oz cans. Complete with magnetic tip and drag lug to help retrieve small objects. Long 32 inch Economy Reacher Features: Allows for easy reaching. High-impact plastic handle. Includes magnetic tip and drag lug. Long 32 inch Economy Reacher Specifications: Weight: 7.2 oz. Length: 32 inches. Claw: C shaped, opens 2.75 inches.", "Use Colored Foam Tubing for a variety of tasks. Build up handles on eating utensils, toothbrushes, pens, pencils, tools and other hard to grasp items. To use simply cut the foam to your desired length. The Foam comes in three different inner diameters to fit large or small handles. Slip resistant, non-absorbent and dishwasher safe foam tubing. Package of 6. 12 inches long. Color-Coded Handle Foam Features: Builds up handles on hard to grasp items. Slip resistant, non-absorbent and dishwasher safe. Color-Coded Handle Foam Specifications: Length is 12 inches. Package of 6. Tan has an inner diameter of 1/4 inch, outer diameter 1 inch. Red has an inner diameter of 3/8 inch, outer diameter 1 1/8 inch. Blue has an inner diameter 1 inch, outer diameter 1 1/8 inch. Assorted has 2 of each size. Latex free", "Ideal for persons who have difficulty tying their laces. These Elastic Shoe Laces allow enough stretch so that shoes can be slipped on or off without untying. These flat elastic laces remain tied better than round elastic laces.Three pairs per package. 24 inch fit 4-5 eyelet pairs, and 30 inch fit 6 eyelet pairs. Elastic Shoe Lace Features: Shoes can be slipped on or off without untying. Flat elastic laces remain tied better than round elastic laces. Put your shoes on without bending over. Elastic Shoe Lace Specifications: 3 pairs per package. Color: white, black and brown. Size: 24 inch fit 4-5 eyelet pairs, and 30 inch fit 6 eyelet pairs.", "The Long Reach Garden Tool Fork is the solution for gardeners who work in a seated position to reach ground level without bending over. The Ergonomically angled handle keeps the hand and wrist in a natural and comfortable position, while the length of the tool eliminates the strain on the back and shoulders of those who garden in a seated position. The \"Soft feel\" non-slip grip handle gives greater comfort and control, even when wet!Due to the working position and increase weight of the long reach tools, we recommend using the Arm Support Cuff with them. Long Reach Garden Tool Fork Features: Non-slip grip handles. Keeps hand and wrist in a natural position. Eliminates strain while gardening. Long Reach Garden Tool Fork Specifications: Length - 35 in. Weight - 18.5 oz.", "The Akton Polymer Oval Commode Pad provides comfort and relief from pressure and shear. Velcro adhesive strips make pad easy to attach, use and maintain.The Akton Polymer Oval Commode Pad won't leak, flow, or bottom out, and it is tissue equivalent. It moves with patients, not against them, to reduce pressure and shear, the two leading causes of pressure sores.The Akton Polymer Oval Commode Pad is also X-ray translucent and easy to clean with standard disinfectant. It will not support microbiological growth, and it won't absorb body fluids or odors. Akton Polymer Oval Commode Pad Features: Won't leak, flow, or bottom out. Moves with patients, not against them! Won't absorb body fluids or odors! Akton Polymer Oval Commode Pad Specifications: Measures: 16 x 16 x 5/8 in. with 8 x 12 in. oval opening. Non returnable hygiene item. Ships via UPS Ground.", "The Easy on Utensil Holder hand strap with utensil pouch assists people with limited or no grip to use eating and writing utensils. No grasping is required to hold utensils. Can also be used to hold combs and other objects. Cone shaped plastic grip has hook and loop closures on D ring strap. Can be adjusted to fit palms 7-9 inches. Easy on Utensil Holder Features: Assists people with limited or no grip to use eating and writing utensils. No grasping is required to hold utensils. Can also be used to hold combs and other objects. Easy on Utensil Holder Specifications: Can be adjusted to fit palms 7-9 inches. Hook-and-loop closures on D ring strap.", "Easie Eaters are lightweight and easy to grip curved utensils for children. These curved utensils are offered for right handed or left handed users. Set includes fork and spoon. Designed by OT. Red, blue, or purple (sorry, no color choice).Set includes fork and spoon.***Utensils with Mouth guard are available by special request. Easie Eaters Feature: Easy to grip curved handles. Built up handles make them easier to hold. Easie Eater Specifications: Dishwasher safe. Colors- Red, blue, or purple. Set includes fork and spoon.", "EZ Key Turners are enlarged key holders designed to triple the leverage, allowing a person to open hard-to-turn locks with less effort. Large T-shaped key holders fit over the top of a standard key. The turner provides a large grasping surface and leverage for turning the key. Different colors aid in key identification. Package of 2. EZ Key Turner Features: Triples the leverage supplied by the average key head. Different colors aid in key/lock identification. Easy to find in a pocket or purse. EZ Key Turner Specifications: Package of 2. Dimensions: 1.25 x 0.25 x 2.25 inches. Does not fit keys with thick plastic heads.", "Crutch Mate Gel Arm Pads are designed to reduce friction and help prevent the incidence of skin breakdown. Crutch Mate Gel Arm Pads are especially useful for individuals who utilize crutches for longer periods. Gel arm pads provide long lasting comfort. Crutch Mate Gel Arm Pads attach easily to crutches with hook-and-loop closures. Crutch Mate Gel Arm Pads slide over existing hand support bar. They can be wiped down with a damp cloth and mild soap or disinfectant. Crutch Mate Gel Arm Pads are sold in pairs. Crutch Mate Gel Arm Pads Features: Made from glycerin gel. Reduce friction and prevent skin breakdown. Provide long lasting comfort. Hook-and-loop closures. Crutch Mate Gel Arm Pads Specifications: Attach to crutches with hook-and-loop closures. Sold in pairs. Gel pads are 3/8\" thick gel.", "EZ Reachers with round silicone tips provide a powerful and secure grip with delicate sensitivity. Constructed of lightweight aluminum with a stainless steel spring mechanism for heavy-duty use. The handle is comfortable to hold and has an easy-to-operate pistol grip full finger trigger. EZ Reachers will handle objects of different shapes and sizes up to 5 lbs. The jaws open to 4.5 inches wide. The locking model has an on/off lever locking mechanism to hold the jaws securely around the item being retrieved. A flip of the thumb releases the lock. Optional wrist support provides added arm support for people with limited strength. 22 inch models weigh 9 oz. 22 inch EZ Reacher with SAF-T-LOK Features: Round silicone tips provide a powerful and secure grip with delicate sensitivity. Constructed of lightweight aluminum. Handle is comfortable to hold. Easy-to-operate pistol grip full finger trigger. Automatic locking mechanism to hold the jaws securely around the item being retrieved. 22 inch EZ Reacher with SAF-T-LOK Specifications: 22 inch models weigh 9 oz. Jaws open to 4.5 inches wide.", "Crutch Mate Gel Hand Pads are designed to reduce friction and help prevent the incidence of skin breakdown. Especially useful for individuals who utilize crutches for longer periods. Crutch Mate Gel Hand Pads provide long lasting comfort and attach easily to crutches. Crutch Mate Gel Hand Pads slide over the existing crutch hand support bar. They can be wiped down with a damp cloth and mild soap or disinfectant. Crutch Mate Gel Hand Pads are sold in pairs.To install, simply remove the old hand grip core from the crutch, and slip off the original foam pad. Next, push the core through the Crutch-Mate™ Hand Grip Crutch Pad and re-assemble the crutch. Crutch Mate Gel Hand Pads Features: Made from glycerin gel. Reduce friction and prevent skin breakdown. Provide long lasting comfort. The hand grips are completely round and slide on. Fits both auxiliary crutches and forearm crutches. Crutch Mate Gel Hand Pads Specifications: Gel pads are 3/8\" thick gel. Sold in pairs.", "Ideal for use with the E-Z Shampoo. The EZ Shower provides the comfort and refreshment of a shampoo to bedridden individuals. Fill the EZ Shower bag with 2 ½ gallons of warm water, carry to the bedside using the wooden handle, and hang on IV pole or bedpost by the EZ Shower's sturdy nylon cord. Gently spray the cleansing water using the hose which also controls water flow with an on and off valve. Can be used with the EZ Shampoo Basin to shampoo hair almost anywhere. The Shampoo Basin is sold separately. Manufacture's one year limited warranty. EZ-Shower Features: The easy fill spout prevents splashing and snaps shut for a water-tight seal. Holds 2.5 gallons of water so you can completely shampoo and rinse your hair. Can be hung where ever you need water for bathing. EZ-Shower Specifications: Capacity: 2.5 gallons water. Hose: 2 feet in length. Latex Free Heavy Duty Vinyl.", "Adaptive Cube Pad are true gel cushions constructed of Akton polymer. These true Gel Pads will not leak, flow, or bottom out, and is tissue equivalent. True Gel moves with the skin, not against it, to reduce pressure and shear, the two leading causes of pressure sores. Unlike liquid gel cushions, the Akton polymer does not migrate, depleting its quality and jeopardizing a person?s skin integrity. Provides pressure and shear reduction that requires no pumps, electricity or special training to use. Easy to clean with standard disinfectant. It will not support microbiological growth, and it won't absorb body fluids or odors. Available in varying sizes and thickness to accommodate individual needs.The Adaptive Cube Gel Pad is 100% Akton Polymer. True gel cubes provide increased air flow. Adaptive Cube Gel Pads have multifunctional applications for traditional and non-traditional seating challenges. Pads can be cut up to be used for protection on arm pads, foot plates, head rests or leg rests, and splint or brace applications. Adaptive Cube Pad Features: Moves with the skin, not against it, to reduce pressure and shear. Easy to clean with standard disinfectant. Will not support microbiological growth, and it won't absorb body fluids or odors. Will not leak, flow, or bottom out, and is tissue equivalent. Adaptive Cube Pad Specifications: 100% Akton Polymer. This is a non-returnable hygiene item.", "The Five Cleat Ice Pick is a plated steel attachment that prevents a cane or crutch from slipping on snow-covered, slushy or icy surfaces. It clamps onto canes and crutches from 5/8 to 1 inch diameter with the screws provided. Simply squeeze the two plastic knobs together to swing the point into place and lock into position for use.When not needed, flip the point up in the retracted position to expose the rubber tip of the cane for normal use. A screwdriver is required for installation. Five Cleat Ice Pick for Canes and Crutches Features: Five points help prevent a cane or crutch from slipping on snow-covered, slushy or icy surfaces. When not needed, it flips out of the way. Five Cleat Ice Pick for Canes and Crutches Specifications: Clamps onto canes or crutches from 5/8\" to 1\" in diameter with the screws provided. One per package.", "The Deluxe Walker Side Bag is large enough to hold books, magazines, etc. Six separate storage areas let you store and access belongings easily. Attaches to side of walker. Constructed of high quality water resistant fabric. Made in U.S.A. Measures 9 inches wide x 12 inches long x 3 inches deep. Deluxe Walker Side Bag Features: Large enough to hold books, magazines, etc. Six separate storage areas. High quality water resistant fabric. Deluxe Walker Side Bag Specifications: Width - 9 inches. Length - 12 inches. Depth - 3 inches.", "The Folding 26 inch Economy Reacher is easier to grasp and hold than other folding reachers. Only 7oz of pressure is required at the trigger to close the jaws. Ergonomic designed handle and trigger allows the heel of hand and fingers to be in a more natural position requiring less pressure and less force. Soft, slip-resistant santoprene molding over the jaw and C shaped claw with interlocking tips improve grip force with clothing and other fabrics. Jaws open to 2.75 inches for grasping larger objects such as 15 oz cans. In the tip end of the reacher is a magnetic tip for picking up small metal objects (like paper clips), and a pulling post for added versatility when retrieving objects. The Folding 26 inch Economy Reacher has the pulling post and magnet in the tip end of the reacher. Measures 14 inches when folded, 26 inches when fully extended. Weighs 5.8 oz. Collapses flat to provide more convenient placement in wheelchairs, walker baskets and scooter backpacks. Folding 26 inch Economy Reacher Features: High-impact plastic handle. Folds flat for easy travel. Ergonomic handle and trigger. Folding 26 inch Economy Reacher Specifications: Weight: 5.8 oz. Length: Folded 14 inches, extended 26 inches. Includes: Drag lug, magnetic tip Claw: C shaped, opens 2.75 inches,", "Positioned horizontally, this Dual Position Wedge gently elevates your head. Positioned vertically, it provides upper back support while sitting. Features a removable washable poly cotton cover. Measures 22 inches long by 19 inches wide and 12 inches high. Made in USA. Dual Position Wedge Features: Gently elevates head. Provides upper back support. Removable, washable poly cotton cover. Dual Position Wedge Specifications: Length - 22 in. Width - 19 in. Height - 12 in. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "The most effective patented non-slip material on the market, Dycem ® is not sticky but grips on both sides to prevent movement on dry, slippery surfaces. The Large Dycem No Slip Mats can be used on trays and tables and carts to prevent plates and cups from sliding. Mats can be used under mixing bowls and chopping boards to hold them firmly in place and consequently reduce the risk of accidents. Mats can stabilize a range of items, such as telephones, calculators or writing paper, notepads, games and other items for clients with limited grip or mobility. They are helpful when writing, drawing, painting, playing a game or doing a puzzle. ***Variety of sizes available for different uses. Clean with soapy water to retain tackiness. Must be dry before using - not effective when wet. Dycem Non-Slip Mat Features: Reduce the risk of accidents. Mats can be used under just about anything, and won't let anything slip. Dycem Non-Slip Mat Specifications: Large Mat measures 10 x 14 inches. Color choices - blue, red and yellow. Not effective when wet.", "The most effective patented non-slip material on the market, Dycem ® is not sticky but grips on both sides to prevent movement on dry, slippery surfaces. The Small Dycem Non Slip Mats can be used on trays and tables and carts to prevent plates and cups from sliding. Mats can be used under mixing bowls and chopping boards to hold them firmly in place and consequently reduce the risk of accidents. Mats can stabilize a range of items, such as telephones, calculators or writing paper, notepads, games and other items for clients with limited grip or mobility. They are helpful when writing, drawing, painting, playing a game or doing a puzzle. ***Variety of sizes available for different uses. Clean with soapy water to retain tackiness. Must be dry before using - not effective when wet. Dycem Non-Slip Mat Features: Reduce the risk of accidents. Mats can be used under just about anything, and won't let anything slip. Dycem Non-Slip Mat Specifications: Small Dycem Non-slip mat measures 10 x 7 1/4 inches. Color choices - blue, red and yellow. Not effective when wet.", "The Cargo Shelf Under Seat Bag has an open shelf that mounts to the framework of manual wheelchairs for carrying books, clothes, etc. Designed so items will not fall out the back. Also has front zippered pocket for smaller items such as keys, glasses, wallets for extra-easy access. Constructed of high quality, water-resistant fabric. Made in U.S.A. Measures 15 inches wide x 16 inches deep. Cargo Shelf Under Seat Bag Features: Front zippered pocket. High quality, water-resistant fabric. Pocket holds-keys, glasses, wallets. Shelf holds-books, clothes, laptop, etc. Designed so items will not fall out the back. Cargo Shelf Under Seat Bag Specifications: Measures 15 inches wide x 16 inches deep.", "The Formed Sock Aid with Cord Loop Handle has a molded plastic frame that provides for the sock to be slipped over the sock aid and then pulled onto the foot. Rubber self-adhesive pad (included) may be added to provide a non-slip resistance to the sock and can be placed in the best position for the individual user. With this useful aid, users can successfully put on socks without assistance. Formed Sock Aid with Cord Loop Handle Features: Allows the sock to be pulled onto the foot. Rubber self adhesive pad provides a non-slip resistance to the sock. Looped Handle makes it much easier to grasp and pull on sock. Formed Sock Aid with Cord Loop Handle Specifications: Braided cord line connects to both sides of plastic sock aid.", "Easi Grip Add On Handles convert conventional style tools with hard to control handles, to ergonomic grip handles that are easy to use and to control. Simply slip the handle of the tool into the two stainless steel clamps which can be finger tightened with the plastic wing nuts. Use with hand tools, rakes, hoes and brooms. Two handles can be added to long shafted tools such as rakes, hoes, broom, etc. Can be used with the Arm Support cuff for increased control and leverage. Easi Grip Add On Handle Features: Can be fitted to regular garden tools to convert to ergonomic grip. Keep the hand and wrist in a comfortable position. Two stainless steel clamps. Improve leverage, making it easier and less painful to use garden tools. Can be fitted to long handled items to give an upright working position, thus preventing undue back strain and giving a wider field of work without twisting the body. Easi Grip Add On Handle Specifications: Package of 2. Key operated stainless steel clamps enough to slide over the handle of the tool (max diameter 40mm, 1.5?).", "The Front Armrest Bag For Wheelchairs is a large size bag that mounts to end of armrests and is easily detachable. Extends from the front of the armrest. Zippered top enclosure for added security. Side pockets provide plenty of storage room. Features a light weight aluminum frame that allows the bag to always be open.Fits both wheelchair and scooter arm rests. Attaches to most armrests using unique \"soft to the skin\" mounting system. Can be mounted on inside or outside of armrest. The Front Armrest Bag measures 7 inches high x 12 inches diameter. Front Armrest Bag Features: Large size bag that mounts to end of armrests and is easily detachable. Zippered top enclosure for added security. Side pockets provide plenty of storage room. Front Armrest Bag Specifications: Measures 7 inches high x 12 inches diameter. Fits both wheelchair and scooter arm rests. Can be mounted on inside or outside of armrest.", "The Easi Grip Arm Support Cuff is designed to assist gardeners who suffer from weak hands and wrists. The Arm Support Cuff easily plugs into the back of any Easi Grip tool. This product is great for those who struggle with weak hands or wrists, but love to work outside. The Arm Support Cuff causes the forearm and upper arm strength to be used to move the tool. This decreases the strain on their wrist and fingers.Garden Tool is not included. Easi Grip Arm Support Cuff Features: Plugs easily into any easigrip tool. Decreases strain on the wrist and fingers.", "Furniture Risers are an alternative to a lift chair for people who need assistance rising from their existing furniture. Heavy duty plastic reinforced with ribbed construction. Wide base for stability. Deep depression securely holds furniture legs. Protective non-skid floor pads.Set of 8 includes four 3 inch high and four 4 inch high. Use the risers separately to raise two pieces of furniture 3 inches and 4 inches, or stack the risers to raise one piece of furniture 5 inches. Furniture Risers Features: For people who need assistance rising from their existing furniture. Heavy duty plastic reinforced with ribbed construction. Protective non-skid pads protects furniture and floor. Furniture Risers Specifications: Set of 8 includes four 3 inch high and four 4 inch high. Wide base for stability. Width of 4 inch Risers: 5 inches at base, 3.75 inches at top. Width of 3 inch Risers: 4.5 inches at base, 3.75 inches at top. Can accommodate furniture legs up to 2.5 inches in diameter. Weight Capacity: 350 lbs including person and furniture.", "The Easi Grip Garden Tools Cultivator has an ergonomically angled handle to keep the hand and wrist in a natural position, taking the strain and discomfort out of gardening. The stainless steel metal section helps prevent soil adhesion. The soft feel non-slip grip prevents the tools from turning in the hand, giving a firmer grip even in wet conditions. Easi Grip Garden Cultivator Features: Stainless steel metal prevents soil adhesion. Angled handle. Keeps hand and wrist in a natural position. Soft feel non-slip grip. Easi Grip Garden Cultivator Specifications: Length- 9 in. Weight- 5.6 oz. The Easi Grip Garden Cultivator can be used with the plug-in arm support cuff which allows the strength of the forearm to also be used.", "The Adaptive Flat Pads are 100% smooth Akton Polymer. Adaptive Pads have multifunctional applications for traditional and non-traditional seating challenges. Pads can be cut and used for spot protection on products, such as arm pads, foot plates, head rests, leg rests, and splints or braces. Adaptive Pads are available in 1/4 inch 1/2 inch and 5/8 inch thicknesses. The Adaptive Pad when used as a cushion is intended for comfort only, not medical intervention. AKTON polymer won't leak, flow, or bottom out, and it is tissue equivalent. It moves with wheelchair users, not against them, to reduce pressure and shear, the two leading causes of pressure sores. AKTON polymer is also radiolucent and easy to clean with standard disinfectant. It will not support microbiological growth, and it won't absorb body fluids or odors.Cover option does not apply. 1/4 inch Akton Polymer Adaptive Flat Pad Features: Won't leak, flow, or bottom out, and it is tissue equivalent. Multifunctional applications for traditional and non-traditional seating challenges. Moves with wheelchair users, not against them, to reduce pressure and shear. Radiolucent and easy to clean with standard disinfectant. Will not support microbiological growth, and it won't absorb body fluids or odors. 1/4 inch Akton Polymer Adaptive Flat Pad Specifications: Available in 1/4 inch 1/2 inch and 5/8 inch thicknesses. Measures: 18 x 18 x 1/4 inch. This is a non-returnable hygiene item. Shipping via UPS Ground.", "The Long Reach Garden Tool Hoe is the solution for gardeners who work in a seated position to reach ground level without bending over. The Ergonomically angled handle keeps the hand and wrist in a natural and comfortable position, while the length of the tool eliminates the strain on the back and shoulders of those who garden in a seated position. The \"Soft feel\" non-slip grip handle gives greater comfort and control, even when wet!Due to the working position and increase weight of the long reach tools, we recommend using the Arm Support Cuff with them. Long Reach Garden Tool Hoe Features: Non-slip grip handles. Keeps hand and wrist in a natural position. Eliminates strain while gardening. Long Reach Garden Tool Hoe Specifications: Length - 31 in. Weight - 20 oz.", "The Ez Reacher Wrist Support provides optional wrist support and added arm support for people with limited strength. Fits all EZ Reachers.", "The Good Grips Rocker Knife has a large, easy to hold handle made of soft, rubber material, with flexible ribbing that is comfortable to hold. The Rocker Knife, with a rounded knife blade, utilizes a rocking motion for easier cutting, which requires minimal arm strength. The extended safety cap protects fingers while cutting. A great solution for persons who have had a stroke, and for persons with limited arm movement, strength or arthritis. Good Grips Rocker Knife Features: Large soft rubber handle to cushion your grip. Utilizes a rocking motion for easier cutting. Dishwasher safe. Great for people with weak grasp. Requires minimal arm strength. Good Grips Rocker Knife Specifications: Extended safety cap protects fingers while cutting. Latex free.", "Coated surface of the Easy Slider 30 inch Shoehorn makes it easy for the foot to slide into the shoe. Textured grip handle is easy to grasp. Enameled steel shaft. Easy Slider 30 inch Shoehorn Features: Textured grip handle is easy to grasp. Easy Slider 30 inch Shoehorn Specifications: Enameled steel shaft. Length: 30 inches.", "The Good Grips Roller knife measures 8 inches long. Circular blade measures 3 inch diameter. Weighs 4 oz. Dishwasher safe.The Good Grips line features durable, non-slip flexible handles on every product. Ergonomically designed to fit the palm comfortably and softly, the pressure-absorbing processed rubber handle puts less tension on the hands, while providing an outstanding grip. Made from the same material dishwasher gaskets are constructed of, the handles are slip-proof, wet or dry, as well as dishwasher-safe. Good Grips products are moderately priced and have won the Tylenol/Arthritis Foundation Design Award. Good Grips Roller Knife Features: Simply roll across food to cut. Nonslip flexible handles. Dishwasher Safe. Good Grips Roller Knife Specifications: Latex free. Measures 8 inches long. Weighs 4 oz.", "The Dysphagia Cup is for people who have Dyshpagia or difficulties swallowing. The shape of the cup causes the chin to be tucked while drinking. The Dysphagia Cup's special design directs the liquid to the center of the mouth, this helps to prevent liquid from escaping at the lips. The shape also provides nose clearance for the drinker to empty the cup without tilting their head back. The weighted base helps to slow tremors. This cup is also dishwasher safe! Dysphagia Cup Features: Helps to eliminate spills. Weighted base slows tremors. Dysphagia Cup Specifications: Dishwasher safe. Color: Almond.", "The Insulated Bowl keeps food warm or cold. Optional disposable lids available below. Measures 4 1/2 inch diameter, 2 3/4 inches tall. Microwave and dishwasher safe. 12 oz capacity. Blue. Insulated Bowl Features: Will hold up to 12 oz. Keeps any drink warm or cold. Insulated Bowl Specifications: Diameter: 4 1/2 inch. Height: 2 3/4 inch.", "The Souper Spoon is ideal for persons with tremors or poor hand control. Features a specially designed 1/8 inch raised lip to prevent spills while moving the spoon toward the mouth. Total length measures 7 1/8 inch.The Good Grips line features durable, non-slip flexible handles on every product. Ergonomically designed to fit the palm comfortably and softly, the pressure-absorbing processed rubber handle puts less tension on the hands, while providing an outstanding grip. Made from the same material dishwasher gaskets are constructed of, the handles are slip-proof, wet or dry, as well as dishwasher-safe. Good Grips products are moderately priced and have won the Tylenol/Arthritis Foundation Design Award. Good Grips Souper Spoon Features: Large soft rubber handle to cushion your grip. 1/8 inch raised bowl lip helps prevent spills. Bendable metal shafts. Dishwasher safe Great for people with weak grasp Good Grips Souper Spoon Specifications: Bend for use with either the right or left hand. Total length measures 7 1/8 inch. Latex free.", "The Cane Holder keeps the cane in an upright position. The cane holder is a spring-loaded clip designed to grip a cane or crutch tubing up to 7/8 inch diameter. Holder will secure the cane to a table, desk, or counter. Holder rests on tabletop or can be wedged beneath to secure crutch or cane. Foam disks protects surface of furniture. Cane Holder Features: Stops cane from falling. Holds cane upright. Holder rests on tabletop. Foam disks protects surface of furniture. Easily snaps onto any crutch or cane tubing. Cane Holder Specifications: Clamps cane or crutch up to 7/8 inch in diameter.", "The Good Grips 5 inch utility knife has the unique Good Grips® handle for comfortable and safe cutting. Built-up, pressure-absorbing handle is ideal for people with arthritis or limited ability to grasp. Sharp, stainless steel blade. Soft, non-slip handle for a secure grip. Measures 10 inches long. Weighs 3 oz.Dishwasher safe, but the manufacturer recommends hand wash with warm, soapy water and promptly dry.The Good Grips line features durable, nonslip flexible handles on every product. Ergonomically designed to fit the palm comfortably and softly, the pressure-absorbing processed rubber handle puts less tension on the hands, while providing an outstanding grip. Made from the same material dishwasher gaskets are constructed of, the handles are slip-proof, wet or dry, as well as dishwasher-safe. Good Grips products are moderately priced and have won the Tylenol/Arthritis Foundation Design Award. Good Grips Utility Knife Features: Built-up, pressure-absorbing handle. Ideal for those with arthritis or limited ability to grasp. Sharp, stainless steel blade. Non-slip handle for a secure grip. Good Grips Utility Knife Specifications: Measures 10 inches long. Weighs 3 oz. Dishwasher safe.", "Our Economy Hip Kit with Economy 26 inch Reacher feature recommended items for patients recovering from hip or knee surgery or injury. A must for people recovering from total hip replacement or total knee replacement surgery. Includes items to help the user remain independent when bathing, dressing and doing other activities at home. Conveniently provides the ADL items needed after hip surgery, the items most often suggested by therapists. Economy Hip Kit with 26 inch Economy Reacher Features: Kit features recommended ADL items for patients recovering from hip/knee surgery or injury. An essential item to have if you are preparing for hip or knee surgery. Also for people who suffer from limited motion or arthritis. Economy Hip Kit with 26 inch Economy Reacher includes one each: Long Handle Contoured Sponge. Sock Aid with Cords and Foam Handles. Long Handle 18 inch Shoe Horn. Economy 26 inch Reacher.", "The Good Grips Weighted Fork features the same great design as the Good Grips Utensils. The 6 ounces of weight in the built-up handle provides more control so that the utensil reaches the mouth easier. Ideal for persons with limited hand control, Parkinson's disease or spasticity. Good Grips Weighted Fork Features: Weighted utensils are ideal for those with Parkinson's Disease or hand tremors. Large soft rubber handle to cushion your grip. Bendable metal shafts. Dishwasher safe. Great for people with weak grasp. Good Grips Weighted Fork Specifications: Bend for use with either the right or left hand. 6 oz. weight added to the handle. Latex free.", "Standard 26 inch Economy Reacher requires only 7oz of pressure at the trigger to close the jaws. Ergonomic designed handle and trigger allows the heel of hand and fingers to be in a more natural position requiring less pressure and less force. Soft, slip-resistant jaw and C shaped claw with interlocking tips improve grip force with clothing and other fabrics. Jaws open to 2.75 inches for grasping larger objects such as 15 oz cans. In the tip end of the reacher is a magnetic tip for picking up small metal objects (like paper clips), and a pulling post for added versatility when retrieving objects. 26 inch Economy Reacher Features: High-impact plastic handle. Magnetic tip. Less force required for grasping. 26 inch Economy Reacher Specifications: Weight: 6.2 oz. Length: 26 inches. Claw: C shaped, opens to 2.75 inches.", "The Good Grips Weighted Utensils Set of Four includes one each Good Grips Weighted Teaspoon, Good Grips Weighted Tablespoon, Good Grips Weighted Fork, Good Grips Weighted Rocker Knife.These weighted utensils feature the same great design as the Good Grips Utensils. The 6 ounces of weight in the built-up handle provides more control so that the utensil reaches the mouth easier. Ideal for persons with limited hand control, Parkinson's disease or spasticity. Good Grips Weighted Utensil Set Features: Weighted utensils are ideal for those with Parkinson's Disease or hand tremors. Large soft rubber handle to cushion your grip. Bendable metal shafts. Dishwasher safe. Great for people with weak grasp. Good Grips Weighted Utensil Set Specifications: Bend for use with either the right or left hand. 6 oz. weight added to the handle. Latex free.", "The Electric Razor Strap has an adjustable 1/2 inch wide strap with hook and loop (Velcro) closure that holds a variety of razor types. It provides people with weak hands a secure grip for shaving. Thumb loops aids in securing straps. Non returnable hygiene item. Electric Razor Strap Features: Conforms easily and comfortably over the users hand. Provides a secure grip for shaving. Helps people with weak hands or grasp. Electric Razor Strap Specifications: Measures: 1/2\" x 4\" x 6\". Fits most popular electric razors.", "The KEatlery Weighted Soup Spoon uses weight to steady the users hand, helping them to eat, and to decrease hand tremors. Stainless steel construction and dishwasher safe. Utensils weigh an average of 7.2 - 7.5 ounces each. KEatlery Weighted Soup Spoon Features: Allows more control when eating. Stainless steel. Dishwasher safe. KEatlery Weighted Soup Spoon Specifications: Weight: 7.2 - 7.5 ounces. Order individual utensil or the set.", "The Keatlery Weighted Teaspoon uses weight to steady the users hand, helping them to eat, and to decrease hand tremors. Stainless steel construction and dishwasher safe. Utensils weigh an average of 7.2 - 7.5 ounces each. Keatlery Weighted Teaspoon Features: Allows more control when eating. Stainless steel. Dishwasher safe. Keatlery Weighted Teaspoon Specifications: Weight: 7.2 - 7.5 ounces. Order individual utensil or the set.", "The Elbowlift Suspension Pad benefits patients who are bedridden or who spend time in a wheelchair. The bony prominence at the elbow can make this area susceptible to pressure sores, contusions, and friction burns.Elbowlift Suspension Pads protect the sensitive olecranon and olecranon bursa from friction burns and contusions by elevating and cushioning the elbow in smooth foam.The Elbowlift Suspension Pads help prevent pressure ulcers, pressure sores and other skin injuries. Also guards against olecranon bursitis and ulnar neuritis. Elbowlift Suspension Pad Features: Smooth foam pad elevates and cushions the elbow. Low friction backing improves patient movement. Adjustable hook-and-loop strap keep the pad in place. Suspension Pad helps prevent pressure ulcers, pressure sores and other skin injuries. Elbowlift Suspension Pad Specifications: One size fits all. Machine wash and dry. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "The KEatlery Weighted Utensils Set of 4 includes one knife, fork, teaspoon, and soupspoon. Each utensil uses weight to steady the users hand, helping them to eat, and to decrease hand tremors. Utensils are Stainless steel and dishwasher safe. Utensils weigh an average of 7.2 - 7.5 ounces each. KEatlery Weighted Utensils Set of 4 Features: Allows more control when eating. Stainless steel. Dishwasher safe. KEatlery Weighted Utensils Set of 4 Specifications: Weight: 7.2 - 7.5 ounces each. Set includes one knife, fork, teaspoon, and soupspoon.", "The Key Turner is ideal for people with limited hand strength or coordination. Heavy-duty key turner holds 3 keys and provides increased leverage to turn a key with a comfortable grip. Key Turner Specifications: Holds 3 keys and provides increased leverage to turn a key with a comfortable grip. Does not fit keys with thick plastic heads. Measures 4 ¾\" long and 7/8\" wide.", "The Easi-Grip Bread Knife has a sharp blade and contoured handle that helps in easy cutting and handling. Bread Knife has an 8 inch long x 1 inch wide serrated blade.The handles of Easi-Grip Knives and Utensils are molded in a soft feel plastic, which gives a firm comfortable grip in either hand. The stainless steel tools are set at 90 degrees from the handle, keeping the hand and wrist in a neutral stress free position. Easi-Grip Knives and Kitchen Tools are supremely comfortable for everyone to use, but will be particularly beneficial for those with arthritis, Repetitive Strain Injury, Carpal Tunnel Syndrome or other conditions which weaken the hand and wrist. All items are dishwasher safe. Easi-Grip Bread Knife Features: Serrated blade. Blade is set at 90 degrees from the handle. Unique handle keeps hand and wrist in a stress free position. Easi-Grip Bread Knife Specifications: Blade Length - 8 in. Blade Width - 1 in. Dishwasher safe.", "The Good Grips Utensil Set features large soft rubber handles to cushion your grip. The stainless steel spoon and fork have an adjustable metal shaft that allows them to be twisted to an angle specific for your loved one's needs. Set includes a rocker knife, fork, tablespoon, teaspoon, and small spoon. Good Grips Utensil Set Features: Large soft rubber handle to cushion your grip. Bendable metal shafts. Dishwasher safe. Great for people with weak grasp. Good Grips Utensil Set Specifications: Bend for use with either the right or left hand. Latex free.", "This expandable Good Grips Utensil Strap is ideal for persons with limited grip. Just attach the elastic strap to the utensil and slip the hand through the loop. Standard size fits almost any adult hand and accommodates all Good Grips® utensils as well as other large or built-up handles. Pediatric strap fits the Good Grips® Pediatric Spoon.Machine wash and air dry. Good Grips Utensil Strap Features: Accommodates all Good Grips® utensils. Good Grips Utensil Strap Specifications: Standard size fits almost any adult hand. Pediatric strap fits the Good Grips® Pediatric Spoon.", "Great for hard to grasp buttons! The Good Grips Button Hook has a cushioned handle with flexible ribbing that adapts to any grip. Simply hook over button and pull through buttonhole. Good Grips Button Hook Features: A cushioned grip handle with flexible ribbing. Good Grips Button Hook Specifications: Grip measures: 4\" Total Length: 6\" Material: Latex free.", "Slip your hair dryer into the Hands Free Hairdryer Stand , position it and let go for hands free hair drying! The holder has foam padding that will securely hold dryers with handles up to 2 1/4 inch in diameter. The 17 inch flexible goose neck will bend and pivot allowing you to position the hair dryer to the angle that best fits your needs. The space saving tapered \"U\" shaped base measures 8 inches long, 6 inches wide, 1/8 inches high. The Hair Dryer Holder won't take up a lot of surface space, an important consideration for those with small counter space. (Hair dryer not included). Hair Dryer Stand Features: Portable! The flexible neck adjusts to any angle. Great for shoulder or upper extremity weakness. Hair Dryer Stand Specifications: Neck length: 17 inches. Base dimensions: 8 in. L x 6 in. W x 1/8 in. H. Weight: 1 1/2 pounds. Assembly: Simple assembly required. Note: Hair Dryer NOT included.", "Includes EZ Bathe Inflatable Tub , drain hose, hand held shower with hose, and Wet/Dry Vacuum.Now clients can enjoy bathing the way its meant to be - soaking wet! Reinforced tub with new streamlined design is longer and deeper. Tub inflates to 71 inches long, 31 inches wide, 13 1/2 inches deep to fit individuals up to 6 feet 2 inches. The EZ Bathe Inflatable Bathtub can be rolled under an individual, then inflated to immerse a person for a refreshing, cleansing bath.Fits all beds. The hand-held shower connects to a tap up to 25 ft away. The drain hose, leading to bathtub, sink or toilet, can be turned off for a long soak or left on for constant draining. Its durable wet/dry vacuum inflates, deflates and dries the tub thoroughly. The drain hose and vacuum are both included. **A conventional garden hose may be attached to the drain hose if additional length is needed. EZ Bathe Tub Features: Drain hose (leading to bathtub, sink or toilet) can be turned off for a long soak or left on for constant draining, allowing a shower. Constructed of heavy duty vinyl. A safe, and convenient way to bathe in bed. EZ Bathe Tub Specifications: Dimensions (inflated): 71\"L x 31\"W x 13 1/2\"H. Accommodates individuals up to 6'2\". Hand-held shower (included) connects to a tap up to 25-feet away. 25' Reinforced Drain Hose with on/off valve. Fits all beds.", "EZ Reachers with round silicone tips provide a powerful and secure grip with delicate sensitivity. Constructed of lightweight aluminum with a stainless steel spring mechanism for heavy-duty use. The handle is comfortable to hold and has an easy-to-operate pistol grip full finger trigger. EZ Reachers will handle objects of different shapes and sizes up to 5 lbs. The jaws open to 4.5 inches wide. Weighs 9 oz. 22 inch EZ Reacher Features: Round silicone tips provide a powerful and secure grip with delicate sensitivity. Constructed of lightweight aluminum. Handle is comfortable to hold. Easy-to-operate pistol grip full finger trigger. Handles objects of different shapes and sizes up to 5 lbs. 22 inch EZ Reacher Specifications: Jaws open to 4.5 inches wide. Weighs 9 oz.", "The EZ Shampoo Washbasin is an inflatable sink for shampooing while remaining in bed. The double-tube design prevents splashing while comfortably supporting an individual's neck and shoulders. Constructed of durable vinyl, the shampoo basin can be inflated by mouth or air pump. After use, the drain hose removes water and suds. Simply towel dry, deflate, and fold for storage. Includes drain hose and stopper. Inflates to 24 inches long x 28 inches wide x 6 inches deep. Inner opening dimensions measures 24 inches wide x 20 inches long. One year limited warranty.Can be used with the EZ Shower to shampoo hair almost anywhere. Shampoo basin with pillow provides extra support and comfort. Inflatable EZ-Shampoo Washbasin Features Double-tube design prevents splashing. Comfortably supports an individual's neck and shoulders. Added pillow for extra support and comfort. Inflatable EZ-Shampoo Washbasin Specifications Inflated size: 24 inches long x 28 inches wide x 6 inches deep. Inner opening dimensions: measures 24 inches wide x 20 inches long. (Non returnable hygiene item.)", "For people with arthritis or with limited hand mobility, this Hole in One Key Holder provides several grasping positions. You can position the key at just the right angle for easy turning in the lock. One or two keys fit into slots and are held by a single screw. Hole-In-One Key Holder Features: You can position the key to any angle. Multiple key positions for easy insertion into the key hole Does not fit keys with thick plastic heads.", "The ErgoTek Plus 26 inch Folding Reacher folds flat making it ideal for traveling. The jaw can be rotated 90 and 180 degree so that you can grasp vertical objects with your hand, wrist and forearm in a more natural and ergonomic position. The jaws of this foldable reacher open to 3 1/4 inches for grasping objects such as a 15 oz can. This folding reacher has a pulling post and magnet in the tip end for picking up small metal objects (like paper clips), and a clip for storing the foldable reacher on a walker, wheelchair or bedside rail. The ErgoTek Plus Folding Reacher measures 13.5 inches long when folded, 26 inches long when extended, and weighs 6.35 oz. ErgoTek Plus™ 26 inch Folding Reacher Features: Lightweight and durable aluminum grabber. Ergonomically designed handle and trigger. Jaw rotates 90 and 180 degrees. Folds flat for travel or storage. ErgoTek Plus™ 26 inch Folding Reacher Specifications: Jaws open: 3 1/4 inches. Folded Length: 13.5 inches. Extended Length: 26 inches. Weighs: 6.35 ounces.", "This tool allows people with arthritis or limited grasp to floss their teeth easily and effectively. The fork-shaped handle of the Floss Aid makes it possible to reach all teeth and keeps floss taut when in use. Measures 6 inches long. White or blue.(sorry no color choice) Floss Aid Features: Allows people with arthritis or limited grasp to floss their teeth easily and effectively. Keeps floss taut when in use. Floss Aid Specifications: Measures 6 inches long. White or blue.(sorry no color choice).", "The Independence Two Handle Clear Mugs wide base makes is easy to set down without tipping or spilling. 10 oz mug comes with two lids: anti-splash and feeding spout. Made from clear polycarbonate. Measures 4 inches tall.Use with Independence Replacement Lids, Independence Nosey Lid, or the Independence Vaccuum Lid to customize the cup you need.Both lids allow the flow of liquid to be regulated and can be used with a straw. Measures 3 1/2 in. x 4 in. Dishwasher safe up to 125°F. Latex free. Microwave safe. Independence Two Handle Clear Mug Features: Two Handle Clear Mug comes with two lids - one anti-splash and one feeding spout. Anti-splash lid prevents splashing and helps to direct the flow of liquid into the mouth. The spout lid has a contoured spout to fit comfortably in the mouth. Independence Two Handle Clear Mug Specifications: Measures: 3 1/2 in. x 4 in. Capacity: 10 oz.", "Independence Vacuum Lid has a spouted lid. Simply push the rubber button to release a small amount of liquid for controlled intake. One per package.Fits: Independence Cups and Mugs CPS101, CPS102, and CPS103. Independence Long Handle Clear Mug CPS104. Independence Two Handle Clear Mug CPS105. Independence Vacuum Lid Features: Allows controlled liquid intake.", "Multipurpose Foam Wedge can be used to elevate a person's head or feet. More effective than pillows and provides better support. White cotton cover can be removed and machine washed. 7-1/2\" High Foam Slant Bed Wedge Pillow Features: Helps relieve the discomforts of problem breathing, poor circulation, hiatus hernia, back or neck problems. Ideal for head, foot or leg elevation. Beneficial for those dealing with acid reflux and respiratory problems. Foam Slant Bed Wedge Pillow Specifications: Measures 24 x 24 x 7.5 inches. Constructed of polyurethane foam for consistent support and lasting comfort. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "The Jar Opener is ergonomically designed for minimal stress. This slip resistant jar opener and tap turner helps weak, or injured hands to turn jar lids or faucets with minimal stress on hand and wrist joints. Dome shaped jar opener and closer is ideal for use by individuals with limited manual dexterity. The large round disk fits over jar lids or taps. The pinwheel design in the surface helps concentrate hand strength while turning. Jar Opener Specifications: Dimensions: 4.75 inches diameter, 1. 25 inches high. Color: white. Jar Opener Features: Design provides minimal stress on the wrist. Helps weak or injured hands turn jar lids or faucets.", "The Jumbo Shopping Cart is ideal for carrying groceries, laundry and many other utility purposes. The Jumbo Shopping Cart is easy to assemble, and folds flat for storage.This product is an exceptional high quality and durable 4 wheel compact foldable shopping cart. Features 6 inch rear and 3 inch front 3/4 inch solid rubber tires with steel spokes. Coated with highly durable epoxy finish. Great for senior citizens and single shoppers. Jumbo Shopping Cart Features: Carries groceries, laundry, books, and many other heavy or large items. Folds flat for storage! Easy to assemble. Jumbo Shopping Cart Specifications: Weight capacity: 150 lbs. Basket measures: 14 1/2 x 17 x 24 inches. Overall measurements: 21 1/4 x 24 1/2 x 40 3/4 inches. Front tires: 3 in. Rear tires: 6 in. 3/4 in. solid rubber!", "The Easi-Grip Grater has a large built up handle that allows more pressure to be applied while grating. Grater measures 5 inches long x 2 1/4 inches wide.The handles of Easi-Grip Knives and Utensils are molded in a soft feel plastic, which gives a firm comfortable grip in either hand. The stainless steel tools are setat 90 degrees from the handle, keeping the hand and wrist in a neutral stress free position. Easi-Grip Knives and Kitchen Tools are supremely comfortable for everyone to use, but will be particularly beneficial for those with arthritis, Repetitive Strain Injury, Carpal Tunnel Syndrome or other conditions which weaken the hand and wrist. All items are dishwasher safe. Easi-Grip Grater Features: Soft feel plastic handles. Angle of handle keeps arm, wrist, and hand in a stress free position. Easi-Grip Grater Specifications: Length - 5 in. Width - 2 1/4 in.", "The Low Vision Playing Cards Poker Size are a great gift for to anyone who has trouble seeing the numbers and suits on a normal deck of cards. Black and red classic design and colors. High quality plastic coated cards. Over sized icons are great for both kids and adults. Extra large icons measure 1 1/2 inches high, 1 inch wide. Cards measure 3 1/2 inches high, 2 1/2 inches wide. Low Vision Playing Cards Poker Size Features: A great gift for to anyone who has trouble seeing the numbers and suits on a normal deck of cards. Over sized icons are great for both kids and adults. High quality plastic coated cards. Low Vision Playing Cards Poker Size Specifications: Black and red classic design and colors. Extra large icons measure 1 1/2 inches high, 1 inch wide. Cards measure 3 1/2 inches high, 2 1/2 inches wide.", "The design of the Kennedy Cup allows the cup to be easily filled with up to 7 ounces of warm or cooled liquid. Once the lid is screwed on the liquid will not spill out even if the Kennedy Cup is turned upside down. This means an end to messy spills and a new independence to those who have difficulty using conventional cups!The Kennedy Cup is perfect for all ages, and is great for using while laying down. Features an easy to hold handle! The Kennedy Cup is dishwasher safe and can be used with any style straw. Kennedy Cup Features: Can be used with any style straw! Will not leak, even if turned upside down. NO more messy spills. BPA Free Kennedy Cup Specifications: Holds 7 oz. of hot or cold liquid. Comes in Blue color only.", "The Formed Sock Aid with 2 Foam Handles has a molded plastic frame that provides for the sock to be slipped over the sock aid and then pulled onto the foot. Rubber self-adhesive pad (included) may be added to provide a non-slip resistance to the sock and can be placed in the best position for the individual user. The two foam handles provide a larger gripping surface for easy use. With this useful aid, users can successfully put on socks without assistance. Formed Sock Aid with 2 Foam Handles Features: Allows the sock to be pulled onto the foot. Rubber self adhesive pad provides a non-slip resistance to the sock. Foam hand-grips make it much easier to grasp and pull on sock. Formed Sock Aid with 2 Foam Handles Specifications: Braided cord line with foam hand-grips. Molded plastic sock aid.", "Action Mattress Overlays are made of 100% Akton Polymer. These mattress overlays are used to cover the entire surface or isolated areas of an existing standard mattress. Used by hospitals and long term care facilities as a significant component in prevention and treatment of decubitus ulcers. Akton Full Mattress Overlays provide high pressure and shear reduction that requires no pumps, electricity or special training to use. The 5/8 inch layer of AKTON polymer can be used under clients with existing decubitus ulcers and increases bed surface height only 5/8 inch, providing for independent stable transfers.Available with a hook and loop hitch used to secure one end of the overlay to the head of the bed. The hitch will reduce slippage when the bed is raised. Please call our toll free number 1-877-750-0376 to order #CAC6302H Full Mattress Overlay with Hitch.Shipping UPS Ground. Mattress Overlay Features: Requires no special training to use! Does not promote bacterial growth. Ideal for multiple client use. Will not migrate like gels. Mattress Overlay Specifications: Width:35 in. Length: 80 in. Thickness: 5/8 in. Available with a hook and loop hitch. This is a non-returnable hygiene item.", "Anyone who's misplaced their keys will like this new product! The Hand Key-Per not only keeps your keys handy on the fridge or dashboard, it also increases leverage to make daily opening tasks easier. Bag/envelope slitter quickly opens stubborn season packets or food bags. The Hand Key-Per will hold two keys. This convenient key holder makes it easier to find house keys in the dark, and to turn door and ignition keys. It increases hand strength when opening medicine jars, both press-and-turn and aspirin bottles. A pop-top beverage can opener helps avoid broken fingernails and the magnet also makes it easy to pick up paper clips, ear rings and pins. It even has an emery board for emergency nail repair.Designed of American materials to last a lifetime of normal home use. The Hand Key-Per comes complete with instructions. Helpful for everyone. Great for protecting acrylic nails, hands weakened by injury or arthritis, carpal tunnel or repetitive tasks. The Hand Key-per is small enough to fit in your pocket and is easy to use. Hand Key-Per Features: Small enough to fit in a pocket. Increases leverage to make opening tasks easier. Includes an emergency emery board. Magnet will pick up small metal objects. Does not fit keys with thick plastic heads. Keeps your keys handy on the fridge or dashboard. Holds two keys in internal slots.", "The Large Compression Stocking Aid is a device that really works to apply compression stockings! Grooves catch the compression stocking and prevent it from falling off. Works like a traditional sock aid - just pull the stocking over the shell, insert the foot and pull the cord to bring the hose up and onto the leg. Suitable for Class 1 and 2 stockings. Recommended for below the knee stockings, but may be used for some above the knee models. Large Compression Stocking Aid Features: Helps you put on support hosiery quickly and evenly! Made out of durable and flexible plastic. Nylon chord is easy to grab, and won't break! Large Compression Stocking Aid Specifications: Width: 6 in. Height: 5 3/4 in.", "The Formed Sock Aid with Garters has a molded plastic frame that provides for the sock to be slipped over the sock aid and then pulled onto the foot. Rubber self-adhesive pad (included) may be added to provide a non-slip resistance to the sock and can be placed in the best position for the individual user. The foam handle provides a larger gripping surface for easy use. The garters provide a more secure grip on the sock, so the sock will not slip off when pulling the sock aid onto the foot. With this useful aid, users can successfully put on socks without assistance. Formed Sock Aid with Garters Features: Allows the sock to be pulled onto the foot. Rubber self adhesive pad provides a non-slip resistance to the sock. Garters secure sock onto aid. Foam hand-grip makes it much easier to grasp and pull on sock. Formed Sock Aid with Garters Specifications: Braided cord line with foam hand-grip. Molded plastic sock aid.", "The Posey Heel Pillow helps protect heels and ankles from skin irritation and painful pressure sores. It also provides protection against skin breakdown on heels and feet. Comfortable heel protection device filled with soft polyester fiber and covered with soft cotton fabric. The heel pillow features hook and loop fasteners for quick and easy application. One pair per package. Thick quilted polyester fill protects heels and aids in decreasing pressure to reduce the risk of pressure sores. Machine washable. Sized for most applications. Large size recommended for large or edematous foot/ankle.This product is not intended for use while walking. Posey Heel Pillow Features: Helps protect heels and ankles from skin irritation and painful pressure sores. Provides protection against skin breakdown on heels and feet. Filled with soft polyester fiber and covered with soft cotton fabric. Posey Heel Pillow Specifications: Large Pastel measures 11 1/2 x 11 inches. Machine washable. One pair per package. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "Could you use a helping hand getting out of bed? The Freedom Grip Transfer Handle helps to keep you safe and independent. Wake up with the confidence and freedom knowing you can get out of bed with ease. Perfect for anyone with back pain or arthritis and will help to prevent you from falling out of bed. Economy solution for the person who needs a helping hand getting out of bed. Comes complete with a 20 x 28 inch bed board. Slides between the mattress and box spring. Fits any style Home Bed. Made of steel, simply snap the handle in. No tools required for installation. Designed for people weighing 150 lbs or less. Freedom Grip Transfer Handle Features: Fits any size Bed, helps prevent falls and injuries, improves in-bed mobility and assists with standing and balancing. Sturdy steel handle mounts easily without tools, and fits any size or style home bed. Freedom Grip Transfer Handle Specifications: Designed for people weighing 150 lbs or less. Height above bed with 8\" mattress - 10\" - 12\".", "The Large Glove Box attaches under most wheelchair or scooter seats. Store your books, purse, cell phone, pens, keys, notebooks, etc. Constructed of high quality, water-resistant fabric. Large Glove Box Features: Ideal for storing valuable and personal items out-of-sight! Stay Organized on the go! Keep items safe from the elements. Bring materials with you wherever you go. Large Glove Box Specifications: Width: 12 inches. Length: 5 inches. Depth: 9 inches. Water-resistant fabric.", "The OXO Good Grips 8 inch slicer knife has the unique Good Grips® handle for comfortable and safe cutting. Built-up, pressure-absorbing handle is ideal for people with arthritis or limited ability to grasp. Ideal for slicing roasts, deli meats and more. Use this knife for slicing melon, eggplant and other large foods. Sharp, stainless steel blade. Soft, non-slip handle for a secure grip.Dishwasher safe. Manufacturer recommends hand wash with warm, soapy water and promptly dry The Good Grips line features durable, non-slip flexible handles on every product. Ergonomically designed to fit the palm comfortably and softly, the pressure-absorbing processed rubber handle puts less tension on the hands, while providing an outstanding grip. Made from the same material dishwasher gaskets are constructed of, the handles are slip-proof, wet or dry, as well as dishwasher-safe. Good Grips products are moderately priced and have won the Tylenol/Arthritis Foundation Design Award. OXO Good Grips Slicer Knife Features: Built-up, pressure-absorbing handle. Provides comfortable and safe cutting. Ideal for people with arthritis or limited ability to grasp. Slices roasts, deli meats, melon, eggplant and other large foods. 8 inch sharp, stainless steel blade. OXO Good Grips Slicer Knife Specifications: Measures 14.2 x 1.5 x 1 inch. Weighs: 4 oz.", "The Amefa Utensils are lightweight stainless steel forks, knives, and spoons, made with built up plastic curved handles that fit comfortably in the hand. Amefa Left Hand Spoon handle measures 5 inches in length and 1 1/4 inches in diameter. Designed especially for those who have a hard time holding on to standard shaped spoons. The spoon and fork are both angled for either the left or right hand. Amefa Left Hand Spoon Features: Curved handle provides an easy to hold, easy to use utensil. Large grip is easier to grasp. Amefa Left Hand Spoon Specifications: Handle measures 5 inches in length and 1 1/4 inches in diameter.", "The Independence Long Handle Clear Mug is constructed of a clear polycarbonate that makes it easy to monitor liquid intake. Larger 10 oz cup with long handle provides a variety of grasping options. The Independence Long Handle Clear Mug comes with two interchangeable lids - one anti-splash and one feeding spout lid. The feeding spout lid has a contoured spout to fit comfortably in the mouth. The anti-splash lid prevents splashing and helps to direct the flow of liquid into the mouth. Dishwasher safe up to 228°F. Holds both hot and cold liquids. Latex free. Microwave safe. Independence Long Handle Clear Mug holds 10oz. Measures 4 ½ in x 3 in. Independence Long Handle Clear Mug Features: Provides a variety of grasping options. Comes with two interchangeable lids. Independence Long Handle Clear Mug Specifications: Holds: 10oz. Measures: 4 ½ in x 3 in.", "Replacement sponges for Long Handle Lotion Applicator. Bag of 2 replacement sponges.", "Package of 2 lids. One each spout lid and anti-splash lid. The spout lid has a contoured spout to fit comfortably in the mouth. Anti-splash lid prevents splashing and helps to direct the flow of liquid into the mouth. Independence Replacement Lids allow the flow of liquid to be regulated and can be used with a straw.Both lids fit: Independence Cups and Mugs CPS101, CPS102, and CPS103. Independence Long Handle Clear Mug CPS104. Independence Two Handle Clear Mug CPS105. *Wash lids in warm soapy water. Independence Replacement Lids Features: Both lids fit snuggly and securely - no leaks!", "Each package of No-Rinse Bathing Wipes contains eight high quality cloths - enough to cleanse the entire body. The aloe and lanolin enriched formula provides cleansing, moisturizing and deodorizing in one step. Warm the pack in a microwave or blanket warmer or use at room temperature. Leaves skin clean, refreshed and odor-free. Wipes measure 8x8 inches, needle punched polypropylene/polyester/rayon blend towels in a resealable package. Case of 24 No-Rinse Bathing Wipes Feature: Leaves skin clean, refreshed and odor-free. Antibacterial formula documented to kill E. Coli, Staph, Salmonella & Strep. Towels can be heated in the microwave for even greater comfort. Resealable. Case of 24 No-Rinse Bathing Wipe Specifications: Hypoallergenic and Latex-Free. Aloe Vera, Vitamin E enriched & no alcohol. Case includes 24 packs of eight disposable wipes for one complete bath. Wipes are 8\"x8\" needle punched polypropylene/polyester/rayon blend. Microwave heating times will vary according to wattage. Overweight item. $5.00 additional shipping is included in the purchase price. UPS Ground only.", "The Long Handle Loofah sponge has buff material for scrubbing and exfoliating on one side, and a sponge side on the other! Can be used for bath or shower. The specially-coated wire can be bent. Ideal for those with limited joint motion, or anyone who needs a little help for those hard to reach areas! Long Handle Loofah Sponge Features: Handle can be angled! Helps people bathe independently! Long Handle Loofah Sponge Specifications: Round sponge head measures: 4 3/4 in. diameter x 2 1/4 in. thick. Length: 18 in.", "The Basic Econo Kit includes 1 Sock Aid with Foam Handles, 1 Ergo Plus Reacher 26 inch, 1 Dressing Stick, 1 Plastic shoe horn 18 inch, 1 Long Handle Contoured Bath Sponge 18 inch. Econo Hip Kit with 26 inch Ergo Plus Reacher Features: Kit features recommended ADL items for patients recovering from hip/knee surgery or injury. An essential item to have if you are preparing for hip or knee surgery. Also for people who suffer from limited motion or arthritis. Save over 10% by purchasing the kit over purchasing the individual items. Econo Hip Kit with 26 inch Ergo Plus Reacher includes: 1 Sock Aid with Foam Handles 1 Ergo Plus Reacher 26 inch 1 Dressing Stick 1 Plastic shoe horn 18 inch 1 Long Handle Contoured Bath Sponge 18 inch.", "Ready to use. Eliminates odors and is a safe perineal cleanser. Moisturizes as it cleans. The No Rinse Body Wash leaves skin clean, refreshed and odor-free. Gentle on sensitive skin. No-Rinse Body Wash Features: Ready to use, no water needed. Leaves skin clean, moisturized and odor-free . Gentle on sensitive skin. Moisturizes as it cleans. No-Rinse Body Wash Specifications: Contains no alcohol. Single - 8 ounce bottle. Reduces laundry and linen cost.", "The Good Grips Weighted Rocker Knife has a rounded knife blade to make cutting easy. Only minimal arm strength is needed to cut. The 6 ounces of weight in the built-up handle provides more control so that the utensil reaches the mouth easier. Ideal for persons with limited hand control, Parkinson's disease or spasticity. Good Grips Weighted Rocker Knife Features: Large soft rubber handle to cushion your grip. Utilizes a rocking motion for easier cutting. Dishwasher safe. Great for people with weak grasp. Requires minimal arm strength. Good Grips Weighted Rocker Knife Specifications: Extended safety cap protects fingers while cutting. Latex free.", "Use this Long Handle Shoe horn to help slide shoes on without bending! Constructed of break resistant plastic. Occupational therapist recommend the curved design. Long Handle Shoe horn Features: Break resistant plastic! Recommend by occupational therapist! Long Handle Shoe horn Specifications: Length: 16 in. Yellow color only.(Sorry no color choice)", "The Long Reach Toenail Cutter is designed to accommodate swollen fingers and helps individuals who have difficulty bending or reaching their toenails. The long loop handle allows use of several fingers allowing you to use the strength and control of your whole hand instead of just a few fingers.Extended shank reduces bending and stretching. Angle of the blade provides ergonomic positioning of your wrist. Measures 8.7 inches and weighs 2 ounces. Long Reach Toenail Cutter Features: Helps individuals who have difficulty bending or reaching their toenails. Allows use of several fingers allowing you to use the strength and control of your whole hand. Long Reach Toenail Cutter Specifications: Length - 8.7 inches. Weight - 2 ounces.", "The Shopping Cart Liner can be removed from the Folding Shopping Cart and be used as a carrying tote. This liner has a square bottom which increases its capacity and fits the Medium, Jumbo and Super Folding Shopping Carts. The Shopping Cart Liner is made of water repellent nylon. Features an adjustable shoulder strap for easy carrying, and Velcro fasteners built in to attach to the shopping cart. Open size measures 24 inches long x 17.5 inches wide x 14.5 inches deep. (Shown being used as a carrying tote.) Shopping Cart Liner Features: Color Options: Black, Red, White, and Yellow. Fits the Medium, Jumbo & Super Folding Shopping Carts. Square bottom increases capacity. Made of Water Repellent Nylon! Adjustable shoulder strap. Shopping Cart Liner Specifications: Length: 24 inches. Width: 17.5 inches. Depth: 14.5 inches.", "Action Mattress Overlays are made of 100% Akton Polymer. These mattress overlays are used to cover the entire surface or isolated areas of an existing standard mattress. Used by hospitals and long term care facilities as a significant component in prevention and treatment of decubitus ulcers. Akton Full Mattress Overlays provide high pressure and shear reduction that requires no pumps, electricity or special training to use. The 5/8 inch layer of AKTON polymer can be used under clients with existing decubitus ulcers and increases bed surface height only 5/8 inch, providing for independent stable transfers.Available with a hook and loop hitch used to secure one end of the overlay to the head of the bed. The hitch will reduce slippage when the bed is raised. Please call our toll free number 1-877-750-0376 to order #CAC6303H Full Mattress Overlay with Hitch.Shipping UPS Ground. Mattress Overlay Features: Requires no special training to use! Does not promote bacterial growth. Ideal for multiple client use. Will not migrate like gels. Mattress Overlay Specifications: Width:27 in. Length: 74 in. Thickness: 5/8 in. Available with a hook and loop hitch. This is a non-returnable hygiene item.", "The KEatlery Weighted Knife uses weight to steady the users hand, helping them to eat, and to decrease hand tremors. Stainless steel construction and dishwasher safe. Utensils weigh an average of 7.2 - 7.5 ounces each. KEatlery Weighted Knife Features: Allows more control when eating. Stainless steel. Dishwasher safe. KEatlery Weighted Knife Specifications: Weight: 7.2 - 7.5 ounces. Order individual utensil or the set.", "The uniquely curved blade on the Meat Cutter Rocker Knife allows for a rocking motion, making cutting meats and vegetables much easier. This is also a great kitchen utensil for those unable to perform the sawing motion of a knife, while holding the food with a fork. Meat Cutter Rocker Knife Features: Wooden handle. Rounded safety point stainless steel blade. Dishwasher-safe. Meat Cutter Rocker Knife Specifications: Length: 8 1/2 in. Blade: 4 in. Handle: 4 1/2 in. Weight: 2.4 oz.", "If you have difficulty sleeping while traveling by plane, car, train etc, chances are your neck is telling you that you need more support. The Core Travel Pillow makes it possible to sleep as well while traveling as you do at home. This pillow reduces nerve pressure on the neck to reduce muscle stress and tension for a more restful sleep. Compact size makes it easy to carry. 18 x 9 in. Core Travel Pillow Features: Supports your neck to help prevent stiffness from sleeping or sitting. Compact size makes it easy to carry. Supports the neck vertebrae in a natural position. Core Travel Pillow Specifications: Measures: 18 x 9 in. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "Each package of No-Rinse Bathing Wipes contains eight high quality cloths - enough to cleanse the entire body. The aloe and lanolin enriched formula provides cleansing, moisturizing and deodorizing in one step. Warm the pack in a microwave or blanket warmer or use at room temperature. Leaves skin clean, refreshed and odor-free. Wipes measure 8x8 inches, needle punched polypropylene/polyester/rayon blend towels in a resealable package. No Rinse Bathing Wipes Feature: Leaves skin clean, refreshed and odor-free. Antibacterial formula documented to kill E. Coli, Staph, Salmonella & Strep. Towels can be heated in the microwave for even greater comfort. Resealable. No Rinse Bathing Wipe Specifications: Hypoallergenic and Latex-Free. Aloe Vera, Vitamin E enriched and no alcohol. Eight disposable wipes for one complete bath. Wipes are 8\"x8\" needle punched polypropylene/polyester/rayon blend. Microwave heating times will vary according to wattage.", "The Good Grips Fork features a large soft rubber handle to cushion your grip. These stainless steel forks have an adjustable metal shaft that allows the fork to be twisted to an angle specific for your loved one's needs. Good Grips Fork Features: Large soft rubber handle to cushion your grip. Bendable metal shafts. Dishwasher safe. Great for people with weak grasp. Good Grips Fork Specifications: Bend for use with either the right or left hand. Latex free.", "The tapered handle of the Melaware Fork is easy to grasp and fits comfortably in the hand. The Melaware Fork has a straight handle and is like a spoon with three tines.The handle measures 1 inch in diameter at the base and tapers to 3/4 in. Dishwasher safe. Melaware Fork Features: Tapered handle is easy to grasp. Utensils are made of Stainless steel. Melaware Fork Specifications: Handle measures : 1 in. in diameter at the base and taper to 3/4 in. Dishwasher safe.", "The tapered handle of the Melaware Knife (pictured in center)is easy to grasp and fits comfortably in the hand. The Melaware knife handle measures 1 inch in diameter at the base and tapers to 3/4 in. The knife blade will cut with both slicing and rocking motions.Dishwasher safe. Melaware Knife: Tapered handle is easy to grasp. Utensils are made of Stainless steel. Melaware Knife: Handle measures : 1 in. in diameter at the base and taper to 3/4 in. Dishwasher safe.", "Great Grips Faucet Grips makes turning the water on and off an effortless task. They're also a big help in eliminating confusion when children are learning which faucet is hot and cold water. The bright red and blue color-coded faucets give kids the visual cue they need to keep from making a painful and dangerous error. Easy to install. Latex free material. Great Grips Faucet Grips Features: Eliminate confusion between hot or cold water. Easily slip over knob. Slip free, comfortable grasp.", "Padded transfer and gait belt constructed of woven cotton fabric coated with anti-slide skin friendly material on its inner surface which prevents belt from riding up. Fix lock buckle allows belt to be tightened without opening. Quick release plastic buckle. Medium Safety Sure Padded Belt Features: Great for helping patients to stand up or sit down. Simplifies transfers from bed to wheelchair, wheelchair to toilet, or wheelchair to car seat. Numerous hand-grips provide a variety of leverage points and reduce strain on caregivers back. Medium Safety Sure Padded Belt Specifications: Measures 4 inches wide, 3/8 inches thick. Medium fits waist sizes 32 - 48 inches. Has 2 horizontal and 3 vertical hand grips.", "Ideal for carrying groceries or laundry and other utility purposes. Easy to assemble. Folds flat for storage. Exceptional high quality and durable 4 wheel compact foldable shopping cart. Features 6 inch rear and 3 inch front 3/4 inch solid rubber tires with steel spokes. Coated with highly durable epoxy finish. Great for senior citizens and single shoppers. Mini Shopping Cart Features: 6 inch rear and 3 inch front 3/4 inch solid rubber tires with steel spokes. Coated with highly durable epoxy finish. Folds flat for storage. Mini Shopping Cart Specifications: Weighs 9 lbs. 100 lb. weight capacity. Basket measures: 12 1/2 x 10 1/2 x 20 inches. Overall measurements: 15 x 17 x 36 inches.", "The Heelift Convoluted Suspension Boot removes pressure from the heel. The elevation pad disperses pressure evenly across entire calf. Features smooth tricot fabric covering on the outside for increased patient mobility. Air holes provide optimal ventilation. Secures with two adjustable hook-and-loop straps. The Heelift Convoluted Suspension Boot helps prevent heel ulcers by eliminating heel pressure by lifting the heel with an elevation pad and suspending the heel in protective space. Pressure is transferred from the heel to the lower leg. In pressure ulcer prevention regimens, suspending the heel is appropriate for at risk patients who are immobile, post-operative or suffer from diabetes, cardiovascular disease or dietary deficiencies. This suspension boot is an ideal addition to existing treatment regimens. It can also be used in cases of foot drop, flaccid paralysis (non-spastic), pre and post-operative hip fractures and skin grafts. Heelift Convoluted Suspension Boots are made from soft, firm, medical grade foam with a convoluted design. Original Heelift effectively removes pressure from the heel, preventing heel ulcers, pressure ulcers and diabetic foot ulcers from forming. Latex-free. Choose convoluted foam for a slightly cooler wearing boot. Boot is non-returnable if packaging is opened. Boot is machine washable if placed in a net laundry bag with the Velcro® straps closed and the extra elevation pads removed. Heelift Convoluted Suspension Boot Features: Removes pressure from the heel. Helps prevent heel ulcers. Air holes provide ventilation. Heelift Convoluted Suspension Boot Specifications: Standard size measures: 12 inches calf to heel, 9 inches heel to toe. Fits calf circumference 8 - 14 inches. Fits height range 60 - 77 inches. Fits weight range 120 - 250 pounds. Bariatric and Petite sizes also available.", "The Bath Safe Elongated Raised Toilet Seat with Arms easily attaches to the toilet and is designed to be used in conjunction with regular toilet seat and lid so the bathroom decor is not altered.These Elevated Toilet Seats feature molded in arms for security and support. Adds 3 1/2 inches to toilet seat height to provide support while getting on and off the toilet. Wider front opening slopes downward to guard against spillage. Arms are raised 7 3/4 inches from bowl. Width between arms is 19 inches. Overall width of arms is 21 1/2 inches. Extra-long screws attach the raised seat and toilet seat to the bowl (hardware included). Weight capacity 300 pounds. Available for standard or elongated toilet bowls.Riser only, uses existing toilet seat. Bath Safe Elongated Raised Toilet Seat with Arms Features: Easily attaches to the toilet. Designed to be used in conjunction with regular toilet seat. Molded in arms for security and support. Bath Safe Elongated Raised Toilet Seat with Arms Specifications: Arms are raised 7 3/4 inches from bowl. Adds 3 1/2 inches to toilet seat height. Overall width of arms is 21 1/2 inches. Weight capacity 300 pounds. Ships via UPS Ground.Non-returnable hygiene item.", "The Heelift Smooth Suspension Boot removes pressure from the heel. The elevation pad disperses pressure evenly across entire calf. Features smooth tricot fabric covering on the outside for increased patient mobility. Air holes provide optimal ventilation. Secures with two adjustable hook-and-loop straps. Heelift Smooth Suspension Boots help prevent heel ulcers by eliminating heel pressure by lifting it with an elevation pad and suspending the heel in protective space. Pressure is transferred from the heel to the lower leg. In pressure ulcer prevention regimens, suspending the heel is appropriate for at risk patients who are immobile, post-operative or suffer from diabetes, cardiovascular disease or dietary deficiencies. This suspension boot is an ideal addition to existing treatment regimens and also can be used in cases of foot drop, flaccid paralysis (non-spastic), pre and post-operative hip fractures and skin grafts. Heelift Smooth Suspension Boots are made from soft, firm, medical grade foam. Effectively removes pressure from the heel, helping to prevent heel ulcers, pressure ulcers and diabetic foot ulcers from forming. Latex-free. Smooth foam is ideal for patients with edematous legs as it will not create \"impressions\" on the leg. Heelift is machine washable if placed in a net laundry bag with the Velcro® straps closed and the extra elevation pads removed. Heelift Suspension Boot is non-returnable if packaging is opened. Heelift Smooth Suspension Boot Features: Removes pressure from the heel. Helps prevent heel ulcers. Air holes provide ventilation. Heelift Smooth Suspension Boot Specifications: Standard size measures: 12 inches calf to heel, 9 inches heel to toe. Fits calf circumference 8 - 14 inches. Fits height range 60 - 77 inches. Fits weight range 120 - 250 pounds. Bariatric and Petite sizes also available.", "The Large Weighted Universal Holder is designed to hold a toothbrush or disposable razor. It weighs approximately 7 ounces and includes an allen wrench. Holder has 3 set screws that tighten in a triangular pattern to secure most objects up to a maximum of 1/2 inch in diameter , and 5 1/4 inches in length. The toothbrush shown is an Oral B and the disposable razor is the Gillette Trac II. (Toothbrush and Razor not included.) Large Weighted Universal Holder Features: Designed to hold a toothbrush or razor. Big grip is easy to hold! Large Weighted Universal Holder Specifications: Weight: 7 oz. Overall diameter: 1 1/8 in. Length: 5 1/4 in. Holds most objects up to a maximum 1/2 in. diameter.", "The Amefa Utensils are lightweight stainless steel forks, knives, and spoons, made with built up plastic curved handles that fit comfortably in the hand. Amefa Left Hand Fork handle measures 5 inches in length and 1 1/4 inches in diameter. Designed especially for those who have a hard time holding on to standard shaped forks. The Fork and spoon are both angled for either the left or right hand. Amefa Left Hand Fork Features: Curved handle provides an easy to hold, easy to use utensil. Large plastic handle is easier to grasp. Amefa Left Hand Fork Specifications: Handle measures 5 inches in length and 1 1/4 inches in diameter.", "The Lamp Switch Enlarger fits over the existing small lamp switch to provide an easy, stress free grasp. Large triangle shaped knob adapter helps people with decreased hand strength to switch lamps on and off more easily. These lamp switch adapters are easy to install and do not require electrical connections. Package of 2 Lamp Switch Enlargers. (Not for push button style switches.) Lamp Switch Enlarger Features: Special design for persons with limited grasp. Fits over most standard lamp switches. Lamp Switch Enlarger Specifications: Package of 2. Dimensions: 1.5 inches wide, 1.5 inches high, 0.81 inches deep. Color: white.", "The Bristle scrub brush has two suction cups that adhere to flat surfaces. This scrub brush is great for one-handed cleaning. (Non-returnable hygiene item.) Mounted Scrub Brush Features: Long stiff nylon bristles. Great for one-handed cleaning. Two suction cups that adhere to flat surfaces. Mounted Scrub Brush Specifications: Brush measures 1 1/4 x 4 inches. Nylon bristles measure 1/2 inch in length.", "The patented handle on the Good Grips Jar Opener provides a flexible, non-slip grip for easy opening of twist-off lids. Metal grip strip. Opens lids ranging from 1/2 to 3 3/4 inches. Ergonomically designed to fit the palm comfortably and softly. Dishwasher safe.The Good Grips line features many durable, non-slip flexible handles on every product. Ergonomically designed to fit the palm comfortably and softly, the pressure-absorbing processed rubber handle puts less tension on the hands, while providing an outstanding grip. Made from the same material dishwasher gaskets are constructed of, the handles are slip-proof, wet or dry, as well as dishwasher-safe. Good Grips products are moderately priced and have won the Tylenol/Arthritis Foundation Design Award. Good Grips Jar Opener Features: Provides a flexible, nonslip grip for easy opening of twist-off lids. Ergonomically designed to fit the palm comfortably and softly. Good Grips Jar Opener Specifications: Open lids ranging from 1/2\" to 3-3/4\".", "The Pen and Pencil Cushions are made from molded soft plastic. Cushions effortlessly slide onto pens, pencils, artists' paint brushes and other items. The Pen and Pencil Cushions also provide a larger gripping surface and cushions grip of the utensil being used. Pen and Pencil Cushions Features: Molded soft plastic. Slide onto pens, pencils, artists' paint brushes and other items. Provide a larger gripping surface. Pen and Pencil Cushions Specifications: Package of 2 grippers. Measures 1 1/2 inches long x 3/4 inches wide. Colors vary.", "The Nosey Lid allows users to maintain proper head and neck position when swallowing. Ideal for people with limited range of motion of the head, neck or upper extremities or arthritis. Lid has cut out for the nose to allow drinking without bending the neck or tilting the head. The Nosey Lid can be used with any of the Independence Cups or Mugs. Combine mugs and lids to create the cup you need. For example, to create a two handle nosey cup, combine the Double Handle Mug and the Nosey Lid. One per package. Independence Nosey Lid Features: Maintains proper head and neck position when swallowing. Dishwasher safe.", "The Insulated Weighted Bowl has weight added internally to the base to reduce tremors of the hand, and increase control. The bowl is insulated to keep hot food hot, or cold food cold. Optional disposable lids are available. *Do not microwave the Insulated Weighted Bowl due to steel weight. Insulated Weighted Bowl Features: Comes in Blue. Dishwasher safe. Weight reduces hand tremors. Insulated Weighted Bowl Specifications: Can hold up to 12 oz. Weighs 15.5 oz. Diameter is 4 1/2 inch. Height is 2 3/4 inch.", "The Amefa L Knife was designed to be used by either right or left hand. The knife features a serrated blade, curved for an easy, smooth, rocking motion. Amefa Utensils are lightweight stainless steel forks, knives, and spoons, made with built up plastic curved handles that fit comfortably in the hand. Handle measures 3 1/4 inches in length and 1/2 inches in diameter. Amefa L Knife Features: A serrated curved blade. Special design allows a smooth rocking motion. Lightweight and stainless steel. Amefa L Knife Specifications: Handle measures 3 1/4 inches in length and 1/2 inches in diameter.", "Single 8 oz bottle. NO RINSE BODY BATH concentrated formula produces a gentle bathing solution that does not require rinsing. Just 1 oz. of the Body Bath yields 32 oz. of solution. The mild, pH balanced formula eliminates odors and is gentle enough for perineal cleansing.To use, mix one capful of the Body Bath with one quart of warm water; apply to body and gently massage into lather. The foam removes dirt and oil, then towel dry. Skin is soft, clean, and refreshed - never sticky.The No Rinse Body Bath special formula for bathing without rinsing! Simply apply to washcloth, massage into lather on body, then towel dry - no rinsing required. Moisturizing formula leaves skin fresh and clean. No-Rinse Body Bath 8 oz. Features: Gentle bathing solution that does not require rinsing. Mild, pH balanced formula eliminates odors and is gentle enough for perineal cleansing. Leaves skin is soft, clean, and refreshed - never sticky. No-Rinse Body Bath 8 oz. Specifications: 1 oz. of the Body Bath yields 32 oz. of solution. 8 oz. bottle.", "Use this specially designed Lotion Applicator to apply lotions, oils, creams or medications to hard to reach areas. The lotion applicator features a 12 inch long built-up ribbed handle with a thumb rest and is angled in two areas for maximum maneuverability. Lotion Applicator Features: Apply lotions, oils, creams or medications! Angled in two areas! Lotion Applicator Specifications: Length: 12 in.", "Use the Posey Fiesta Gait Belt to provide assistance for individuals when walking, standing, or sitting. The 2 inch wide cotton belt features a metal buckle with teeth for secure closing and easy adjusting. Machine washable.INDICATIONS: Patients/residents requiring ambulation and/or transfer assistance. Posey Fiesta Gait Belt Features: Helps prevent caregiver back injuries and assists in safe patient transfer and ambulation. Specially designed nickel-plated, metal buckles offer maximum hold, while reducing wear on the cotton belt for increased durability. Posey Fiesta Gait Belt Specifications: Length: 54 inches. Fits waist sizes up to 51 inches. Constructed of sturdy cotton. 2 inch wide webbing. Machine washable.", "Use the Posey Fiesta Gait Belt to provide assistance for individuals when walking, standing, or sitting. The 2 inch wide cotton belt features a metal buckle with teeth for secure closing and easy adjusting. Machine washable.INDICATIONS: Patients/residents requiring ambulation and/or transfer assistance. Posey Fiesta Gait Belt Features: Helps prevent caregiver back injuries and assists in safe patient transfer and ambulation. Specially designed nickel-plated, metal buckles offer maximum hold, while reducing wear on the cotton belt for increased durability. Posey Fiesta Gait Belt Specifications: Length: 72 inches. Fits waist sizes up to 71 inches. Constructed of sturdy cotton. 2 inch wide webbing. Machine washable.", "The KEatlery Weighted Fork uses weight to steady the users hand, helping them to eat, and to decrease hand tremors. Stainless steel construction and dishwasher safe. Utensils weigh an average of 7.2 - 7.5 ounces each. KEatlery Weighted Fork Features: Allows more control when eating. Stainless steel. Dishwasher safe. KEatlery Weighted Fork Specifications: Weight: 7.2 - 7.5 ounces. Order individual utensil or the set.", "The NO RINSE BODY BATH concentrated formula produces a gentle bathing solution that does not require rinsing. Just 1 oz. of the Body Bath yields 32 oz. of solution. The mild, pH balanced formula eliminates odors and is gentle enough for perineal cleansing.To use, mix one capful of the Body Bath with one quart of warm water; apply to body and gently massage into lather. The foam removes dirt and oil, then towel dry. Skin is soft, clean, and refreshed - never sticky.The No Rinse Body Bath special formula for bathing without rinsing! Simply apply to washcloth, massage into lather on body, then towel dry - no rinsing required. Moisturizing formula leaves skin fresh and clean. Case of 12 No Rinse Body Bath 16 oz. bottles Feature: Gentle bathing solution that does not require rinsing. Mild, pH balanced formula eliminates odors and is gentle enough for perineal cleansing. Leaves skin is soft, clean, and refreshed - never sticky. Case of 12 No Rinse Body Bath 16 oz. bottles Specifications: 1 oz. of the Body Bath yields 32 oz. of solution. Case of 12 - 16 oz. bottles. Overweight item. $4.00 additional shipping is included in the purchase price. UPS Ground only.", "The Akton Polymer Large Commode Pad provides comfort and relief from pressure and shear. Velcro adhesive strips make pad easy to attach, use and maintain.The Akton Polymer Large Commode Pad won't leak, flow, or bottom out, and it is tissue equivalent. It moves with patients, not against them, to reduce pressure and shear, the two leading causes of pressure sores.The Akton Polymer Large Commode Pad is also X-ray translucent and easy to clean with standard disinfectant. It will not support microbiological growth, and it won't absorb body fluids or odors. Akton Polymer Large Commode Pad Features: Won't leak, flow, or bottom out. Moves with patients, not against them! Won't absorb body fluids or odors! Akton Polymer Large Commode Pad Specifications: Measures: 18 x 18 x 1 in.(with opening). Split:8 x 10 in. Non returnable hygiene item. Ships via UPS Ground.", "The Large Front Walker Bag attaches easily to the front of a walker with velcro straps. Features 2 mesh pockets in front and large pocket in back. Constructed of high quality water resistant fabric. Large Front Walker Bag Features: 1 large pocket. 2 mesh pockets. High quality water resistant fabric! Easy attachment with velcro straps. Large Front Walker Bag Specifications: Made in U.S.A. Width: 17 in. Length: 12 in. 2 in. deep.", "The tapered handle of the Melaware Right Hand Spoon is easy to grasp and fits comfortably in the hand. The Melaware Right Hand Spoon (pictured on far left) is bent to the left for easier access to the mouth for right-handed users. The handle measures 1 inch in diameter at the base and tapers to 3/4 inch. Dishwasher safe. Melaware Right Hand Spoon Features: Tapered handles are easy to grasp. Ideal for persons with decreased wrist motion. Utensils are made of Stainless steel. Melaware Right Hand Spoon Specifications: Handles measure : 1 in. in diameter at the base and taper to 3/4 in. Dishwasher Safe.", "Bicycle EZ See LoVision Playing Cards have jumbo sized 1 5/8 inch numbers and letters to make it easier for those with sight problems. Each suit is color coded for quick recognition. Coated plastic cards don't stick together like regular cards. Use with our Playing Card Holder Tray for a great gift. Bicycle EZ See Lo Vision Playing Cards Features: Jumbo sized numbers and letters. Color coded suits. Coated plastic cards don't stick together. Bicycle EZ See Lo Vision Playing Cards Specifications: Numbers and letters are 1 5/8 inch.", "The No Rinse Body Wash is ready to use. Eliminates odors and is a safe perineal cleanser. Moisturizes as it cleans. Leaves skin clean, refreshed and odor-free. Gentle on sensitive skin. No-Rinse Body Wash Features: Ready to use, no water needed. Leaves skin clean, moisturized and odor-free . Gentle on sensitive skin. Moisturizes as it cleans. No-Rinse Body Wash Specifications: Contains no alcohol. Case of 24 No Rinse Body Wash 8 oz bottles. Reduces laundry and linen cost. Overweight item. $4.00 additional shipping is included in the purchase price. UPS Ground only.", "The Large Safety Sure Padded Transfer Belt is constructed of woven cotton fabric! Belt is coated with anti-slide skin friendly material on its inner surface which prevents the belt from riding up. The lock buckle allows belt to be tightened without opening. Large Safety Sure Padded Transfer Belt Features: Anti-slide skin friendly material. Quick release plastic buckle. Woven cotton fabric. Large Safety Sure Padded Transfer Belt Specifications: Fits waist sizes 42 - 60 in. 3 horizontal and 4 vertical hand grips. Measures 4 inches wide, 3/8 in. thick.", "The No Rinse Shampoo completely cleans hair without water - no rinsing is required. Apply shampoo to hair until completely wet, then massage into hair. Rich lather causes dirt and dust particles to float to the top of the foam. Towel dry hair, comb and style.Leaves hair silky soft and manageable. The PH balanced, no alcohol formula won't irritate sensitive skin, so it is safe for adults or children.No Rinse products are used in hospitals and nursing facilities all over the county. Use at home or while traveling or camping. No Rinse Shampoo Features: Ready to use. No rinsing is required. Leaves hair silky soft and manageable. Towel dry hair, comb and style. No Rinse Shampoo Specifications: Single 16 oz bottle No Rinse, waterless Shampoo.", "The Leg Lifter is useful and convenient for lifting a weak or casted leg onto a bed or for repositioning. Reinforced polyester webbing covers a rigid but adjustable metal rod. The foot loop opening can be positioned to accommodate a casted leg. 42 inches long. Leg Lifter Features: Extends the user's reach to assist in lifting one leg at a time. Loop is placed around the foot or cast and can be re-positioned by the user. Hand loop is located at one end and a larger foot loop at the other. Leg Lifter Specifications: Total length is 42 inches. Navy Blue. Consists of an aluminum rod and foothold covered with webbing.", "Independence Cups and Mugs with Lids are designed to meet the needs of individuals who are unable to utilize standard cups. This translucent mug makes it easy to monitor liquid intake. Each cup and mug comes with two lids - one spout lid and one anti-splash lid. The spout lid has a contoured spout to fit comfortably in the mouth and the anti-splash lid prevents splashing and helps to direct the flow of liquid into the mouth. Both lids allow the flow of liquid to be regulated and can be used with a straw. Container and lids are made from translucent, durable polypropylene. Dishwasher safe up to 228°F. Holds both hot and cold liquid. Latex free. Microwave safe. Use with Independence Replacement Lids, Independence Nosey Lid, or the Independence Vacuum Lid to customize the cup you need.**Each style of cup is sold separately. Independence Cups and Mugs with Lids Features: Each cup and mug comes with two lids - one spout lid and one antis plash lid. This translucent mug makes it easy to monitor liquid intake. Independence Cups and Mugs with Lids Specifications: No handles: 8 oz. cup, measures 3 ½ in. H x 3 in. #CPS 101. Single handle: 8 oz. cup, measures 2 ¾ in. H x 3 in. #CPS 102. Double handle: 8 oz. cup , measures 2 ¾ in. H x 3 in. #CPS 103.", "The >b>No-Rinse Shampoo Cap is ready to use. One-piece cap transfers all massaging action directly to hair and scalp. Latex free and alcohol free. Eliminates odor and leaves hair fresh and clean. Can be heated in microwave prior to use. One per package. Case of 12 No Rinse Shampoo Caps Feature: Simple to use. Just massage, towel dry and style. Helps eliminate odor. Can be heated prior to use. No Rinse Shampoo Cap Specifications: Case of 12 No-Rinse Shampoo Caps. Microwave heating times will vary according to wattage. Overweight item. $4.00 additional shipping is included in the purchase price. UPS Ground only.", "The Neo Bird Freeform Writing Pen is a great relief for people with arthritis or hand ailments or injuries. The unique, patented design of this innovation in writing instruments allows the weight of your hand to work for you, not against you. Black ink, medium ball point.Refills are no longer available for the Neo Bird pen.", "Ideal for people with limited range of motion of the head, neck or upper extremities, or arthritis. The Nosey Cup has a cut out for the nose that permits you to drink without bending your neck or tilting your head. Made from translucent plastic. Dishwasher safe. Nosey Cup Features: Ideal for people with limited range of motion of the head, neck or upper extremities. Cut out for the nose permits drinking without bending neck or tilting head. Nosey Cup Specifications: 4 oz., 8 oz. and 12 oz. sizes. Made from translucent plastic. Dishwasher safe.", "The No-Rinse Shampoo Cap is ready to use. One-piece cap transfers all massaging action directly to hair and scalp. Latex free and alcohol free. Helps eliminate odor and leaves hair fresh and clean. Can be heated in microwave prior to use. One per package.Perfect for people who can not shampoo their hair in the traditional way. No-Rinse Shampoo Cap Features: Ready to use. Leaves hair fresh and clean. Just massage, towel dry and style. Helps eliminate odor. Can be heated prior to use. No-Rinse Shampoo Cap Specifications: One shampoo cap per package. Microwave heating times will vary according to wattage.", "The NO RINSE BODY BATH concentrated formula produces a gentle bathing solution that does not require rinsing. Just 1 oz. of the Body Bath yields 32 oz. of solution. The mild, pH balanced formula eliminates odors and is gentle enough for perineal cleansing.To use, mix one capful of the Body Bath with one quart of warm water; apply to body and gently massage into lather. The foam removes dirt and oil, then towel dry. Skin is soft, clean, and refreshed - never sticky.The No Rinse Body Bath special formula for bathing without rinsing! Simply apply to washcloth, massage into lather on body, then towel dry - no rinsing required. Moisturizing formula leaves skin fresh and clean. 16 oz. No-Rinse Body Bath Features: Gentle bathing solution that does not require rinsing. Mild, pH balanced formula eliminates odors and is gentle enough for perineal cleansing. Leaves skin is soft, clean, and refreshed - never sticky. 16 oz. No-Rinse Body Bath Specifications: 1 oz. of the Body Bath yields 32 oz. of solution. Single 16 oz. bottle.", "The Tri-Core orthopedic cervical support pillow is prized for its effectiveness in correctly aligning the spine and supporting the neck in its natural position to help relieve headaches, neck pain for side and back sleepers alike. Its patented overall design: a unique trapezoid center and two neck lobes which cushion the head and support the neck, make it the highest quality cervical support pillow available.The special design of the Tri-Core Orthopedic Pillow supports the neck vertebrae to reduce muscle stress and tension for a more restful sleep. Our premier, fiber-filled support pillow is the highest quality cervical support pillow available. As you sleep, this pillow cradles your neck in its most natural and neutral position. The Tri-Core is the fiber support pillow most recommended by the medical professionals who commonly treat neck and head pain. Most users experience a positive difference within days of using the cervical pillow, while others may require up to two weeks before their neck and back muscles adjust to their proper position.Choose from firm or gentle support. Core Orthopedic Pillow Features: Supports the neck vertebrae in a natural position. Reduces nerve pressure on the neck to reduce muscle stress. Fiber-filled ergonomic pillow that provides the highest quality cervical support available. Helps open obstructed airways that often cause snoring . Designed for either back or side sleeping. Made of a hypoallergenic, anti-microbial fiber. Fits standard pillow case. Hand-washable. Core Orthopedic Pillow Specifications: 24 x 16 in. Choose from firm or gentle support. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "The Good Grips Swivel Peeler has the unique Good Grips® handle for comfortable and safe peeling. Cushioned built up handle won't slip even when wet. The stainless steel blade swivels for easy peeling and requires less wrist movement. Built-up, pressure-absorbing handle is ideal for people with arthritis or limited ability to grasp. Dishwasher safe.The Good Grips line features durable, non-slip flexible handles on every product. Ergonomically designed to fit the palm comfortably and softly, the pressure-absorbing processed rubber handle puts less tension on the hands, while providing an outstanding grip. Made from the same material dishwasher gaskets are constructed of, the handles are slip-proof, wet or dry, as well as dishwasher-safe. Good Grips products are moderately priced and have won the Tylenol/Arthritis Foundation Design Award. Good Grips Swivel Peeler Features: Flexible handles. Built up handle designed for easy grip. Won't slip even when wet. Dishwasher safe.", "Soft fleece lining of the Padded Armsleeve offers extra protection. Provides comfortable protection for fragile or sensitive skin that may bruise or tear easily. Made of 95% soft cotton and 5% Lycra, the special stretchy fabric is soft and breathable.Sold in pairs. One pair per package. Can be repeatedly washed and dried. To launder, machine wash and dry low temperature. For best results, hang dry. Padded Armsleeve Features: Helps protect thin, fragile skin tissue. Offers a protective barrier against skin tears and abrasions. Helps prevent patient disruption of medical treatments by camouflaging IV sites and wound sites. Knitted from latex free soft cotton/nylon/spandex four-way stretch yarn. Padded Armsleeve Specifications: Length - 16½? (42 cm). Fits Limb circumference of 11? (28 cm). One pair per package. ***Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "Stirring with one hand is easy with the Pan or Pot Holder . This wire frame holds the Pot handle while you stir your food, keeping the pan from accidentally turning and causing spills. Suction-cup feet secure the Pan Holder on the stove. The wire frame is covered with epoxy to protect ranges and pans from scratches. Works best on electric stoves. Pan Holder Features: Holds the Pot handle while you stir your food. Suction-cup feet secure the Pan Holder to the stove.", "Action Mattress Overlays are made of 100% Akton Polymer. These mattress overlays are used to cover the entire surface or isolated areas of an existing standard mattress. Used by hospitals and long term care facilities as a significant component in prevention and treatment of decubitus ulcers. Akton 7/8 inch Mattress Overlays provide high pressure and shear reduction that requires no pumps, electricity or special training to use. The 7/8 inch layer of AKTON polymer can be used under clients with existing decubitus ulcers and increases bed surface height only 7/8 inch, providing for independent stable transfers.Shipping UPS Ground. Mattress Overlay Features: Requires no special training to use! Does not promote bacterial growth. Ideal for multiple client use. Will not migrate like gels. Mattress Overlay Specifications: Width:27 in. Length: 46 in. Thickness: 7/8 in. This is a non-returnable hygiene item.", "The Nail Clipper Board is a standard size nail clipper securely attached to a plastic base. There are two suction-cup feet on the bottom of the plastic base that provide stability, and prevent the board from slipping when suctioned to a table or desk. Ideal for people with arthritis or limited pinching ability. Nail Clipper Board Features: Designed for people with limited pinching ability. Two suction-cup feet prevent slipping while clipping. Nail Clipper Board Specifications: Board measures 4\" x 2\".", "Action Mattress Overlays are made of 100% Akton Polymer. These mattress overlays are used to cover the entire surface or isolated areas of an existing standard mattress. Used by hospitals and long term care facilities as a significant component in prevention and treatment of decubitus ulcers. Akton Full Mattress Overlays provide high pressure and shear reduction that requires no pumps, electricity or special training to use. The 5/8 inch layer of AKTON polymer can be used under clients with existing decubitus ulcers and increases bed surface height only 5/8 inch, providing for independent stable transfers.Available with a hook and loop hitch used to secure one end of the overlay to the head of the bed. The hitch will reduce slippage when the bed is raised. Please call our toll free number 1-877-750-0376 to order #CAC6301H Full Mattress Overlay with Hitch.Shipping UPS Ground. Mattress Overlay Features: Requires no special training to use! Does not promote bacterial growth. Ideal for multiple client use. Will not migrate like gels. Mattress Overlay Specifications: Width:27 in. Length: 80 in. Thickness: 5/8 in. Available with a hook and loop hitch. This is a non-returnable hygiene item.", "The Posey Padded Legsleeve provides comfortable protection for fragile or sensitive skin that may bruise or tear easily. Made of 95% soft cotton and 5% Lycra, the special stretchy fabric is soft and breathable.Sold in pairs. One pair per package. Can be repeatedly washed and dried. To launder, machine wash and dry low temperature. For best results, hang dry. Posey Padded Legsleeve Features: Helps protect thin, fragile skin tissue. Offers a protective barrier against skin tears and abrasions. Helps prevent patient disruption of medical treatments by camouflaging IV sites and wound sites. Knitted from latex free soft cotton/nylon/spandex four-way stretch yarn. Posey Padded Legsleeve Specifications: Length - 13½? (34 cm). Fits Limb circumference of 11? (28 cm). One pair per package. Non returnable if packaging is opened", "The Posey Legsleeve provides comfortable protection for fragile or sensitive skin that may bruise or tear easily. Made of 95% soft cotton and 5% Lycra, the special stretchy fabric is soft and breathable.Sold in pairs. One pair per package. Can be repeatedly washed and dried. To launder, machine wash and dry low temperature. For best results, hang dry. Posey Legsleeve Features: Helps protect thin, fragile skin tissue. Offers a protective barrier against skin tears and abrasions. Helps prevent patient disruption of medical treatments by camouflaging IV sites and wound sites. Knitted from latex free soft cotton/nylon/spandex four-way stretch yarn. Posey Legsleeve Specifications: Length - 13½? (34 cm). Fits Limb circumference of 11? (28 cm). One pair per package. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "A wonderful finish for any shampoo. No Rinse Hair Conditioner is ready to use. Instantly eliminates snarls and tangles while leaving hair soft and easy to manage. No rinsing required. No residue and no greasiness. Simply apply, massage into hair, and leave in or towel dry, comb and style. Alcohol free. 8 oz bottle. No-Rinse Hair Conditioner Features: Ready to use. Eliminates snarls and tangles. No rinsing required. No-Rinse Hair Conditioner Specifications: Case of 12 - 8 oz bottles. Alcohol free. Overweight item. $4.00 additional shipping is included in the purchase price. UPS Ground only.", "Ideal for carrying groceries or laundry and other utility purposes. Easy to assemble. Folds flat for storage. Exceptional high quality and durable 4 wheel compact foldable shopping cart. Features 6 inch rear and 3 inch front 3/4 inch solid rubber tires with steel spokes. Coated with highly durable epoxy finish. Great for senior citizens and single shoppers. Medium Shopping Cart Features: 6 inch rear and 3 inch front 3/4 inch solid rubber tires with steel spokes. Coated with highly durable epoxy finish. Folds flat for storage. Medium Shopping Cart Specifications: Medium Shopping weighs 13 lbs. 125 lb. weight capacity. Basket measures: 11 3/4 x 15 x 18 3/4 inches. Overall measurements: 23 x 22 3/4 x 38 1/2 inches.", "Tapered handles are easy to grasp and fit comfortably in the hand. The Melaware Left Hand Spoon (pictured on far right) is bent to the right for easier access to the mouth for left-handed users. The handle measures 1 in. in diameter at the base and tapers to 3/4 in. Dishwasher safe. Melaware Left Hand Spoon Features: Tapered handles are easy to grasp. Ideal for persons with decreased wrist motion. Utensils are made of Stainless steel. Melaware Left Hand Spoon Specifications: Handle measures : 1 in. in diameter at the base and taper to 3/4 in. Dishwasher safe.", "The optional Mini Liner can be removed from the Mini Folding Shopping Cart and used as a carrying tote. This liner has a square bottom which increases its capacity.The Mini Liner is made of water repellent nylon. Features an adjustable shoulder strap for easy carrying, and Velcro fasteners built in to attach to the shopping cart. (Shown being used as a carrying tote.) Mini Liner Features: Color Options: Black, Red, White, and Yellow. Square bottom increases capacity. Made of Water Repellent Nylon! Adjustable shoulder strap. Mini Liner Specifications: Length: 20 inches. Width: 13 inches. Depth: 10 1/2 inches.", "The Extra Large Adult Size Clothing Protector features a Poly/cotton cover with waterproof barrier to protect clothing for messy eaters. The extra large adult size bib has attractive print designs with mauve, green or navy background. White trim. Hook-and-loop (Velcro) closure. Measures 17-3/4 x 36 inches. Adult Clothing Protectors Features: Poly/cotton cover with waterproof barrier. Keeps wearer completely food free and dry. Adult Clothing Protectors Specifications: Hook-and-loop (Velcro) closure. Measures 17-3/4 x 36 inches.", "The Scooter Tiller Basket Liner fits inside your scooter tiller basket so smaller items don't slip through. The zippered top adds security and portability. Fits most baskets. Scooter Tiller Basket Liner Features: Fits inside your scooter tiller basket so smaller items don't slip through. Zippered top adds security and portability. Scooter Tiller Basket Liner Specifications: Measures 13 inches wide x 10 inches long x 7 inches deep. Constructed of high quality water resistent fabric. Made in U.S.A.", "The Mid-Range Seatback Bag is the perfect size wheelchair seat-back bag! Similar to the Standard Seatback Bag, but the mid range seat back bag offers a zipper pocket and an open mesh pocket for additional storage. Fits both scooters and wheelchairs. Adjustable straps convert to fit scooter seatback and wheelchair push handles. Mid-Range Seatback Bag Features: Offers a zipper pocket and an open mesh pocket for additional storage. Mid-Range Seatback Bag Specifications: Measures 12 inches wide x 13 inches high x 3 inches deep. Constructed of high quality water resistant fabric. Made in U.S.A.", "The Quadriplegic Palmer Clip with Pocket was designed specially for a quadriplegic user. Although the utensil easily slides into the pocket, the utensil is securely held and will not fall or slip out. The Clip is made of molded Kydex plastic that will slide onto the users hand and helps them to gain control of the utensil while eating. Quadriplegic Palmer Clip with Pocket Features: Fits right or left hand. Spring action holds cuff in place. Utensil pocket permits effective utensil positioning. Little or no gripping ability is needed. Quadriplegic Palmer Clip with Pocket Specifications: Does not fit built-up handles. Latex free. Utensils not included. Adjust fit with a heat gun.", "As big as they come! This Monster Seat-Back bag is great for shopping, laundry, groceries, and more. A rigid frame allows bag to remain open. Fits both wheelchairs and scooters. Adjustable straps convert to fit scooter seatback and wheelchair push handles. Side compartments provide quick access to items that you need to keep handy. Monster Seatback Bag Features: Large bag for shopping, laundry, groceries, and more. Monster Seatback Bag Specifications: Constructed of high quality water-resistant fabric with durable nylon webbing straps. Measures 13 inches wide x 18 inches high x 10 inches deep. Made in U.S.A.", "Extension Handle for recliners places handle within easy reach. Provides easy adjustment of all types of reclining chairs. Four bolt attachment ensures secure fit. Padded design protects chair handle.Made of heavy duty steel. Recliner Lever Extender Features: 4 bolt attachment that ensures a secure fit to most recliner handles. Adds 6\" to your reach. Handle is 7\" wide, giving you more surface to grasp. Recliner Lever Extender Specifications: Dimensions - 9\" L x 7\" W. Weighs only 2 pounds. Made of heavy duty steel.", "The Posey Heel Pillow helps protect heels and ankles from skin irritation and painful pressure sores. It also provides protection against skin breakdown on heels and feet. Comfortable heel protection device filled with soft polyester fiber and covered with soft cotton fabric. The heel pillow features hook and loop fasteners for quick and easy application. One pair per package. Thick quilted polyester fill protects heels and aids in decreasing pressure to reduce the risk of pressure sores. Machine washable. Sized for most applications. Large size recommended for large or edematous foot/ankle.This product is not intended for use while walking. Posey Heel Pillow Features: Helps protect heels and ankles from skin irritation and painful pressure sores. Provides protection against skin breakdown on heels and feet. Filled with soft polyester fiber and covered with soft cotton fabric. Posey Heel Pillow Specifications: Regular size heel pillow measures 10 x 9 inches. Machine washable. One pair per package. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "Replacement sponges package of three. Replacement sponges for Dr. Joseph's Footbrush. Toe sponges fit easily between toes.", "The Amefa Utensils are lightweight stainless steel forks, knives, and spoons, made with built up plastic curved handles that fit comfortably in the hand. Amefa Right Hand Spoon handle measures 5 inches in length and 1 1/4 inches in diameter. Designed especially for those who have a hard time holding on to standard shaped spoons. The spoon and fork are both angled for either the left or right hand. Amefa Right Hand Spoon: Curved handle provides an easy to hold, easy to use utensil. Large grip is easier to grasp. Amefa Right Hand Spoon: Handle measures 5 inches in length and 1 1/4 inches in diameter.", "The Leveron Doorknob Lever Adaptor is a universal door knob lever adaptor! The adaptor will fit all door knobs regardless of size or shape and on either side of interior or exterior doors. Installation is easily accomplished without removing the knob or adjusting any of the existing hardware. Does not use any adhesives or metal grip mechanisms that will discolor or scratch the knob's surface. Allows full key access. Complies with fire safety requirements. Utilizes a special thermo-plastic and unique fastening system. Provides a very easy way to open the door. Push down on the handle with the side of your hand or push up on the handle with the back of your hand. No twisting or turning. These are ideal for anyone who has arthritis or weak hands, or for someone who simply wants the convenience of a lever door handle (i.e. easier opening with your arms full of grocery bags etc.). Leveron converts almost every existing door knob to lever action. One size fits all. It is easy to install and comes with a unique custom installation wrench (this unique wrench provides added security against theft).The Leveron Lever Adapter is made of a high density, light weight, very durable thermoplastic. Unlike metal adapters it is warm to the touch, and will not peel or rust. Put this lever in a vice..twist it...bang it with a hammer. You'll find it resilient and tough. It will not tarnish, cleans easily, and is unaffected by industrial solvents. It is unaffected by extreme weather conditions from -100 F to its melting point of 250 F, as well as the damaging effects of salt air.Caution: This product contains natural rubber latex which may cause allergic reactions. Leveron Door Knob Lever Features: will fit all door knobs regardless of size or shape! Made of a high density, light weight, very durable thermoplastic. Warm to the touch, and will not peel or rust. Leveron Door Knob Lever Specifications: Handle length- 4 in. Contains natural rubber latex. The turner knob is 2 5/8 in. (6.7cm) diameter and the handle is 4 inches (10cm) long. Available in Almond, Satin Silver, Antique Brass.", "Rigid Lip Blocks can be placed in the top of the straw to assist with lip closure and to direct fluid into the front of the mouth. Measures 3/4 inch long. Package of 6. Colors may vary. Rigid Lip Block Features: Discourages users from biting the straw. FDA compliant and contains no lead, phthalates, PVC, BPA or latex. Rigid Lip Block Specifications: Includes: package of 6. Colors: vary. Length: ¾ inch.", "The Sip-Tip Valve keeps the straw full of liquid. It reduces the amount of energy needed to bring liquid to the mouth. Provides a moderate restriction, giving the user greater control of the liquid flow. Coughing and choking is eliminated, and less air is swallowed.Insert the valve into the bottom of the straw. The valve keeps the straw full of liquid. Valve opening is set for moderate flow; some users will prefer a freer flow which may be obtained by trimming the end of the valve. Select Flow Valve is compatible with most brands of disposable flex straws.", "Clip a Plastic Food Bumper Guard onto most any circular plate 9 to 11 inches and helps making scooping food onto utensils easier. The 1 1/4 inch plastic rail is lightweight and dishwasher safe.", "The Slicing Knife has a high quality stainless steel blade, that is long and narrow. Ideal for slicing bread. An easy-to-grip contoured closed handle with blades set at an angle minimizes wrist movement for the user. The handle has been designed to counter-balance the weight of the utensil while also being aesthetically pleasing. Slicing Knife Features: Easy-to-grip contoured handle. Handle angle minimises wrist movement. Slicing Knife Specifications: Blade length 254mm. Weight 125g. Dishwasher safe.", "A wonderful finish for any shampoo. The No Rinse Hair Conditioner is ready to use. Instantly eliminates snarls and tangles while leaving hair soft and easy to manage. No rinsing required. No residue and no greasiness. Simply apply, massage into hair, and leave in or towel dry, comb and style. Alcohol free. 8 oz bottle. No-Rinse Hair Conditioner Features: Ready to use. Eliminates snarls and tangles. No rinsing required. No-Rinse Hair Conditioner Specifications: 8 oz bottle. Alcohol free.", "The Ring Writer Clip has two linked rings, one for the finger and one for the writing utensil. Positions and angles the utensil correctly for use. Requires little or no gripping ability. Ring Writer Clip Features: Offers extra control while writing. Little or no gripping ability is needed. Ring Writer Clip Specifications: Three sizes to fit different fingers. Finger Ring IDs: Small .58\" (1.47 cm), Medium .73\" (1.85 cm), Large .87\" (2.21 cm). Package of 3 includes 1 of each size ring. Made of Polyethylene.", "The NO RINSE BODY BATH concentrated formula produces a gentle bathing solution that does not require rinsing. Just 1 oz. of the Body Bath yields 32 oz. of solution. The mild, pH balanced formula eliminates odors and is gentle enough for perineal cleansing.To use, mix one capful of the Body Bath with one quart of warm water; apply to body and gently massage into lather. The foam removes dirt and oil, then towel dry. Skin is soft, clean, and refreshed - never sticky.The No Rinse Body Bath special formula for bathing without rinsing! Simply apply to washcloth, massage into lather on body, then towel dry - no rinsing required. Moisturizing formula leaves skin fresh and clean.Shipping via UPS Ground delivery. Case of 24 No Rinse Body Bath 8 oz. bottles Feature: Gentle bathing solution that does not require rinsing. Mild, pH balanced formula eliminates odors and is gentle enough for perineal cleansing. Leaves skin is soft, clean, and refreshed - never sticky. Case of 24 No Rinse Body Bath 8 oz. bottles Specifications: 1 oz. of the Body Bath yields 32 oz. of solution. Case of 24 - 8 oz. bottles. Overweight item. $4.00 additional shipping is included in the purchase price. UPS Ground only.", "The NO RINSE BODY BATH concentrated formula produces a gentle bathing solution that does not require rinsing. Just 1 oz. of the Body Bath yields 32 oz. of solution. The mild, pH balanced formula eliminates odors and is gentle enough for perineal cleansing.To use, mix one capful of the Body Bath with one quart of warm water; apply to body and gently massage into lather. The foam removes dirt and oil, then towel dry. Skin is soft, clean, and refreshed - never sticky.The No Rinse Body Bath special formula for bathing without rinsing! Simply apply to washcloth, massage into lather on body, then towel dry - no rinsing required. Moisturizing formula leaves skin fresh and clean. No Rinse Body Bath Case of 4 Gallons Feature: Gentle bathing solution that does not require rinsing. Mild, pH balanced formula eliminates odors and is gentle enough for perineal cleansing. Leaves skin is soft, clean, and refreshed - never sticky. No Rinse Body Bath Case of 4 Gallons Specifications: 1 oz. of the Body Bath yields 32 oz. of solution. Case of 4 Gallons. Overweight item. $5.00 additional shipping is included in the purchase price. UPS Ground only.", "The NO RINSE BODY BATH concentrated formula produces a gentle bathing solution that does not require rinsing. Just 1 oz. of the Body Bath yields 32 oz. of solution. The mild, pH balanced formula eliminates odors and is gentle enough for perineal cleansing.To use, mix one capful of the Body Bath with one quart of warm water; apply to body and gently massage into lather. The foam removes dirt and oil, then towel dry. Skin is soft, clean, and refreshed - never sticky.The No Rinse Body Bath special formula for bathing without rinsing! Simply apply to washcloth, massage into lather on body, then towel dry - no rinsing required. Moisturizing formula leaves skin fresh and clean. No-Rinse Body Bath Gallon Features: Gentle bathing solution that does not require rinsing. Mild, pH balanced formula eliminates odors and is gentle enough for perineal cleansing. Leaves skin is soft, clean, and refreshed - never sticky. No-Rinse Body Bath Gallon Specifications: 1 oz. of the Body Bath yields 32 oz. of solution. one gallon bottle. Overweight item. $4.00 additional shipping is included in the purchase price. UPS Ground only.", "The Professional Cushion with Basic Cover provides exceptional pressure relief for users at risk of skin breakdown or with a history of pressure ulcers. A full 1 5/8 inch Akton polymer provides effective weight distribution on a contour or flat surface. The Professional Cushion provides an additional 50% cushioning against pressure, shear, and vibration. This is significant for those active clients using a power wheelchair who have increased concerns about bottoming-out and the potential effective of increased temperatures (due to foam insulation properties). Basic Cover is included. The Basic Cover is made of a durable stretch knit material. Soft black pontae fabric, non skid bottom, zippered on 3 sides, removable and washable. An Incontinence Cover is also available for an additional charge. Custom sizes also available - please contact us by phone for a custom size quote. Toll free number 1.877.750.03Shipping via UPS Ground.This is a non-returnable hygiene item.", "The No Rinse Shampoo completely cleans hair without water - no rinsing is required. Apply shampoo to hair until completely wet, then massage into hair. Rich lather causes dirt and dust particles to float to the top of the foam. Towel dry hair, comb and style.Leaves hair silky soft and manageable. The PH balanced, no alcohol formula won't irritate sensitive skin, so it is safe for adults or children.No Rinse products are used in hospitals and nursing facilities all over the county. Use at home or while traveling or camping. No Rinse Shampoo Features: Ready to use. Does not require rinsing. Leaves hair silky soft and manageable. Towel dry hair, comb and style. No Rinse Shampoo Specifications: Single Gallon No Rinse, waterless Shampoo. Overweight item. Additional shipping is included in the purchase price. UPS Ground only.", "High rim and reverse curve on one side aids in scooping food onto a utensil without spilling over the side. The bottom of the dish has a rubber suction base to prevent skidding and secure the plate to your table. Ideal for individuals with self feeding problems to scoop food without spilling. Top rack dishwasher safe. Color may vary. Scooper Plate with Suction Base Features: Ideal for individuals with self feeding problems. Rubber suction base to prevent skidding and secure the plate to your table. Aids in scooping food onto a utensil without spilling over the side. Scooper Plate with Suction Base Specifications: Measures 6 3/4 inch diameter. Low rim is 3/4 inch tall, high curved rim is almost 1 1/2 inches high. Material: Polypropylene.", "Clean your back, toes, or any other hard to reach spot with the Long Handle Bath Sponge ! Durable sponges weigh only 2 oz. Long Handle Bath Sponge Features: Soft foam is non-irritating to the skin! Handle can be bent! Durable sponges! Long Handle Bath Sponge Specifications: Rectangular sponge measures 5 in. long and 2 1/2 in. thick. Contoured sponge measures 5 in. long and is 2 in. thick. Round sponge measures 5 in. in diameter and 2 1/4 in. thick. Total length: 22 in.", "The No Rinse , waterless Shampoo completely cleans hair without water - no rinsing is required. Apply shampoo to hair until completely wet, then massage into hair. Rich lather causes dirt and dust particles to float to the top of the foam. Towel dry hair, comb and style.Leaves hair silky soft and manageable. The PH balanced, no alcohol formula won't irritate sensitive skin, so it is safe for adults or children.No Rinse products are used in hospitals and nursing facilities all over the county. Use at home or while traveling or camping. Case of 12 No Rinse Shampoo 16 oz. bottles Feature: Ready to use. No rinsing is required. Leaves hair silky soft and manageable. Towel dry hair, comb and style. Case of 12 No Rinse Shampoo 16 oz. bottles Specifications: Case of 12 - 16 oz. bottles. Overweight item. $5.00 additional shipping is included in the purchase price. UPS Ground only.", "The No Rinse Shampoo completely cleans hair without water - no rinsing is required. Apply shampoo to hair until completely wet, then massage into hair. Rich lather causes dirt and dust particles to float to the top of the foam. Towel dry hair, comb and style.Leaves hair silky soft and manageable. The PH balanced, no alcohol formula won't irritate sensitive skin, so it is safe for adults or children.No Rinse products are used in hospitals and nursing facilities all over the county. Use at home or while traveling or camping. Case of 24 No Rinse Shampoo 8 oz. bottles Feature: Ready to use. No rinsing is required. Leaves hair silky soft and manageable. Towel dry hair, comb and style. Case of 24 No Rinse Shampoo 8 oz. bottles: Case of 24 - 8 oz. bottles. Overweight item. $5.00 additional shipping is included in the purchase price. UPS Ground only.", "The No Rinse Shampoo completely cleans hair without water - no rinsing is required. Apply shampoo to hair until completely wet, then massage into hair. Rich lather causes dirt and dust particles to float to the top of the foam. Towel dry hair, comb and style.Leaves hair silky soft and manageable. The PH balanced, no alcohol formula won't irritate sensitive skin, so it is safe for adults or children.No Rinse products are used in hospitals and nursing facilities all over the county. Use at home or while traveling or camping. No Rinse Shampoo Features: Ready to use. Does not require rinsing. Leaves hair silky soft and manageable. Towel dry hair, comb and style. No Rinse Shampoo Specifications: Case of 4 No Rinse Shampoo Gallon bottles. Overweight item. $5.00 additional shipping is included in the purchase price. UPS Ground only.", "These special drinking straws feature a one-way valve that allows liquid to flow only up the straw. Liquid will not flow down this straw after lips are removed.The one-way valve also eliminates sucking air from an empty straw. Each package contains 10 - 7 inch straws. Ideal for persons with weak oral musculature or difficulty swallowing. One-Way Drinking Straw Features Allows liquid to flow only up the straw. Eliminates sucking air from an empty straw. One-Way Drinking Straw Specifications Length: 7 inches Pack: 10 Straws Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "The E Size Oxygen Tank Holder is a very safe and inexpensive way of carrying your oxygen cylinder on the back of your wheelchair or scooter. Can carry E size oxygen tanks and smaller size tanks. Constructed of high quality water-resistant fabric. Made in U.S.A. Designed for stability on wheelchairs with push handles and scooter style seats. E Size Oxygen Tank Holder Features: Water-resistant fabric. Safe and inexpensive. Holds E size oxygen tanks and smaller tanks. E Size Oxygen Tank Holder Specifications: Color choices- Black. Choose holder for wheelchairs or for scooters.", "Body Care Long Handle Hair Brush has firm curved bristles designed follow the shape of the head. This means that the handle can be held close to the body without losing power or reach. Body Care Long Handle Brushes and Combs are great for people with limited arm or hand movement. Anti-slip handles are ergonomically designed to lie against user's entire palm. Contoured design is both attractive and functional. Made of polypropylene. Body Care Long Handle Hair Brush Features: Firm curved bristles. Handle is designed to lie against user's entire palm. Anti-slip handles. Attractive and functional contoured design. 14 inches long.", "The Posey Blanket Support Cover helps prevent foot drop. Machine washable cotton foot support cover slips over the Posey Blanket Support frame. Posey Blanket Support Cover Features: Cotton foot drop support cover secures with strap and is machine washable. Posey Blanket Support Cover Specifications: Measures 36\"L x 24\"H.", "The Posey Six Handle Gait Belt helps to prevent caregiver back injuries when assisting in safe transfers or ambulation. Gait and transfer belt is constructed of extremely durable nylon webbing.The gait belt's multiple handles provide a variety of holding positions. This enables caregivers to safely support and transfer individuals.4 inches wide. Features 4 vertical and 2 horizontal handles. Choose from Metal Buckle or Quick-release buckle (shown). Machine washable. One per package. Adjusts from 27 to 57 inches long. Fits waist sizes 28 to 52 inches. Posey Six Handle Gait Belt Features: Helps to prevent caregiver back injuries. Handles provide a variety of holding positions. 4 vertical and 2 horizontal handles. Posey Six Handle Gait Belt Specifications: Constructed of extremely durable nylon webbing. 4 inches wide. Fits waist sizes 28 to 52 inches.", "The Side Access Bag is a unique wheelchair seatback bag with a zipper on top and both sides for easier access. The side access bag also has a back zippered pocket. Fits both wheelchairs and scooters. Adjustable straps convert to fit both scooter seatback and wheelchair push handles. Zippered top and sides let you easily access what you need without leaving your seat. Wheelchair Side Access Bag Features: Unique wheelchair bag with a zipper on top and both sides for easier access. Wheelchair Side Access Bag Specifications: Constructed of high quality water-resistant fabric with durable nylon webbing straps. Measures 12 inches wide x 13 inches high x 4 inches deep. Made in U.S.A.", "The Scooper Dish is an oval scoop dish with non-skid foam base. The Scooper dish is a combination of a plate and bowl. The contoured lip can be used to push food onto utensils without it spilling out of the dish. The Scooper Dish is designed to assist children and adults with limited muscle control or the use of only one hand. Skidtrol Scooper Dish Measures: 6 x 7 1/2 inches long. 1 3/4 inches deep on the high side. Not recommended for the microwave oven or dishwasher.", "This 8 inch round GripWare Plastic Scooper Plate dish features a scoop edge that gradually rises from front to back. The contoured rim allows food to be trapped and pushed easily onto utensils. The low front and high back are ideal for persons with the use of only one hand or limited motor co-ordination. GripWare dishes have non-skid rubber feet which grip table surfaces and prevent the dish from sliding. GripWare Round Scoop Plate is molded of white, heat resistant plastic that is dishwasher safe and microwave safe. GripWare Plastic Scooper Plate Features: Scoop edge allows food to be trapped and pushed easily onto utensils. Non-skid rubber feet prevent the dish from sliding. Ideal for persons with the use of only one hand. GripWare Plastic Scooper Plate Specifications: Diameter: 8 inch. Color: white. Heat resistant plastic.", "The Rocking T Knife requires less strength and dexterity than other knives. Simply apply gentle pressure to the handle with your whole hand then simply rock back and forth and the 3-1/2 inch stainless steel single-edge blade cuts food easily. Rocking T Knife Features: 3-1/2 inch stainless steel single-edge blade. Carrying case sold separately to safely transport for use anywhere. Rocking T Knife Specifications: Blade 3-1/2 inches. Choose from wooden handle or black plastic Rocking T Knife handle. Carrying case for safely transporting the Rocking T Knife can be purchased below.", "The Rolyan Wrap-On Thumb Support provides warmth and compression to reduce pain in the thumb and wrist. Rolyan Wrap-On Thumb Support is ideal for preventing overuse while allowing unrestricted hand movement. Simply place your thumb in the sleeve, and wrap the hook-and-loop closure around your hand for a secure and snug fit. Rolyan Wrap-On Thumb Support Features: Prevents overuse. Allows unrestricted hand movement. Rolyan Wrap-On Thumb Support Specifications: Measure your wrist circumference for correct size.(XS,S,M,L,XL) Specify size as left or right. Hand wash and air dry.", "The Action Professional Bed Pad is made of 100% Akton Polymer. This mattress overlay is used to cover an isolated area of an existing standard mattress. Used by hospitals and long term care facilities as a significant component in prevention and treatment of decubitus ulcers. Akton Polymer will not migrate like gels, does not promote bacterial growth, and is ideal for multiple client use. Shipping via UPS Ground. Professional Bed Pad Features: Requires no special training to use! Does not promote bacterial growth. Ideal for multiple client use. Will not migrate like gels. Professional Bed Pad Specifications: Width:17 in. Length: 27 in. Thickness: 7/8 in. Available with a hook and loop hitch. This is a non-returnable hygiene item.", "The Rubber Grip Button and Zipper Aid is contoured to fit comfortably in the fingers. A specially formed stainless steel wire loop is inserted through the clothing eyelet and hooks over the button to allow it to be pulled back through the eyelet. 5/8 inch brass plated hook on other end for pulling clothing zipper tab. Handle is 7/8 inch diameter x 7 1/2 inches long. Rubber Grip Button and Zipper Aid Features: Contoured to fit comfortably in the hand. Rubber Grip Button and Zipper Aid Specifications: Handle is 7/8 inch diameter x 7 1/2 inches long. Stainless steel wire loop. 5/8 inch brass plated hook.", "The Soft Curve Grip Knives have ergonomically designed built up handles contoured for a comfortable grip. The soft curve of the handle is designed for use by individuals with arthritis or limited grasping ability. Gentle curve at the end allows the utensil to nestle securely in the hand. Made of dishwasher safe stainless steel with built up santoprene handles. Soft Curve Grip Knife Features: Ergonomically designed built up handles contoured for a comfortable grip. Soft Curve Grip Knife Specifications: Made of stainless steel. Dishwasher safe.", "The 23 inch Rainbow Reacher is designed as a light duty and low cost reacher which anyone could use. Perfect for reaching into nooks and crannies, grabbing things you can't quite reach or don't want to touch. The flexible rubber cups and jaw opening safely grip small and large items up to 1 pound. A handy hook and loop strap is included so your Rainbow Reacher will always be close at hand, in the kitchen, office, laundry room or work shop. Weighs 4.9 oz. Jaw opens to 4.25 inches. 23 inch Rainbow Reacher Features: Low cost. Perfect for grabbing things you can't quite reach or don't want to touch. Flexible rubber cups and jaw opening safely grip small and large items up to 1 pound. Handy hook and loop strap is included so your Rainbow Reacher will always be close at hand. 23 inch Rainbow Reacher Specifications: Weighs 4.9 oz. Jaw opens to 4.25 inches.", "Shampoo Aid Shampoo Tray Neck Adaptor serves as a foam \"gasket\" to help control water flow. It gently hugs the neck and adjusts to various sizes. It attaches to the Shampoo Aide with elastic and hook-and-loop fasteners so that it moves with the user if their head moves.", "The Soft Curve Grip Teaspoons have ergonomically designed built up handles contoured for a comfortable grip. The soft curve of the handle is designed for use by individuals with arthritis or limited grasping ability. Gentle curve at the end allows the utensil to nestle securely in the hand. Made of dishwasher safe stainless steel with built up santoprene handles. Soft Curve Grip Teaspoon Features: Ergonomically designed built up handles contoured for a comfortable grip. Soft Curve Grip Teaspoon Specifications: Made of stainless steel. Dishwasher safe.", "The soft built up handle makes this Shoehorn easier to grasp for persons suffering from arthritis or having difficulty holding a smaller handle. The Nylon cord hand loop can be used to secure the shoehorn to wrist or can be used for hanging. Soft Handle 24 inch Shoehorn Features: Nylon cord hand loop. Oval-shaped handle made .of soft built-up foam! Soft Handle 24 inch Shoehorn Specifications: Length: 24 in. Coated steel.", "The Amefa Utensils are lightweight stainless steel forks, knives, and spoons, made with built up plastic curved handles that fit comfortably in the hand. Amefa Right Hand Fork handle measures 5 inches in length and 1 1/4 inches in diameter. Designed especially for those who have a hard time holding on to standard shaped forks. The fork and spoon are both angled for either the left or right hand. Amefa Right Hand Fork: Curved handle provides an easy to hold, easy to use utensil. Large grip is easier to grasp. Amefa Right Hand Fork: Handle measures 5 inches in length and 1 1/4 inches in diameter.", "The soft built up handle makes this Shoehorn easier to grasp for persons suffering from arthritis or having difficulty holding a smaller handle. The Nylon cord hand loop can be used to secure the shoehorn to wrist or can be used for hanging. Soft Handle 30 inch Shoehorn Features: Nylon cord hand loop. Oval-shaped handle made .of soft built-up foam! Soft Handle 30 inch Shoehorn Specifications: Length 30 in. Coated steel.", "Soapy Soles Elite is a 3-in-1 foot care product that scrubs, massages, and indulges your feet with three different surfaces. One cleans, one massages, and one stimulates. The ultimate way to clean and massage your feet - without bending over!! Soapy Soles Elite pad suctions to the floor of a tub or shower. The bumpy center oval has nodes or \"bumps\" that can be used for a reflexology home treatment to reduce stress and improve health. Clear Blue.The center oval is detachable and can be replaced with the Elite Pumice or Elite Soap Dispenser. Just pop out the center insert and pop in a different insert. Use the Pumice for exfoliating and gently removing dead, dry skin. Rub your foot over the Elite Soap Dispenser to release just the right amount of your favorite liquid soap. Use with any type liquid soap.", "Black ink Ring Pen allows one finger to fit through the ring wich creates a solid grip. The ergonomically designed barrel provides a natural resting place for the writing finger. Barrel fits snuggly between two other fingers. No pressure, no pain. Black ink only. Black ink Ring Pen Features: Special design provides pain free writing. A finger can fit through the ring, providing a strong grip. Black ink Ring Pen Specifications: Black ink only.", "The center oval of Soapy Soles is detachable and can be replaced with the Elite Pumice or Elite Soap Dispenser. Just pop out the center insert and pop in a different insert. Rub your foot over the Elite Soap Dispenser to release just the right amount of your favorite liquid soap. Use with any type liquid soap.", "Spoon and Fork Holders slip on most standard spoons and forks with ease. Comfortable built up handle improves grip. Removable and portable. Two holders per packet.", "The Easi-Grip Spatula features a large built up handle for a comfortable grip that is ergonomically angled to keep your hand and wrist in a stress-free natural position. This adapted kitchen spatula makes cooking easier. The stainless steel utensil is very lightweight which is ideal for someone who has very weak hands. The handle of the Easi Grip Spatula is molded in a plastic, which gives a firm comfortable grip in either hand. The ?soft-feel? black grip on the handle is non-slip which makes it safer to use with wet or greasy hands. The stainless steel spatula is set at 90 degrees from the handle, keeping the hand and wrist in a neutral stress free position. Spatula measures 8 inches long and 2 1/2 inches wide. Easi-Grip Knives and Kitchen Tools are supremely comfortable for everyone to use, but will be particularly beneficial for those with arthritis, Repetitive Strain Injury, Carpal Tunnel Syndrome or other conditions which weaken the hand and wrist. All items are dishwasher safe. Easi-Grip Spatula Features: Soft feel non-slip handle gives a comfortable grip. Angle of handle keeps arm, wrist, and hand in a neutral position. Dishwasher safe. Recommended for weak grip or poor hand control. Easi-Grip Spatula Specifications: Spatula Length: 8 inches. Spatula Width: 2 1/2 inches.", "Package of 2 Ring Pen black ink refills.", "The Roberts Book Holder is a book holder designed for use by individuals with upper extremity disabilities. Holds books, newspapers, magazines, or individual sheets of paper at a comfortable angle for reading. The book holder consists of a base with 10 rows of holes, a book support and a set of pegs. The pegs are placed in the appropriate holes to accommodate the width and thickness of the material; the pegs keep the book in a secure position and prevent unwanted flipping of pages while allowing easy page turning. Roberts Book Holder Features: Molded of strong plastic. Holds books, newspapers, magazines, or individual sheets of paper at a comfortable angle for reading. Pegs keep the book in position and prevent unwanted flipping of the pages. Easy to store or transport (built-in handle). Roberts Book Holder Specifications: Folds to 7.5 x 14 x 7/16 inches for transport and storage. Actual dimensions: 14 in. x 7 1/2 in. x 7/16 in.", "The Posey Armsleeves provide comfortable protection for fragile or sensitive skin that may bruise or tear easily. The arm sleeve features a thumb hole cut out to keep arm sleeves in place and allow full use of all fingers.Made of 95% soft cotton and 5% Lycra, the special stretchy fabric is soft and breathable.Sold in pairs. One pair per package. Can be repeatedly washed and dried. To launder, machine wash and dry low temperature. For best results, hang dry. Posey Armsleeve Features: Helps protect thin, fragile skin tissue. Offers a protective barrier against skin tears and abrasions. Helps prevent patient disruption of medical treatments by camouflaging IV sites and wound sites. Knitted from latex free soft cotton/nylon/spandex four-way stretch yarn. Posey Armsleeve Specifications: Small - Length 15½? (39½ cm), Fits arm circumference 8½? (21½ cm). Medium - Length 16½? (42 cm), Fits arm circumference 11? (28 cm). Large - Length 18? (46 cm), Fits arm circumference 11? (28 cm). X-Large - Length 20? (51 cm), Fits arm circumference 13? (33 cm). Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "The Posey Blanket Support Frame holds the sheets and blankets up off the user's feet. Helps prevent foot drop. Sturdy steel frame clamps securely to mattress to prevent the device from moving. Fits standard hospital mattresses, 36 inches wide. Removes easily when making the bed. Four-piece cradle disassembles for compact storage. Measures 36 in. long x 24 in. high.Optional cotton foot drop support cover is also available. Posey Blanket Support Frame Features: Raised mid-section offers extra height at the center of the bed. Helps keep sheets and blankets off the patient?s feet. Securely clamps to the mattress . Can be easily removed when changing bed sheets. Posey Blanket Support Frame Specifications: Four piece stainless steel construction. Fits standard hospital or nursing home beds. Measures 36 in. long x 24 in. high.", "The 13 inch Safety Sure Pivot Transfer Disc is designed for use by patients who are able to stand but cannot readily move their legs. For maximum support and safety for both the patient and the helper, we recommend that either a transfer belt or sling be used in conjunction with the Safety Sure Transfer Pivot Disc. An individual with impaired mobility from paralysis or limited upper body functions can use the Safety Sure Transfer Pivot Disc unassisted in a very efficient way. If the patient cannot use his/her upper extremities a helper will be needed. The Safety Sure Transfer Pivot Disc is placed on the floor with the label facing downwards. The patient's feet are to be positioned completely on the disc to facilitate a smooth transfer and reduce back strain on both patient and helper. The handle of the Safety Sure Transfer Pivot Disc should be placed facing the patient, to prevent interfering with the feet of the helper. The helper should place one of his/her feet on the disc to safely monitor and control the transfer. After using the Safety Sure Transfer Pivot Disc, it should immediately be removed from the floor to avoid accidents. Because of the lightweight and convenient grip handle, the Safety Sure Transfer Pivot Disc is easy to use and carry. The Safety Sure Transfer Pivot Disc is made of three high quality polymer plates, one turning on top of the other. The Safety Sure Transfer Pivot Disc is also equipped with anti-glide tapes on both sides to prevent slipping on the floor or when a patient is standing on the disc. Transfer between a chair and a wheelchair: The disc is \"locked\" in place when the helper places his/her heel comfortably on the floor and the rest of his/her foot firmly on the plate between the feet of the patient. The patient wears a transfer belt and the helper holds on to the handles while guiding the patient through the transfer. Transfer between a wheelchair and a toilet: Proper use of the disc in this situation is identical to above, except it is safer and easier with two helpers. The helper(s) can use their other, free hand(s) to help undress the patient before placing him/her on the toilet.Transfer between a wheelchair and a bed: Before you move a patient from a bed to a wheelchair, you should make sure that the wheelchair is positioned as close to the bed as possible, with the wheels locked.For better control and safety, always have the patient wear a transfer belt. 13 inch Safety Sure Transfer Disc Specifications: Weighs 2 pounds. 13 inch diameter. 1/2 inch thick. Weight limit 300 lbs.", "This 15 inch Safety Sure Pivot Disc is designed for use by patients who are able to stand but cannot readily move their legs. For maximum support and safety for both the patient and the helper, we recommend that either a transfer belt or sling be used in conjunction with the Safety Sure Transfer Pivot Disc. An individual with impaired mobility from paralysis or limited upper body functions can use the Safety Sure Transfer Pivot Disc unassisted in a very efficient way. If the patient cannot use his/her upper extremities a helper will be needed. The Safety Sure Transfer Pivot Disc is placed on the floor with the label facing downwards. The patient's feet are to be positioned completely on the disc to facilitate a smooth transfer and reduce back strain on both patient and helper. The handle of the Safety Sure Transfer Pivot Disc should be placed facing the patient, to prevent interfering with the feet of the helper. The helper should place one of his/her feet on the disc to safely monitor and control the transfer. After using the Safety Sure Transfer Pivot Disc, it should immediately be removed from the floor to avoid accidents. Because of the lightweight and convenient grip handle, the Safety Sure Transfer Pivot Disc is easy to use and carry. The Safety Sure Transfer Pivot Disc is made of three high quality polymer plates, one turning on top of the other. The Safety Sure Transfer Pivot Disc is also equipped with anti-glide tapes on both sides to prevent slipping on the floor or when a patient is standing on the disc. Transfer between a chair and a wheelchair: The disc is \"locked\" in place when the helper places his/her heel comfortably on the floor and the rest of his/her foot firmly on the plate between the feet of the patient. The patient wears a transfer belt and the helper holds on to the handles while guiding the patient through the transfer. Transfer between a wheelchair and a toilet: Proper use of the disc in this situation is identical to above, except it is safer and easier with two helpers. The helper(s) can use their other, free hand(s) to help undress the patient before placing him/her on the toilet.Transfer between a wheelchair and a bed: Before you move a patient from a bed to a wheelchair, you should make sure that the wheelchair is positioned as close to the bed as possible, with the wheels locked.For better control and safety, always have the patient wear a transfer belt. 15 inch Safety Sure Transfer Disc Specifications: Weighs 2 pounds. 15 inch diameter. 1/2 inch thick. Weight limit 300 lbs.", "A Stocking Aid which will apply support hosiery quickly and evenly. Grooves catch the compression stocking and prevent it from popping off. Works like a traditional sock aid - just pull the stocking over the shell, insert the foot and pull the cord to bring the hose up and onto the leg. Suitable for Class 1 and 2 stockings. Recommended for below the knee stockings, but may be used for some above the knee models. Small measures 5 1/2 in. wide x 5 1/4 in. high. Small Compression Stocking Aid Features: Helps you put on support hosiery quickly and evenly. Suitable for Class 1 and 2 stockings. Grooves catch the compression stocking and prevent it from popping off. Small Compression Stocking Aid Specifications: Measures: 5 1/2 in. wide x 5 1/4 in. high.", "High rim and reverse curve on one side aids in scooping food onto a utensil without spilling. The bottom of the Scooper Bowl dish has a rubber suction base to prevent skidding. Dishwasher safe. Blue only. Scooper Bowl with Suction Base Features: Rubber suction base helps prevent skidding. Reverse curve on one side aids in scooping food onto a utensil without spilling. Scooper Bowl with Suction Base Specifications: 4 1/2 inches in diameter. Molded of heat-resistant plastic.", "The Standard Wheelchair Seat-back Bag is perfect for every day use! A zippered top keeps your belongings secure. Spacious, single compartment bag. Ideal for everyday use. Fits both wheelchairs and scooters. Adjustable straps convert to fit scooter seat back and wheelchair push handles. Standard Wheelchair Seat-back Bag Features: Fits both wheelchairs and scooters. Spacious, single compartment bag. Standard Wheelchair Seat-back Bag Specifications: Measures 12 inches wide x 12 inches high x 3 inches deep. Constructed of high quality water-resistant fabric with durable nylon webbing straps. Made in U.S.A.", "The Soft Basket for Scooter Tillers features front mesh pockets and a zippered top to keep items safe. Ideal for people who do not feel safe putting their items in a wire basket. Has the same cubic inch holding capacity as a standard wire basket. Scooter Soft Basket Features: Front mesh pockets and a zippered top to keep items safe. Scooter Soft Basket Specifications: Measures 12 inches wide x 11 inches long x 8 inches deep. Constructed of high quality water resistent fabric.", "People with pain and, or, limited use of their hands will find using this 10 inch Playing Card Holder easier than trying to hold multiple cards in one hand. The unique slot design allows cards to be easily added or removed. The extended front of the holder provides a convenient place to keep pencils while playing card games.Bicycle EZ See LoVision Playing Cards have jumbo sized 1 5/8 inch numbers and letters to make it easier for those with sight problems. Each suit is color coded for quick recognition. Coated plastic cards don't stick together like regular cards. Playing Card Holder 10 inch Features: People with pain and/or limited use of their hands will find using this holder much easier than trying to hold multiple cards in one hand. The slot is designed so that cards can be easily added or removed. Also holds recipes or memos. Pencils and small coins fit on the extended front of the holder. Playing Card Holder 10 inch Specifications: Measures 2\" x 1 3/8\" x 10\". Comes in a bag of four 10 inch holders. Low Vision Cards Feature : Jumbo sized numbers and letters. Color coded suits. Coated plastic cards don't stick together.", "The Pilot Flotation Pad with Basic Cover is a low profile cushion that provides exceptional pressure relief for most users with a pressure ulcer history. One full inch of Akton Polymer provides immersion for bony prominences and protects clients with fragile skin integrity. This multi-use cushion is recommended for use on manual and power wheelchairs, truck or taxi seats, or for other uses requiring significantly reduced high-pressure areas, vibration and shear. The low profile allows users to effectively reach the floor for more efficient foot-assisted propulsion. It also conforms to pre-contoured foam or rigid cushions to maximize stability and positioning when required. The Basic Cover is sold with the Pilot Flotation Pad. The Basic Cover is made of a durable stretch knit material. Soft black pontae fabric, non skid bottom, zippered on 3 sides, removable and washable. An Incontinence Cover is available for an additional charge.Custom sizes also available - please contact us by phone for a custom size quote. Toll free number 1.877.750.0376. Choose from the following sizes:CAC9000 16W x 16DCAC9006 16W x 18DCAC9005 18W x 16DCAC9008 18W x 18DShipping via UPS Ground.This is a non-returnable hygiene item.", "Sip-Tip Cup makes drinking from a straw easier. A cup with a simple built-in one-way straw! Place the Sip-tip Valve in the bottom of the clear flexible straw. Use the specially designed clear plastic cup and flexible lid for drinking. Liquid moves up the straw when the plastic lid is pressed or when the person takes a sip. The one-way valve keeps the straw full of liquid. This reduces the amount of energy needed to bring liquid into the mouth. The one-way valve can be trimmed at designated areas, giving the user selective flow restriction. The lid stabilizes the straw for easier oral-motor control. The optional mouthpiece is placed on the top of the straw to assist with lip closure and to direct fluid into the front of the mouth. Sip-Tip Cup Package Features: Reduces the amount of energy needed to bring liquid into the mouth. Built-in one-way select flow valve. Valve keeps the straw full of liquid. Not recommended for carbonated beverages. Sip-Tip Cup Package Specifications: Package includes: 1 8 oz rigid plastic tumbler, 1 spill resistant lid, 1 Sip-Tip Valve, 10 clear flexible straws.", "The Steady Write Pen is designed to help improve handwriting. Helpful for those who have tremors, arthritis, decreased coordination, or limited use of hands. The Ball point pen is permanently attached to solid base that helps to balance, guide and stabilize the hand for improved handwriting. The Steady Write pen helps improve handwriting by using the friction of the base to smooth out the motion of your writing. The solid base balances and guides the hand as you write. Grasp like an ordinary pen, or modified knuckle grip. Steady Write Pen Features: Use for either the right or left hand. Uses the friction of the base to smooth out the motion of your writing. Steady Write Pen Specifications: Includes: one base and pen. Uses: standard refills.", "Getting in and out of a car becomes much easier with this Deluxe Swivel Seat Cushion . Carry the lightweight cushion with you anywhere. The 360° turning capability makes it easy to get into whatever position is best for entering and exiting your car. The polyfoam-padded seat adds extra comfort to long drives. The 15 inch seat diameter accommodates most everyone. Enables a person to twist and turn while helping to prevent hip and back strain. Deluxe cushion has 1 3/4 inches of soft foam cushion padded for added comfort. Ball bearing roller mechanism allows seat to turn without binding. Durable flexible base with slip resistant bottom contours to seat and stays in place. Removable camel cover is machine washable. Weight capacity 300 pounds. 15 inch diameter. Item weighs 2.35 pounds. Deluxe Swivel Seat Cushion Features: Ideal for use in your vehicle, home or office. 360° turning capability. Polyfoam-padded seat adds extra comfort. Ball bearing roller mechanism. Slip resistant bottom. Removable camel cover is machine washable. Deluxe Swivel Seat Cushion Specifications: Weight- 2.35 pounds. Weight limit- 300 pounds. Diameter- 15 in.", "The Small Glove Box attaches under most wheelchair or scooter seats. Store your cell phone, tissues, medicine, playing cards, pens, keys, etc. Constructed of high quality, water-resistant fabric. Small Glove Box Features: Ideal for storing valuable and personal items out-of-sight! Stay Organized on the go! Keep items safe from the elements. Small Glove Box Specifications: Width: 9 inches. Length: 5 inches. Depth: 3 inches. Water-resistant fabric Made in U.S.A.", "The soft texture grip handle is easy to hold. The specially formed stainless steel wire loop goes through the clothing eyelet and secures the button, allowing the button to be pulled back through the eyelet with little effort. A 5/8 inch brass plated hook on other end of the handle aids in zipping and un-zipping. Texture Grip Button and Zipper Aid Features: Stainless steel wire loop. Brass plated hook. Texture grip handle. Texture Grip Button and Zipper Aid Specifications: Diameter is 7/8 inch. Length is 7 1/2 inches.", "The Stainless Steel Plate Guard features three spring action clips to secure the guard to the plate. Fits plates with a diameter of 9 to 11 inches. Stainless Steel Plate Guard Features: Three spring action clips to secure the guard to the plate. Dishwasher safe. Stainless Steel offers durability and sanitation. Stainless Steel Plate Guard Specifications: Fits plates with a diameter of 9 to 11 inches.", "The Suction Denture Brush has bristles on both sides. This product has two suction feet on the bottom of the base that securely hold it in place. The larger brush has even-length bristles, and the smaller brush has contoured bristles. Ideal for independent one handed denture care. Handle color may vary. Suction Denture Brush Features: Suction feet that securely hold the base in place. Ideal for independent one handed denture care.", "The Sure Fit Food Guard is ideal for use at home and at restaurants due to its inconspicuous design and tapered ends. It's clear polycarbonate plastic is attractive, strong and functional. The Sure Fit Food Guard stays securely in place while scooping up against it, so food stays on the plate. The Sure Fit Food Guard attaches by sliding the grooved edge onto the plate, forming a gapless fit. Sure Fit Food Guard Features: Clear polycarbonate plastic is attractive, strong and functional. Allows people who have difficulty eating to scoop food up against it. Tapered guard ends allow for easy utensil use. Sure Fit Food Guard Specifications: Fits plates from 8 1/2 to 10 inches in diameter. Top rack dishwasher safe.", "The Soft Curve Grip Soup Spoons have ergonomically designed built up handles contoured for a comfortable grip. The soft curve of the handle is designed for use by individuals with arthritis or limited grasping ability. Gentle curve at the end allows the utensil to nestle securely in the hand. Made of dishwasher safe stainless steel with built up santoprene handles. Soft Curve Grip Soup Spoon Features: Ergonomically designed built up handles contoured for a comfortable grip. Soft Curve Grip Soup Spoon Specifications: Made of stainless steel. Dishwasher safe.", "The soft built up handle makes this Shoehorn easier to grasp for persons suffering from arthritis or having difficulty holding a smaller handle. The Nylon cord hand loop can be used to secure the shoehorn to wrist or can be used for hanging. Soft Handle 18 inch Shoehorn Features: Nylon cord hand loop. Oval-shaped handle made .of soft built-up foam! Soft Handle 18 inch Shoehorn Specifications: Length: 18 in. Coated steel.", "The center oval of Soapy Soles is detachable and can be replaced with the Elite Pumice or Elite Soap Dispenser. Just pop out the center insert and pop in a different insert. Use the Pumice for exfoliating and gently removing dead, dry skin.", "The special design of the Leg Lifter Pillow foam wedge helps to maintain proper pelvic positioning to decrease low back pressure and pain. White or blue poly cotton cover is removable and washable. Leg Lifter Pillow Features: Helps maintain proper pelvic positioning. Cotton cover is removable and washable. Helps decrease low back pressure and pain. Leg Lifter Pillow Specifications: Width: 10 in. Length: 15 in. Height: 7 in. White or blue poly cotton cover. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "The Thermoskin Shoulder Wrap is ideal for people suffering from pain in only one shoulder due to orthopedic conditions such as tendonitis or bursitis. The lining retains heat and absorbs moisture for increased comfort. Measure evenly around the fullest part of your expanded chest for correct size. Fits both left and right. Thermoskin Shoulder Wrap Features: Provides protection, compression and heat therapy for the shoulder. Able to be worn on either the right or left side. Takes moisture into the Wrap and away from the skin. Thermoskin Shoulder Wrap Specifications: Measures 12.00\" H x 8.00\" W x 2.00\" D. Color - Beige.", "The Bath Safe Standard Model Raised Toilet Seat with Arms easily attaches to the toilet and is designed to be used in conjunction with existing toilet seat and lid so the bathroom decor is not altered.These Elevated Toilet Seats feature molded in arms for security and support. Adds 3 1/2 inches to toilet seat height to provide support while getting on and off the toilet. Wider front opening slopes downward to guard against spillage. Arms are raised 7 3/4 inches from bowl. Width between arms is 19 inches. Overall width of arms is 21 1/2 inches. Extra-long screws attach the raised seat and toilet seat to the bowl (hardware included). Weight capacity 300 pounds. Available for standard or elongated toilet bowls.Riser only, uses existing toilet seat. Bath Safe Raised Toilet Seat with Arms Features: Easily attaches to the toilet. Designed to be used in conjunction with regular toilet seat. Molded in arms for security and support. Bath Safe Raised Toilet Seat with Arms Specifications: Arms are raised 7 3/4 inches from bowl. Adds 3 1/2 inches to toilet seat height. Overall width of arms is 21 1/2 inches. Weight capacity 300 pounds. Ships via UPS Ground.Non-returnable hygiene item.", "Package of 3 additional refills for the Steady Write Pen.", "These plastic Straw Holders mount onto the edge of any glass or cup to keep a drinking straw in position. For people who are unable to hold or drink from a glass, this clip-on device eliminates the need to hold the straw. Straw Holder Features: For people who are unable to hold or drink from a glass. Eliminates the need to hold the straw. Straw Holder Specifications: Bag of 6. Will accept any straw with less than 3/8 inch outside diameter.", "Oral hygiene care and cleaning is easier with Toothette® disposable swabs. Soft foam with ridges for stimulation and gentle cleaning. Individually wrapped package of 20. Choose from Treated with peppermint-flavor or Untreated.(Non returnable hygiene item.) Toothettes Features: Soft foam with ridges provide a gentle but thorough cleaning. Toothettes Specifications: Individually wrapped package of 20.", "The Standard Saddle Armrest Bag offers a large single pocket armrest bag that mounts to most any armrest. Helps keep personal belongings close and reachable. Fits both wheelchair and scooter arm rests. Attaches to most armrests using unique \"soft to the skin\" mounting system. Can be mounted on inside or outside of armrest. The Standard Saddle Bag attaches by wrapping the fabric with the 2 inch hook strap over the top of the armrest and securing to the 2 inch soft loop strap. Also included is a smaller hook-and-loop strap attached to the bottom of the bag. Securing this strap to the seat post or frame will prevent the bag from swinging outward. Standard Saddle Armrest Bag Features: Helps keep personal belongings close and reachable. Fits both wheelchair and scooter arm rests. Standard Saddle Armrest Bag Specifications: Measures 10 inches wide x 8 inches long x 3 inches deep. Fits armrests from 1 inch round tubing to deluxe scooter armrests. Soft material allows your arm to mover over the armrest bag without discomfort or skin irritation. Made in U.S.A.", "The Standard Scooter Tiller Bag mounts to tiller handles for easy, convenient storage. Can mount in front or behind the tiller. Has hook-and-loop straps to prevent bag from swinging. Constructed of high quality water resistant fabric. Standard Scooter Tiller Bag Features: Mounts to tiller handles for easy, convenient storage. Can mount in front or behind the tiller. Has hook-and-loop straps to prevent bag from swinging. Standard Scooter Tiller Bag Specifications: Constructed of high quality water-resistant fabric with durable nylon webbing straps. Measures 10 inches wide x 6 inches long x 3 inches deep. Made in U.S.A.", "Additional weight of the Weighted Knife helps stabilize movement for those who experience tremors of the hands. Each utensil weighs approximately 8 ounces. Gray plastic vinyl handle is contoured to fit the fingers. Stainless Steel utensil. Handle length is 4 1/2 in.; diameter is approximately 1 1/8 in. Dishwasher safe. Order single utensils or the set. Weighted Knife Features: Additional weight helps stabilize movement for those who experience tremors of the hands. Handle is contoured to fit the fingers. Weighted Knife Specifications: Stainless Steel utensil. Utensil weighs approximately 8 ounces. Handle length is 4 1/2 in. Diameter is approximately 1 1/8 in.", "Padded transfer and gait belt constructed of woven cotton fabric coated with anti-slide skin friendly material on its inner surface which prevents belt from riding up. Fix lock buckle allows belt to be tightened without opening. Quick release plastic buckle. Small Safety Sure Padded Belt Features: Great for helping patients to stand up or sit down. Simplifies transfers from bed to wheelchair, wheelchair to toilet, or wheelchair to car seat. Numerous handgrips provide a variety of leverage points and reduce strain on caregivers back. Small Safety Sure Padded Belt Specifications: Measures 4 inches wide, 3/8 inches thick. Small fits waist sizes 23-36 inches. Has 2 horizontal and 2 vertical hand grips.", "The Soft Curve Grip Forks have ergonomically designed built up handles contoured for a comfortable grip. The soft curve of the handle is designed for use by individuals with arthritis or limited grasping ability. Gentle curve at the end allows the utensil to nestle securely in the hand. Made of dishwasher safe stainless steel with built up santoprene handles. Soft Curve Grip Fork Features: Ergonomically designed built up handles contoured for a comfortable grip. Soft Curve Grip Fork Specifications: Made of stainless steel. Dishwasher safe.", "Vinyl coated Toilet Tissue Tongs help provide independent hygiene. The lightweight tongs assist individuals with limited reach and range of motion. Ends are slightly angled for more precise use. Vinyl coated handles and ends for easy maintenance. Folded paper is grasped with the coated jaws. Features extra large hand grips. Measures 15 inches long. Stainless steel. Reinforced joint adds extra durability. Latex free.This is a non-returnable hygiene item. Toilet Tissue Tongs Features: Help provide independent hygiene. Assist individuals with limited reach and range of motion. Toilet Tissue Tongs Specifications: Vinyl coated handles. Extra large hand grips. Measures 15 inches long.", "The Weighted Razor Cuff has a pocket that holds a disposable razor. It's 1/2 inch wide strap fits comfortably over the hand. Thumb loop aids in adjusting strap. Hidden weights help to steady shaky hand. Hook and loop closure. Weighs about 1 1/2 pounds.Non returnable hygiene item. Weighted Razor Cuff Features: Easy on cuff design. Weighted for better control. Weighted Razor Cuff Specifications: Fits most razors. Weighs about 1 1/2 pounds.", "The Swedish Cutting Board is ideal for people who have had a stroke or have neurological impairments that limit them to the use of one hand. Stainless steel spikes hold food for cutting or slicing. It also features a vise to hold larger food items, jars or mixing bowls. Swedish Cutting Board Features: Stainless-steel spike insert holds vegetables for slicing. Rubber suction feet adhere the board securely in place. Swedish Cutting Board Specifications: White plastic board measures 12 x 11 inches. Weight: 3 lbs.", "Additional weight of the Weighted Tablespoon helps stabilize movement for those who experience tremors of the hands. Each utensil weighs approximately 8 ounces. Gray plastic vinyl handle is contoured to fit the fingers. Stainless Steel utensil. Handle length is 4 1/2 in.; diameter is approximately 1 1/8 in. Dishwasher safe. Order single utensils or the set. Weighted Tablespoon Features: Additional weight helps stabilize movement for those who experience tremors of the hands. Handle is contoured to fit the fingers. Weighted Tablespoon Specifications: Stainless Steel utensil. Utensil weighs approximately 8 ounces. Handle length is 4 1/2 in. Diameter is approximately 1 1/8 in.", "Additional weight of the Weighted Teaspoon helps stabilize movement for those who experience tremors of the hands. Each utensil weighs approximately 8 ounces. Gray plastic vinyl handle is contoured to fit the fingers. Stainless Steel utensil. Handle length is 4 1/2 in.; diameter is approximately 1 1/8 in. Dishwasher safe. Order single utensils or the set. Weighted Teaspoon Features: Additional weight helps stabilize movement for those who experience tremors of the hands. Handle is contoured to fit the fingers. Weighted Teaspoon Specifications: Stainless Steel utensil. Utensil weighs approximately 8 ounces. Handle length is 4 1/2 in. Diameter is approximately 1 1/8 in.", "The Tall-ette Total Hip Replacement Elevated Toilet Seat is specially designed to assist persons who need an extended hip position due to post-surgical or traumatic injuries, or who have undergone unilateral or bilateral total hip replacements. The saddle style prevents hip adduction and internal rotation. Unique bilateral contoured shape permits easy rising. Tall-ette Total Hip Replacement Elevated Toilet Seat Features: Specially designed to assist persons who need an extended hip position due to post-surgical or traumatic injuries, or who have undergone unilateral or bilateral total hip replacements. 4 inch elevation permits easy sitting and rising. The unique bilateral contoured shape allows for optimal comfort. Tall-ette Total Hip Replacement Elevated Toilet Seat Specifications: Raises the user 4 inches. Fits standard toilets. Outside measures 16 inches long x 14 1/8 inches wide. Inside measures 10 inches long x 8 inches wide. Weighs 3.3 lbs. ***Non-returnable hygiene product***", "The Tek Partner Universal Remote measures 5 1/2 inches wide, 8 1/2 inches long. Retains code information during battery changes. Requires 4 AA batteries. Buttons measure 3/4 inch.Large buttons and bold easy to read characters make these remotes user friendly. Touch sensitive lighted keypad for operation in the dark. Replaces up to 4 standard remotes and can be used with most any combination of TVs, VCRs, and cable boxes. Extra large frames are easy to grasp and difficult to misplace. (Batteries not included). Tek Partner Universal Remote Features: Large buttons. Bold easy to read characters. Lighted keypad for operation in the dark. Replaces up to 4 standard remotes. Tek Partner Universal Remote Specifications: Length: 8 1/2 inches. Width: 5 1/2 inches. 2 1/2 inches thick. Requires 4 AA batteries.", "The Universal Hand Clip is ideal for people with arthritis or limited hand strength. Spring action hand clip fits snug against the hand. Attaches to phones, cups, bottles, hair brushes and other items with heavy duty hook-and-loop (Velcro) adhesive back strips. Universal Hand Clip Features: Ideal for people with arthritis or limited hand strength. Universal Hand Clip Specifications: Spring action hand clip fits snug against the hand. Attaches to phones, cups, bottles, hair brushes and other items. Heavy duty hook-and-loop adhesive back strips.", "The Under Counter Zim Jar Opener can open or close practically all types of screw lids, jars or bottle caps. Simply slip the lid in until it wedges and turn jar. Even opens those frustrating press and turn \"child proof\" containers. Attach the solid steel Under Counter Zim Jar Opener to the underside of any counter, cabinet, or shelf with the provided screws. The Under Counter Zim Jar Opener measures 5 x 6 in. Under Counter Zim Jar Opener Features: Attaches to the underside of any counter, cabinet, or shelf. Nickel plated steel! Under Counter Zim Jar Opener Specifications: Measures: 5 x 6 in.", "Easy to clean polypropylene webbing with a utensil pocket. Adjusts by a Velcro hook-and-loop closure with D-ring thumb loop. Measure hand across top of knuckles. Utensil Holder Specifications: Small/Medium Beige fits 3 1/2 - 4 1/2 inches. Large/XLarge Navy fits 4 1/2 - 4 3/4 inches.", "The Universal Leather ADL Cuff holds various utensils as well as the Right-Angle Pocket (NC21025). Includes a utensil pocket to hold the item of choice, and a comfortable elastic strap to keep the unit secured on the hand. Slide eating utensils into fixed pocket to help people eat without any assistance. Small fits very small adults; Medium fits most women and smaller men; Large fits most men. Utensil is not included. Universal Elastic Cuff Features: Utensils slide into fixed pocket to help people eat without any assistance. Universal Elastic Cuff Specifications: Small: fits 3 to 3 1/2 inches (7.6 to 8.9 centimeters). Width below MP joints. Medium: fits 3 1/2 to 4 inches (8.9 to 10 centimeters). Width below MP joints. Large: fits 4 to 4 1/2 inches (10 to 11 centimeters) Width below MP joints.", "The Thermoskin Arthritis Wrist and Hand Wrap was designed with an adjustable velcro closure that is easier to put on. It provides arthritis sufferers easier application and variable compression. Measure around wrist below wrist crease. Thermoskin Arthritis Wrist and Hand Wrap Features: Ideal for mildly increasing skin temperature to give increased circulation around the hand, wrist, and lower forearm for relief of pain and discomfort from arthritis, Repetitive Stress Injuries (RSI), and tendonitis. Inner lining made of Trioxon, a unique fiber that wicks away perspiration and keeps skin ventilated and comfortably dry. Adjustable Velcro strap applies additional compression/support when needed. Hand or machine-washable.", "The Thermoskin Arthritis Wrist Wrap provides protection and soft support for the wrist during periods of activity and for Repetitive Stress Injuries. Features one piece universal wrap around design to fit both left and right wrists. Velcro closure allows for a comfortable adjustable fit. Measure around the wrist below crease for proper size. Thermoskin Arthritis Wrist Wrap Features: Ideal for mildly increasing skin temperature to give increased circulation around the hand and wrist for relief of pain and discomfort from arthritis, Repetitive Stress Injuries (RSI), and tendonitis. Inner lining made of Trioxon, a unique fiber that wicks away perspiration and keeps skin ventilated and comfortably dry. Adjustable Velcro strap applies additional compression/support when needed. Hand or machine-washable.", "Thermal support for prevention, treatment and rehabilitation of the elbow. The Thermoskin Arthritis Elbow Wrap provides protection and support for the elbow. Useful in the treatment of tennis (lateral epicondylitis) and golfer's (medial epicondylitis) elbow. Elbow wrap with adjustable close over the upper arm is easy to pull on. Helps to provides relief from arthritis pain and discomfort caused by tendonitis. Unique to Thermoskin® is Trioxon®?a unique soft material which not only captures and retains your natural body heat, but also, unlike other products, it allows your skin to ventilate and remain comfortably dry. Thermoskins® are completely washable and ?breathable? to help alleviate excessive perspiration, skin irritations and the unpleasant odor associated with neoprene products.Thermoskin out performs other products because the unique Trioxon lining is designed to be soft against the skin. This minimizes skin irritation and perspiration while helping to retain heat. With Thermoskins, users experience less pain and mastery of rehabilitation protocols is facilitated. Thermoskin heat retainers will enable the return to routine activity more quickly. The arthritis wraps are designed with an adjustable hook and loop closure to allow arthritis sufferers ease of use and compression variation. Measure circumference of arm just below the elbow, with arm extended to determine size. Thermoskin Arthritis Elbow Wrap Features: Ideal for mildly increasing skin temperature to give increased circulation around the elbow for relief of pain and discomfort from arthritis, Repetitive Stress Injuries (RSI), and tendonitis. Inner lining made of Trioxon, a unique fiber that wicks away perspiration and keeps skin ventilated and comfortably dry. Adjustable Velcro strap applies additional compression/support when needed. Hand or machine-washable.", "This specially designed Wanchik's Writer device slides comfortably on, wrapping around your hand between the thumb and the index finger. Insert your standard pen or pencil into the holder. The tool supports your writing utensil for a more relaxed hand when writing.This writing utensil holder holds the pen for you! People with decreased dexterity will be able to hold the writing finger in the proper position.To determine size, measure the length from the index finger MCP to the DIP joint (knuckle to last index finger joint). Small fits 2-1/2in to 3-1/2in (6.4cm to 8.9cm). Large fits 3-1/2in to 4-1/2in (8.9cm to 11cm). Wanchik's Writer Features: Wraps comfortably around the palm. Helps give individuals with weakened hand, finger and/or wrist dexterity the support and control needed to write. Wanchik's Writer Specifications: Plastic-covered aluminum. Designed to fit pencils and thin ballpoints. Easily bendable for a customized fit.", "The Thermoskin Arthritis Knee Wrap provides support, warmth, and gentle compression to decrease pain due to sprains, arthritis, or general discomfort of the knee. An easy on/easy off support designed specifically for arthritis sufferers. Measure with knee slightly bent underneath knee cap. Thermoskin Arthritis Knee Wrap Features: Ideal for mildly increasing skin temperature to give increased circulation around the knee for relief of pain and discomfort from arthritis, Repetitive Stress Injuries (RSI), and tendonitis. Inner lining made of Trioxon, a unique fiber that wicks away perspiration and keeps skin ventilated and comfortably dry. Adjustable Velcro strap applies additional compression/support when needed. Hand or machine-washable.", "Additional weight fo the Weighted Fork helps stabilize movement for those who experience tremors of the hands. Each utensil weighs approximately 8 ounces. Gray plastic vinyl handle is contoured to fit the fingers. Stainless Steel utensil. Handle length is 4 1/2 in.; diameter is approximately 1 1/8 in. Dishwasher safe. Order single utensils or the set. Weighted Fork Features: Additional weight helps stabilize movement for those who experience tremors of the hands. Handle is contoured to fit the fingers. Weighted Fork Specifications: Stainless Steel utensil. Utensil weighs approximately 8 ounces. Handle length is 4 1/2 in. Diameter is approximately 1 1/8 in.", "The Weighted Insulated Cup with Anti-Splash Lid keeps the hot liquids hot, or the cold liquids cold. A steel weight has been added internally in the base of the cup to reduce tremors of the hand - commonly associated with persons having Parkinson's Disease and other illnesses or injuries that cause tremors. Blue cup holds up to 8 oz. The cup comes with an Anti-splash which helps prevent spills and keeps the liquid from splashing out of the cup while drinking. The Lid is constructed of white plastic. Weighs 8.4 oz. Latex free. Weighted Insulated Cup with Anti-Splash Lid Features: Added weight helps reduce tremors of the hand. Insulation keeps the contents warm or cold. Weighted Insulated Cup with Anti-Splash Lid Specifications: Latex free. Cup holds up to 8 oz. Weighs 8.4 oz. Color choice - blue cup and white lid.", "The Thermoskin Flexible Thumb Splint has a moldable and low profile splint immobilizes the CMC joint, while providing heat therapy and rigid support for UCL injuries associated with repetitive strain problems. Wrap around design is easy to apply and remove.Measure around wrist for size. Specify size and left/right. Thermoskin Flexible Thumb Splint Features: Allows performance of routine tasks - beneficial for arthritis. Trioxin lining alleviates skin irritation - allows skin to ventilate. Thermoskin Flexible Thumb Splint Specifications: Measure evenly around wrist joint for sizing.", "A weighted mug for individuals with hand tremors. This plastic insulated mug weighs approximately 11.4 ounces. Holds 12 oz. Detachable lid. Replacement lids are available.This mug cannot be microwaved due to the steel weight in the bottom of the mug. Weighted Insulated Mug with Lid Features: Wide handle is large enough for large fingers to easily grasp the mug. Insulated to help keep drinks hot or cold. Helps control tremors for those with Parkinson's or other disorders that cause hand trembling. Weighted Insulated Mug with Lid Specifications: Top shelf dishwasher safe. 5 inches tall and 3.25 inches in diameter. Weighs approximately 11.4 ounces empty. Holds 12 oz.", "The Standard Walker Side Bag attaches to the side of most walkers and is convenient for storing small items. It is constructed of high quality water resistant fabric with durable nylon straps and is made in the USA. This small walker pouch measures 11 inches wide, 6 inches long, 3 inches deep. Standard Walker Side Bag Features: Ideal for storing small items. Smaller size doesn't weigh down the walker. Straps prevent bag from swinging. Standard Walker Side Bag Specifications: Measures: 11 x 6 x 3 inches. Material: high quality water-resistant fabric with durable nylon webbing straps. Made in: U.S.A. Color: Black.", "The Weighted Utensils Set of Four includes: teaspoon, fork, knife and soup spoon.Additional weight helps stabilize movement for those who experience tremors of the hands. Each utensil weighs approximately 8 ounces. Gray plastic vinyl handle is contoured to fit the fingers. Stainless Steel utensil. Handle length is 4 1/2 in.; diameter is approximately 1 1/8 in. Dishwasher safe. Order single utensils or the set. Weighted Utensils Set of Four Features: Additional weight helps stabilize movement for those who experience tremors of the hands. Handle is contoured to fit the fingers. Weighted Utensils Set of Four Specifications: Stainless Steel utensil. Utensil weighs approximately 8 ounces. Handle length is 4 1/2 in. Diameter is approximately 1 1/8 in.", "The Toilet Tissue Aid features a spring clip to hold toilet tissue. Squeeze the handle to open. The handle shape allows most persons with minimal grasp to insert their fingers into the loop. Handle portion to angle measures 9 3/4 inches. Lower angle portion measures 6 1/4 inches. Distance from top to tip, measured diagonally is 13 inches. This is a non-returnable hygiene item. Toilet Aid Features: Spring clip holds toilet tissue. Handle allows people with minimal grip to operate. Toilet Aid Specifications: Diagonal length is 13 inches.", "No more difficult lifting!Fill the Portable Wheeled Tote with groceries, books and more. Folds to a pocket size for easy storage. Adjustable hand straps for easy carrying. Constructed with heavy gauge, water repellent nylon for heavy items. Built with front pocket with zipper for extra storage. Comes with a reusable vinyl zipper bag with handle. For extra portability, the two wheels on this bag fold easily. No assembly required.Convenient to take everywhere, this lightweight rolling shopping bag folds down to the size of a pocketbook. Similar to rolling luggage, features a heavy-gauge, water-repellent, black vinyl bag that rides upright for easy maneuverability. Adjustable handle straps make it easy for anyone to use. Easy-close fastener at the top of the bag provides quick and easy access. Front pocket has a zipper for secure storage. Two folding wheels with front supports for standing. Folding Shopping Bag with Wheels Specifications: Weight capacity: 25 lbs. Bag weighs less than 3 pounds. Carrying case: 12Lx7W inches. Full size of bag: 22-1/2Hx12Wx7D inches.", "Adaptive Flat Pads are 100% smooth Akton Polymer. Adaptive Pads have multifunctional applications for traditional and non-traditional seating challenges. Pads can be cut and used for spot protection on products, such as arm pads, foot plates, head rests, leg rests, and splints or braces. Adaptive Pads are available in 1/4 inch 1/2 inch and 5/8 inch thicknesses. The Adaptive Pad when used as a cushion is intended for comfort only, not medical intervention. AKTON Polymer won't leak, flow, or bottom out, and it is tissue equivalent. It moves with wheelchair users, not against them, to reduce pressure and shear, the two leading causes of pressure sores. AKTON polymer is also radiolucent and easy to clean with standard disinfectant. It will not support microbiological growth, and it won't absorb body fluids or odors.Please note: If 1/2 inch or 5/8 inch pad is used for a seating cushion, pad must be used with an Action brand cover for warranty to be in force. 1/2 inch Akton Polymer Adaptive Flat Pad Features: Won't leak, flow, or bottom out, and it is tissue equivalent. Multifunctional applications for traditional and non-traditional seating challenges. Moves with wheelchair users, not against them, to reduce pressure and shear. Radiolucent and easy to clean with standard disinfectant. Will not support microbiological growth, and it won't absorb body fluids or odors. 1/2 inch Akton Polymer Adaptive Flat Pad Specifications: Available in 1/4 inch 1/2 inch and 5/8 inch thicknesses. This is a non-returnable hygiene item. Shipping via UPS Ground.", "Eighteen inch re-usable flexible polyethylene drinking straw has a 3/16 inch diameter hole. Package of 10 straws. 18 inch Flexible Re Usable Straw Features: Eighteen inch re-usable flexible polyethylene drinking straw. 18 inch Flexible Re Usable Straw Specifications: 3/16 inch diameter hole. Package of 10 straws. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "5/8 inch Akton Polymer Adaptive Pad is 100% smooth Akton Polymer. Adaptive Pads have multifunctional applications for traditional and non-traditional seating challenges. Pads can be cut and used for spot protection on products, such as arm pads, foot plates, head rests, leg rests, and splints or braces. Adaptive Pads are available in 1/4 inch 1/2 inch and 5/8 inch thicknesses. The Adaptive Pad when used as a cushion is intended for comfort only, not medical intervention. Akton Polymer Pads won't leak, flow, or bottom out, and it is tissue equivalent. It moves with wheelchair users, not against them, to reduce pressure and shear, the two leading causes of pressure sores. AKTON polymer is also radiolucent and easy to clean with standard disinfectant. It will not support microbiological growth, and it won't absorb body fluids or odors.Please note: If 1/2 inch or 5/8 inch pad is used for a seating cushion, pad must be used with an Action brand cover for warranty to be in force. 5/8 inch Akton Polymer Adaptive Pad Features: Won't leak, flow, or bottom out, and it is tissue equivalent. Multifunctional applications for traditional and non-traditional seating challenges. Moves with wheelchair users, not against them, to reduce pressure and shear. Radiolucent and easy to clean with standard disinfectant. Will not support microbiological growth, and it won't absorb body fluids or odors. 5/8 inch Akton Polymer Adaptive Pad Specifications: Available in 1/4 inch 1/2 inch and 5/8 inch thicknesses. This is a non-returnable hygiene item. Shipping via UPS Ground.", "This unique T Turning Handle fits over knobs, keys, faucets and other irregularly shaped handles. The 3-1/2 inch long, easy-to-grasp \"T\"-shaped handle provides leverage and a secure grip. The steel prongs are embedded in a durable plastic base. Accommodates items up to 1-1/4 inch in diameter. T Turning Handle Features: Fits over knobs, keys, faucets,& other objects. Steel prongs. Durable plastic base. T Turning Handle Specifications: T handle length- 3-1/2 inch.", "Hook the specially designed end of the lightweight Zip It Zipper Pull tool to the zipper tab to make zipping anything easier. Keep this tool in your pocket or purse for use any time or place. 4 inch long t-shaped handle.Zipper must have a hole to attach the Zip It Zipper Pull.Ring Zipper Pulls are not included. Zip It Zipper Pull Features: Keep this tool in your pocket or purse for use any time or place. Zip It Zipper Pull Specifications: 4 inch long t-shaped handle.", "Attach this one-inch metal ring with clasp hook to any regular zipper tab to make zipping easier. Ideal for jackets, purses, suitcases, etc. Package of 3.Zipper must have a hole to attach the Clear Zip Rings.", "The Snap-N-Save Tub Mount Transfer Bench with Padded Swivel Seat provides assistance getting in and out of the bathtub and provides a secure place to sit while bathing. What makes the Snap-N-Save Tub Mount Transfer Bench with Padded Swivel Seat unique is the space saving tub-mounting features. Compared to most transfer benches, the Tub Mount Sliding Swivel Seat Transfer Bench doesn't have any legs extending outside of the bathtub saving space in the bathroom and helps keep water from splashing outside of the bathtub.With a swivel seat, the Tub Mount Sliding Swivel Seat Transfer Bench enables users to turn 90 degrees before getting in and out of the bath tub. This helps make patient transfers easy and safe. The Tub Mount Sliding Swivel Seat Transfer Bench also features a double safety lock for inside and outside of the tub. The legs adjust to a variety of heights. Tub Requirements Tub Wall Width: 2.75 - 5.75 inches. Inside Tub Width (at Bottom): 16.5 inches (minimum). Inside Tub Width (at Top): 22.5 inches (minimum). Tub Wall Height (inside): 13 - 17.5 inches. Snap-N-Save Tub Mount Sliding Transfer Bench with Padded Swivel Seat Features: Tub mounts easily clamp to side of tub without scratching. Equipped with a non-slip surface to keep you from sliding off the transfer bench. Clamps fasten with a simple turn of a knob. Durable and lightweight aluminum frame. Legs are height adjustable. Features double safety locks for inside and outside positions. Equipped with safety strap for added safety. Easy to assemble without any tools. This tub mount sliding transfer bench has padded seat and back that is built of heat sealed upholstery to resist moisture penetration. The seat platform slides smoothly over polished, high-strength aluminum tubes. Seat and back platform swivels 360 degrees, locking at 90 degrees intervals to allow for easier entry and exit to and from the bench. Rust-proof construction. Entry side of bench mounts to most tub walls for space savings in smaller bathrooms. Easily supports bathers weighing up to 350 pounds (159 kg). Strong suction tipped legs prevent movement on wet surfaces. Snap-N-Save Tub Mount Sliding Transfer Bench with Padded Swivel Seat and Padded Back Specifications: Seat Size: 17.5 W x 13.5 D inches. Padded Seat: 1.5 inches thick. Back Measures: 18.75 inches wide x 8.25 high. Seat height adjustment range (1 inch increments): 18 - 22.5 inches. Weight capacity: 350 lbs. Overweight items ship UPSDue to hygiene reasons, this product is non-returnable.", "The Snap-N-Save Tub Mount Transfer Bench with Molded Swivel Seat provides assistance getting in and out of the bathtub and provides a secure place to sit while bathing. What makes the Snap-N-Save Tub Mount Transfer Bench with Molded Swivel Seat unique is the space saving tub-mounting features. Compared to most transfer benches, the Tub Mount Sliding Swivel Seat Transfer Bench doesn't have any legs extending outside of the bathtub saving space in the bathroom and helps keep water from splashing outside of the bathtub.With a swivel seat, the Tub Mount Sliding Swivel Seat Transfer Bench enables users to turn 90 degrees before getting in and out of the bath tub. This helps make patient transfers easy and safe. The Tub Mount Sliding Swivel Seat Transfer Bench also features a double safety lock for inside and outside of the tub. The legs adjust to a variety of heights. Tub Requirements Tub Wall Width: 2.75 - 5.75 inches. Inside Tub Width (at Bottom): 16.5 inches (minimum). Inside Tub Width (at Top): 22.5 inches (minimum). Tub Wall Height (inside): 13 - 17.5 inches. Snap-N-Save Tub Mount Sliding Transfer Bench with Swivel Seat Features: Bathroom space saver, mounts onto the tub wall. Tub mounts easily clamp to side of tub without scratching. Equipped with a non-slip surface to keep you from sliding off the transfer bench. Clamps fasten with a simple turn of a knob. Durable and lightweight aluminum frame. Legs are height adjustable. Features double safety locks for inside and outside positions. Equipped with safety strap for added safety. Drain holes on the seat and back rest allow for easy drainage. Also equipped with a convenient hand-held shower hook providing free use of both hands in the shower. Easy to assemble without any tools. Snap-N-Save Tub Mount Sliding Transfer Bench with Swivel Seat Specifications: Seat Size: 20.5 W x 13.5 D inches. Back Measures: 16 inches wide x 9.5 high. Seat height adjustment range (1 inch increments): 18 - 22.5 inches. Weight capacity: 350 lbs. Overweight item ships UPSDue to hygiene reasons, this product is non-returnable.", "People with pain and, or, limited use of their hands will find using this 15 inch Playing Card Holder easier than trying to hold multiple cards in one hand. The unique slot design allows cards to be easily added or removed. The extended front of the holder provides a convenient place to keep pencils while playing card games.Bicycle EZ See LoVision Playing Cards have jumbo sized 1 5/8 inch numbers and letters to make it easier for those with sight problems. Each suit is color coded for quick recognition. Coated plastic cards don't stick together like regular cards. Playing Card Holder 15 inch Features: People with pain and/or limited use of their hands will find using this holder much easier than trying to hold multiple cards in one hand. The slot is designed so that cards can be easily added or removed. Also holds recipes or memos. Pencils and small coins fit on the extended front of the holder. Playing Card Holder 15 inch Specifications: Measures 2 x 1 3/8 x 15\" (5.1 x 3.5 x 38 cm). Comes in a bag of four 15 inch holders.", "The Dressing Stick is ideal for people with limited upper extremity movement or decreased hip flexion. Lightweight 5/8 inch diameter hardwood dowel has a vinyl coated push-pull hook on one end and a coated hook on the other. 26 inches long. The small hook on the opposite end aids in pulling zippers and shoelace loops. Essential for anyone who has difficulty bending, a limited range of movement, or the use of only one arm or one hand. Dressing Stick Features: Lightweight 5/8 inch diameter hardwood dowel. Vinyl coated push-pull hook. Coated hook. Hooks aid in pulling zippers and shoelace loops. Dressing Stick Specifications: Length - 26 in.", "Superior, smooth, rounded design of the Self Wipe Toilet Aid provides more comfort than other devices and allows for accurate placement and pressure. Easy to travel with. Comfortable and easy to use hygiene aid helps people who have difficulty bending or limited use of their hands and arms to function independently when using the toilet. Toilet tissue is placed around the angled clamp on the lower portion of the device. After use the tissue is discarded by pressing an easy-to-use release button on the end of the handle. Self Wipe Bathroom Toilet Aid Features: Allows people with limited use of their hands and arms to function independently when using the toilet. Works for anyone lacking the manual dexterity to practice necessary hygiene when using the toilet. Release button allows thumb use only. Never touches the water. Includes a roller handle feature that allows the rolling of toilet tissue and complete use with one hand if needed. Self Wipe Bathroom Toilet Aid Specifications: Handle Measures: 9 3/4 inches in length. Angled Clamp: 5\" length. Total length from top to lower tip: 14 3/4\". Made of sturdy plastic. Autoclavable. Due to hygiene purposes, this item is non-returnable.", "The Shampoo Aid Shampoo Tray is a lightweight, durable tray that rests comfortably on a person's shoulders to make shampooing easier. It is ideal for anyone who has difficulty reclining backwards into a sink for shampooing.Tray has raised edges to channel water; the center hinge adjusts for different heights and folds for storage or transporting.See accessories below. Shampoo Aid Shampoo Tray Features: Rests comfortably on the shoulders allowing you to shampoo in an upright seated position. Raised edges channel water into the sink to keep the floor dry. Great for in home hair washing. Shampoo Aid Shampoo Tray Specifications: Folds to 12 inches wide x 15 inches long. Tray measures 12 inches wide x 1 inch to 4 inches high X 27 inches long when opened.", "Shampoo Aide Shampoo Tray Extender adds up to 6 inches to lengthen tray and provides additional head support.", "The Penco Walker Glides are designed to fit front-wheeled walkers with 1 inch to 1 1/8 inch tubing diameter. Penco Walker Glides feature a patented, self-fitting mechanism for easy installation. Made of durable, high density resin for use on all walking surfaces. The ski design allows for easy movement over thresholds and slight elevation changes without snagging or the need to lift the walker. The self-fitting mechanism and stainless steel tightening bolt keep the glides safe and secure. Manufactured in the United States. Penco Walker Glide Features: Patented, self-fitting mechanism for easy installation. Improves mobility when used in conjunction with wheels on the front legs of standard walkers. Penco Walker Glide Specifications: Fits: front-wheeled walkers with 1 inch to 1 1/8 inch tubing diameter. Construction: durable plastic material.", "This Shampoo Tray is contoured to fit the neck comfortably and rest on client's shoulders. Contoured 1 3/8 inch raised sides support neck and prevent water from spilling over. 35 inch straps wrap around the client's forearm to stabilize the tray. Made from lightweight, durable plastic, that is easily cleansed with soap or household disinfectant and water. Can be used with a chair or wheelchair. (Non returnable hygiene item.) Shampoo Tray Features: Made from lightweight plastic. Easily cleansed with soap or household disinfectant and water. Can be used with a chair or wheelchair. Raised edges prevent water from spilling over. Reduces back strain for caregiver. Shampoo Tray Specifications: Measures 12 x 17 inches. Hand held shower not included. (Non returnable hygiene item.)", "The Shear Smart Pad , combined with a breathable double-layer Shear Smart cover , significantly reduces the effects of shear while providing superb user comfort. The cube construction of the pad surface allows air circulation, provides cushioning from mild impact, heat dissipation and the comfort of sitting on 9/16 inch Akton Polymer. This cushion will conform to contoured bases for additional support when required. Adaptive Pads are 100% Akton Polymer. AKTON polymer won't leak, flow, or bottom out, and it is tissue equivalent. It moves with wheelchair users, not against them, to reduce pressure and shear, the two leading causes of pressure sores. AKTON polymer is also radiolucent and easy to clean with standard disinfectant. It will not support microbiological growth, and it won't absorb body fluids or odors. The Shear Smart Cover is sold with the Shear Smart Pad. The Shear Smart Cover provides significant relief from the effects of shearing and is an effective moisture barrier against incontinence. It offers a complete double layer of low shear material to allow for maximum movement on the pad. Replacement covers are available. Shipping via UPS Ground. Shear Smart Pad with Shear Smart Cover Features: Allows air circulation. Provides cushioning from mild impact. Won't leak, flow, or bottom out. Shear Smart Pad with Shear Smart Cover Specifications: Thickness: 9/16 inch. . This is a non-returnable hygiene item.", "The Super Shopping Cart . is ideal for carrying groceries or laundry and other utility purposes. Easy to assemble. Folds flat for storage. Exceptional high quality and durable 4 wheel compact foldable shopping cart. Features 6 inch rear and 3 inch front 3/4 inch solid rubber tires with steel spokes. Coated with highly durable epoxy finish. Great for senior citizens and single shoppers.Heavy duty wire and steel tubing. Reinforced bottom. Wheels are 1 inch thick solid rubber. Super Shopping Cart Features: 6 inch rear and 3 inch front 3/4 inch solid rubber tires with steel spokes. Coated with highly durable epoxy finish. Folds flat for storage. Super Shopping Cart Specifications: Weighs 20 lbs. 250 lb. weight capacity. Basket measures: 14 1/2 x 17 x 24 inches. Overall measurements: 21 1/4 x 24 1/2 x 41 3/4 inches.", "The Autodrop Eye Drop Guide helps solve the problems encountered by many eyedropper users, who involuntarily blink or who sometimes just miss the eye. Simply clip the Autodrop to the top of the eye drop container after the cap has been removed. The Autodrop will then fit right over the eye. Special lip holds the lower lid down to prevent blinking. Unique pinhole directs eyesight upward and away from the descending drops. Autodrop Eye Drop Guide can be used in conjunction with the Autosqueeze Eye Drop Bottle Squeezer #AMI 209. Autodrop Eye Drop Guide Features: Special lip holds the lower lid down. Prevents blinking. Pinhole directs eyesight upward. Autodrop Eye Drop Guide Specifications: Clip guide to container after the cap has been removed.", "The Turn Easy Transfer Disc helps make transfers from a chair or bed easier and safer. Suitable for any type of transfer, especially transfers in close spaces. A rubber disc on bottom provides a non slip surface while the top plastic disk slides against a fabric center. The nonfriction carpet center works like ball bearings. This rotating pivot disk provides a smooth, controlled motion that makes the user feel secure. Turn Easy Transfer Disc Features: Helps make transfers from a chair or bed easier and safer. Portable and space saving. Turn Easy Transfer Disc Specifications: Measures 15 inches diameter. 2/5 inch thick. 280 lb weight capacity.", "Handy drink holder fits tubing 7/8 to 1 1/2 inches. The Universal beverage Holder brackets mount horizontally or vertically and lock in desired angle.The Universal Beverage Holder is ideal for walkers, wheelchairs, scooters, strollers, and bicycles. This holder accommodates beverage containers from 10 to 32 oz., including hot or cold drinks in cups, mugs, cans or bottles. The rugged holder is made from high impact polypropylene. The brackets are made from ultra high impact ABS. Requires simple screwdriver installation. Measures 4 3/4 in. high x 3 1/2 in. wide without insert, 6 in. high x 3 in wide with insert. Universal Beverage Holder Features: Brackets mount horizontal or vertical. Constructed of high-quality, impact resistant plastic. Works great for walkers, wheelchairs, rollators, bed rails, and more. Universal Beverage Holder Specifications: Cup Holder Capacity: 10 ounce to 32 ounce cans, cups, bottles, and travel mugs. Cup Holder Measures: 4 3/4 in. high x 3 1/2 in. wide without insert. Cup Holder Measures: 6 in. high x 3 in wide with insert.", "White Cotton Terry Walker and Crutch Hand Grips with foam liner.Designed to minimize hand discomfort when using a walker or crutch. Simply wrap cover around a standard handle and secure with the hook-and-loop fasteners. Measure 6 1/2 x 6 3/4 inches. Sold in pairs. Terry Walker and Crutch Hand Grips Features: 100% cotton terry fabric. Thick foam padding. Minimize hand discomfort when using a walker or crutch. Hook-and-loop fasteners. Terry Walker and Crutch Hand Grips Specifications: Measure 6 1/2 x 6 3/4 inches. Sold in pairs. Fits around a standard sized handle.", "One-handed peeling made easy with the Veggie and Fruit Holder . Large suction base adheres to smooth surfaces. 2 sharp plastic prongs securely hold vegetables or fruit for peeling with one hand. Veggie and Fruit Holder Features: Securely holds vegetables or fruit for peeling with one hand. Veggie and Fruit Holder Specifications: Large suction base adheres to smooth surfaces. 2 sharp plastic prongs hold fruit or vegetables.", "The Walker Holder for Scooters attaches to scooter seat backs to carry a basic style walker wherever you go. This walker carrier is constructed of high quality water resistant fabric and is made in U.S.A. Designed for stability on scooters or electric wheelchairs. To attach the walker carrier to your scooter, slip the harness over the top of your seatback so that the fastening straps and bottom pocket hang from the seatback, and then tighten the harness at the buckle. Place your folded walker down into the bottom pocket and then pull the fastening straps around your walker and buckle the straps. Walker Holder for Scooters Features: Attaches to a scooter or electric wheelchair seatback to carry basic style walker. Walker Holder for Scooters Specifications: Constructed of high quality water resistant fabric. Made in U.S.A.", "Deluxe Walker Basket is a plastic-coated wire basket. Attach basket to any walker for carrying needed items. Features a heavy-duty clear plastic tray that has one large compartment, a coin or medication holder, and a round compartment for a glass, can or cup. Choose from flexible stabilizing bars or Velcro hook-and-loop straps. Replacement trays available. Deluxe Walker Basket Features: Heavy-duty clear plastic tray. One Large Compartment. Coin or medication holder. Round compartment for a glass, can or cup. Deluxe Walker Basket Specifications: Choose from flexible stabilizing bars or Velcro hook-and-loop straps. Replacement trays available. Measures : 5 ½ in. deep 16 in. wide 7 in. tall.", "The ThumSaver MP stabilizes the thumb MP joint in neutral to protect ligaments and reduce painful grinding at the MP and CMC joints. Provides excellent MP control for arthritis and ligament injuries. Choose this rigid splint for CMC and MP arthritis, zigzag deformities of the thumb, gamekeeper's or skier's thumb. Trimmed to allow IP and wrist motion, the ThumSaver™ MP reduces CMC joint pain felt when pinching or gripping small objects. The thin plastic shell provides firm control with little bulk so the ThumSaver MP can be worn inside gloves and mitts. Includes felt padding for cushioning. Manufactured to provide thin, strong control. Made from high temperature plastic. Will not break or deform with heat, stain resistant and thin enough to wear under gloves. ThumSaver MP Features: Reduce the pain you feel when pinching or gripping small objects. Realigns the MP joint (the middle joint) and stabilizes the base of your thumb to relieve the grinding pain of arthritis. Wearing the ThumSaver MP, you can garden, write or grasp a doorknob without pain or the fear of dropping things. Felt pads are included to provide cushioning where you need it. ThumSaver MP Specifications: Instructions: Measure the length from the IP joint (knuckle at the end of the thumb) to the wrist crease. Measure around the IP joint (around the knuckle at the end of the thumb). Size Length Circumference Small 3&quot; to 3 1/2&quot; 2 1/2&quot; to 2 3/4&quot; Medium 3 1/2&quot; to 4&quot; 2 3/4&quot; to 3 1/8&quot; Large 4&quot; to 4 1/2&quot; 3 1/8&quot; to 3 1/2&quot; X-Large 4 1/2&quot; to 5&quot; 3 1/4 to 3 1/2&quot; Choose right or left hand", "The plastic vinyl handle of the Weighted Button Aid is designed with finger grips to improve grasp. The internally added weight assists in stabilizing the hand of those with unsteady hands or tremors. Specifications: Measures 1 1/8 inch wide x 7 1/2 inch long. Weighs approximately 8 oz.", "The Weighted Insulated Cup with Spout Lid keeps the hot liquids hot, or the cold liquids cold. A steel weight has been added internally in the base of the cup to reduce tremors of the hand - commonly associated with persons having Parkinson's Disease and other illnesses or injuries that cause tremors.The cup comes with a Spouted Lid which helps direct the liquid straight into the mouth and is great for sipping. The Lid is constructed of white plastic. Weighted Insulated Cup with Spout Lid Features: Added weight helps reduce tremors of the hand. Insulation keep food and drink warm or cold. Weighted Insulated Cup Spout Lid Specifications: Latex free. Cup holds up to 8 oz. Weighs 8.4 oz. Color choice - blue cup and white lid.", "Additional weight of the Weighted Soupspoon helps stabilize movement for those who experience tremors of the hands. Each utensil weighs approximately 8 ounces. Gray plastic vinyl handle is contoured to fit the fingers. Stainless Steel utensil. Handle length is 4 1/2 in.; diameter is approximately 1 1/8 in. Dishwasher safe. Order single utensils or the set. Weighted Soupspoon Features: Additional weight helps stabilize movement for those who experience tremors of the hands. Handle is contoured to fit the fingers. Weighted Soupspoon Specifications: Stainless Steel utensil. Utensil weighs approximately 8 ounces. Handle length is 4 1/2 in. Diameter is approximately 1 1/8 in.", "The Wheelchair Back Pack attaches to a wheelchair with ease by placing loops over the wheelchair push handles. A large single compartment pocket has hook-and-loop closure to keep belongings secure. Wheelchair Back Pack Features: Attaches with ease by placing loops over the wheelchair push handles. Large single compartment pocket. Wheelchair Back Pack Specifications: Measures 14 x 19 inches. Completely washable. Constructed of black, oxford nylon, waterproof fabric.", "Body Care Long Handle 12 inch Hair Brush and Comb Set is great for people with limited arm or hand movement. Anti-slip handles are ergonomically designed to lie against user's entire palm. Contoured design is both attractive and functional. Made of polypropylene. Available in two lengths.Our prize-winning range of ergonomically designed body care products, are all carefully balanced to provide maximum power with minimal effort and strain on hands, arms and shoulders. Each product has a unique shape that makes reaching even easier. The handles are oval and have a rough surface so as to provide a secure grip. Body Care Long Handle 12 inch Brush and Comb Set Features: Anti-slip handles. Attractive and functional contoured design. Designed to rest against user's entire palm. Body Care Long Handle 12 inch Brush and Comb Set Specifications: Length-12 inches. Available in two lengths. Made of polypropylene.", "The Wall Mount Zim Jar Opener opens or closes all types of screw lids, from jar lids to bottle caps. Simply slip practically any size jar top into the steel jaws until it wedges and turn jar. The Wall Mount Zim Jar Opener even opens even the most frustrating press and turn \"child proof\" containers. Mounts to any wall with the provided screws. Wall Mount Zim Jar Opener Features: White enamel finish. Steel jaws open or close all types of lids. Wall Mount Zim Jar Opener Specifications: Measures: 5 x 6 in. Can open jars and bottles from 1/2 inch to 3.75 inch in diameter. Screws provided.", "This durable 1 inch black plastic ring easily snaps onto hard-to-pull zipper tabs on clothing, jackets, or any zippered item. The large plastic ring is much easier to manipulate and requires less strength to pull than common small zipper tabs found on most clothing. The Zip Grip Zipper Ring is washable; after wearing your favorite shirt or jacket, just toss the garment and the ring in the wash. Zipper must have a hole to attach the Zip Grips Zipper Rings. **Six Zip Grips Zipper Rings per package. Zip Grips Features: 1 inch black plastic ring easily snaps onto hard-to-pull zipper tabs on clothing, jackets, or any zippered item. The large plastic ring is much easier to manipulate and requires less strength to pull than common small zipper tabs. Zip Grips Specifications: Size: 1 inch. Six Zip Grips Zipper Rings per package.", "Package of 8 waterproof, non-slip tub treads self stick to virtually any clean, dry surface. Provides safe traction for tubs, stairs, railing, ladders, stools, laundry room and bathroom. Tub Safety Treads are mildew-resistant, easy to clean and will not crack. White. Each strips measures 3/4 inches wide x 10 inches long. Tub Safety Treads Features: Non-slip treads self stick to virtually any clean, dry surface. Mildew-resistant, easy to clean and will not crack. Tub Safety Treads Specifications: Measures: 3/4\" wide x 10\" long.", "The Carry-All Walker Pouch features a large single pocket for carrying items. Velcro hook-and-loop closure secures bag to walker, wheelchair, or bedrail. Navy denim with white trim machine washable fabric. Pouch measures 12 ½ x 15 inches overall. Large front opening pouch measures 10 x 14 inches. Two smaller inside pockets measure 4 x 4 1/2 inches. Carry-All Walker Pouch Features: Large single pocket. Velcro hook-and-loop closure. Machine washable fabric. Carry-All Walker Pouch Specifications: Pouch- 12 ½ x 15 inches overall. Large front pouch- 10 x 14 inches. Two smaller inside pockets measure 4 x 4 1/2 inches.", "The Good Grips Rocker Knife with Serrated Blade makes cutting meat easier. Rounded knife blade utilizes a rocking motion for easier cutting, which requires minimal arm strength. The extended safety cap protects fingers while cutting. A great solution for persons who have had a stroke, and for persons with limited arm movement, strength or arthritis. Good Grips Rocker Knife with Serrated Blade Features: Serrated Blade makes cutting meat easier. Large soft rubber handle to cushion your grip. Utilizes a rocking motion for easier cutting. Dishwasher safe. Great for people with weak grasp. Requires minimal arm strength. Good Grips Rocker Knife with Serrated Blade Specifications: Extended safety cap protects fingers while cutting. Latex free.", "Plastisol spoon coating protects teeth and lips. Good Grips Coated Spoons have large, easy to hold handles made of soft rubber material. Special twist in stainless steel shaft can be bent to angle left or right. Good Grips Coated Spoon Features: Large soft rubber handle to cushion your grip. Bendable metal shafts. Dishwasher safe. Great for people with weak grasp. Good Grips Coated Spoon Specifications: Bend for use with either the right or left hand. Latex free.", "The Good Grips Small Spoon features a large soft rubber handle to cushion your grip. These stainless steel utensils have an adjustable metal shaft that allows them to be twisted to an angle specific for your loved one's needs. Good Grips Small Spoon Features: Large soft rubber handle to cushion your grip. Bendable metal shafts. Dishwasher safe. Great for people with weak grasp. Good Grips Small Spoon Specifications: Bend for use with either the right or left hand. Latex free.", "Turning Knob Operator makes turning odd shaped control knobs easier by using more leverage. Press the turner onto a knob and the retractable pins grip the knob or faucet. Handle measures 5 1/4 inches, gripping area is 2 1/4 inches across, but can grip larger irregular shaped knobs. Turning Knob Operator Features: Provides more leverage. Retractable pins grip the knob or faucet. Turning Knob Operator Specifications: Handle- 5 1/4 inches. Gripping area- 2 1/4 inches.", "The Utensil Hand Clip is an excellent eating aid for people who have trouble grasping and holding small utensils. This spring-action plastic clip fits the hand snugly without pinching. Utensil Hand Clip Features: Eating aid for people who have trouble grasping and holding small utensils. Utensil Hand Clip Specifications: Spring-action plastic clip fits the hand snugly without pinching.", "The Hinged Elevated Toilet Seat offers all the comfort and convenience of an elevated toilet seat, but with a hinged benefit. This model features a seat riser made of two parts which are hinged together, allowing the ring to be lifted in the same manner as your standard toilet seat. The Hinged Toilet Seat Riser fulfills the need for added height with the convenience and comfort of your own toilet seat. The seat riser is installed using your existing toilet seat and cover and does not significantly change the appearance of the toilet. The Hinged Elevated Toilet Seat elevates the seating position by 3 inches for easy sitting and rising. Because of the hinged feature, cleaning is much easier. Easy to install with the included hardware kit. Choose from standard or elongated model. Hinged Elevated Toilet Seat Features: Works with existing toilet seat. Available in two models to fit either round or elongated bowls. Makes cleaning easier. Lightweight, and durable. Easy to install with its included hardware kit. Hinged Elevated Toilet Seat Specifications: Weight Capacity: 400 lbs. Seat height elevation: 3\". Total lift height including existing toilet seat: 4\" Length: 10.5\" - (round bowl), 13.5\" - (elongated bowl). Overall length: 17\" - (round bowl), 19.5\" - (elongated bowl). Width: 9.5\" (round bowl), 10\" (elongated bowl). Uses your existing toilet seat. Riser only, uses your existing toilet seat.***Non-returnable hygiene product***", "The Good Grips Weighted Soup Spoon is ideal for persons with tremors or poor hand control. Features a specially designed 1/8 inch raised lip to prevent spills while moving the spoon toward the mouth. Total length measures 7 1/8 inch.These weighted utensils feature the same great design as the Good Grips Utensils. The 6 ounces of weight in the built-up handle provides more control so that the utensil reaches the mouth easier. Ideal for persons with limited hand control, Parkinson's disease or spasticity. Good Grips Weighted Soup Spoon Features: Weighted utensils are ideal for those with Parkinson's Disease or hand tremors. Large soft rubber handle to cushion your grip. Bendable metal shafts. Dishwasher safe. Great for people with weak grasp. Good Grips Weighted Soup Spoon Specifications: Bend for use with either the right or left hand. 6 oz. weight added to the handle. Total length measures 7 1/8 inch. 1/8 inch raised lip to prevent spills. Latex free.", "The Nosey Glass features a contoured shape and slightly textured surface that provides a steadier grip. A cut out for the nose allows drinking without bending the neck or tilting the head. Translucent plastic allows monitoring of liquids. Dishwasher safe. Nosey Glass Features: Dishwasher safe. Cut out for the nose. Textured surface. Translucent plastic. Nosey Glass Specifications: Will hold 8 oz.", "The Good Grips Weighted Tablespoon features the same great design as the Good Grips Utensil. The 6 ounces of weight in the built-up handle provides more control so that the utensil reaches the mouth easier. Ideal for persons with limited hand control, Parkinson's disease or spasticity. Good Grips Weighted Tablespoon Features: Weighted utensils are ideal for those with Parkinson's Disease or hand tremors. Large soft rubber handle to cushion your grip. Bendable metal shafts. Dishwasher safe. Great for people with weak grasp. Good Grips Weighted Tablespoon Specifications: Bend for use with either the right or left hand. 6 oz. weight added to the handle. Latex free.", "Put an end to messy accidents caused by sliding dinnerware. The molded melamine Skidtrol Non-Skid Bowl has a non-skid ring to prevent sliding, even on an incline. Skidtrol Non-Skid Bowl Features: Non-skid ring on bottom helps prevent sliding. Skidtrol Non-Skid Bowl Specifications: 8 1/8 inch diameter, 2 inches deep. Top shelf dishwasher safe.", "The Good Grips Weighted Teaspoon features the same great design as the Good Grips Utensil. The 6 ounces of weight in the built-up handle provides more control so that the utensil reaches the mouth easier. Ideal for persons with limited hand control, Parkinson's disease or spasticity. Good Grips Weighted Teaspoon Features: Weighted utensils are ideal for those with Parkinson's Disease or hand tremors. Large soft rubber handle to cushion your grip. Bendable metal shafts. Dishwasher safe. Great for people with weak grasp. Good Grips Weighted Teaspoon Specifications: Bend for use with either the right or left hand. 6 oz. weight added to the handle. Latex free.", "The Lock Laces are elastic shoelaces with a locking system that feature specially designed elastic laces combined with a spring activated locking device. Ideal for children, the elderly and physically challenged. Can be worn with all styles of running shoes, athletic shoes and casual lace-up shoes. Simply slip your shoes on and off, no more tying and untying laces or double knots. Provides convenience, superior comfort, more flexibility and a better fit compared to cotton or nylon shoelaces. Lock Laces Features: No more tying and untying laces or double knots! Provides convenience, superior comfort, more flexibility and a better fit! Can be worn with all styles of shoes!", "Semi-rigid plastic spoon enhances independent eating for people who have limited or painful movement of their upper extremities. Ideal for diagnoses of neurological disorders, a stroke, head injury, severe arthritis, wrist fractures, shoulder dysfunction, or cerebral palsy.Food is scooped onto the spoon with simple elbow motion, minimizing the movements of the shoulder and forearm. Raised back prevents food from spilling off the spoon. Top shelf dishwasher safe. For right hand only. Diameter and softness of the handle can be increased by adding a Foam Rubber Adapter.", "The Good Grips Tablespoon features a large soft rubber handle to cushion your grip. These stainless steel utensils have an adjustable metal shaft that allows them to be twisted to an angle specific for your loved one's needs. Good Grips Tablespoon Features: Large soft rubber handle to cushion your grip. Bendable metal shafts. Dishwasher safe. Great for people with weak grasp. Good Grips Tablespoon Specifications: Bend for use with either the right or left hand. Latex free.", "Specially designed Body Aligner Pillow , is a foam wedge that helps maintain a perfect position while reducing pressure in sensitive areas. Place along the back while lying on the side. Can be used as a lumbar support while sitting. Measures 23 x 8 x 9 1/2 inches. White or Blue washable cover. Body Aligner Pillow Features: Foam wedge. Maintains a perfect position. Reduces pressure in sensitive areas. Lumbar support. Body Aligner Pillow Specifications: White or Blue washable cover. Measures 23 x 8 x 9 1/2 inches. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "The Hold-and-Read Page Holders make it possible to read a paperback using one or no hands. The folding clip holds both the left and right sides securely. Even though the pages are held back tightly, you can still easily turn the page! Accommodates any thickness of paperback book. **Clear plastic. Hold-and-Read Page Holders Features: Requires one or no hands! Easy to turn pages. Use with any size paperback book. Can be used as a bookmark. Hold-and-Read Page Holders Specifications: Closed: 5 1/4 inches long Open: 3/4 inch wide. Clear plastic.", "Using Action's mini-cube technology, this Large Lap Tray Pad provides spot protection and pressure management for use on lap trays, head rests, large flat or contoured surfaces, or other areas of redness development in \"at risk\" users.The Lap Tray Pads are used to protect arms and elbows against developing pressure ulcerations or bruises.Sold with Action's low shear cover. Large Lap Tray Pad Features: Won't rub skin. Unrivaled in reducing the development of decubitus ulcers and pressure sores. Large Lap Tray Pad Specifications: Measures: 8 x 8in. 1/2 in. thick. This is a non-returnable hygiene item.", "Wear Ease Shoe Fasteners convert regular lace-up shoes into shoes with simple to use hook-and-loop closures, allowing for easier fastening and unfastening of shoes. D-rings facilitate closing and opening of the strap. Wear Ease Shoe Fastener Features: Converts regular lace-up shoes into shoes with simple to use hook-and-loop closures. Wear Ease Shoe Fastener Specifications: Each fastener fits 2-3 eyelets. For shoes with 4-6 eyelets, 2 per shoe may be required. Package of 4.", "The T Long Handle Shoehorn eliminates the need for rotating the wrist. The unique \"T\" shaped handle allows the wrist to remain in a neutral position while putting on shoes. T Long Handle Shoehorn Features: Eliminates wrist rotation. Useful for people who have trouble bending! Ideal for people with arthritis, limited wrist movement, or other hand limitations. T Long Handle Shoehorn Specifications: Unique \"T\" handle. Length: 19.5 in.", "Anatomically designed to provide warmth and even compression to offer relief of pain and discomfort in the fingers and hands for arthritis and repetitive pain sufferers.The outer fabric is made of a non-slip material that provides added grip. Gove is secures with a velcro fastening.Clinically proven to increase surface skin and subcutaneous temperature between 2-3 degrees F, the optimal level to make tendons and muscles more pliable and elastic to provide optimal muscle function.Clinically tested Thermoskin® therapeutic Arthritic Gloves provide compression while helping to control swelling and aiding in the stability of an injured area.Thermoskin® Arthritis Gloves are made from elasticized fabrics specifically designed to provide even compression and firm support for muscle injury and soreness, with the greatest possible comfort and fit. Thermoskin® Arthritis Gloves stabilize the affected area and combine compression with naturally generated body heat for therapeutic relief from soreness and discomfort.Unique to Thermoskin® Arthritis Gloves is Trioxon®?a unique soft material which not only captures and retains your natural body heat, but also, unlike other products, it allows your skin to ventilate and remain comfortably dry. Thermoskin® Arthritis Gloves with Trioxon® lining are completely washable and ?breathable? to help alleviate excessive perspiration, skin irritations and the unpleasant odor associated with neoprene products. Thermoskin out performs other products because the unique Trioxon lining is designed to be soft against the skin. This minimizes skin irritation and perspiration while helping to retain heat. With Thermoskin Arthritis Gloves patients experience less pain and mastery of rehabilitation protocols is facilitated. Thermoskin heat retainers will enable the return to routine activity more quickly. The arthritis wraps are designed with an adjustable hook and loop closure to allow arthritis sufferers ease of use and compression variation. To determine the size needed, measure around the circumference of the hand around, the knuckle. Sold in pairs. Black. Thermoskin Arthritis Gloves Feature: Ideal for mildly increasing skin temperature to give increased circulation of the hand for relief of pain and discomfort from arthritis, Repetitive Stress Injuries (RSI), and tendonitis. Inner lining made of Trioxon, a unique fiber that wicks away perspiration and keeps skin ventilated and comfortably dry. Adjustable Velcro strap applies additional compression/support when needed. Hand or machine-washable.", "The Dycem Strips have an adhesive backing that secures them into place. The strips can be used to build up eating utensil handles to provide the user with a more secure grip. The Adhesive backing on the strips can be attached to pens, tools, wheelchair arms, and walkers for a more comfortable grip. Yellow color provides color and tone contrast for people with low vision. Dycem Strips Features: Adhesive backing. Bright yellow color is easy to see. Provide a more secure grip. Dycem Strips Specifications: Strips measure 1 1/8 x 16 inches. Package of 3. Color choice - yellow.", "The Cane Holder for Walkers/Wheelchairs features a unique double-clip that allows users to keep a cane handy wherever they may need it.Simply snap one side of the clip onto any tubular structure such as a tubular table leg, walker, commode, bed rail, wheelchair, or even a lawn chair. The opposite side of the clip will hold most diameters of walking canes. The gripping surfaces are soft plastic rollers and will not damage cane surfaces. Clip Cane Holder Features: Allows users to keep a cane handy wherever they may need it. Will not damage cane. Gripping surfaces are soft plastic rollers. Clip will hold most diameters of canes. Unique double-clip. Clip Cane Holder Specifications: Measures - 3 x 2 x 1 3/4 inches.", "The Easy Grip Slant Tip Tweezers are specially designed for stiff or arthritic hands. Ready to use, right out of the easy to open package. Rounded back rests in the palm of the hand for stability and control. Comfortable, soft rubber finger and thumb grips. Precision tips with unique gripping surface to tweeze fine and tiny hair. Alignment feature keeps tips perfectly matched for lasting accuracy, increases precision, prevents tips from slipping side-to-side and maintains alignment if tweezers are dropped. Easy action reduces painful pinching motion. Overall length 4.25 inches.The Easy Grip Slant Tip Tweezers and other products are designed specifically to assist people who have problems gripping and manipulating tools like clippers, tweezers and smoothers. They combine the comfort of elastomers, rigid lightweight polymers and long lasting stainless steel action surfaces. Built to last, all Easy Grip products are guaranteed for life. Easy Grip Slant Tip Tweezers Features: Comfortable, soft rubber finger and thumb grips. Easy action reduces painful pinching motion. Rounded back rests in the palm of hand for stability and control. Easy Grip Slant Tip Tweezers Specifications: Overall length: 4.25 inches.", "The Ergowriter is designed to alleviate the pain of writing associated with arthritis and painful fingers. It comfortably and correctly positions the thumb to reduce stress placed on the wrist.Can be used with most standard pens and pencils. A blue ink pen is included. For right or left hand use. Designed by an Occupational Therapist. Ergowriter Features: Designed to help alleviate the pain of writing. Comfortably and correctly positions the thumb to reduce stress placed on the wrist. Ergowriter Specifications: Can be used with most standard pens and pencils. Blue ink pen included.", "The Easy Grip Point Tip Tweezers are specially designed for stiff or arthritic hands. Ready to use, right out of the easy to open package. Rounded back rests in the palm of the hand for stability and control. Comfortable, soft rubber finger and thumb grips. Precision tips with unique gripping surface to tweeze fine and tiny hair. Alignment feature keeps tips perfectly matched for lasting accuracy, increases precision, prevents tips from slipping side-to-side and maintains alignment if tweezers are dropped. Easy action reduces painful pinching motion. Overall length 4.25 inches.Easy Grip Point Tip Tweezers and other products are designed specifically to assist people who have problems gripping and manipulating tools like clippers, tweezers and smoothers. They combine the comfort of elastomers, rigid lightweight polymers and long lasting stainless steel action surfaces. Built to last, all Easy Grip products are guaranteed for life. Easy Grip Point Tip Tweezers Features: Rounded back rests in the palm of hand for stability and control. Comfortable, soft rubber finger and thumbs grips. Easy action reduces painful pinching motion. Easy Grip Point Tip Tweezers Specifications: Overall length 4.25 inches. Long lasting stainless steel action surfaces.", "The Wheelchair Weather Chaps keep you drier than a poncho because it fits snugly around your lower body, instead of draping over it. Slip your feet into the bottom pocket, then pull it over your legs and lap for waterproof protection. Bottom is contoured so nothing gets caught in your wheels and there's no need to leave your seat to put it on. Removable fleece lining provides extra warmth, great for ball games and getting around!Three sizes are avaialble: Pediatric size for children and small adults, Adult size, and Extra wide. Wheelchair Weather Chaps Removable fleece lining provides extra warmth. Fits snugly around your lower body.", "The Easy Grip Toenail Clippers are specially designed for stiff or arthritic hands. Ready to use, right out of the easy to open package. No twisting or flipping the handle to open the clippers, and no more painful bending or turning your wrist to get the right angle for cutting each nail. Angled shape allows for a comfortable hand position. Improved clipping design means less squeezing to cut the nail. Bulb-shaped handle with finger scoops provides 3 grip choices: power grip, pinch grip and lateral grip. Blade-bumpers keep fingers stable and prevent accidental cuts. Larger blade width reduces the number of cuts necessary to trim each nail. Even the thickest toenails are cut quickly and easily with our Easy Grip Toenail Clippers. Overall length 4.25 inches.Easy Grip Nail Clippers and other products are designed specifically to assist people who have problems gripping and manipulating tools like clippers, tweezers and smoothers. They combine the comfort of elastomers, rigid lightweight polymers and long lasting stainless steel action surfaces. Built to last, all Easy Grip products are guaranteed for life. Easy Grip Toe Nail Clipper Features: Soft rubber grip handles. Blade bumpers add stability and help prevent injury. Angled head to reduce stress on wrist and hands. Easy Grip Toe Nail Clipper Specifications: Toenail Clippers are 4.25\" long. Easy to clean, hygienic stainless steel.", "Use this 54 inch Stripe Belt to provide assistance for individuals when walking, standing, or sitting. The 2 inch wide cotton belt features a metal buckle with teeth for secure closing and easy adjusting. Machine washable. Pediatric sizes available by special order. 54 inch Stripe Belt Features: Made from cotton. Metal buckle has teeth. Holds securely around the patient. Adjusts easily. 54 inch Stripe Belt Specifications: 2 inches wide. Special orders available.", "Use this 60 inch Patriot Stripe to provide assistance for individuals when walking, standing, or sitting. The 2 inch wide cotton belt features a metal buckle with teeth for secure closing and easy adjusting. Machine washable. Pediatric sizes available by special order. 60 inch Patriot Stripe Features: Made from cotton. Metal buckle has teeth. Holds securely around the patient. Adjusts easily. 60 inch Patriot Stripe Specifications: 2 inches wide. Special orders available.", "Two-sided, multi-functional Bath Brush that really hits the spot! One side is soft bristles for gently cleaning and massaging your body. The other side is Elite Bar Soap so you can apply soap before you scrub. Lightly scented and lathers up nicely. The soap insert pops out and can be replaced when empty or interchanged. Elite Bath Brush features a 15 1/2 inch long contoured handle. Pearl Blue color.The center oval is detachable and can be replaced with the Elite Pumice Insert or Elite Liquid Soap Dispenser Insert. Just pop out the center insert and pop in a different insert. Use the Elite Pumice Insert for exfoliating and gently removing dead, dry skin. The Elite Soap Dispenser Insert will release just the right amount of your favorite liquid soap. Use with any type liquid soap. Elite Bath Brush Features: Lightly scented and lathers up nicely. Soap insert pops out and can be replaced when empty or interchanged. Elite Bath Brush Specifications: 15 1/2 inch long contoured handle.", "The curved shape of the Easy Grip Foot Smoother makes it easy to reach every part of the foot. Specially designed for stiff or arthritic hands. Easy to clean, hygienic stainless steel. One side reduces calluses, the other side smoothes rough skin.The Easy Grip Foot Smoother and other products are designed specifically to assist people who have problems gripping and manipulating tools like clippers, tweezers and smoothers. They combine the comfort of elastomers, rigid lightweight polymers and long lasting stainless steel action surfaces. Built to last, all Easy Grip products are guaranteed for life. Easy Grip Foot Smoother Features: Dual function: One side reduces calluses, the other side smoothes rough skin. Easy to clean, hygienic stainless steel. Curved shape makes it easy to reach every part of the foot. Easy Grip Foot Smoother Specifications: Length: 10 1/2\" (27cm).", "Use this 60 inch Stripe Gait Belt to provide assistance for individuals when walking, standing, or sitting. The 2 inch wide cotton belt features a metal buckle with teeth for secure closing and easy adjusting. Machine washable. Pediatric sizes available by special order. 60 inch Stripe Belt Features: Made from cotton. Metal buckle has teeth. Holds securely around the patient. Adjusts easily. 60 inch Stripe Belt Specifications: 2 inches wide. Special orders available.", "These Cup Holders are made of high impact flexible plastic and can hold up to 44 oz beverages. These cup holders feature slotted openings for mug handles. Three different style mounting attachments are available for these cup holders. Choose Scooter mount for chairs with removable arm pads; Clamp mount for wheelchairs with exposed round horizontal or vertical tubing; or Velcro Strap mount for universal armrests. Cup Holders Features: High impact flexible plastic. Slotted openings for cups with handles. Cup Holders Specifications: Can hold up to 44 oz beverages. 3 different mounting systems available.", "Use this 72 inch Stripe Gait Belt to provide assistance for individuals when walking, standing, or sitting. The 2 inch wide cotton belt features a metal buckle with teeth for secure closing and easy adjusting. Machine washable. Pediatric sizes available by special order. 72 inch Stripe Belt Features: Made from cotton. Metal buckle has teeth. Holds securely around the patient. Adjusts easily. 72 inch Stripe Belt Specifications: 2 inches wide. Special orders available.", "AbleRise Double turns an ordinary bed into a convenient storage area while providing support for getting in and out of bed. Comfortable to grasp non-metal handle is warm to the touch and can be used for repositioning and turning in bed. Easy to install rail slides between mattress and box springs. Fits twin, full and queen size beds. Handle is 20 inches wide. Height adjustable from 16 3/8 to 18 5/8 iches. Single has a slide bar that extends 39 3/4 inches underneath the mattress, and a strip of hook-and-loop that attaches to the opposite end of the bed frame for additional stability. Double Able Rise permits installation on both sides. AbleRise Double Features: Especially helpful when a person uses either side of the bed and for couples where both need added assistance. Convenient storage area. Warm to the touch comfortable to grasp non-metal handle. Easy to install rail slides. Adjustable height. AbleRise Double Specifications: Fits twin, full and queen size beds. Handle is 20 inches wide. Height adjustable from 16 3/8 to 18 5/8 iches.", "The Drink Holder holds a drink securely on wheelchair frame, bed rails or other tubular frames. Tough plastic holder is slotted on two sides to hold one or two handled cups. Rugged plastic clamp has a large easy-to- tighten lever knob and will fit 1 or 7/8 inch diameter tubing. Will accommodate beverage containers 2 1/2 - 3 inch diameter. Holder measures 5 inches high x 4 inches wide. Drink Holder Features: Tough plastic holder. Slotted on two sides. Secures on wheelchair frame, bed rails or other tubular frames. Drink Holder Specifications: Holder height- 5 in. Width- 4 in. Fits 1 or 7/8 inch diameter tubing.", "Sleep more comfortably with this uniquely designed pillow. The Knee Separator Pillow eases pain in the back, legs, hips, and knees by maintaining proper spinal alignment. Knee Separator Pillow Features: Eases pain in the back, legs, hips, and knees. Maintains proper spinal alignment. Adjustable strap secures pillow to leg. Knee Separator Pillow Specifications: Removable washable cover. Measures: 7 x 5 inches. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "Constructed of woven cotton fabric. Fix lock buckle allows belt to be tightened without opening. Quick release plastic buckle.Sherpa lined belt provides additional skin protection. Medium Safety Sure Sherpa Lined Belt Features: Great for helping patients to stand up or sit down. Simplifies transfers from bed to wheelchair, wheelchair to toilet, or wheelchair to car seat. Numerous hand-grips provide a variety of leverage points and reduce strain on caregivers back. Medium Safety Sure Sherpa Lined Belt Specifications: Measures 4 inches wide. Medium fits waist sizes 32 - 48 inches. 2 horizontal and 3 vertical hand grips.", "Use either the Akton Repair Kit Patch or the roll for quick and easy resurfacing of small cuts or punctures on any Action pad. Full instructions included.Action pads can be cut for custom sizing and application. The cut surface will be sticky. We recommend using the Repair Kit to cover the cut edges. Akton Repair Kit Patch Features: Quick and easy resurfacing. Can be cut for custom sizing and application. Akton Repair Kit Patch Specifications: Full instructions included.", "Thanks to the input from hundreds of Speech-Language Pathologists & Occupational Therapists the final design of The PROVALE® Cup is now available. Simply by tipping the Provale cup in a normal drinking motion, 5 or 10 cc of liquid is delivered. By returning the cup to its upright position, the chamber is refilled and ready to deliver another 5 or 10 cc. The Provale cup encourages normal drinking habits and small swallows. May help eliminate the need for pre-thickened liquids with some patients with dysphagia. Nose clearance minimizes head tilt. Easy to disassemble for cleaning. The Provale cup is dishwasher safe. Patented anti-suck mechanism prevents over-delivery of fluids. Transparent Outer Cup model allows liquid activity monitoring. Use with or without provided handles. Dishwasher safe.The advantages The PROVALE® Drinking Cup are: *Delivers a fixed delivery amount of liquid with every normal drinking motion. The New PROVALE® Cup's ease of use may allow for more patient independence. Because individual patient needs vary, a trained healthcare professional must make the decision on patient independence. *Patented mechanism prevents over-delivery of fluid. Unlike a \"sippy\" cup, The New PROVALE Cup has a patented feature that prevents over-delivery of fluid when the cup is used properly. Sucking on the drinking spout will not result in additional fluid being dispensed.*Good nose clearance to minimize head tilt. The Cup-In-A-Cup design of The PROVALE Cup provides very good nose clearance which allows patients to keep their chin in a proper position to make a good swallow. The inner or middle cup contains an angled channel that also allows the user to keep their chin in a good position for a proper swallow.*Can be used with water, nutritional supplements, and some thickened liquid products. *Optional one or two easy-grip-handle or no-handle design. *Travel-mug appearance is functional, yet inconspicuous. The PROVALE® Cup is designed with patient integrity in mind. *Designed to utilize normal drinking motion.*Easy and logical to assemble.*Easy-to-clean and institutional dishwasher-safe. No valves or tubes to clean. *Broad base to minimize tipping and spilling.", "Constructed of woven cotton fabric. Fix lock buckle allows belt to be tightened without opening. Quick release plastic buckle.Sherpa lined belt provides additional skin protection. Small Safety Sure Sherpa Lined Belt Features: Great for helping patients to stand up or sit down. Simplifies transfers from bed to wheelchair, wheelchair to toilet, or wheelchair to car seat. Numerous hand-grips provide a variety of leverage points and reduce strain on caregivers back. Small Safety Sure Sherpa Lined Belt Specifications: Measures 4 inches wide. Small fits waist sizes 23-36 inches. Has 2 horizontal and 2 vertical hand grips.", "Use this 48 inch Stripe Gait Belt to provide assistance for individuals when walking, standing, or sitting. The 2 inch wide cotton belt features a metal buckle with teeth for secure closing and easy adjusting. Machine washable. Pediatric sizes available by special order. 48 inch Stripe Belt Features: Made from cotton. Metal buckle has teeth. Holds securely around the patient. Adjusts easily. 48 inch Stripe Belt Specifications: 2 inches wide. Special orders available.", "Use this 54 inch Patriot Stripe Belt to provide assistance for individuals when walking, standing, or sitting. The 2 inch wide cotton belt features a metal buckle with teeth for secure closing and easy adjusting. Machine washable. Pediatric sizes available by special order. 54 inch Patriot Stripe Belt Features: Made from cotton. Metal buckle has teeth. Holds securely around the patient. Adjusts easily. 54 inch Patriot Stripe Belt Specifications: 2 inches wide. Special orders available.", "The Hole in One Utensils are designed for people with limited hand mobility. The handles on these eating utensils provide several grasping positions.Fingers can be inserted through the hollow center or wrapped around the outside. The Hole in One Utensils are attached to the handle by a swivel screw. This allows the utensil to fold back on the handle when not in use. When the utensil is folded back, it will easily fit into a pocket or purse for travelers. Utensils may be reversed for right or left handed use. Made of stainless steel.The handle is 5 inches long with a string loop at the end. Utensils protrude 3 1/4 inches from the handle.***The spoon and fork are sold separately.*** Hole-in-One Eating Utensils Features: Provide several grasping positions. Fingers can be inserted through the hollow center or wrapped around the outside. Reverse for right or left handed use. Hole-in-One Eating Utensils Specifications: Handle length 5 in. Utensils protrude 3 1/4 (8.3cm) inches from the handle. The spoon and fork are sold separately.", "The Insulated cup keeps hot liquid hot, or cold liquid cold. The Spouted lid provides for easy sippage and directs the liquid straight into the mouth. Can hold up to 8 oz. Insulated Cup with Spout Lid Features: Keeps contents hot or cold! Easy sippage with spouted lid. Insulated Cup with Spout Lid Specifications: Latex free. Cup holds up to 8 oz. Color choice - blue cup and white lid.", "The Good Grips Teaspoon features a large soft rubber handle to cushion your grip. These stainless steel spoons have an adjustable metal shaft that allows them to be twisted to an angle specific for your loved one's needs. Good Grips Teaspoon Features: Large soft rubber handle to cushion your grip. Bendable metal shafts. Dishwasher safe. Great for people with weak grasp. Good Grips Teaspoon Specifications: Bend for use with either the right or left hand. Latex free.", "The high rim of the Inner Lip Plate keeps food from sliding off the plate. Plate is designed to help prevent spills over the edge while you are eating. Using the raised lip of the plate, you can push food onto your fork or spoon. The Plate has a 9 inch diameter, is made of durable plastic and is dishwasher and microwave safe. Sandstone color. Inner Lip Plate Features: Deeper plate provides an edge that you can use to help push food onto your fork. Made of durable plastic. Inner Lip Plate Specifications: Diameter: 9in. Dishwasher and microwave safe. Color is sandstone.", "The Hole-in-One Double Button Loop has two different sized loops to fit a variety of button sizes. This tool is great for people with limited hand function due to arthritis. The 5 inch handle on this button loop provides several grasping positions and excellent leverage yo help buttoning. It can be grasped with the fingers inserted through the hollow center or around the outside. The button loops fold back toward the handle when not in use, making it ideal for travel. Hole-In-One Double Button Loop Features: Provides leverage to help buttoning. Button loops fold, ideal for travel. Provides several grasping positions.", "The SoloGrip One-Handed Jar Opener was created solely to relieve the arthritic, elderly, and persons with disabilities from the troublesome task of opening jars, bottles, and medicine bottles.When you cannot seem to loosen a jar lid no matter what you do, take matters into your own hand with the Solo Grip One-Handed Jar Opener . This product makes struggling to hold the base of jars a thing of the past by holding them like a vise with no moving parts!Are you tired of stubborn jars? Then try this Solo Grip One-Handed Jar Opener ! It pries open a variety of bottles and jars, giving you extra muscle power. The exterior is crafted of sturdy polycarbonate, while the inner walls consist of a rubbery material. To use, simply place the jar deep inside the wedge. Made in USA!! SoloGrip One-Handed Jar Opener Features: Exterior is crafted of sturdy polycarbonate. Inner walls consist of a rubbery material. Fits neatly in a drawer! SoloGrip One-Handed Jar Opener Specifications: Length: 15-3/4 in. Width: 8-1/4 in. Height: 3 in. Color: white.", "The Dependa-Bar is designed for bathing, toileting and other environments where grab bars are found. Combines the sturdiness of a wall mounted grab bar and the functionality of a dual support rail that moves in step during standing and transferring in the bathroom. Mounts using conventional means to walls of most construction. Locks every 45 degrees (5 positions) providing a support rail that moves with the user. When not in use, conveniently locks against the wall. Stainless steel construction. Vertical rail is 30 1/2 inches long. Pivot rail is 18 inches long. Fixed horizontal grab bar with 1/ 1/4 inch diameter and 1 1/2 inch wall clearance. Dependa-Bar Features: Locks every 45 degrees (5 positions). Combines a wall mounted grab bar and a dual support rail. Water Resistant ? Stainless steel construction. Can be installed in the bathtub or beside the toilet. Dependa-Bar Specifications: Vertical rail is 30 1/2 inches long. Pivot rail is 18 inches long.", "The Magnetic Walking Cane Holder has a powerful magnet that can be attached to any metal surface. For crutches, two sets are needed. Each cane holder kit includes one magnetic cane attachment, a metal fastening plate and a strip of double-sided tape. The stainless steel fastening plate can be attached to any non-metal surface- walls, doors, furniture- in frequently used areas, allowing for a convenient cane rest just about anywhere. Fastening plate has holes for permanent mounting (screws/nails not included) or can be attached using the double-sided tape. Magnetic Cane Holder Features: Amount permanently or with double sided tape. Convenient cane rest! Attaches just about anywhere! Magnetic Cane Holder Specifications: Kit includes: one magnetic cane attachment, a metal fastening plate and a strip of double-sided tape. Plate can be attached to any non-metal surface- walls, doors, furniture. For permanent mounting, screws/nails are not included. Can be attached using the double-sided tape.", "The Bottom Buddy is a toilet tissue aid designed for self cleansing when reaching is difficult. The soft, flexible head grips hold any tissue or pre-moistened wipe securely. Soiled paper or wipes are released into the bowl with a push of the button located in the curved handle. 11 inches long. Weighs 4 oz. Storage bag included. Bottom Buddy features: Soft, flexible head grips hold tissue. A simple push of a button releases the soiled paper or wipes. Bottom Buddy specifications: Bottom Buddy is 11\" long. Weighs 4 oz. Storage bag included. Due to hygiene purposes, this item is non-returnable.", "The Telescopic Shoehorn adjusts from 12 to 30 inches in length. Ideal for packing in your suitcase or overnight bag. The angle of the shoehorn paddle can be adjusted for use while standing or sitting. Telescopic Shoehorn Features: Angle of paddle can be adjusted. Fits in overnight bag or suitcase! Telescopic Shoehorn Specifications: Includes wrist strap. Adjusts from 12 to 30 in.", "The Easy Grip Nail Clippers are specially designed for stiff or arthritic hands. Ready to use, right out of the easy to open package. No twisting or flipping the handle to open the clippers, and no more painful bending or turning your wrist to get the right angle for cutting each nail. Angled shape allows for a comfortable hand position. Improved clipping design means less squeezing to cut the nail. Bulb-shaped handle with finger scoops provides 3 grip choices: power grip, pinch grip and lateral grip. Blade-bumpers keep fingers stable and prevent accidental cuts. Larger blade width reduces the number of cuts necessary to trim each nail. Overall length 3.5 inches.Easy Grip Nail Clippers and other products are designed specifically to assist people who have problems gripping and manipulating tools like clippers, tweezers and smoothers. They combine the comfort of elastomers, rigid lightweight polymers and long lasting stainless steel action surfaces. Built to last, all Easy Grip products are guaranteed for life. Easy Grip Nail Clippers Features: Gentle on hands. Soft rubber grip handles. Blade bumpers add stability and help prevent injury. Easy Grip Nail Clippers Specifications: Easy to clean, hygienic stainless steel. 45° blade angle allows for a comfortable and stable hand position. Nail Clippers are 3.5\" long.", "The Safety Sure Transfer Sling is a small and easy to use device with many applications. It can be used to move a person from or to a bed, move up in bed, raise or lowering, lift from the floor to a wheelchair or bed, wheelchair to car and back, move higher up in a wheelchair, transfer between bed and wheelchair and back, turn in bed. Safety Sure Transfer Sling Features: Assists in the safe transfer, repositioning and lifting of patients. Safety Sure Transfer Sling Specifications: Dimensions: Length 8 x Width 19 inches. Thickness: 3/8 inch. Weight: 1 lb. Waist size: max 50 inches. Handles: 4.", "Use this 48 inch Patriot Stripe gait belt to provide assistance for individuals when walking, standing, or sitting. The 2 inch wide cotton belt features a metal buckle with teeth for secure closing and easy adjusting. Machine washable. Pediatric sizes available by special order. 48 inch Patriot Stripe Features: Made from cotton. Metal buckle has teeth. Holds securely around the patient. Adjusts easily. 48 inch Patriot Stripe Specifications: 2 inches wide. Special orders available.", "Half roll shape offers multiple-choice comfort. Perfect to elevate ankles and reduce varicose veins while improving circulation. Use under knees to ease lower back strain. Place behind your back for gentle lumbar support. 100% visco foam responds to body weight and temperature, molds to body contours. Memory foam with White or Blue washable cover. Softeze Memory Foam Half Roll Features: Offers multiple-choice comfort. Elevates ankles to reduce varicose veins. Helps improve circulation. Softeze Memory Foam Half Roll Specifications: Size: 18 by 8 by 5 1/2 inches. Color: white or blue. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "Generously sized Wheelchair Carry-All Backpack is great for books, groceries and other heavy items. Full-width backpack pocket inside helps keep things in order. The top flap has a Velcro closure. The Wheelchair Carry-All Backpack is made of waterproof nylon with a rigid bottom liner. Attaches to the wheelchair?s handgrips by strong nylon straps. Wheelchair Carry-All Backpack Features: Great for books, groceries and other heavy items. Top flap has a Velcro closure. Wheelchair Carry-All Backpack Specifications: Measures 14 x 14 x 4 inches.", "The Hand to Hand Mug is a lightweight plastic mug that has the look and feel of ceramic. The hand to hand mug's contoured shape makes it easy and comfortable to grip the mug with one or two hands. The double walled design insulates the hands from heat and cold while retaining the temperature inside the mug. 10 oz capacity. The hand to hand mug is dishwasher and microwave safe. Hand to Hand Mug Features: Double walled design that insulates. Grooves help the user grip the mug. Lightweight plastic. Hand to Hand Mug Specifications: Holds 10oz. Dishwasher and microwave safe.", "The Rigid Sock Aid has an indented channel on the inside that acts as a heel guide and keeps the foot in position. Extra wide design is ideal for people with edema or larger feet. Rope loop handle. Holds it shape and stays open to help put on socks. For one or two handed use Rigid Sock Aid with Heel Guide Features: Plastic Shell The 35\" (89 cm) loop strap can be manipulated with one hand. Has an indented channel on the inside that acts as a heel guide. The extra width is ideal for people with edema or larger feet.", "Use this 72 inch Patriot Stripe Belt to provide assistance for individuals when walking, standing, or sitting. The 2 inch wide cotton belt features a metal buckle with teeth for secure closing and easy adjusting. Machine washable. Pediatric sizes available by special order. 72 inch Patriot Stripe Belt Features: Made from cotton. Metal buckle has teeth. Holds securely around the patient. Adjusts easily. 72 inch Patriot Stripe Belt Specifications: 2 inches wide. Special orders available.", "AbleRise Single turns an ordinary bed into a convenient storage area while providing support for getting in and out of bed. Comfortable to grasp non-metal handle is warm to the touch and can be used for repositioning and turning in bed. Easy to install rail slides between mattress and box springs. Fits twin, full and queen size beds. Handle is 20 inches wide. Height adjustable from 16 3/8 to 18 5/8 iches. Single has a slide bar that extends 39 3/4 inches underneath the mattress, and a strip of hook-and-loop that attaches to the opposite end of the bed frame for additional stability. AbleRise Single Features: Convenient storage area. Warm to the touch comfortable to grasp non-metal handle. Easy to install rail slides. Adjustable height. AbleRise Single Specifications: Fits twin, full and queen size beds. Handle is 20 inches wide. Height adjustable from 16 3/8 to 18 5/8 iches.", "The Large Safety Sure Sherpa Lined Belt is constructed of woven cotton fabric. The lock buckle allows belt to be tightened without opening. Sherpa lined belt provides additional skin protection. Large Safety Sure Sherpa Lined Belt Features: Quick release plastic buckle! Large Safety Sure Sherpa Lined Belt Specifications: 4 inches wide. Fits waist sizes 42 - 60 in. 3 horizontal and 4 vertical hand grips.", "The Make a Bib CLip and Cord consists of a braided nylon cord with a spring tension pinch clip at each end. Use this bib kit to make \"do-it-yourself\" bibs out of napkins, towels, plastic film or other materials. Sliding plastic bead makes the bib length adjustable. Make a Bib Clip and Cord Features: Bib length is adjustable! Cord drapes around the neck and attaches to the bib. Convenient alternative to other clothing protectors. Make a Bib Clip and Cord Specifications: Kit includes: braided nylon cord with a spring tension pinch clip at each end.", "Using Action's mini-cube technology, this Small Lap Tray Pad provides spot protection and pressure management for use on lap trays, head rests, large flat or contoured surfaces, or other areas of redness development in \"at risk\" users.The Lap Tray Pads are used to protect arms and elbows against developing pressure ulcerations or bruises.Sold with Action's low shear cover. Small Lap Tray Pad Features: Won't rub skin. Unrivaled in reducing the development of decubitus ulcers and pressure sores. Small Lap Tray Pad Specifications: 1/2 in. thick. This is a non-returnable hygiene item.", "The Spenco Foot Pillows help provide relief of pressure for the feet, heels and ankles. Velcro closure. One size fits all.Spenco Silicore Padding cushions and protects pressure prone areas of the body. Silicore fibers unique siliconized hollow core shafts don't mat down and retain their loft and allow air flow. Silicone coating lubricates each fiber to reduce friction and shear forces while preventing moisture penetration or retention. The breathable cotton/polyester fabric is fully washable, dry-able and radio-translucent. Spenco Foot Pillow Features: Helps increase air flow. Reduces friction and shear forces. Helps prevent moisture penetration and retention. Spenco Foot Pillow Specifications: One pair per package. Breathable cotton/polyester fabric. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "Small Clear Plate Guard fits smaller plates that measure 6 to 8 inches, such as dessert and salad plates. This clear polycarbonate 1 1/4 inch high rim prevents food from being pushed off the plate by making scooping food onto utensils easier. Attach by sliding the plate into the internal \"v\" grove of the plate guard. The plastic rail is dishwasher safe. Small Clear Plate Guard Features: Prevents food from being pushed off the plate. Makes scooping food onto utensils easier. Dishwasher safe. Small Clear Plate Guard Specifications: Fits: plates with a diameter of 6 to 8 inches. Measures: 1 1/4 inch high. Material: clear polycarbonate plastic.", "The Partitioned Scoop Dish with Lid has three compartments to keep food separated. High walls can be used to help push food onto utensils. The Partitioned Scoop Dish with Lid is dishwasher and microwave safe. Partitioned Scoop Dish with Lid Features: Three separate compartments. Keeps food separated. High walls can be used to help push food onto utensils. Partitioned Scoop Dish with Lid Specifications: 8 1/4 inch Diameter. 1 1/2 inches Deep. Color is Sandstone. Dishwasher and microwave safe.", "Posey Skinsleeves provide comfortable protection for fragile or sensitive skin that may bruise or tear easily. Made of 95% soft cotton and 5% Lycra, the special stretchy fabric is soft and breathable.Sold in pairs. One pair per package. Can be repeatedly washed and dried. To launder, machine wash and dry low temperature. For best results, hang dry. Posey Arm Sleeves Dark Medium Features: Helps protect thin, fragile skin tissue. Offers a protective barrier against skin tears and abrasions. Helps prevent patient disruption of medical treatments by camouflaging IV sites and wound sites. Knitted from latex free soft cotton/nylon/spandex four-way stretch yarn. Posey Arm Sleeves Dark Medium Specifications: Medium - Length 16½? (42 cm). Fits arm circumference 11? (28 cm) One pair per package. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "The Insulated cup keeps hot contents hot or cold contents cold, while the plastic Anti-splash lid prevents spills. Can hold up to 8 oz. Insulated Cup with Anti-Splash Lid Features: Keeps drink hot or cold. No more spills! Insulated Cup with Anti-Splash Lid Specifications: Capacity of 8 oz. Color choice - blue cup with white lid.", "The Snap-N-Save Shower Chair with Arm Rests allow users to sit down or stand up safely and easily. Durable chrome plated aluminum frame. Easy to assemble, no tools required. Based on a patented design, this shower chair with arms has safer structures and is easy to install and uninstall.If you're looking for a durable, lightweight weight and compact bath bench or shower chair, then look no further. The Eagle Snap-n-Save Shower Chair is a durable yet lightweight shower chair providing a safe means to showering and an excellent tool in fall prevention in the bathtub or shower.We've research and tested several shower chairs and found the Eagle Snap-n-Save Shower Chair to be an outstanding bath bench for its safety features, stability, durability, lightweight and ease of breakdown.What makes the Eagle Snap-n-Save Shower Chair unique is ease of assemble and disassemble. It snaps together easily and quickly without any tools. This enables easy storage and transportation. The Eagle Snap-n-Save Shower Chair is equipped with a lightweight aluminum frame, adjustable legs and supports up to 350 pounds. It?s small enough to fit a small space (see dimensions below).The Eagle Snap-n-Save Shower Chair has feet with suction cups built in. The legs are fully adjustable, and can be adjusted in 1 inch increments up to 20 inches. The height of the handles are 5.5 inches which helps make getting up and down easier and safer.Easy to assemble, no tools required. Molded contoured seat with non-slip textured finish. Durable lightweight aluminum frame. Splayed let configuration with large suction feet for stability. Color - Silver. Snap-N-Save Shower Chair with Arm Rests Features: Easy snap together assembly - no tools required for easy storage and transport. Arms provide assistance to sit down or to get up safer and easier. Legs are height adjustable. Suction cup feet for added bathroom safety and stability. Durable and lightweight aluminum frame. Drain holes in seat. Two side holders for hand held shower hose. Excellent tool in fall prevention in the bathtub or shower. Snap-N-Save Shower Chair with Arm Rests Specifications: Seat Height 16 - 20 inches. Seat dimensions 13 inches wide X 18.75 inches deep. Base width 18.5 - 19.25 inches. Base depth 18 - 20 inches. Width between armrests 18.5 inches. Unit weight 7.5 lbs. Seat to arm top 5.5 inches. Armrest Height from Floor: 21.5- 25.5 inches. Weight capacity 350 lbs. Ships via UPS Ground. Non-returnable hygiene item.", "Awesome Grip Hand Rim Covers are removable, changeable covers that fit the push wheel rims of manual wheelchairs. The closed cell foam base is heat resistant and water resistant. Fabric cover easily attach with hook-and-loop, and are reversible and washable. The Awesome Grip Hand Rim Covers provide a larger softer gripping surface, and will not slip on the rims or in your hands. Awesome Grip Hand Rim Covers Features: Removable, and changeable covers. Will not slip on the rims or in the hands. Provides a larger softer gripping surface. Awesome Grip Hand Rim Covers Specifications: Washable and reversible. Fit on standard size manual wheelchairs with 22 inch rims. Choose from Dark Blue Faux Suede, Patriotic, or Smiley Face fabric.", "The slick inner surface of the Car Ease Slide makes getting in and out of a car seat effortless. Sliding and rotation into the car seat is smooth with no friction. Unlike other products, CarEase is comfortable to sit on. Perfect for all sliding transfers. 18 x 22 inches. Car Ease Slide Features: Comfortable to sit on. Slick surface doesn't create friction. Car Ease Slide Specifications: 18 x 22 inches.", "The Leg Hugger with Foot Hugger helps prevent feet from slipping off wheelchair footrests or becoming entangled under chair. Removable foot pads raise footrests 2 inches to help improve posture and promote proper seating alignment.Secures to an 18-20\" wheelchair with quick-release straps. Cushioned foam is covered in wipe-clean vinyl. Leg Hugger with Foot Hugger Features: Quick-release straps. Improves posture and seat alignment. Makes standard wheelchairs more comfortable. Leg Hugger with Foot Hugger Specifications: Leg Hugger with 1 inch Foot Hugger #CPO6351 - 13\"W x 9\"D x 1\"H. Leg Hugger with 2 inch Foot Hugger #CPO6352 - 13\"W x 9\"D x 2\"H. Leg Hugger with 3 inch Foot Hugger #CPO6353 - 13\"W x 9\"D x 3\"H. Leg Hugger with 4 inch Foot Hugger #CPO6354 - 13\"W x 9\"D x 4\"H. Fits 18 - 20 in. wheelchairs. Meets CA# 117 flame retardancy standards.", "Posey SkinSleeves are a latex-free barrier that helps protect fragile skin. Made of soft cotton and Lycra for a comfortable fit, the SkinSleeve helps prevent the disruption of medical treatment by camouflaging IV and wound sites. The neutral flesh tones (light or dark) discreetly blend with the patient's own skin. Covering the leg or arm while leaving the thumb and fingers free, the SkinSleeve easily adjusts for the amount of necessary skin protection.Sold in pairs. One pair per package. Can be repeatedly washed and dried. To launder, machine wash and dry low temperature. For best results, hang dry. Dark Leg Sleeves Features: Soft cotton and Lycra provide a comfortable fit. Prevent the disruption of medical treatment. Blend with the patient's own skin tone. Dark Leg Sleeves Specifications: Length - 13½? (34 cm). Fits Limb circumference of 11? (28 cm). One pair per package. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "Use either the Akton Repair Kit Roll or patch for quick and easy resurfacing of small cuts or punctures on any Action pad. Full instructions included.Action pads can be cut for custom sizing and application. The cut surface will be sticky. We recommend using the Repair Kit to cover the cut edges. Akton Repair Kit Roll Features: Quick and easy resurfacing. Can be cut for custom sizing and application. Akton Repair Kit Roll Specifications: Full instructions included.", "The Dependa-Bar is designed for bathing, toileting and other environments where grab bars are found. Combines the sturdiness of a wall mounted grab bar and the functionality of a dual support rail that moves in step during standing and transferring in the bathroom. Mounts using conventional means to walls of most construction. Locks every 45 degrees (5 positions) providing a support rail that moves with the user. When not in use, conveniently locks against the wall. Stainless steel construction. Vertical rail is 30 1/2 inches long. Pivot rail is 18 inches long. Fixed horizontal grab bar with 1/ 1/4 inch diameter and 1 1/2 inch wall clearance. Dependa-Bar Features: Locks every 45 degrees (5 positions). Combines a wall mounted grab bar and a dual support rail. Water Resistant ? Stainless steel construction. Can be installed in the bathtub or beside the toilet. Dependa-Bar Specifications: Vertical rail is 30 1/2 inches long. Pivot rail is 18 inches long.", "The Posey Soft Armrest Pads add comfort and helps prevent pressure sores. Keeps skin from sticking to vinyl wheelchair seats and backs. Luxurious, synthetic fur padding for wheelchair armrests. Fits almost all wheelchairs with regular length armrests. Machine washable. One pair per package. Posey Soft Seat and Back sold separately. Posey Soft wheelchair Armrest Features: Luxurious, synthetic fur padding. Helps prevent pressure sores. Machine washable. Posey Soft Wheelchair Armrest Specifications: Package: One Pair Fits: Most standard length armrests", "This 2-in-1 Gas Gadget tool was designed to help eliminate wrist pain when refueling your car. The Gas Gadget acts as a wrench for those with arthritis, tendinitis of the wrist or carpal tunnel syndrome. It minimizes the effort needed to loosen and re-tighten vehicle gas caps. It may also be used as a prop to hold the gas filling nozzle open at gas pumps where the fill trigger detent is broken or missing. This is particularly useful during cold or inclement weather.The Gas Gadget is made from molded, black, high density polyethylene (HDPE) and features an ergonomic handle with a textured body. The wrench opening portion of the tool is hollowed out so that the gas cap tether won't interfere with its operation. It is small enough to fit in your glove compartment, under you seat or even in some door map pockets.Use the Gas Gadget to hold the fill nozzle open whenever you find a broken nozzle detent mechanism. Simply insert the fill nozzle into the filler neck of your car, squeeze the trigger to start the flow of gasoline, and then insert the flat portion of the Gas Gadget against the trigger and balance the round edge opposite the flat in the bottom portion of the nozzle. If not needed while filling, store the Gas Gadget on the access panel door. Gas Gadget Features: Assists in tightening gas caps. Reduces wrist and finger joint stress. Minimizes effort needed to loosen and tighten gas caps. Holds gas filling nozzle open. Gas Gadget Specifications: 7 inches long. Textured handle.", "The Posey Soft Seat and Back adds seating comfort and helps prevent pressure sores. Luxurious, synthetic fur padding for wheelchair seat and back. Covers openings in wheelchairs to help prevent pinching. Machine washable. Fits almost all standard wheelchairs. Posey Soft armrest sold separately. Posey Soft Seat and Back Features: Luxurious, synthetic fur padding. Helps prevent pressure sores. Machine washable. Posey Soft Seat and Back Specifications: Set: Seat and back. Fits: Most standard wheelchairs.", "The Softeze Memory Foam All Purpose Wedge gently molds to the contours of your body providing unbelievable comfort. Designed for multiple uses. Use as support for head, neck, knees, legs and back. Memory Foam with White or Blue washable cover. Softeze Memory Foam All Purpose Wedge Features: Molds to the contours of your body. Designed for multiple uses. Use as support for your head neck knees legs back. Softeze Memory Foam All Purpose Wedge Specifications: Size: 20 by 8 by 5 inches. White or Blue washable cover. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "Introducing Myself Belts ! A belt that promotes independence through it's patented one-handed closure. It's award-winning design is as easy as Snap-Slide-Secure! One end of the belt snaps around the front left belt loop, thereby attaching the belt to the pants. Next, the belt slides through the rest of the belt loops. Finally, the wearer secures the belt's Velcro ends together.Myself Belts can be opened and closed easily throughout the day and the belt always goes back to the correct tightness. Ideal for people with the use of only one hand. Offered in genuine brown leather. Specify size to fit waist measurement: 27/29, 30/32, 32/34, 34/36, 36/38, 38/40, 40/42, 42/44, 44/46, 46/48 inches.Myself Belts run slightly small. If you are choosing between two sizes, size up! Myself Belts Features: Velcro® belt closure allows for one handed closure. Perfect for special needs. Snaps around a front belt loop and then wraps around and secures in the front. Myself Belts Specifications: Offered in genuine brown leather. Width: 1 ¼ inch", "The Posey Comfy Seat adds seating comfort and helps prevent skin breakdown. Covers openings in a wheelchair to help prevent pinching. The soft, fiber-filled cushion easily attaches to wheelchairs with ties. Reinforced openings allow use of a positioning belt. Machine washable. Meets CA #117 flame retardancy standards. Posey Wheelchair Comfy Seat Features: Helps prevent skin breakdown. Soft, fiber-filled cushion. Helps prevent pinching. Easily attaches to wheelchairs. Machine washable. Posey Wheelchair Comfy Seat Specifications: One per package. Fits most standard wheelchairs. Attaches with ties.", "The Fleece Armrest Pouch easily attaches with a velcro fastener over the wheelchair arms. Comes in washable blue denim with fleece covered arm rests. Offers comfort plus a convenient storage compartment. Measures 10 x 9 with 4 1/2 inch pocket. Package of 2. Fleece Armrest Pouch Features: Easily attaches with a velcro fastener over the wheelchair arms. Offers comfort plus a convenient storage compartment. Fleece Armrest Pouch Specifications: Washable blue denim with fleece covered arm rests. Measures 10 x 9 with 4 1/2 inch pocket. Package of 2.", "The Bath Safe Adjustable Bath and Shower Seat assists in sitting or standing and makes personal hygiene easier. Features smooth sitting area with water drainage holes, suction feet and a built-in hand held shower spray holder. Bath Safe Adjustable Bath and Shower Seat Features: Seat height can be adjusted from 16 to 21 inches in 1 inch increments. Supports up to 300 lbs. Durable and rust proof. Snap together assembly, no tools required. Suction feet and a built-in hand held shower spray holder. Adjustable Bath and Shower Seat Specifications: Height Adjustable Legs: 16\"-21\". Base Dimensions (Outside): 22\" W x 16\" D. Fits tubs or showers that have a flat bottom surface of at least 17\" W. Seat Dimensions: 22\" W x 16\" D. Unit Weight: 11.85 lbs. Ships via UPS Ground. Non-returnable hygiene item.", "\"T\" Shaped Molded Plastic Handle Mug will accommodate a variety of grasping patterns. 12 oz capacity. Red/White. Package of 2.", "The Posey Transport Belt was designed to provide additional leverage when transferring a patient, thereby reducing the chance of injury to the patient and/or caregiver. The belt is constructed of durable nylon. The waist and thigh straps can be adjusted to fit the patient securely. Straps are secured with quick-release buckles. Nylon handles on the waist strap provide the caregivers with a firm grip during transfers and with ambulation assistance.INDICATIONS: Patients/residents requiringtransfer assistance. Posey Transport Belt Features: Helps prevent caregiver back injuries and assistsin safe patient transfer in and out of wheelchairs. Two point support offers additional leverage when assisting patients. Adjustable waist and thigh straps for optimal fit. Waist handles provide firm grip points. Posey Transport Belt Specifications: Durable nylon webbing with quick-releasebuckles. Machine washable. One size fits all. 300 lb weight limit.", "The Oxygen Tank Holders are made of PVC coated, heavy duty navy blue nylon that is strong, waterproof and lightweight. The top and bottom straps are equipped with quick-release buckles and are fully adjustable to accommodate most wheelchairs. Top straps can be attached to the push handles or uprights while bottom straps attach to the tipping levers. Oxygen Tank Holders Features: Heavy duty navy blue nylon is strong, waterproof and lightweight. Top and bottom straps are equipped with quick-release buckles. Straps are fully adjustable to accommodate most wheelchairs. Oxygen Tank Holders Specifications: Choose from : Large Holder for both D and E size tanks or Small Holder for M6 or 3.25 diameter tanks. Top straps can be attached to the push handles or uprights. Bottom straps attach to the tipping levers.", "Providing care for a loved one is one of the toughest jobs you can ever have. In The Educated Caregiver video series, you'll meet others who know what you're going through - and who share their experiences, insights and advice. From them and from healthcare professionals, you'll learn skills and valuable strategies for taking care of yourself and your loved one. Coping Skills, Volume 1, 80 minutes From those who have shouldered it themselves, learn how to deal with the physical and emotional burden caregivers experience. The video's short, easily viewed segments let you focus on or review specific skills: ? Gaining control over a demanding daily routine ? Reducing stress ? Averting burnout, or \"compassion fatigue\" ? Preparing for when your loved one leaves home ? Dealing with natural feelings of helplessness, anger, resentment and guiltHands-On Skills, Volume 2, 45 minutesYou'll see step-by-step demonstrations of key caregiving skills you'll use every day, such as: ? Caring for bed-ridden patients ? Assistance with walking ? Transferring from a bed to a chair ? Dressing, grooming and hygiene ? Assessment techniques ? Home safety Essential Knowledge, Volume 3, 48 minutesHealthcare professionals share vital information every caregiver needs to know, including: ? Communicating with a loved one ? Administering medications and understanding interactions ? Avoiding and controlling infection ? Wound care and preventing bed sores ? Ensuring proper nutritionAvailable in DVD only.", "An indispensable resource offering encouragement and instruction to those affected by Alzheimer?s Disease. For many families, Alzheimer?s means a gradually diminishing quality of life both for the sufferer and caregivers. All too often, the disease has led to isolation?and even a certain social stigma. It can impose psychological and emotional burdens just as heavy as the physical one. The Family Guide to Alzheimer?s Disease was created to help families understand what to expect; deal effectively with the challenge of this disease; help their loved ones meet each day more successfully; and enhance the quality of life for all involved.Understanding Alzheimer's, Volume 1, 62 minutes In this volume you?ll learn about the nature of Alzheimer?s, its causes and the stages of the disease. You?ll also learn some of the typical symptoms, how to obtain a diagnosis and the current treatments. Finally, you?ll learn how the disease affects our loved ones and alters the reality in which they live. Volume one covers: ? Overview of Dementia/Alzheimer?s Disease ? Symptoms ? Diagnosis ? Stages of Alzheimer's ? Treatment ? Telling Others ? Patient perspectiveBehavior Issues, Volume 2, 67 minutes Alzheimer?s changes almost everything about the way our loved ones perceive the world?and how they respond to it. One of the keys to helping our loved ones continue to live as successfully as possible is to understand this changed, strange world. In this volume you?ll learn more about how Alzheimer?s affects our loved ones?and how those effects typically change the person?s behavior. You?ll also learn successful strategies for ?redirecting? that behavior in ways that help your loved one and your family enjoy a better quality of life. Volume two covers: ? Overview ? Agitation ? Hallucinations ? Wandering ? Sleeplessness/Sundowning ? Incontinence ? Inappropriate Actions ? Redirection ? Fiblets Daily Life, Volume 3, 42 minutes As you come to understand more about the altered world of an Alzheimer?s sufferer, you?ll learn effective strategies for making your home environment a safe place where your loved one can live successfully. You?ll also learn key skills for communicating with persons suffering from Alzheimer?s and how to create a daily routine that is nurturing for your loved one and manageable for you. Volume three covers: ? Home Environment ? Driving ? Adult Emotions ? Communication ? Daily RoutineFamily Caregiving, Volume 4, 62 minutes In this volume, you?ll learn how to handle the daily responsibilities of caring for a loved one, such as eating, dressing, grooming and bathing. Just as important, you?ll learn how to get the outside help from family, friends and other resources that can be critical for safeguarding your own health. Volume four covers: ? Role of the Caregiver ? Taking Care of Yourself ? Accepting Support ? Respite ? Sexual Relationships ? Family Relationships ? Activities of Daily Living (ADLs) ? Eating ? Bathing ? Dressing Transitions, Volume 5, 44 minutes In this final volume, you?ll learn how to make some difficult transitions. You?ll learn how to adapt social activities to accommodate your loved one?s increasing disability and isolation. You?ll also learn how to recognize when the time has come to consider moving your loved one to a care facility (and how to evaluate these facilities). You?ll learn how the disease affects a person?s spirituality, and you?ll gain insights from others who have gone through the process of grieving the loss of a loved one for whom they have provided years of care. Volume five covers: ? Social Activities ? Spiritual Issues ? Care Facilities ? GriefAvailable in DVD only.", "The Solid Handle Rocker Knife is designed for those unable to use a knife and fork simultaneously. Because of Parkinson's, muscle weakness, or arthritis, dinner time can be frustrating for those without full control or weakness in their upper extremities. The specially designed, curved blade of the Solid Handle Rocker Knife lets them cut their food, using just one hand. Elegant, dishwasher safe, and stainless steel, this knife will fit in with regular dinner flatware. Solid Handle Rocker Knife Features: Designed for those persons with limited use of only one hand. User can effortlessly cut food with the curved blade using a rocking motion. Solid Handle Rocker Knife Specifications: Blade measures 4 inches long. Handle measures 4 1/4 inches long. Weighs 3 ounces.", "Solutions & Practical Advice for Older Adults and Their Families When older adults experience changes caused by the aging process, it's often difficult for families to know how to begin managing their loved ones' care, deal with difficult emotions, and make informed decisions. Through The Family Guide to Long-term Care series, you'll find answers to the questions that families so often encounter. These volumes are filled with indispensable knowledge that will benefit the entire family - not just at one point in time but throughout the entire process as a loved one experiences changes that come with aging.Getting Started, Volume 1, 34 minutesLearn what to do when an aging parent begins to need more assistance than you can provide. You'll benefit from detailed, step-by-step information on: ? Planning ahead as a family ? Warning signs that your parent should no longer live alone ? Assessing needs based on activities of daily living (ADLs) ? Safeguarding the home ? Home-based servicesMaking the Right Choice, Volume 2, 50 minutesWhen the time arrives for your parent to move from home, Making the Right Choice helps you understand the array of living options available - and find the one that best fits your situation. You'll learn about: ? Involving your loved one in the decision ? The continuum of care ? How to choose a facility ? Dealing with natural feelings of guilt ? Making the transition from homeStaying Involved, Volume 3, 31 minutesLearn how the family's role remains critical to your loved one's well-being even after the transition to new surroundings. You'll get important information on: ? Care planning ? Ways to keep the family involved ? Becoming partners with the staff and other providers ? Monitoring your loved one's care ? Helping your parent stay emotionally healthyUnderstanding Long-term Care Insurance, Volume 4, 21 minutesThis video will thoroughly prepare you to navigate an often bewildering maze of information - and make decisions that will preserve your assets and freedom of choice. You'll get expert guidance on: ? Gauging your need for LTC insurance ? The limits of Medicare and Medicaid ? Coverage for assisted living, home health and adult day care ? What to look for in an insurer ? Choosing coverage options that are best for youLegal Issues, Volume 5, 21 minutesNone of us wants to give up the right to decide whether we should be kept alive on a machine, or how our estate will be passed along - or to put our families in the uncomfortable position of making such desiccations for us. You'll learn valuable information that will give you and your family more peace of mind: ? Making a will and keeping it up to date ? Living Wills - making health care decisions in advance ? Durable power of attorney ? Designating others to make decisions on your behalf Financial Planning, Volume 6, 27 minutesAfter viewing this video, you'll have a clear picture of what to do if you someday have to manage a loved one's affairs. Whether you're planning for yourself or an aging parent, this video will give you the essential information you need: ? Organizing financial information and determining available assets ? Principles of sound investing ? Social Security benefits ? Everything you need to know about Medicare: what it will (and will not)pay for, deductibles, Parts A & B, coverage options and supplemental insurance.Available in DVD only.", "This bath and shower seat provides easier access for people who have difficulty getting in and out of the shower or bath tub. The Bath Safe Adjustable Bath and Shower Seat with Removable Arms and Back features a smooth sitting area with water drainage holes, suction feet and a built-in hand held shower spray holder. Available with removable arms and contoured back rest. Bath and Shower Seat with Removable Arms and Back Features: Seat height can be adjusted from 16 to 21 inches in 1 inch increments. Supports up to 300 lbs. Durable and rust proof. Snap together assembly, no tools required. Removable back and arms. Bath and Shower Seat with Removable Arms and Back Specifications: Height Adjustable Legs: 16\"-21\". Base Dimensions (Outside): 22\" W x 16\" D. Fits tubs or showers that have a flat bottom surface of at least 17\" W. Seat Dimensions: 22\" W x 16\" D. Unit Weight: 11.85 lbs. Seat Back: 14 ½? H (measured from the seat). Ships via UPS Ground. Non-returnable hygiene item.", "Large handle of the Self Opening Scissors allows the strength and control of the whole hand to be used. Ideal for swollen finger joints. Spring re-opens the scissors after each cut. Safety lock keeps scissors closed when not in use. Self Opening Scissor Features: Large comfortable handle. Strong stainless steel multi-purpose blades. Spring to automatically re-open scissor after cutting action is completed. Safety lock to keep scissors closed when not in use. Self Opening Scissors Specifications: Weighs 4.6 oz. 8.75 inches long.", "The Thermoskin Arthritis Ankle Wrap's wrap around design is easier to put on. Measure around ankle joint for proper fit. Provides support to assist with sprains and ligament damage to the ankle. Provides general support and compression. Beige. Latex free. Thermoskin Arthritis Ankle Wrap Features: Ideal for mildly increasing skin temperature to give increased circulation around the ankle for relief of pain and discomfort from arthritis, Repetitive Stress Injuries (RSI), and tendonitis. Inner lining made of Trioxon, a unique fiber that wicks away perspiration and keeps skin ventilated and comfortably dry. Adjustable Velcro strap applies additional compression/support when needed. Hand or machine-washable.", "Attach the Un Skru Jar Opener to the underside of any counter, cabinet, or shelf to open screw on lids from 3/8 to 5 inches in diameter. Supplied with mounting screws ready for installation. Un Skru Jar Opener Features: Holds the jar lid firmly while you twist the bottle. Can be operated with one hand! Attatches to the underside of any counter, cabinet, or shelf. Un Skru Jar Opener Specifications: Mounting screws provided. Opens lids 3/8 to 5 in. in diameter.", "This durable, lightweight and compact bath bench or shower chair with back rest, provides a safe means to showering and an excellent tool in fall prevention in the bathtub or shower. The Snap-n-Save Shower Chair with Backrest is an outstanding bath bench for its safety features, stability, durability, lightweight and ease of breakdown.Easy to assemble and disassemble. It snaps together easily and quickly without any tools. This enables easy storage and transportation. Easy to assemble, no tools required. Snap-N-Save Shower Seat with Arms and Back Features: Arm rests provide assistance to sit down or to get up safer and easier. Ergonomic hand grips under the seat. Durable and lightweight Aluminum Frame. Suction cup feet for added safety and stability. Snaps together easily and quickly without any tools for easy storage and transport. Legs are height adjustable. Two side-holders for hand-held shower hose. Snap-N-Save Shower Seat with Arms and Back Specifications: Seat Height: 16 - 20 inches Backrest dimensions: 15.5 inches wide x 7.75 inches high Seat dimensions: 13 in. W X 18.75 in. D Backrest dimensions: 15.5 inches wide x 7.75 inches high. Seat height: 16 - 20 inches. Seat to Top of Arm: 5.5 inches. Width between arm rests: 18.5 inches. Base width: 18.5 - 19.25 inches. Base depth: 18 - 20 inches. Unit weight: 10 lbs. Armrest Height from Floor: 21.5- 25.5 inches. Back height top to seat: 12.5 inches. Distance Between Armrests: 18.75 inches. Weight capacity: 350 lbs. Ships via UPS Ground. Non-returnable hygiene item.", "Increased leverage of the 6 inch Wheelchair Brake Lever Extensions makes it easier to lock the wheels. Slip onto the existing lever of the wheel chair. 6 inch Wheelchair Brake Lever Extensions Features: Extra length makes it easier to lock the wheels. 6 inch Wheelchair Brake Lever Extensions Specifications: Sold as a pair. Fits Invacare wheelchairs and most others. Color is steel with black tip.", "Increased leverage of the 8 inch Wheelchair Brake Lever Extensions makes it easier to lock the wheels. Slip onto the existing lever of the wheel chair. 8 inch Wheelchair Brake Lever Extensions Features: Extra length makes it easier to lock the wheels. 8 inch Wheelchair Brake Lever Extensions Specifications: Sold as a pair. Fits Invacare wheelchairs and most others. Color is steel with black tip.", "Medium Safety Sure Transfer Slide Specifications: Dimensions: Length 27 x Width 37 inches. Thickness: 0.1 inches without padding. Weight: 4 oz. SafetySure Transfer Slide is used primarily to: Move a patient up in bed. Turn in bed. Transfer between bed and wheelchair. Advantages : The SST Slide is very useful for small transfers, repositionings and moving from bed to wheelchair. It is easy to put in place, remove and carry along with you wherever you go! New Ultra Low Friction material also provides Soft, padded, comfortable and effortless transfers. and Prevents shear on user's skin.", "The Snap-N-Save Extra Long Sliding Transfer Bench is a durable transfer bench that enables you to transfer in and out of the shower or bathtub with ease. The Snap-N-Save models of sliding transfer bench, based on a patented design, consists of a plastic molded seat with attached sliding rings, left and right leg frame, a backrest, two sliding rails and four legs.Patented new design to make assembly easier and structure more solid for higher weight capacity. Snap-N-Save Extra Long Sliding Transfer Benches are ideal for traveling. Snap-N-Save Sliding Transfer Bench Extra Long Model Features: Very easy to assemble, no tools required. Bench slides for easy mobility. Height adjustable in 1/2\" increments. Splayed leg configuration for added stability. Plastic model seats have a larger seating area. Seat and backrest have a non-slip texture finish. Safety belt is included. Backrest can be installed on either side of seat. Durable lightweight aluminum frame. Secured locking mechanism for both patient transfer and while in the tub/shower. Come with double safety locks. Snap-N-Save Sliding Transfer Bench Extra Long Model Specifications: Seat measures: 18.75 inches wide x 13 inches deep. Adjustable seat height: 19 - 23.5 inches. Required clearance: 15 - 19 inches. Base width lo to high: 48.5 - 49 inches. Base depth lo to high: 19.5 - 21.5 inches. Back height from floor: 32.5 - 37 inches. Back measures: 15.75 wide x 7.75 inches high. Unit weight: 12.5 lbs. Weight limit: 300 lbs. Silver color. Ships via UPS Ground. Non-returnable hygiene item.", "The Posey Deluxe Guard Rail Pad is constructed of durable, firm foam, this practical safety aid offers maximum rail cushioning and coverage. Quick-release buckles allow fast and easy application and removal. Pad is 1 inch thick and available in various lengths to accommodate most healthcare beds. Wipes clean with liquid disinfectant. Meets CA #117 flame retardancy standards.INDICATIONS: Bed Safety. Patients at risk for bed entrapmentand/or injury. Posey Deluxe Guard Rails Pad Features: Helps protect patients from side rail injuries. Constructed of durable 1 inch thick foam and features hook and loop straps for easy removal. Wipe clean vinyl cover. Posey Deluxe Guard Rails Pad Specifications: Meets CA #117, Section E Flame Retardancy Standards. #5606 measures 60 inches long x 14 inches high.", "The Snap-N-Save Sliding Transfer Bench makes the process of getting in and out of the bathtub easy! Designed to make assembly easier and structure more solid for higher weight capacity. Ideal for traveling. Bench slides for easy mobility. Backrest is adjustable for left or right facing tubs. Durable lightweight aluminum frame. Locking mechanism for stability during transfer. The Transfer Bench consists of a plastic molded seat with attached sliding rings, left and right leg frame, a backrest, two sliding rails and four legs. Sliding Transfer Bench Regular Model Silver CEH61211. Item ships via UPS Ground. Non-returnable hygiene item. Snap-N-Save Sliding Transfer Bench Features: Very easy to assemble, no tools required. Bench slides for easy mobility. Height adjustable in 1/2\" increments. Splayed leg configuration for added stability. Plastic model seats have a larger seating area and come with a Shower Head Holder. Seat and backrest have a non-slip texture finish. Safety belt is included. Backrest can be installed on either side of seat. Durable lightweight aluminum frame. Secured locking mechanism for both patient transfer and while in the tub/shower. Come with double safety locks. Snap-N-Save Sliding Transfer Bench Specifications: Seat measures: 18.75 X 13 inches. Adjustable seat height: 19 - 23 inches. Required clearance: 15 - 19 inches. Base width: 39.5 - 41 inches. Base depth: 19.5 - 21.5 inches. Back height from floor: 32.5 - 37 inches. Unit weight: 12 lbs. Weight limit 400 lb.", "The Posey Deluxe Guard Rail Pad is constructed of durable, firm foam, this practical safety aid offers maximum rail cushioning and coverage. Quick-release buckles allow fast and easy application and removal. Pad is 1 inch thick and available in various lengths to accommodate most healthcare beds. Wipes clean with liquid disinfectant. Meets CA #117 flame retardancy standards.INDICATIONS: Bed Safety. Patients at risk for bed entrapmentand/or injury. Posey Deluxe Guard Rails Pad Features: Helps protect patients from side rail injuries. Constructed of durable 1 inch thick foam and features hook and loop straps for easy removal. Wipe clean vinyl cover. Posey Deluxe Guard Rails Pad Specifications: Meets CA #117, Section E Flame Retardancy Standards. #5605W measures 72 inches long x 14 inches high.", "The Heel Guide Compression Stocking Aid features a unique indented channel on the inside of the center cone that acts as a heel guide and keeps the foot in a perfect position while pulling on the compression hose. It has extra long handles and is easily assembled. Three separate sized hand grips accommodate different hand sizes. This unique product comes apart for traveling purposes and reduces the need for bending or stretching.Wide cone is ideal for people with edema or larger feet. Sturdy handle 17 inches high. Heel Guide Compression Stocking Aid tested on hose up to 30-40 mmHg. Easy to assemble. Heel Guide Compression Stocking Aid Features: Reduces the need for bending or stretching. Easy to assemble. Extra long sturdy handles. Comes apart for traveling. Heel Guide Compression Stocking Aid Specifications: Handle length: 17 inches high. 19\" circumference.", "The Posey Large Positioning Wedges are ideal for keeping bed-ridden patients repositioned, eliminating pressure points over the bony prominences and reducing the incidence of pressure ulcers. Lightweight positioning Wedges provide both positioning support and comfort.Positioning edges can be easily placed in position and unlike foam pillows, it is possible to turn the patient without assistance by using the wedges. The unique construction of an outer vinyl mesh, breathable fabric shell and a non-absorbent, polystyrene bead fill allows air to flow through the wedge, eliminating the discomfort of conventional foam pillows, which build up heat. All the Wedges feature a zippered closure, enabling beads to be added or removed for patient accommodation. Posey Large Lateral Wedge Features: Ideal for keeping bed-ridden patients repositioned, eliminating pressure points over the bony prominences and reducing the incidence of pressure ulcers. Lightweight, polystyrene filled wedges offer both positioning support and comfort. Posey Large Lateral Wedge Specifications: Large lateral wedge measures 19L x 7W x 9H inches. Machine washable. One per package. Recommended for patients over 180lbs. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "Small Safety Sure Transfer Slide Specifications : Dimensions: Length 18 x Width 22 inches. Thickness: 0.1 inches without padding. Weight: 1 oz. SafetySure Transfer Slide (SST Slide) 2031 is used primarily to : \t Move a patient up in bed. Turn in bed. Transfer between bed and wheelchair. Advantages : The SST Slide is very useful for small transfers, repositionings and moving from bed to wheelchair. It is easy to put in place, remove and carry along with you wherever you go! New Ultra Low Friction material also provides Soft, padded, comfortable and effortless transfers. and Prevents shear on user's skin.", "The Posey Medium Positioning Wedges are ideal for keeping bed-ridden patients repositioned, eliminating pressure points over the bony prominences and reducing the incidence of pressure ulcers. Lightweight positioning Wedges provide both positioning support and comfort.Positioning edges can be easily placed in position and unlike foam pillows, it is possible to turn the patient without assistance by using the wedges. The unique construction of an outer vinyl mesh, breathable fabric shell and a non-absorbent, polystyrene bead fill allows air to flow through the wedge, eliminating the discomfort of conventional foam pillows, which build up heat. All the Wedges feature a zippered closure, enabling beads to be added or removed for patient accommodation. Posey Medium Lateral Wedge Features: Ideal for keeping bed-ridden patients repositioned, eliminating pressure points over the bony prominences and reducing the incidence of pressure ulcers. Lightweight, polystyrene filled wedges offer both positioning support and comfort. Posey Medium Lateral Wedge Specifications: Medium lateral wedge measures 16L x 6W x 7H inches. Machine washable. One per package. Recommended for patients under 180lbs. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "The Transfer Handle is perfect for anyone who uses a bedside commode or wheelchair. This handle enables the elderly and people with disabilities to be independent, while preventing falls and injuries. Made of steel and painted off white. The handle is 6 inches wide and mounted to a 30 x 27 inch bedboard. Just slide between the mattress and box springs. Fits any style home bed. The Transfer Handle Features: Made of steel and painted off white. Enables people to get in and out of bed safely. Ideal for people who use walkers or wheelchairs. The Transfer Handle Specifications: The handle is 6 inches wide and is mounted to a 30 x 27 inch bedboard. Fits any style home bed. Designed for people who weigh 250 lbs or less.", "The Posey Small Positioning Wedges are ideal for keeping bed-ridden patients repositioned, eliminating pressure points over the bony prominences and reducing the incidence of pressure ulcers. Lightweight positioning Wedges provide both positioning support and comfort.Positioning edges can be easily placed in position and unlike foam pillows, it is possible to turn the patient without assistance by using the wedges. The unique construction of an outer vinyl mesh, breathable fabric shell and a non-absorbent, polystyrene bead fill allows air to flow through the wedge, eliminating the discomfort of conventional foam pillows, which build up heat. All the Wedges feature a zippered closure, enabling beads to be added or removed for patient accommodation. Recommended for Pediatrics or Cervical use. Posey Small Lateral Wedge Features: Ideal for keeping bed-ridden patients repositioned, eliminating pressure points over the bony prominences and reducing the incidence of pressure ulcers. Lightweight, polystyrene filled wedges offer both positioning support and comfort. Posey Small Lateral Wedge Specifications: Small lateral wedge measures 14 1/2 L x 4 W x 5 1/2 H inches. Machine washable. One per package. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "The Bath Safe Adjustable Transfer Bench with Arms and Back provides safer, easier access for people who are affected by weakness or lack of mobility, and have difficulty entering or exiting the tub safely. Easily adapted for bathtub entry from either the right or left side. Suction feet provide added security. Features height adjustable legs (16-21 inches), removable back and arm, built-in hand held shower holder and suction feet. Overall width is 30 inches. Weight limit 350 pounds. Easy to assemble. No tools required. Durable and rust proof. Bath Safe Adjustable Transfer Bench features: Easy to assemble, no tools required! Removable back and arms. Built in hand held shower holder. Built in suction feet. Durable and Rust Proof. Bath Safe Adjustable Transfer Bench specifications: Base Dimensions (Outside): 30? W x 16\" D. Seat Dimensions: 30? x 16\" D. Other Seat dimensions: 15\" D with the back in place. Unit Weight: 13.65 lbs. Seat Back: 14 ½? H (measured from the seat). Weight Capacity: 350 lbs. Ships via UPS Ground.Non-returnable hygiene item.", "The Posey Deluxe Guard Rail Pad is constructed of durable, firm foam, this practical safety aid offers maximum rail cushioning and coverage. Quick-release buckles allow fast and easy application and removal. Pad is 1 inch thick and available in various lengths to accommodate most healthcare beds. Wipes clean with liquid disinfectant. Meets CA #117 flame retardancy standards.INDICATIONS: Bed Safety. Patients at risk for bed entrapmentand/or injury. Posey Deluxe Guard Rails Pad Features: Helps protect patients from side rail injuries. Constructed of durable 1 inch thick foam and features hook and loop straps for easy removal. Wipe clean vinyl cover. Posey Deluxe Guard Rails Pad Specifications: Meets CA #117, Section E Flame Retardancy Standards. #5607 measures 43 inches long x 14 inches high.", "The Transfer Sling and Gait Belt is a combination of a transfer belt and a sling. This combination will make transferring more comfortable for the caregiver and for the care receiver. The Transfer Sling and Gait Belt gently supports behind the back and under the knees to form a sling, and will not slide upward. The belt can be used as a one or two person lift. This belt is more comfortable than the standard transfer belts because it will not slide up under arms. Appropriate for sit-pivot transfers. Transfer Sling and Gait Belt Medium/Large Features: Helps make transferring more comfortable for the caregiver and the care receiver. Gently supports behind back and under knees to form a sling, and will not slide upward. Transfer Sling and Gait Belt Medium/Large Specifications: Medium/Large fits most large men and women. Supports up to 250 lbs.", "The EZ Adjust Bed Rail offers four different positions! Adjustable length allows for use as both a bed rail or hand rail. Adjusts from 26 to 42 inches wide. Rail folds down to side of bed and fits any home or hospital bed. Adapts to appropriate height for varying mattress thicknesses and is reversible. Safety strap secures bed rail to bed frame. Bed Rail/Hand Rail-Adjustable length allows for use as both a bed rail to prevent falling out of bed or as a hand rail to assist in getting out of bed. EZ Adjust Bed Rail Features: Assembly: Installs in minutes with 4 bolts and Allen Wrench (Included). Made for Bed Type: Attaches to any home or hospital bed with included Safety Strap. Adjustable bed rail easily adjusts from 26 in. to 34 in. to 42 in. after it has been placed on the bed. Collapsible-Rail folds down to side of bed to allow user to get out of bed or provide space for making bed. Reversible-Can be placed on either side of the bed. Dual Safety Strap-Secures bed rail to bed frame. EZ Adjust Bed Rail Specifications: Weight Capacity: 400 lbs. Weight of Product: 14 lbs. Gap Between Rails: 3 inches. Height of Rail: 23 inches high from the base of mattress. Width of Rail: Locks in place at 26 in., 34 in. & 42 in. after installed on bed. Package Dimensions: 28 x 21 x 1.5 inches. Color: Charcoal Gray Powder coat steel Ships via UPS Ground.", "Adaptive Flat Pads are 100% smooth Akton Polymer . Adaptive Pads have multifunctional applications for traditional and non-traditional seating challenges. Pads can be cut and used for spot protection on products, such as arm pads, foot plates, head rests, leg rests, and splints or braces. Adaptive Pads are available in 1/4 inch 1/2 inch and 5/8 inch thicknesses. The Adaptive Pad when used as a cushion is intended for comfort only, not medical intervention.AKTON polymer won't leak, flow, or bottom out, and it is tissue equivalent. It moves with wheelchair users, not against them, to reduce pressure and shear, the two leading causes of pressure sores. AKTON polymer is also radiolucent and easy to clean with standard disinfectant. It will not support microbiological growth, and it won't absorb body fluids or odors.Please note: If 1/2 inch or 5/8 inch pad is used for a seating cushion, pad must be used with an Action brand cover for warranty to be in force. 1/2 inch Akton Polymer Adaptive Flat Pad 20 x 20 inch Features: Won't leak, flow, or bottom out, and it is tissue equivalent. Multifunctional applications for traditional and non-traditional seating challenges. Moves with wheelchair users, not against them, to reduce pressure and shear. Radiolucent and easy to clean with standard disinfectant. Will not support microbiological growth, and it won't absorb body fluids or odors. 1/2 inch Akton Polymer Adaptive Flat Pad 20 x 20 inch Specifications: Measures: 20 x 20 inches. Available in 1/4 inch 1/2 inch and 5/8 inch thicknesses. This is a non-returnable hygiene item. Shipping via UPS Ground.", "Crutch Mate Forearm Pads are designed to reduce friction and help prevent the incidence of skin breakdown. Crutch Mate Forearm Pads are especially useful for individuals who utilize crutches for longer periods. Gel pads provide long lasting comfort. Gel forearm pads attach easily to forearm crutches with hook-and-loop closures. They can be wiped down with a damp cloth and mild soap or disinfectant. Crutch Mate Forearm Pads are sold in pairs. Crutch Mate Forearm Pads Features: Made from glycerin gel. Reduce friction and prevent skin breakdown. Provide long lasting comfort. Hook-and-loop closures. Crutch Mate Forearm Pads Specifications: Attach to forearm crutches with hook-and-loop closures. Sold in pairs. Gel pads are 3/8\" thick gel.", "The Leg Hugger helps prevent feet from slipping off footrests or becoming entangled under chair. Secures to an 18-20\" wheelchair with quick-release straps. Lies flush with leg bars to allow full use of footrest. Cushioned foam padding is covered in water-repellent, wipe-clean vinyl. Leg Hugger Features: Lies flush with leg bars. Quick-release straps. Leg Hugger Specifications: Width: 15 1/2 in. Length: 9 in. Meets CA #117 flame retardancy standards. Secures to an 18-20\" wheelchair.", "The molded Melamine Cup has a large indentation at its base. The user's thumb and index finger slip easily around the narrow stem of the cup. Helpful for individuals with limited grasp or decreased finger strength. Unique cup design allows for firm grip. Melaware Cup Features: Persons with limited grasp can hold this cup confidently. Ideal when finger strength is decreased. The thumb and index finger slip easily around the narrow stem of the Melaware Cup. Melaware Cup Specifications: Sandstone or white (sorry, no color choice). Melamine products should not be microwaved. Molded melamine cup is dishwasher safe. Holds 8 fluid ounces.", "Extra long 24 inch Stainless Steel Shoe Horn has a curved, vinyl covered hand grip. The curved grip is easier to grasp and can also be used for pulling up socks. Stainless Steel Shoe Horn Features: Made of stainless steel metal. Soft rubber handle. Stainless Steel Shoe Horn Specifications: 24\" Stainless Steel", "Rigid clear plastic walker tray has a large compartment that measures 8 1/2 L x 3 3/4 W x 2 3/8 D inches and a shallow compartment with rounded corners for medications, coins, buttons or other small items. A round compartment holds a drinking glass, can or cup. The tray is 2 3/8 inches deep. Dishwasher safe. Walker Basket Replacement Tray Features: Replaces worn or broken Deluxe Walker Trays. Shallow compartment with rounded corners for medications, coins, buttons or other small items. Round compartment holds a drinking glass, can or cup. Walker Basket Replacement Tray Specifications: Large compartment 8 1/2 L x 3 3/4 W x 2 3/8 D inches. Tray is 2 3/8 inches deep.", "Medium Safety Sure Transfer Slide with Padding Specifications: Dimensions: Length 27 x Width 37 inches. Thickness: 1 inch with padding. Weight: 15 oz. SafetySure Transfer Slide is used primarily to: Move a patient up in bed. Turn in bed. Transfer between bed and wheelchair. Advantages : The SST Slide is very useful for small transfers, repositionings and moving from bed to wheelchair. It is easy to put in place, remove and carry along with you wherever you go! New Ultra Low Friction material also provides Soft, padded, comfortable and effortless transfers. and Prevents shear on user's skin.", "The Posey Deluxe Guard Rail Pad is constructed of durable, firm foam, this practical safety aid offers maximum rail cushioning and coverage. Quick-release buckles allow fast and easy application and removal. Pad is 1 inch thick and available in various lengths to accommodate most healthcare beds. Wipes clean with liquid disinfectant. Meets CA #117 flame retardancy standards.INDICATIONS: Bed Safety. Patients at risk for bed entrapmentand/or injury. Posey Deluxe Guard Rails Pad Features: Helps protect patients from side rail injuries. Constructed of durable 1 inch thick foam and features hook and loop straps for easy removal. Wipe clean vinyl cover. Posey Deluxe Guard Rails Pad Specifications: Meets CA #117, Section E Flame Retardancy Standards. #5605 measures 72 inches long x 14 inches high.", "The Posey Deluxe Lateral Arm Support prevents lateral leaning. Provides a comfortable, convenient arm rest to facilitate arm use and rehabilitation. Plush, padded foam covered with soft, water-resistant vinyl. Fits left or right. Optional hook-and-loop positioning straps are included to stabilize arm position. Wipes clean. Posey Deluxe Lateral Arm Support Features: Helps provide added padding to the top and inside face of the wheelchair armrest. Self-releasing straps may be used to maintain arm position. Soft, water repellent, wipe-clean vinyl cover. Posey Deluxe Lateral Arm Support Specifications: Interchangeable design can be used on either the left or right armrests. Adds 2 inches of height to armrest. Meets CA #117, Section E Flame Retardancy Standards.", "The Posey Wheelchair Wing Backs provide firm upper trunk support. Adjusts to accommodate individual needs. Sturdy plywood core covered with comfortable foam padding for extra comfort. Wipe-clean vinyl cover. Installs in seconds to seat-back screws. Measures 8 in. W x 10 in. L. Sold as a pair. Posey Wheelchair Wing Backs Features: Useful for patients who require bilateral upper torso support. Helps provide firm lateral support without occupying seating space. Installs in seconds with existing upholstery screws. Posey Wheelchair Wing Backs Specifications: Metal mounting brackets can be bent for different angles. Constructed of sturdy plywood and padded foam for extra comfort. Meets CA #117, Section E Flame Retardancy Standards.", "Small Safety Sure Transfer Slide with Padding Specifications : Dimensions: Length 18 x Width 22 inches. Thickness: 1 inch with padding. Weight: 8 oz.. SafetySure Transfer Slide (SST Slide) 2031 is used primarily to : \t Move a patient up in bed. Turn in bed. Transfer between bed and wheelchair. Advantages : The SST Slide is very useful for small transfers, repositionings and moving from bed to wheelchair. It is easy to put in place, remove and carry along with you wherever you go! New Ultra Low Friction material also provides Soft, padded, comfortable and effortless transfers. Prevents shear on user's skin.", "The Maddadapt Built Up Handle Angled Utensils are 30° angled forks and spoons that help individuals with limited upper extremity movement and grasping ability eat independently and comfortably!Adjustable rings on the handle give support against individual fingers for maximum comfort or can be removed if desired. The handles are hollow so that non-toxic weight can be added as necessary. Maddadapt™ Angled Teaspoon - Left Hand Features: Adjustable rings on the handle. Weight can be added! Help individuals with limited upper extremity movement. Maddadapt™ Angled Teaspoon - Left Hand Specifications: Diameter and softness of the handle can be increased by adding Colored Handled Foam. Dishwasher safe.", "The Heavy Duty Transfer Handle for Home Beds is perfect for anyone who uses a bedside commode or wheelchair. Enables elderly and people with disabilities to be independent while preventing falls and injuries. Will ease the burden of the caregiver. Made of steel and painted off white. The handle is 6 inches wide and mounted to a 30 x 27 inch bedboard. Just slide between the mattress and box springs. Fits any style home bed.Heavy Duty Transfer Handle for home beds attaches to metal bed frames without tools. **Recommended for people over 250 lbs. Heavy Duty Transfer Handle for Home Beds Features: Prevents falls and injuries. Made of steel. Heavy Duty Transfer Handle for Home Beds Specifications: Handle is 6 inches wide Fits any style home bed.", "The Transfer Sling and Gait Belt is a combination of a transfer belt and a sling. This combination will make transferring more comfortable for the caregiver and for the care receiver. The Transfer Sling and Gait Belt gently supports behind the back and under the knees to form a sling, and will not slide upward. The belt can be used as a one or two person lift. This belt is more comfortable than the standard transfer belts because it will not slide up under arms. Appropriate for sit-pivot transfers. Transfer Sling and Gait Belt Small/Medium Features: Helps make transferring more comfortable for the caregiver and the care receiver. Gently supports behind back and under knees to form a sling, and will not slide upward. Transfer Sling and Gait Belt Small/Medium Specifications: Small/Medium fits small/medium men and women. Supports up to 250 lbs.", "The Extra Large Scooter Saddle Armrest Bag has more storage space than any other saddle bag. Ideal for scooter users who need to carry lots of stuff. It features a front zippered pocket, front mesh pocket, interior pocket, side loops, side mesh pockets, and a \"hidden pocket\".Provides lots of storage space.Attaches to most armrests using unique \"soft to the skin\" mounting system. Can be mounted on the inside or outside of armrest. Measures 12 inches wide x 16 inches long x 2 inches deep. Extra Large Scooter Saddle Bag Features: Ideal for scooter users who need to carry lots of stuff. Has a front zippered pocket, a front mesh pocket, an interior pocket, side loops, side mesh pockets, and a hidden pocket. Extra Large Scooter Saddle Bag Specifications: Measures 12 inches wide x 16 inches long x 2 inches deep.", "Triderma MD® Pressure Sore Relief is a concentrated cream that is specifically formulated to help promote fast healing for minor to severely damaged skin from pressures, skin breakdown or other hard to heal skin irritations. This powerful cream contains proprietary AP4 Genuine Virgin Aloe, Vitamins A,B,D,E, Allantoin, Oat Protein, Zinc PCA and the most advanced healing ingredients available to help promote fast tissue repair. Each ingredient has been chosen for its healing, protecting and regenerating abilities. AP4 Genuine Virgin Aloe naturally contains three anti-inflammatory agents to reduce swelling, six antiseptics to fight bacteria and three analgesics to soothe pain. It helps strengthen the cells and contribute to the skins regenerative and recuperative processes. This proprietary aloe also contains high levels of multi-complex mucopolysaccharides which are very important for cellular healing and maintaining healthy skin. Zinc helps speed wound healing. Vitamin B5 aids tissue repair and wound healing. Allantoin helps heal, soothe and stimulate new tissue growth. Triderma MD® Pressure Sore Relief Features: Safe to use on sensitive skin areas. Daily use helps prevent skin breakdown and maintain healthy skin. Non-greasy, fragrance free. Contains NO Cortisone. Triderma MD® Pressure Sore Relief Specifications: Size: 4 oz jar. Ingredients: Cortisone and paraben free. Contains: AP4 Genuine Virgin Organic Aloe. Just wanted to let you know...we bought some of your cream for healing bed sores and it is absolutely wonderful!!!!! We have been applying it 2 x daily for about a month to my mothers bottom and it looks the best that it has looked in almost a year!!!!! We were continually fighting bedsores and this has them staying away!!! Thanks again, your items are a god send!!! Thank You Very Much,Tami", "The GripWare™ Partitioned Scoop Dish features 3/4 inch high dividers that allow food to be scooped onto utensils easily. The Scoop Dish has one 8 fluid oz. and two 4 fluid oz. compartments that will accommodate an entire meal.The Scoop Dish is made of durable melamine.Provides secure, nonskid feet to keep the dish from sliding. Dish diameter measures 8-3/4 inches. Dishwasher safe. Melamine products should not be microwaved. GripWare Partitioned Scoop dish Features: One 8 fluid oz. and two 4 fluid oz. compartments. Dishwasher safe. 3/4 inch high dividers. Nonskid feet to keep the dish from sliding. GripWare Partitioned Scoop dish Specifications: Should not be microwaved.", "Package of 2 black ink refills for the Ergo Sof PenAgain.", "Studies have documented the effectiveness of External Hip Protectors in preventing hip fractures. Posey Hipsters feature impact-absorbing pads over the critical hip fracture area to minimize potential damage that can occur from a fall. The brief is made from comfortable poly/cotton Lycra® with a low profile pad positioned over each hip. These low profile pads are sewn into a slim fitting brief allowing the Hipsters to be discreetly worn under clothing. The one-piece design allows for easy laundering at home or in healthcare facilities according to CDC guidelines. The Standard Unisex Brief (#6016) easily slips on over undergarments or can be worn as underwear. Hipsters fit comfortably around the patient's waist and feature a latex-free elastic waistband. Machine washable. Sewn-in pads. One per package. Posey Hipsters Brief Features: High impact-absorbing viscoelastic pads help protect hip bones against injury from falls. Documented to be effective in preventing hip fractures. Impact-absorbing pads over the critical hip fracture area minimize potential damage that can occur from a fall. Slim design can be discreetly worn under clothing. Posey Hipsters Brief Specifications: Small waist 28-30 hips 35-37 in (CPO6016S). Medium waist 30-34 hips 37-41 in (CPO6016M). Large waist 34-38 hips 41-45 in (CPO6016L). X-Large waist 38-42 hips 45-49 in (CPO6016XL). XX-Large waist 42-46 hips 49-53 in (CPO6016XXL). Sewn-in pads. 100% Latex-free. 95% Cotton/5% Spandex.", "The Posey Wheelchair Side Supports fit snugly in wheelchairs and provide bilateral upper torso support. Attach easily with adjustable hook-and-loop straps. Sturdy plywood covered with comfortable foam. Customize a standard wheelchair to accommodate petite individuals.Sold as a pair. Posey Wheelchair Side Supports Features: Adjustable hook and loop straps. Helps provide bilateral upper torso support. Posey Wheelchair Side Supports Specifications: 1 inch wide upholstered pads", "A Lotion applicator that massages the body while applying ointments, creams, lotions and medications.Comes with 2 different massage rollers that are easy to use and change. The inverted roller hugs the body's natural curves and can be used to apply lotions to the arms, legs and neck. The round roller is ideal for use on the back. Roll Easy Lotion Applicator Dimensions: 14 inches long. When folded the Roll Easy is 8 inches long. The rollers are 2 1/2 inches long and 5/8 inches in diameter.", "Star Glide Walker Slides reduce friction and self-align with the floor to allow for easier movement of the walker. Simple to use and easy to install. Just remove the rubber tips from the walker legs and replace them with Star Glides™! Star Glide Walker Slides Features: Reduce friction! Simple to use and easy to install!", "These stainless steel Maddadapt™ Built-Up Handle Cutlery utensils feature lightweight, built-up plastic handles that make it easy for those with weak grasps or arthritis, to hold and use successfully.The adjustable rings on the handles give support against individual fingers for maximum comfort and grip. The handles are hollow so that non-toxic weight can be added when necessary (putty is recommended). A loop on the handle can be used to tie the handle to the wrist. Diameter and softness of the handle can be increased by adding a Color Handle Foam. Maddadapt™ Built-Up Handle Cutlery Features: Adjustable rings on the handle. Weight can be added! Help individuals with limited upper extremity movement. Maddadapt™ Built-Up Handle Cutlery Specifications: Diameter and softness of the handle can be increased by adding Colored Handled Foam. Dishwasher safe.", "Dinnerware dishes that will not move!A practical and revolutionary solution for people with disabilities who have difficulty eating due to the movement of the dinnerware. Freedom Dinnerware non skid plates were designed for people with hand tremors, paralysis, Parkinson's disease, arthritis, uncontrolled movement and disabilities that restrict hand movement necessary for eating independently. Extended rims, built in dividers, special scoop angles and the patented no slip suction pad base provide the solution to the problem.Freedom Dinnerware is ideal for young children, helping them to eat and drink independently and at the same time reducing accidental spills.The products are suitable for Nurseries, Playgroups, Kindergarten and for use in the Home.In addition they reduce labor cost and time by helping to eliminate spills, laundry cleaning and damage to equipment, bedding and flooring.Each one of the Freedom Dinnerware non skid plates come with a Freedom No Slip Suction Pad. Simply turn the Freedom Dinnerware non skid plate over and attach the Freedom no slip Pad to the bottom of the Freedom Dinnerware plate,like putting a lid on a jar and turn it by hand until it is securely tight. Freedom Dinnerware plates are ready for use.The Freedom no slip Suction Pad is a patented vacuum system. When you place the Freedom Dinnerware non skid plate with the no slip pad attached, on a flat surface and push down with slight pressure, it creates a suction system that holds the Freedom plate in place and will not move if you bump it or hit it. Perfect for flat table tops, boats, RVs, wheelchair trays and over-bed tables. No more suction cup feet that slide and loose their grip.Freedom Scoop Plate with Suction Pad Base is deeper on one edge then the other to allow for easier scooping. Highest edge is 1 1/2 inch, lower edge is 3/4 inch. Inside diameter measures 7 inches. Overall diameter is 9 inches. Scoop plate and pad total weight is 13 oz.", "Dinnerware dishes that will not move!A practical and revolutionary solution for people with disabilities who have difficulty eating due to the movement of the dinnerware. Freedom Dinnerware non skid bowls were designed for people with hand tremors, paralysis, Parkinson's disease, arthritis, uncontrolled movement and disabilities that restrict hand movement necessary for eating independently. Extended rims, built in dividers, special scoop angles and the no slip patented suction pad base provide the solution to the problem.Freedom Dinnerware is ideal for young children, helping them to eat and drink independently and at the same time reducing accidental spills.The products are suitable for Nurseries, Playgroups, Kindergarten and for use in the Home.In addition they reduce labor cost and time by helping to eliminate spills, laundry cleaning and damage to equipment, bedding and flooring.Each one of the Freedom Dinnerware non skid bowls come with a Freedom no slip Suction Pad. Simply turn the Freedom Dinnerware bowl over and attach the Freedom Pad to the bottom of the Freedom Dinnerware bowl, like putting a lid on a jar and turn it by hand until it is securely tight. Freedom Dinnerware bowls are ready for use.The Freedom no slip Suction Pad is a patented vacuum system. When you place the Freedom Dinnerware non skid bowl with pad attached, on a flat surface and push down with slight pressure, it creates a suction system that holds the Freedom tableware bowl in place and will not move if you bump it or hit it. Perfect for flat table tops, boats, RVs, wheelchair trays and over-bed tables. No more suction cup feet that slide and loose their grip.Freedom Snack Bowl with Suction Pad Base is a large high sided bowl with a 2 inch inside depth. 8 Inch Diameter. Snack bowl and pad base together weigh 13 oz.", "The Maddadapt Built Up Handle Angled Utensils are 30° angled forks and spoons that help individuals with limited upper extremity movement and grasping ability eat independently and comfortably!Adjustable rings on the handle give support against individual fingers for maximum comfort or can be removed if desired. The handles are hollow so that non-toxic weight can be added as necessary. Maddadapt™ Angled Soup Spoon - Left Hand Features: Adjustable rings on the handle. Weight can be added! Help individuals with limited upper extremity movement. Maddadapt™ Angled Soup Spoon - Left Hand Specifications: Diameter and softness of the handle can be increased by adding Colored Handled Foam. Dishwasher safe.", "Replace the Under-Toe Washer toe sponges when needed to maintain good foot hygiene. Package of 3.", "Ideal for anyone recovering from hip, knee or back surgery. Includes the most popular assistive devices for independent dressing and bathing. These tools let you go about your daily routine and activities while minimizing the need to bend. Bend Aids Hip Kit Features: Recommended ADL items for patients recovering from hip or knee surgery or injury. Offers items for patients recovering from back surgery or anyone with increasing difficulty bending over. Includes 4 of the most popular assistive devices for independent dressing and bathing. Bend Aids Hip Kit Includes: Raptor Reacher. Shoehorn with \"T\" Handle. Scrubbies Round Sponge. Deluxe Sock & Stocking Aid.", "Drinks are securely held on square wheelchair tubing frames! Attach cup holder to any tubing element - including wheelchair frames, walkers, scooters, rollators, and bed rails. Drink holder clamping mechanism easily tightens securely on any upright or horizontal tubing.Open cup holder, then adjust arms to hold 16 oz to 46 oz cups, mugs, glasses or bottles with up to a 4 inch diameter base. Drink Holder closes flat to only 1 inch thick - no problem for going thru doorways. Patented internal support leg of this cup holder prevents accidental closure if bumped.", "Collapsible, weighted non skid drinkholder with integral base has a cork bottom to absorb moisture. Patented locking leg prevents the drink holder from collapsing. Hit it with a hammer - this no slip cupholder will not move or tip over. Great for boats, RVs, wheelchair trays, overbed tables, or table tops.The Freedom Cup Holder is ideal for young children, helping them to drink independently and at the same time reducing accidental spills.The products are suitable for Nurseries, Playgroups, Kindergarten and for use in the Home.In addition they reduce labour cost and time by helping to eliminate spills, laundry cleaning and damage to equipment, bedding and flooring. The Freedom non skid drink holder Suction Pad is a patented no slip vacuum system. When you place the non skid cupholder with attached no slip pad on a flat surface and push down with slight pressure, it creates a suction system that will not move even if you bump it or hit it. Place the base on a clean surface and it stays in place! No tipping, no slipping. The suction grip in the no slip base is incredibly strong, but very easy to release: just lift a corner of the base pad to move the cup holder to another location, or to clean up. Non Skid Cup holder folds flat for easy storage.Large Cupholder adjusts to hold 16 oz. to 46 oz. glasses, mugs, cans or bottles.", "This Typing Aid helps people with limited functional hand skills to accurately press keys. Can be used on keyboard, typewriters, adding machines, calculators and telephones. Can also be used on microwaves and other push button key pads. It will not damage machine keys. Overall length is 7 1/2 inches.", "Drinks are securely held on wheelchair frames! Attach wheelchair cup holder to any round metal tubing element - including wheelchair frames, walkers, scooters, rollators, and bed rails. Round clamping mechanism easily tightens securely on any upright or horizontal tubing. Open drink holder, then adjust arms to hold 16 oz to 46 oz cups, mugs, glasses or bottles with up to a 4 inch diameter base. Cup Holder closes flat to only 1 inch thick - no problem for going thru doorways. Patented internal support leg of this cup holder prevents accidental closure if bumped.", "Collapsible, weighted non skid drinkholder with integral base has a cork bottom to absorb moisture. Patented locking leg prevents the drink holder from collapsing. Hit it with a hammer - this no slip cupholder will not move or tip over. Great for boats, RV's, wheelchair trays, overbed tables, or table tops.The Freedom Cup Holder is ideal for young children, helping them to drink independently and at the same time reducing accidental spills.The products are suitable for Nurseries, Playgroups, Kindergarten and for use in the Home.In addition they reduce labour cost and time by helping to eliminate spills, laundry cleaning and damage to equipment, bedding and flooring. The Freedom No Slip Suction Pad is a patented vacuum system. When you place the non skid cupholder with attached pad on a flat surface and push down with slight pressure, it creates a no slip suction system that will not move even if you bump it or hit it. Place the non skid base on a clean surface and it stays in place! No tipping, no slipping. The suction grip in the base is incredibly strong, but very easy to release: just lift a corner of the base pad to move the non skid cup holder to another location, or to clean up. No Slip Cup holder folds flat for easy storage. Standard size drinkholder adjusts to hold 6 oz. to 16 oz. glasses, mugs, cans or bottles.", "For people who need a bit more time than usual to finish a meal, the Keep Warm Dish assures that food will be warm, right to the last spoonful!Just open the port and fill the chamber with hot water. The handles on the Keep Warm Dish will remain cool even when the dish is heated, allowing you to carry it safely to the table. The dish is top shelf dishwasher safe, but not intended for microwave use. Keep Warm Dish Features: Warm food, right to the last spoonful! Top shelf dishwasher safe. Rounded corners! Includes plastic funnel for filling the water chamber. Keep Warm Dish Specifications: Weight: 2 lb.(when filled with water). Holds up to 22 oz. Measures 2 in. high x 8 in. diameter.", "Triderma MD® Extreme Moisturizer is for severely dry, cracked irritated skin. Protects and heals your skin against damage from exposure to harsh weather or extreme climate changes. This fast acting medical strength formula is more than a moisturizer. It delivers intense moisture to dry, chapped, cracked skin. Its unique blend of clinically proven skin moisturizers combined with powerful natural healing properties allows it to lock in vital moisture and help reinforce skins natural protective barrier. It helps soothe redness, itching and burning. This special formula is fragrance free, non-greasy paraben-free, and safe for diabetics. Triderma MD® Extreme Moisturizer Features: Powerful, yet safe for sensitive skin. Contains medical strength ingredients. Locks in vital moisture and reinforce skin's natural protective barrier. Helps soothe redness, itching and burning. Triderma MD® Extreme Moisturizer Specifications: Includes: Triderma MD® Extreme Moisturizer 4 oz jar. Ingredients: Cortisone and Paraben free. Contains: AP4 Genuine Virgin Aloe™.", "Triderma MD® Intense Healing Cream is a specialized formula to soothe, protect and promote fast healing for hard to heal skin irritations. Contains our powerful AP4 Genuine Virgin Aloe, vitamins A, B, D & E, oat protein, zinc pca, collagen and the most advanced healing and moisturizing ingredients available. Results seen quickly. Triderma MD® Intense Healing Cream Features: Powerful, yet gentle enough to use as an everyday moisturizer for face and body. Multi-purpose cream is fragrance free, non-greasy. Contains NO cortisone making it safe to use head to toe. Triderma MD® Intense Healing Cream Specifications: Contains: Powerful AP4 Genuine Virgin Aloe™, Zinc PCA, Vitamins A,B,D,E. Includes: Triderma MD® Intense Healing Cream 4 oz. jar.", "The Travel toilet Aid provides assistance with independent hygiene while traveling. Curved metal handle with molded plastic head has recessed serrations to grip paper. Weighs 2 1/2 oz. 10 inches long.This is a non-returnable hygiene item. Travel Toilet Aid Features: Provides assistance with independent hygiene while traveling. Travel Toilet Aid Specifications: Weighs 2 1/2 oz. 10 inches long.", "Daily use of these colorful Pen and Pencil Weights Package of 6 makes writing at school a breeze for children with difficulty processing the fine motor skills necessary for proper handwriting. These writing utensil weights provide feedback for those with difficulty in vestibular, proprioceptive processing, or sensory motor feedback. O-Rings secure the weights and allow them to be placed anywhere on the pen or pencil. Not for use with small children, or any children prone to placing items in mouth due to choking hazzard. Pen and Pencil Weights Package of 6 Feature: Helps provide sensory motor feedback. Assist sensory motor planning. Pen and Pencil Weight Package of 6 Specifications: Weights are approximately 1.5 ounces. Set of 6 weights with 12 o-rings.", "The Round Up Plate is for children and adults with limited muscle control and coordination.A high inner wall around the circumference prevents food from spilling or sliding off the plate. Round Up Plate Features: High inner wall. Designed for those with limited muscle control and coordination. Round Up Plate Specifications: Measures 8¨ (20.3 cm) diameter x 3/4¨ (1.9 cm) high. Dishwasher safe.", "The Long handled Under-Toe Washer is the key to foot hygiene for anyone who has trouble bending! Measures 25 inches with a soft built up grip handle. Sponge can be removed when worn and replaced. Under-Toe Washer Features: Key to foot hygiene! Soft built up grip handle. Under-Toe Washer Specifications: Length: 25 in. Sponge can be removed when worn and replaced.", "Increase your visibility while enjoying your independence. The Folding Safety Flag can be easily mounted to all scooters, manual wheelchairs, and power-chairs. It folds down below the individuals head when not in use, or when getting in and out of vehicles. Folding Safety Flag Features: Easily mounts to all scooters, manual wheelchairs, and powerchairs. Folds down when not in use, or when getting in and out of vehicles. Folding Safety Flag Specifications: Vinyl flag measures 7 inches tall by 16 inches long. Fiberglass pole is 5 inches tall fully extended and 27 inches tall when folded. Kit includes: 2 - 3/4 inch square-clamps, 2 - 7/8 inch round-clamps and 2 - 1/4 x 1 inch bolts.", "The Maddagrip Opener conforms to almost any size cap permitting the user to effortlessly open anything from small vials and bottles to large jars. The longer shape and textured outside grip provide a better grip for weak hands. The large diameter of the grip fits into the entire hand and offers extra turning power.Bright orange Maddagrip Opener color for greater visibility. Maddagrip Opener Features: Large, soft, and easy to grip. Textured outside grip.", "The Wall Switch Extension Handle puts wall switches within easy reach of children, wheelchair users or people with limited reach. Provides a 12 inch extension to any standard toggle switch. Wall Switch Extension Handle Specifications: Two per package. Made of molded clear plastic. Screws and bushings are included.", "The Posey Transfer and Walking Belts help prevent caregiver back injuries and assist in the safe transfer or ambulation of patients. The Deluxe Transfer Belt has seven handles and a 6 inch high back support and is ideal for transferring larger patients. Available with a quick-release nylon buckle or nickel-plated buckle. Posey Deluxe Transfer Belt Features: Helps prevent caregiver back injuries. Assist in the safe transfer or ambulation of patients. Ideal for transferring larger patients. Posey Deluxe Transfer Belt Specifications: Seven handles and a 6 inch high back support. Fits waist sizes 30- 66 inches. One per package. Machine washable.", "Dinnerware dishes that will not move!A practical and revolutionary solution for people with disabilities who have difficulty eating due to the movement of the dinnerware. Freedom Dinnerware non skid dishes were designed for people with hand tremors, paralysis, Parkinson's disease, arthritis, uncontrolled movement and disabilities that restrict hand movement necessary for eating independently. Extended rims, built in dividers, special scoop angles and the patented no slip suction pad base provide the solution to the problem.Freedom Dinnerware is ideal for young children, helping them to eat and drink independently and at the same time reducing accidental spills.The products are suitable for Nurseries, Playgroups, Kindergarten and for use in the Home.In addition they reduce labor cost and time by helping to eliminate spills, laundry cleaning and damage to equipment, bedding and flooring.Each one of the Freedom Dinnerware non skid divided compartment plates come with a Freedom no slip Suction Pad. Simply turn the Freedom Dinnerware divided compartment plate over and attach the Freedom no slip Pad to the bottom of the Freedom Dinnerware divided compartment plate, like putting a lid on a jar and turn it by hand until it is securely tight. Freedom Dinnerware divided plates are ready for use.The Freedom Suction no slip Pad is a patented vacuum system. When you place the Freedom Dinnerware non skid divided compartment plate with pad attached, on a flat surface and push down with slight pressure , it creates a suction system that holds the non skid Freedom Divided Plate in place and will not move if you bump it or hit it. Perfect for flat table tops, boats, RVs, wheelchair trays and over-bed tables. No more suction cup feet that slide and loose their grip.Freedom Divided Plate with Suction Pad Base features 3 compartments, one large and 2 small, with high rims to keep foods separated.", "The Folding Travel Toilet Aid provides assistance with independent hygiene while traveling. Curved metal handle with molded plastic head has recessed serrations to grip paper. Weighs 2 1/2 oz. 10 inches long. Folding Travel Toilet Aid folds to 4 3/4 inches.This is a non-returnable hygiene item. Folding Travel Toilet Aid Features: Provides assistance with independent hygiene while traveling. Small folded size can be stored easily. Folding Travel Toilet Aid Specifications: Folds to 4 3/4 inches. 10 inches long when open. Weighs 2 1/2 oz.", "The patented line of PenAgain Pens are ergonomically designed to fit to the contour of the hand. This unique design helps alleviate stresses normally encountered with a standard pen. The natural weight of the writer's hand provides sufficient pressure to apply ink to the paper. This eliminates the need to grip the pen allowing the thumb and forefinger to serve merely as guides.The PenAgain may help alleviate the symptoms of Writers Cramp, Carpal Tunnel Syndrome, Calluses, RSI, and Arthritis. Ergo Sof PenAgain Features: Designed to fit comfortably in the hand. Helps alleviate stresses normally encountered with a standard pen. Special design eliminates the need to grip the pen. May help alleviate the symptoms of Writers Cramp, Carpal Tunnel Syndrome, Calluses, RSI, and Arthritis. Ergo Sof PenAgain Specifications: Black Ink only.", "The Raptor™ Reacher is a low cost, durable, lightweight, all plastic reacher with a contemporary design unlike other reachers. The jaw opens a full 2 1/2\" (6.3 cm) and provides a tight grip on even the smallest items such as coins or bulky items like newspapers, clothing and cans. A hook-like extension on the front can be used as a dressing aid. Raptor Reacher Features: Durable, lightweight, plastic. Can be used as a dressing aid. Hook-like extension on the end of the reacher. Raptor Reacher Specifications: Jaw opens: 2 1/2 in. Length: 24 in. Weight: 6 oz.", "The Walker Bag Hook creates a convenient spot on a walker to hang a bag or purse. Simply attach the clamp around the walker and hang a purse or bag on the hook. Can also be used on most standard bed rails. Walker Bag Hook Specifications: Clamp can be adjusted to accommodate tubing diameters of 1/2 to 1 1/8 inches.", "MediBeads Hand Wrap helps decrease pain in the hand or other small joints caused by Carpal Tunnel Syndrome and tendonitis. The sleeve design surrounds the hand completely. It is made of durable stretch fabric that is ideal for range of motion finger and wrist exercises. MediBeads are microwave activated wraps that provide deep penetrating moist heat for natural pain relief. Simply microwave and slip the sleeve on. The hand wrap may also be used for cold therapy. MediBeads are non-toxic and environmentally friendly. They remain odor free and will not support mold, bacteria, or fungi growth. MediBeads Hand Wrap Features: Easy to apply sleeve design surrounds the hand or small joints. Ideal for hands, elbows, and wrists. Stretch fabric is ideal for exercises. Microwave activated for moist heat treatment. Place in freeze for cold therapy. Helps treat pain caused by carpal tunnel and tendonitis. MediBeads Hand Wrap Specifications: Measures: 5 x 7 inches. Care Instructions: Hand wash in a mild detergent and allow to air dry 24 hours. Material: Non-toxic and latex free. Made in: USA.", "MediBeads Joint Wrap is designed to deliver moist heat or cold therapy to larger joints, such as knees, elbows and ankles. Stretch fabric sleeve is easy to pull one for natural pain relief for aching muscles and painful joints. For moist heat therapy, place the wrap in the microwave for 1 to 2 minutes. MediBeads produce clean moist heat by drawing moisture from the air. No need to add water. For cold therapy, place it in the freezer for 2 hours. This wrap can be worn during strengthening and range of motion exercises. MediBeads are environmentally friendly, convenient, easy to use, washable, odor free, dust free and will not support bacteria or fungi growth. MediBeads Joint Wrap Features: Pull on sleeve surrounds the larger joints. Provides deep-penetrating moist heat. Stretch fabric permits easy application. May also be used for cold therapy. Washable, odor-free, dust free, and will not support bacteria or fungal growth. MediBeads Joint Wrap Specifications: Measures: 6 x 8 inches. Care Instructions: Hand wash in a mild detergent and allow to air dry 24 hours. Material: Non-toxic and latex free. Made in: USA.", "MediBeads King Pad is designed to deliver a moist heat treatment to larger body areas such as the back, abdomen, upper legs and hips. MediBeads are microwave activated wraps that deliver pain relieving moist heat therapy. MediBeads Wraps are ready for use in just a minute and are applied directly to the site of pain to provide immediate relief. The wraps continue to deliver therapeutic moist heat for up to thirty minutes. This is the medically recommended treatment time for heat therapy within a three to four hour period. Through a patent pending process, the OrthoBeads in MediBeads continuously recharge by absorbing only water molecules from the air. Adding water is not necessary. The absorbed water is held, purified and released as \"clean moist heat\" when the MediBeads Wrap is microwaved. The result is a bacteria and odor-free wrap. Unlike other grain and pellet products, MediBeads need no special covers, they will not dry out, dissolve or disintegrate. MediBeads Wraps are washable, so no special covers are required. When removed from the microwave, the temperature of MediBeads Wrap does not increase. This prevents inadvertent burns, which are caused by the continued temperature increase (\"cooking\") prevalent in all gel packs. Microwave activation eliminates potentially dangerous use of boiling water, electricity or ovens. MediBeads are non-toxic and environmentally friendly, easy to use and portable. MediBeads King Pad Features: Natural hydration eliminates the need for sponges, cloths or towels. When microwaved, MediBeads draw moisture from the air and release it as clean, deeply-penetrating moist heat- no need to add water! Washable, odor-free, dust free, and will not support bacteria or fungal growth. MediBeads King Pad Specifications: Measures: 12 x 16 inches. Care Instructions: Hand wash in a mild detergent and allow to air dry 24 hours. Material: Non-toxic and latex free. Made in: USA.", "MediBeads Standard Pad delivers natural pain relieving moist heat therapy. Deeply penetrating moist heat applied directly to the site of pain will increase circulation, relax tension and tightness of overworked muscles, promote healing, and improve mobility. MediBeads are microwave activated moist heat wraps that deliver immediate pain relieving moist heat therapy. These moist heat wraps are ready for use in just minutes, and continue to deliver therapeutic moist heat for up to thirty minutes. Through a patent pending process, the beads in MediBeads continuously absorb water molecules from the air. Adding water is not necessary. The absorbed water is held, purified and released as \"clean moist heat\" when the MediBeads Wrap is microwaved. The result is a bacteria and odor-free wrap. Unlike other grain and pellet products, MediBeads need no special covers, they will not dry out, dissolve or disintegrate. MediBeads Wraps are washable, so no special covers are required. When removed from the microwave, the temperature of MediBeads Wrap does not increase. This prevents inadvertent burns, which are caused by the continued temperature increase (\"cooking\") prevalent in all gel packs. Microwave activation eliminates potentially dangerous use of boiling water, electricity or ovens. MediBeads are non-toxic and environmentally friendly, easy to use and portable. MediBeads Standard Pad Features: Natural hydration eliminates the need for sponges, cloths or towels. Clean, deeply-penetrating moist heat - no need to add water. Washable, odor-free, dust free, and will not support bacteria or fungal growth. MediBeads Standard Pad Specifications: Measures: 9 x 12 inches. Care Instructions: Hand wash in a mild detergent and allow to air dry 24 hours. Material: Non-toxic and latex free. Made in: USA.", "The MediBeads Therapy Wrap is a microwave activated moist heat pad with ties for application to the back, hip or shoulder. The ties allow you apply the wrap to the painful area and still move around. Patent-pending MediBeads technology continuously draw moisture from the air and release it as clean, deep-penetrating moist heat when microwaved. MediBeads are non-toxic, washable, reusable, odor-free and will not support bacterial growth. The time-released moist heat from MediBeads delivers therapeutic levels of heat therapy for up to 30 minutes. Place the pad in the microwaver for 1-2 minutes and apply for moist heat therapy. MediBeads Therapy Wrap Features: Non-toxic and environmentally friendly. Produces clean moist heat - no need to add water! Easy to use - just microwave and apply. Unique wrap design allows treatment during normal activities or exercise. MediBeads Therapy Wrap Specifications: Measures: 7 x 14 inches (not including ties). Fits: up to 60 inches. Care Instructions: Hand wash in a mild detergent and allow to air dry 24 hours. Material: Non-toxic and latex free. Made in: USA.", "Indoors or out, nothing beats the stability and versatility of these Tennis Ball Glides for Walkers ! Indoors, the Ball Glides quietly glide over linoleum and wood floors without leaving any marks. Outdoors, the round shape and tough exterior are the perfect combination for overcoming rough, uneven surfaces.The molded, internal stabilizer provides exceptional stability by securely attaching the tennis ball onto the walker leg. The stabilizer also protects the tennis ball from the sharp edges of the walker leg, extending the life of the glide. Works on any standard walker with 1\" tubing. Sold in pairs. Latex free. Tennis Ball Glides for Walkers Feature: Quiet smooth glides. Won't leave any marks. Tough exterior can overcome any rough surface. Tennis Ball Glide Specifications: Works on any standard walker with 1\" tubing. Sold in pairs.", "The Mounted Table Top Scissors is fitted with a Large ?T? shaped handle that provides the user with a better grip and increases leverage . The Mounted Table Top Scissors are used either by depressing the handle with the scissor in a stable position, or by \"scooting\" it across the table. An internal Spring automatically reopens the scissor when pressure is released. A Blade guard is supplied for safety when not in use. Designed for use by children and adults with very limited hand strength and control, or suitable for use by those with only one functional hand. The Mounted Table Top Scissor is mounted on a lightweight, brightly colored, green plastic base which has rubber non-slip feet for stability. Mounted Table Top Scissors Features: Mounted on a lightweight, brightly colored, green plastic base. Base has rubber non-slip feet for stability. Spring will automatically reopen the blades. Mounted Table Top Scissors Specifications: 1½\" rounded tip blades.", "The Posey Premium \"Gel\" Heel Pillow is a multi-purpose heel pillow that is ideal for individuals in acute care, long term care and homecare settings. The Heel pillow addresses a variety of heel and foot problems including skin irritation, heel ulcers and foot drop. The Premium Gel Heel Pillow is made of a soft, non-shear polyester fabric that provides comfort and protection. Hollow core micro-fiber filling retains its resiliency even after repeated washings and will not bottom out. Removable Gel Pad fits underneath the calf for hot/cold therapy applications and the open heel cutout ensures heel isolation, while also promoting air circulation to reduce heat buildup. The Heel Pillow is interchangeable and the soft ankle and calf straps can be adjusted for different sized patients, allowing variable degrees of foot drop control. Additional Gel Pads are available (Cat. No. 6118GP). Posey Premium Gel Heel Pillow Features: Addresses a variety of heel and foot problems including skin irritation, heel ulcers and foot drop. Made of a soft, non-shear polyester fabric that provides comfort and protection. Gel Pad fits underneath the calf for hot/cold therapy applications. Posey Premium Gel Heel Pillow Specifications: One size fits most applications. Meets CA 117, Section E for flame retardancy. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "The Posey Quilted Long Boot protects delicate skin and is designed to support the calf, minimizing pressure on the heel by dispersing weight evenly along the calf. Helps protect heels, ankles, and calved from skin irritation and painful pressure sores. Intended for patients who are seated or in bed.Protectors are filled with soft polyester fiber, covered with soft cotton fabric. Three padded straps with hook and loop (velcro) fasteners for quick and easy application, helping ensure a secure, yet comfortable fit. Available in pastel plaid (#6113) and solid navy (#6114). One size fits most applications. Machine washable. One pair per package. Posey Quilted Long Boot Features: Designed to support the calf, minimizing pressure on the heel by dispersing weight evenly along the calf. Helps protect heels, ankles, and calved from skin irritation and painful pressure sores. Intended for patients who are seated or in bed. Posey Quilted Long Boot Specifications: Measures 14 inches long x 9 inches high. One size fits most applications. One pair per package. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "This Snap-N-Save Long Sliding Transfer Bench with Swivel Seat eases the transfer into a bathtub by allowing you to sit down, and slide the seat into the tub area. The seat is made of sturdy molded plastic with a non-slip textured finish and an integral shower-head holder. Includes a safety belt. The backrest can be installed on either side of the seat. Seat glides over polished, high-strength aluminum tubes. Molded plastic seat and back, textured finish. Swivel seat, locking every 90°, allows easier entry to and exit from bench. Rust-proof aluminum construction. Adjustable height to fit user and bathtub clearance. Strong suction tipped legs stop movement on wet surfaces. Snap-N-Save Long Sliding Transfer Bench with Swivel Seat Features: This Long sliding transfer bench features molded swivel seat that enables user to turn every 90 degrees before getting in and out of the bathtub or shower. Makes patient transfer even easier and safer. Double safety locks on each side of bench allows user to get on the bench safely before sliding to the other side and locking the bench while inside the tub or shower. Height adjustable in 1/2\" increments. Snap-N-Save Long Sliding Transfer Bench with Swivel Seat Specifications: Seat size: 20.5 x 13.5 inches. Seat height: 19 - 23.25 inches. Base width: 43 - 44 inches. Base depth: 18.5 - 20.5 inches. Required clearance: 14 - 18.5 inches. Back height from floor: 32.25 - 36.5 inches. Weight limit: 300 pounds. Ships via UPS Ground. Non-returnable hygiene item.", "This Snap-N-Save Extra Long Sliding Transfer Bench with Swivel Seat eases the transfer into a bathtub by allowing you to sit down, and slide the seat into the tub area. The seat is made of sturdy molded plastic with a non-slip textured finish and an integral shower-head holder. Includes a safety belt. The backrest can be installed on either side of the seat. Seat glides over polished, high-strength aluminum tubes. Molded plastic seat and back, textured finish. Swivel seat, locking every 90°, allows easier entry to and exit from bench. Rust-proof aluminum construction. Adjustable height to fit user and bathtub clearance. Strong suction tipped legs stop movement on wet surfaces. Snap-N-Save Extra Long Sliding Transfer Bench with Swivel Seat Features: This Extra Long sliding transfer bench features molded swivel seat that enables user to turn every 90 degrees before getting in and out of the bathtub or shower. Makes patient transfer even easier and safer. Double safety locks on each side of bench allows user to get on the bench safely before sliding to the other side and locking the bench while inside the tub or shower. Height adjustable in 1/2\" increments. Snap-N-Save Extra Long Sliding Transfer Bench with Swivel Seat Specifications: Seat size: 20.5 x 13.5 inches. Seat height: 19 - 23.25 inches. Base width: 48 - 49 inches. Base depth: 18.5 - 20.5 inches. Required clearance: 14 - 18.5 inches. Back height from floor: 32.25 - 36.5 inches. Weight limit: 300 pounds. **Item ships via UPS Ground.Due to hygiene reasons, this product is non-returnable.", "MediBeads Neck Rest provides relief for tight, sore muscles resulting from stress, tension, and prolonged static activities. This moist heat wrap rests gently on the top of the shoulders and base of the neck. Deeply penetrating moist heat helps restore muscles to a relaxed and natural healthy state. Because MediBeads Wraps are ready for use in just a minute and are applied directly to the site of pain, relief begins immediately. The wraps continue to deliver therapeutic moist heat for up to thirty minutes. This is the medically recommended treatment time for heat therapy within a three to four hour period. Through a patent pending process, MediBeads continuously recharge by absorbing only water molecules from the air. Adding water is not necessary. The absorbed water is held, purified and released as \"clean moist heat\" when the MediBeads Wrap is microwaved. The result is a bacteria and odor-free wrap. Unlike other grain and pellet products, MediBeads need no special covers, they will not dry out, dissolve or disintegrate. MediBeads Wraps are washable, so no special covers are required. When removed from the microwave, the temperature of MediBeads Wrap does not increase. This prevents inadvertent burns, which are caused by the continued temperature increase (\"cooking\") prevalent in all gel packs. Microwave activation eliminates potentially dangerous use of boiling water, electricity or ovens. MediBeads are non-toxic and environmentally friendly, easy to use and portable. MediBeads Neck Rest Features: Natural moist heat for pain relief. Clean, deeply-penetrating moist heat - no need to add water. Washable, odor-free, dust free, and will not support bacteria or fungal growth. Shape drapes easily and comfortably conforms to the top of the shoulders and neck area. MediBeads Neck Rest Specifications: Measures: 14 x 10 inches. Care Instructions: Hand wash in a mild detergent and allow to air dry 24 hours. Material: Non-toxic and latex free. Made in: USA.", "The Posey Arm Skinsleeves are versatile non-compression knitted skin coverings suitable for a variety of applications. These Skinsleeves are especially helpful to patients with fragile skin prone to tears and abrasions; patients who disrupt IV and/or wound sites. The Posey Arm Skinsleeves are made of 95 percent soft cotton and 5 percent Lycra, the special stretchy fabric is soft and breathable. The arm sleeve features a thumb hole cut out to keep arm sleeves in place and allow full use of all fingers. Posey Arm Skinsleeves Features: Helps protect thin, fragile skin tissue. Offers a protective barrier against skin tears and abrasions. Knitted from latex free soft cotton/nylon/spandex four-way stretch yarn. Machine washable. Posey Arm Skinsleeves Specifications: Size: small, 15½ inches(39½ centimeters). Fits limb circumference: 8½ inches (21½ centimeters). Color: dark. Includes: 1 pair.", "The MediBeads Neck Wrap provides moist heat therapy for your neck and shoulders. This soft wrap is designed to comfortably drape around the neck and between the shoulders to reach the lower neck muscles. Deep penetrating moist heat helps aches and pains in the neck, shoulders and upper back due to tension and stress. It is designed with poly cotton tie closures to maintain positioning. MediBeads is the natural choice for convenient and effective pain relief at home. Microwave activated deep penetrating moist heat wraps are perfect for aching muscles and painful joints. Patent pending MediBeads are washable, odor free, dust free, and will not support bacteria or fungi growth. MediBeads need no special covers, will not dry out, dissolve, or develop odors. They are safe, non-toxic and environmentally friendly. No need to add water since they draw moisture from the air and release it as clean moist heat when microwaved. MediBeads Neck Wrap Features: Comfortably drapes around the neck, between the shoulders, lower neck muscles. Relaxes tension and tightness in overworked muscles. Promotes healing and restoration for sore muscles to their natural healthy state. Washable, odor-free, dust free, and will not support bacteria or fungal growth. MediBeads Neck Wrap Specifications: Measures: 8 x 22 inches (not including ties). Care Instructions: Hand wash in a mild detergent and allow to air dry 24 hours. Material: Non-toxic and latex free. Made in: USA.", "Our prize-winning range of ergonomically designed body care products are all carefully balanced to provide maximum power with minimal effort and strain on hands, arms and shoulders. Each product has a unique shape that makes reaching even easier. The handles are oval and have a rough surface so as to provide a secure grip.Nail files are usually impossible for weak or stiff fingers to manage. The Body Care Multi Purpose Nail file holder rests securely in the whole hand and is therefore easy to use. The disposablefile is also easy to replace. Features two sides where you can insert either a nail file, toothbrush or razor. The Multi Purpose Grip may also be used when shaving or brushing your teeth. Measures 4.33 inches long. Body Care Multi Purpose Grip Features: Rests securely in the whole hand. Easy to use. Insert either a nail file, toothbrush or razor. Body Care Multi Purpose Grip Specifications: Length- 4.33 in.", "Body Care Long Handle 14 inch Hair Brush and Comb Set is great for people with limited arm or hand movement. Anti-slip handles are ergonomically designed to lie against user's entire palm. Contoured design is both attractive and functional. Made of polypropylene. Available in two lengths.Our prize-winning range of ergonomically designed body care products, are all carefully balanced to provide maximum power with minimal effort and strain on hands, arms and shoulders. Each product has a unique shape that makes reaching even easier. The handles are oval and have a rough surface so as to provide a secure grip. Body Care Long Handle 14 inch Brush and Comb Set Features: Anti-slip handles. Attractive and functional contoured design. Designed to rest against user's entire palm. Body Care Long Handle 14 inch Brush and Comb Set Specifications: Length-14 inches. Available in two lengths. Made of polypropylene.", "The Thermoskin Carpal Tunnel Glove helps prevent wrist movements that can cause Carpal Tunnel Syndrome. Comfortable, firm support for weak, injured or aching wrists. Helps prevent and provide relief of Carpal Tunnel Syndrome. Added benefit of heat therapy. Relieves pain and inflammation. Anatomically conforming fit and shape allows full use of fingers. Outer layer of fabric is textured to provide additional grip to aid in daily living activities. Metal splint positioned at 25 degrees helps prevent wrist movements that can cause Carpal Tunnel Syndrome. Fully adjustable velcro locking straps adjusts for a better fit. Thermoskin Thermal Supports contain the exclusive patented Trioxon lining that has been clinically proven to increase your surface and subcutaneous skin temperature 2 to 3° F. This helps increase the elasticity of muscles, tendons, and ligaments to reduce the risk of injury when under stress. Thermoskin Thermal Supports also increase the blood flow to damaged tissue to help speed up the healing process, while providing light compression to counteract tissue swelling. The spiral structure of the Trioxon lining creates a micro-climate which allows the skin to ventilate by wicking away moisture and does not close the pores of the skin. You can wear Thermoskin for extended periods of time without the discomfort you would have with other products. Competitive products trap the perspiration resulting in discomfort, risk of infection and unpleasant odor. In a recent study Thermoskin Thermal Supports provided ?Considerable Relief? or ?Total Relief? of pain in 83% of patients. Measure the circumference of the hand around the knuckles. Thermoskin Carpal Tunnel Gloves Feature: Ideal for mildly increasing skin temperature to give increased circulation around the wrist for relief of pain and discomfort from arthritis, Repetitive Stress Injuries (RSI), and tendonitis. Helps prevent wrist movements that can cause Carpal Tunnel Syndrome Inner lining made of Trioxon, a unique fiber that wicks away perspiration and keeps skin ventilated and comfortably dry. Comfortable, firm support for weak, injured or aching wrists. Hand or machine-washable.", "The No Wire Walker Basket firmly attaches to the horizontal and vertical bars of the walker. Flexible, virtually indestructible, retractable stabilizing arms lock onto the legs of the walker and eliminate excess swinging.The front of the basket features a slot for an identification tag and the bottom of the basket has a built-in glass, can or cup holder, a smaller compartment for coins or medications and a trough for utensils, pens, straws or eyeglasses. No additional tray is needed. Can be attached on the inside or outside of the walker. Ships and stores flat. Easy to assemble. Made of polypropylene. No-Wire Walker Basket Dimensions: Unassembled - 16 1/4 x 7 11/16 x 2 1/8 inches. Assembled - 16 1/4 x 8 3/4 x 8 1/4 inches.", "The Snap-N-Save Sliding Transfer Bench with Swivel Seat eases the transfer into a bathtub by allowing you to sit down, and slide the seat into the tub area. The seat is made of sturdy molded plastic with a non-slip textured finish and an integral shower-head holder. Includes a safety belt. The backrest can be installed on either side of the seat. Seat glides over polished, high-strength aluminum tubes. Molded plastic seat and back, textured finish. Swivel seat, locking every 90°, allows easier entry to and exit from bench. Rust-proof aluminum construction. Adjustable height to fit user and bathtub clearance. Strong suction tipped legs stop movement on wet surfaces. Snap-N-Save Sliding Transfer Bench with Swivel Seat Features: Higher weight capacity of up to 400 lbs. Swivel seat enables user to turn every 90 degrees before getting in and out of the bathtub or shower. Makes patient transfer even easier and safer. Double safety locks on each side of bench allows user to get on the bench safely before sliding to the other side and locking the bench while inside the tub or shower. Height adjustable in 1/2\" increments. Snap-N-Save Sliding Transfer Bench with Swivel Seat Specifications: Seat size: 20.5 x 13.5 inches. Seat height: 19 - 23.25 inches. Base width: 39.5 - 40.5 inches. Base depth: 18.5 - 20.5 inches. Required clearance: 14 - 18.5 inches. Back height from floor: 32.25 - 36.5 inches. Weight limit: 400 pounds. Ships via UPS Ground. Non-returnable hygiene item.", "The MediBeads Sinus Wrap is contoured for the facial area. This microwavable moist heat pad is ideal for relief of sinus headaches, migraines, sinus pressure, dry eye syndrome, and TMJ. Unique wrap design makes it easy to apply to painful sinuses. Doctors and therapists recommend moist heat treatments for natural pain relief. MediBeads deep penetrating moist heat will increase circulation, relax tension and tightness in overworked muscles, promote healing and restore muscles, improve mobility. MediBeads are easy to use. Simply microwave for 1 to 2 minutes and apply directly to the site of pain. The wrap continues to deliver therapeutic moist heat for up to thirty minutes. Through a patent pending process, the MediBeads continuously recharge by absorbing only water molecules from the air. Adding water is not necessary. MediBeads Sinus Wrap Features: Specially contoured for the facial area. Time released heat delivers therapeutic levels of moist heat therapy for up to 30 minutes. Washable, odor-free, dust free, and will not support bacteria or fungal growth. MediBeads Sinus Wrap Specifications: Measures: 7 x 11 inches. Care Instructions: Hand wash in a mild detergent and allow to air dry 24 hours. Material: Non-toxic and latex free. Made in: USA.", "The Garden Seat Caddy is for the passionate gardener. Perfect for yard work when kneeling is uncomfortable due to arthritis or other disability and a seated position is needed. The light weight but very strong design of this garden seat caddy makes this a great addition to any gardener?s tools. The Garden Seat Caddy also features a handy tray below the seat for keeping all your hand garden tools within easy reach. This caddy includes rubber tires with metal wheels, not the plastic ones the competitors use. Garden Seat Caddy Features: Heavy Duty steel frame. Weather resistant powder coated finish. Big 10\" pneumatic tires. 300lb. weight capacity. Swivel seat with adjustable height: 17 to 22 inches high. Tray dimensions: 17\" L x 15-1/2\" W x 3\" D. Overall dimensions: 33\" L x 16\" W x 22\" H. Weight: 30 lbs.", "This Long Flexible Straw is 12 inches long and can be cut to any length to meet your needs. This long drinking straw has one flexible section. Is has an inside diameter of 0.35 inch which is large enough for thick creamy soups or malts. **Cup holder shown in image is sold separately. Non returnable if packaging is opened. Long Flexible Straw Features: Large enough for thick creamy soups or malts. Can be cut to custom length with standard scissors. Long Flexible Straw Specifications: Package of: 10 straws. Length: 12 inches long. Inside diameter: 0.35 inch.", "The No Rinse Shampoo completely cleans hair without water - no rinsing is required. Apply shampoo to hair until completely wet, then massage into hair. Rich lather causes dirt and dust particles to float to the top of the foam. Towel dry hair, comb and style.Leaves hair silky soft and manageable. The PH balanced, no alcohol formula won't irritate sensitive skin, so it is safe for adults or children.No Rinse products are used in hospitals and nursing facilities all over the county. Use at home or while traveling or camping. No Rinse Shampoo Features: Ready to use. No rinsing is required. Leaves hair silky soft and manageable. Towel dry hair, comb and style. No Rinse Shampoo Specifications: Single 8 oz bottle No Rinse, waterless Shampoo.", "The Easy Grip Bi Level Tub Grab Bar fits a wide variety of bathtub types and sizes. Bi-level handhold design allows for added convenience and security when entering or exiting the bathtub. Constructed of heavy gauge welded steel, with easy to clean white vinyl coating. Tool free installation. Stainless steel locking mechanism and rubber pads securely clamp bar in place while protecting the tub finish. Height above tub is 14 3/4 inches. Bar adjusts to tub thicknesses 3\" to 7\". Bi Level Tub Grab Bar Features: Stainless steel locking mechanism and rubber pads. Fits a wide variety of bathtub types and sizes. Easy to clean white vinyl coating. Bi Level Tub Grab Bar Specifications: Height above tub is 14 3/4 inches. Bar adjusts to tub thicknesses 3\" to 7\". Tool free installation.", "The Lightweight Plastic Transfer Board is molded from high-impact plastic, the board also features reinforcement ribs for maximum strength. The Lightweight Plastic Transfer Board provides a smooth and stable flat surface between level areas. The Lightweight Plastic Transfer Board can be used independently by an individual who is able to correctly position the board and then slide themselves over, or can be used by a caregiver to slide, or scoot, the individual over the board rather than lifting them. Lightweight Transfer Board Features: Small and light weight. Lightweight Transfer Board Specifications: Measures 8 inches wide by 30 inches long. Weight limit 220 pounds.", "During the past ten years, scientists and clinicians have concluded that while speech and language therapies are beneficial in the treatment of stroke-related communication disorders, the psychological support provided by friends, family members, and therapists is of the utmost value. The Family Guide to Surviving Stroke and Communication Disorders, Second Edition is a comprehensive guide for families of stroke survivors, speech pathologists and rehabilitation specialists, and counselors who respond to the needs of stroke survivors and their families. Through non-technical terms, case studies, questions and answers, and examples, this book engages all readers on a journey toward understanding, healing, and persevering after a stroke. The Second Edition includes: Murphy's Inner World of Aphasia A new chapter: Profiles in Recovery Updated information about the \"big three\" stroke-related communication disorders: aphasia, apraxia of speech, and the dysarthrias Improved illustrations of the brain A poem: \"The Silent Tongue (aphasia)\" by Kathleen Gerety, RN The Aphasic Patient's Bill of Rights Glossary", "A diagnosis of Alzheimer?s disease can be heartbreaking news. Whether you?re newly diagnosed with Alzheimer?s disease or are a friend or relative of someone with Alzheimer?s, this book offers help. The only text to provide a doctor?s and patient?s view, 100 Questions & Answers About Alzheimer?s Disease gives you authoritative, practical answers to your questions about treatment options, quality of life, caregiving, sources of support, and much more. Written by two prominent neurologists specializing in treatment of Alzheimer?s disease and other dementias, this book is an invaluable resource for anyone coping with the physical and emotional turmoil of this frightening disease. \"This easy-to-read book provides the public and care-providers with the latest scientific and practical information about Alzheimer's disease. It is evidence-based and comprehensive, yet easy to read. It will be a great book to the millions of patients and families who are dealing with this growing medical problem.\" -- Steven H. Ferris, PhD, Director, Alzheimer's Disease Center, New York University School of Medicine \"Drs. Sadowski and Wisniewski have condensed their expertise into an accessible guide that will be invaluable to people newly diagnosed with Alzheimer's disease and to their families. For those of us worried about our memory as we age, this provides an authoritative, conversational guide.\" --Michael Shelanski, MD, PhD, The Taub Institute for Research on Alzheimer's Disease and the Aging Brain, Columbia University. 100 Questions & Answers About Alzheimer's Disease Features: Gives you authoritative, practical answers to all of your questions. Provides the public and care-providers with the latest scientific and practical information about Alzheimer's disease. It is evidence-based and comprehensive, yet easy to read. An accessible guide that will be invaluable to people newly diagnosed with Alzheimer's disease and to their families. For those of us worried about our memory as we age, this provides an authoritative, conversational guide. 100 Questions & Answers About Alzheimer's Disease Specifications: 194 pages filled with all the answers. Includes an appendix, index, and glossary.", "You?ve seen imitations of this lamp just about everywhere, but that's what they are, imitations.There?s only one Verilux® Original Full Spectrum Desk Lamp !This lamp is brighter, produces less glare and helps your eyes and mood better than those cheap imitations. You?ll notice the difference instantly! Why not order one today?Now 20% brighter, the original Full spectrum® ?indoor sunshine? lamp utilizes 50 years of research expertise to scientifically tune light for the eyes of readers, crafters and computer users. See fine details with ease as exclusive Verilux® technologies optimize black-white contrast and reduce eyestrain-causing flicker and glare. This means that you can work longer with less eyestrain ? in fact, Verilux® full spectrum actually relaxes your eyes the more the lamp is used. Check out the other differences ? the flexible gooseneck adjusts smoothly and quietly, the exclusive Parabolic Light Diffuser totally eliminates glare from a bare bulb, the three-way switch allows two levels of illumination, and the Verilux® Original Full spectrum® Desk Lamp is fully supported by a 3-year limited warranty. The lamp that started the full spectrum craze is available in Graphite and Ivory finishes to match any decor. And unlike the other imitations, only the Verilux® Original Full spectrum® Desk Lamp includes the famous energy-saving Verilux® Global Cooling™ 27 W bulb. These bulbs last 10X longer than incandescent bulbs (10,000 hours). So why settle for an inferior substitute when you can have the Original Full spectrum Desk Lamp from Verilux? Verilux® Deluxe Desk Lamp Specifications: Height adjusts between 15? ? 26.5?. Base measures 9.6?L x 7?W, head measures 9.5?L x 5.75?W x 1.75?H. Adjustable steel gooseneck swivels 360º. Original Full Spectrum Deluxe Desk Lamp Natural Spectrum® Replacement Bulb - CFML27VLX", "Approximately ten million Americans have osteoporosis and thirty-four million have osteopenia (low bone mass) and many millions are at risk. Whether you suspect you might have osteoporosis, you recently learned that you have bone loss, or are a friend or relative of someone with osteoporosis or osteopenia, this book offers help for men and women, young or old. 100 Questions & Answers About Osteoporosis and Osteopenia provides authoritative, practical answers to your questions about treatment options, lifestyle decisions to improve bone health, sources of support, comments from men and women with bone loss, and much more. Written by a nurse practitioner and a nurse, this book is an invaluable resource for anyone coping with the physical and emotional challenges of osteoporosis and related conditions. \"This book is a comprehensive and up-to-date resource for individuals seeking credible, scientifically accurate information on osteoporosis. It's a very readable and easy-to-understand guide to the prevention and treatment of osteoporosis, and belongs in every home library.\" --Cedric X. Bryant, PhD, FACSM Chief Executive Physiologist/VP of Educational Services American Council on Exercise \"Building strong bones and enhancing bone health must be a lifelong focus for every woman and man. In an easy-to-read format, Ivy Alexander and Karla Knight offer readers comprehensive information on a range of osteoporosis-related topics, from prevention, to recognizing fractures, to treatment options. It is a must-read for all, especially those in mid-life years.\" --Amy Niles President and CEO National Women's Health Resource Center. 100 Questions & Answers About Osteoporosis and Osteopenia Features: This book offers help for men and women, young or old. This book is a comprehensive and up-to-date resource for individuals seeking accurate information on osteoporosis. It's a very readable and easy-to-understand guide to the prevention and treatment of osteoporosis. Provides authoritative, practical answers to your questions about treatment options, lifestyle decisions to improve bone health, sources of support, and much more. This book is an invaluable resource for anyone coping with the physical and emotional challenges of osteoporosis and related conditions. 100 Questions & Answers About Osteoporosis and Osteopenia Specifications: 257 pages filled with the answers to all of your questions. Includes an appendix, glossary, and index.", "The handy Gas Cap Removal Tool is designed to fit over the raised bar that is present on the top of all gas caps. There are multiple grooves in the head of the gas cap tool so that the tool may be grabbed at different angles. This Gas Cap Removal Tool comes with two attachments in order to accomodate all cars. This item is ideal for persons who have arthritis and have difficulty removing the gas cap at the gas pump. Gas Cap Tool Features: Long angled handle. Accommodates all cars.", "Convert a tub spout to a hand held shower. A suction-lock wall bracket quickly attaches the Hand Held Shower where it is needed without screws or other hardware that would require permanent installation. This portable shower is easy to put on and take off. Fits faucets with an outer diameter that measures 1-3/8in to 1-3/4in (3.5 to 4.5cm). Includes a spray head that can be held by the bracket during use. Bracket can be angled in two positions. The 5' (1.5m) vinyl hose allows access to any location in the tub. The universal adapter has a lip-lock collar that attaches to most tub faucets.The Hand-Held Portable Shower easily fits most tub faucets and installs in seconds without using any tools. Hand Held Portable Shower Features: Enables you to shower while sitting on a shower chair or transfer bench. Installs in your shower in seconds, no tools required. Suction-lock wall bracket quickly attaches the Hand Held Shower where needed without screws. Easy to remove. Wall-mount bracket attaches to shower wall via suction cup. Specifications: Fits faucets with an outer diameter that measures 1-3/8in to 1-3/4in (3.5 to 4.5cm). Vinyl hose measures 5 ft./1.5m. **The Hand Held Portable Shower is not suitable for a tub spout equipped with a lift pin for a shower.", "The Hands Free Height Adjustable Hair Dryer and Styling Stand saves time styling, straightening, drying, and volumizing your hair. The Hair Dryer Stand frees both hands so you can be done styling in record time ? styling hair made so easy! Now you can eliminate the fatigue of holding that heavy hair dryer! Recommended by professional stylists for all hair types, the simple to use Hands Free HairDryer Stand is designed for counter top or vanity. It easily adjusts to accommodate users of any height. The flexible gooseneck allows you to bend and focus air at any angle. Styling hair made easy! Height Adjustable Hair Dryer Stand Features: Adjustable strap holds most hair dryers. Flexible neck holds hair dryer at almost any angle. Telescoping neck adjusts to any height up to 36\". Allows hands free operation.", "Say \"I love you\" to your elders For everyone whose parents or other loved ones are aging, 50 Ways to Love Your Mother will help you find just the right gift to make their lives a little bit brighter. This treasure-trove of more than fifty practical ideas and thoughtful gifts also brims with Jane?s collection of resource discoveries?including company names, phone numbers and Web sites. As an added bonus, Jane has included a list of books (bibliography) for those who want to learn more about caring for aging loved ones. Even professional caregivers will find these resources extremely helpful. What Readers Are Saying \"I have seen this last part of life up close and personal as both a professional and as a family member. To be remembered is everything and more. This book can help you make that kind of difference to your family member.\" ? Leigh Sereduck MSW, Dir. Social Services, Trinity Mission Health & Rehab Center / former Hospice Social Worker, Clinton , Mississippi Baby Boomers Love This Book! As many baby boomers reach fifty-something and beyond, their parents are beginning to move from the spaciousness of the family home into senior housing, assisted living or even care centers. Wouldn't it be great if we could make the transition just a little less difficult for them? 50 Ways to Love Your Mother Features: A book list for those who want to learn more about their aging loved ones. Guidelines on how to make moving from home, to a nursing home a little less difficult. More than fifty practical gift ideas that your loved one will enjoy and cherish! 50 Ways to Love Your Mother Specifications: 88 Pages. Paper back.", "How much of your day and evening do you spend reading or working on detailed projects? Don?t you deserve The Finest Reading Lamp in the World™? With timeless design, all-metal construction, hand-polished antiqued brushed nickel or brass finishes, and microprocessor controlled power adapter, Heritage™ lamps are built to last generations ? Guaranteed! Backed by 50 years of research, Heritage™ scientifically tunes exclusive Full Spectrum indoor sunlight for readers? eyes ? all the benefits of full spectrum daylight, without any of the harmful UV and glare. Plus, exclusive Verilux® Optix glare control technology optimizes black-white contrast and reduces harmful flicker and glare to eliminate eyestrain and enhance vision. Why not order one today? The form of the lamp is timeless and looks more like a fine scientific instrument than like a desk lamp. The full-rotation lamp head and height adjustment that telescopes 11.5? ? 17.5? allow for complete adjustability of your light source. Your Heritage™ Full spectrum Deluxe Desk Lamp includes the incomparable energy-saving Verilux® 27 W Global Cooling™ bulb and the 3-way switch allows you to adjust the brightness to the equivalent of 75, 100, or 150 W incandescent bulbs. And, since the bulb lasts 10X longer (10,000 hours), you save money on replacement bulbs and energy. Thousands of avid readers swear by their Heritage™ lamps and attest to the fact that their eyes actually relax the more they read. Now they can read several chapters and still feel refreshed, without eyestrain. The secret is in the Optix® Glare Control Filter system. This revolutionary filtration system actually focuses the rays of light so they provide unparalleled color rendering, higher black-and-white contrast and no glare from shiny magazine pages. Don?t wait another moment ? you deserve the Heritage™ reading lamp! Verilux® Heritage™ Deluxe Desk Lamp Specifications: Lamp height ranges 11.5? ? 17.5?. Base diameter 8.5?, and head dimensions 8.9?L x 5.4? W x 2.6?H. Multi-directional lamp head turns 180° to shine full spectrum light exactly where you need it. Heritage™ Deluxe Desk Lamp Natural Spectrum® Replacement Bulb - CFML27VLX", "There?s only one Verilux® Original Full Spectrum® Floor Lamp ! This lamp is brighter, produces less glare and helps your eyes and mood better than those cheap imitations. You?ll notice the difference instantly! Why not order one today?Now 20% brighter, the original Full spectrum® ?indoor sunshine? lamp utilizes 50 years of research expertise to scientifically tune light for the eyes of readers, crafters and computer users. See fine details with ease as exclusive Verilux® technologies optimize black-white contrast and reduce eyestrain-causing flicker and glare. This means that you can work longer with less eyestrain ? in fact, Verilux® full spectrum actually relaxes your eyes the more the lamp is used.Check out the other differences ? the flexible gooseneck adjusts smoothly and quietly, the exclusive Parabolic Light Diffuser totally eliminates glare from a bare bulb, the three-way switch allows two levels of illumination, each Floor lamp includes a matching utility tray that adjusts to any height and mounts without tools. And the best indication of the difference between the knock-offs and the Verilux® Original Full spectrum® Floor Lamp is that the Verilux is fully supported by a 3-year limited warranty.The lamp that started the full spectrum craze is available in Graphite, Ivory and Burl finishes to match any decor. And unlike the other imitations, only the Verilux® Original Full spectrum® Floor Lamp includes the famous energy-saving Verilux® Global Cooling™ 27 W bulb. These bulbs last 10X longer than incandescent bulbs (10,000 hours).Why settle for an inferior substitute when you can have the Original Full spectrum Desk Lamp from Verilux? Original Deluxe Floor Lamp Specifications: Gooseneck design stays put in any position. EasyLatch height adjustment provides infinite lamp heights from 48? ? 61?. Base measures 10.5?L x 9?W, head measures 9.5?L x 5.75?W x 1.75?H. Utility Tray - Color coordinated tray mounts without tools in seconds. Original Deluxe Floor Natural Spectrum® Replacement Bulb - CFML27VLX", "The Bridge Medical Portable Telescoping Pivot Grip Grab Bar provides a safety device to grasp while using the bathtub, shower or toilet. It also provides a safety net for fall prevention. The Portable Telescoping Pivot Grip Suction Grab Bar offers safety and support throughout the bathroom. Because the ends pivot and rotate, the installation options are endless; including stretching across a shower corner, across the inside of a bathtub, or even for use on unparallel surfaces, the options are almost limitless! Our Best Portable Grab Bar is YOUR best value! Designed as heavy duty Medical Devices that are tested and approved by health professionals, Bridge Medical's Portable Grab Bars give you the confidence you need to move freely and independently without worry. The Portable Telescoping Pivot Grip Suction Grab Bar easily installs and uninstalls in seconds, making it ideal for travel. Bridge Medical Portable Telescoping Pivot Grip Grab Bar Features: Ideal for travel. Ends pivot and rotate. Installs and uninstalls in seconds. Can be mounted horizontally, vertically or diagonally. Offers safety and support throughout the bathroom. Bridge Medical Portable Telescoping Pivot Grip Grab Bar Specifications: Length extends: 22-27 inches. 5\" minimum size tile required for solid adhesion.", "The new and award-winning Verilux® EasyFlex Full Spectrum Floor Lamp with exclusive easy-glide handle, ergonomic height lever, and ultra-flexible gooseneck places ?indoor sunshine? exactly where you want it.This amazing lamp is the culmination of 50 years of research to tune our full spectrum light for readers, crafters and computer users. Even if you are suffering from arthritis or have another mobility-limiting condition, the Verilux® EasyFlex Full Spectrum Floor Lamp allows you to effortlessly adjust the lamp height and light position.You?ll find that your eyes actually relax the longer you read or do detailed tasks! And unlike other lamps, the Verilux® EasyFlex Full Spectrum Floor Lamp turns on instantly to either the high or low setting, and the full spectrum light never flickers. Colors will look more vibrant and black and white contrast is enhanced. The exclusive Parabolic Light Diffuser eliminates glare and channels more of the light to your book or project, instead of into your eyes. Graphite and Ivory finishes match any décor. Every lamp includes an energy-saving Verilux® 27 W Global Cooling™ bulb with two-way brightness levels equivalent to an incandescent 100 W or 150 W bulb. Each bulb lasts 10X longer, too (10,000 hours). Unlike cheap imitations, your Verilux® EasyFlex Full Spectrum Floor Lamp comes with a 3-year limited warranty and our famous 30-day Risk-Free Guarantee. Oh, and there?s one more thing you?ll receive with your lamp that others don?t include ? a matching utility tray. The tray attaches to your lamp without tools and has a non-skid pad for small items and slots for reading glasses, pens or other items. Verilux® EasyFlex Full Spectrum Floor Lamp: Gooseneck design stays put in any position. EasyLatch height adjustment provides infinite lamp heights from 38.5\" - 54\". Base measures 10.5?L x 9?W, head measures 10.375\" x 8.75\". Weight - 13lbs. EasyFlex® Floor Lamp Natural Spectrum® Replacement Bulb - CFML27VLX", "This book provides authoritative, practical answers to 100 of the most common questions asked by arthritis patients, including diagnosis, underlying causes, treatment options, sources of support, and much more. More than 2 million Americans suffer from rheumatoid arthritis. Whether you've been diagnosed with rheumatoid arthritis or care for someone with this disease, 100 Questions & Answers About Arthritis , offers help. Concise, easy-to-read paperback book. The question and answer format mimics an actual physician consultation. Provides both the patient's and physician's perspective on rheumatoid arthritis. Provides practical answers to questions about diagnosis, underlying causes, treatment options, sources of support, and much more. 100 Questions & Answers About Arthritis Features: This book provides authoritative, practical answers to the most common questions asked by arthritis patients. Format mimics an actual physician consultation. Provides both the patient's and physician's perspective on rheumatoid arthritis. Written by a prominent physician. 100 Questions & Answers About Arthritis Specifications: 199 pages filled with all of your answers. Includes an index, appendix, and glossary.", "The Bridge Medical Portable Grab Bar provides a safe means of getting in and out of the shower or bathtub without having to drill holes in your wall. This fixed length, 13\" Portable Grab Bar looks and works great for most any basic need at home or away. Never leave home without one! Position the Portable Grab Bar anywhere you need some assistance.The fixed length Portable Grab Bar installs and removes without any tools or professional installation costs. Don't be fooled by low price imitation suction devices, our Grab Bars are manufactured using the highest quality commercial grade rubber and are the strongest on the market today. Designed as a heavy duty Medical Device and is tested and approved by health professionals. Bridge Medical Portable Grab Bar Features: Requires no tools or professional installation. Simply Flip two levers to attach and remove. Manufactured using the highest quality commercial grade rubber. Strongest on the market today. Bridge Medical Portable Grab Bar Specifications: Length 13 inches. Suction Cups Measure 4.5 inches in diameter. 5\" minimum size tile required for solid adhesion.", "If you suffer from a lack of energy, feel depressed and find your motivation waning, you may be suffering from Seasonal Affective Disorder (SAD). Nearly 10% of the public suffers from this form of depression when deprived of precious sunshine. Now, the original Verilux HappyLight can be yours ? delivering a full 10,000 LUX of indoor light therapy without any harmful UV rays. And it can be hung on a wall or set on a table or counter for your morning sunshine bath.Research Findings:Follow-up Study shows 94% of patients stopped using anti-depressant drugs. While correct diagnosis of SAD has become more commonplace, treatment is the area where doctors and SAD sufferers need more education. In the past, doctors have been quick to prescribe an anti-depressant (like Prozac, Paxil or Zoloft) when a patient mentioned being ?depressed?. While drugs can sometimes be effective treating depression, they also have a well documented history of very serious side-effects. Light therapy is the natural, side-effect free alternative to anti-depressant pills.To illustrate, a 1997 research study titled ?Follow-up study of seasonal affective disorder in Switzerland?, conducted at the Psychiatric University Clinic, Basel, Switzerland, concluded that:?Over a number of years, the clinical diagnosis changed for the better in 64% of the patients? and that light therapy (and perhaps also light-oriented behaviour) reduced the incidence and depth of subsequent depressive episodes. Further evidence for this was the large reduction in use of conventional antidepressant drugs (from 17 to 1) during the follow-up period. Diagnosis of SAD was stable and reliable.? HappyLight Light Therapy System Features: Comes with table-top stand and space-saving wall mount option. True Seasonal Affective Disorder (SAD) therapy device at a fraction of the cost of others. HappyLight Light Therapy System Specifications: Weight 6.8 lbs. Dimensions: 19.5?H x 13.375?W x 3.25?D. HappyLight® Deluxe Light Therapy System Replacement Bulb Set - CFL36VLX2", "Skin Calming Cream helps soothe itching and irritation that is common to diabetic skin. Natural soothing ingredients such as Oat, Aloe, Chamomile and Vitamin E are blended with inflammation reducing botanicals including Eugenol from Clove Oil and Green Tea extract. Naturally anti-bacterial Tea Tree and Masada Dead Sea Minerals help detoxify skin and encourage healthy rejuvenation. Urea and vegetable based emollients keep skin soft and hydrated. This patent-pending cream uses a nourishing vitamin and botanical complex in conjunction with Dead Sea Minerals to help soothe itching and irritation that is common to diabetic skin. DiabEase Skin Calming Cream Features: Oat, Chamomile, and Eugenol from Clove Oil naturally calm and comfort the skin. Antibacterial Dead Sea Minerals and Antiseptic Tea. Antioxidant Vitamin E and Green Tea Extract help defend skin against environmental stress. Ultra-hydrating Urea softens and moisturizes dry, flaky skin to help relieve irritation and itching. DiabEase Skin Calming Cream Specifications: Size 6 oz.", "Hydrating Skin Therapy is a daily body moisturizer that helps protect diabetic skin from dehydration that can lead to cracking and subsequent infection. Deeply hydrating Urea and naturally anti-bacterial Dead Sea Minerals and Tea Tree combine with nourishing Vitamins E, A, D, and Aloe Vera to revitalize the skin and maintain its natural moisture balance. The rich but lightweight formula leaves skin feeling ultra soft and comfortable. This luxurious daily body moisturizing cream deeply hydrates the skin yet feels lightweight and clean. Hydrating Skin Therapy Features: Help prevent and resolve skin dryness and cracking. Vitamins A, D, and E, Green Tea Extract, and Aloe Vera nourish and soothe dry skin. Antiseptic Tea Tree helps keep skin free of impurities. Hydrating Skin Therapy Specifications: Size 6 oz.", "There are 750,000 strokes in the United States each year. Whether you're a newly diagnosed patient or a loved one of someone who has suffered from a stroke, this book offers help. The only text to provide both the doctor's and patient's views, 100 Questions & Answers About Stroke: A Lahey Clinic Guide provides authoritative, practical answers to the most common questions asked by patients and their loved ones. Written by an expert in the field, this clearly-written book is a complete guide to causes, treatments, and much more. Including actual patient commentary, 100 Questions & Answers About Stroke is an invaluable resource. \"The one thing stroke sufferers and their loved ones crave, besides a full recovery, is information. This book anticipates just about anything you could want to know on the subject; it is the quintessential desk reference on stroke.\"Julia Fox GarrisonStroke Survivor 100 Questions & Answers About Stroke Features: Provides authoritative, practical answers to the most common questions asked by patients and their loved ones. This book is a complete guide to finding the answers to questions about causes, treatments, and much more. 100 Questions & Answers About Stroke Specifications: 185 pages filled with the answers to all of your questions. Includes an index, glossary, and appendix.", "Now you can easily apply lotion to your back and elsewhere while massaging your muscles - all without the need to twist and turn into a human pretzel. Just fill the Roll A Lotion Massager and Lotion Applicator with your favorite moisturizer, oil or foaming bath gel. The 19 rolling balls soothe and invigorate as they massage in the liquid evenly. The extra long removable handle makes it easy to reach your back - or any other hard-to-reach area. You can slide the handle off the applicator to massage your arms or legs without getting your hands greasy. Roll A Lotion Massager and Lotion Applicator Features: 19 rolling balls soothe and invigorate. Great to reach ankles & feet. Extra long handle. Hangs for easy storage. Roll A Lotion Massager and Lotion Applicator Specifications: Length 17 inches. Massage Balls 19.", "Use to safely transport your Rocking T Knife on trips. Black Vinyl Carrying Case.", "Welcome the day with confidence, knowing your home is clean and allergen free. The Verilux UVC Sanitizing Wand sanitizes all your household surfaces instantly - eliminating mold, spores, bacteria and dust mites at the flick of a switch.Keep mattresses free of dust mites and germs. This magic Wand kills 99.9% of germs, viruses and dust mites. You?ve read stories about dust mites living in your mattresses and furniture, feeding on dead skin cells and spreading disease. Now you can safely eliminate these disgusting pests and rid your home of bacteria, germs, viruses and mold without exposing your loved ones to dangerous chemicals.The new Verilux® UVC Sanitizing Wand utilizes powerful Germ-X Lightwave Technology™ to sanitize bedding, sofas, baby toys, toothbrushes, cooking utensils, counters and bathroom fixtures. Gradually wave the Sanitizing Wand over the surface to be treated, and germs are eliminated. Baby furniture, pet bedding and even footwear can be treated to eliminate odors and dangerous viruses. And, an exclusive safety switch turns the unit off, if it is pointed upward. The Verilux® UVC Sanitizing Wand comes complete with AC Adapter/Quick-charge battery charger, battery pack, padded storage case, detailed instructions and a 1-year limited warranty. The long-life UV-C bulb is rated for 15,000 hours (that?s 7 years under normal use). Verilux Sanitizing Wand Features: The Verilux® Sanitizing Wand utilizes advanced UV-C light technology in the range of 258 to 262nm to kill dust mites, viruses, bacteria and 99.9% of household germs. Perfect for sanitizing mattresses, countertops, flatware, computer keyboards, and surfaces in baby rooms. Safety shut-off guards against unwanted exposure to eyes and skin. Built-in timer allows for precise exposure times of 5 or 60 minutes. Comes complete with protective carrying case, battery pack and AC Adapter/Battery Charger. Easy to read digital display. Low battery warning light. Powerful rechargeable batteries included. 1-year limited warranty (battery pack not included). Base - 2.5 x 20.75 inches. Sanitizing Wand Instruction Manual", "The ergonomically designed AbleTripod® Base weighs 8½ ounces and makes your walking cane self-standing, providing maximum stability and function to your cane. Composed of a durable, specially weighted rubber compound, great care was taken to control the right amount of flexibility, giving the base its remarkable performance. Stairs are now easily managed. Quad canes need to be turned sideways on stairs, making the user uncomfortable and in some cases fearful. The AbleTripod® gives the user confidence to negotiate even the narrowest steps. The stress of impact on the user's hand is greatly reduced by the AbleTripod® Base , which flexes as you walk. The tips of the pods flex, grabbing while permitting the AbleTripod® to roll through, maintaining contact with the ground. The stability of the AbleTripod® base is not compromised whether on grass, gravel or sand , whereas typical canes may sink into the ground. The AbleTripod® Walking Cane Tip can be used in ways that no other cane can: its unique design enables the user to lean into the cane, experiencing both support and balance. The ability to lateralize gives the user a unique feeling of confidence, knowing that the AbleTripod® is less likely to slip out than quad canes. The patented AbleTripod® Base easily replaces your walking cane tip, addressing all of these issues and more. The base comes in 4 standard-size openings: 5/8\", 3/4\", 7/8\", 1\" and 11/16\" **See Diagram below for proper fit.** AbleTripod Walking Cane Tip Features: Adds maximum stability and function to your cane. Composed of a durable, specially weighted rubber compound. Greatly reduces the stress of impact on the user's hand. A unique design that enables the user to lean into the cane, experiencing both support and balance. AbleTripod Walking Cane Tip Specifications: Weighs 8 1/2 ounces. 4 standard-size openings: 5/8\", 3/4\", 7/8\", 1\" and 11/16\".", "The Magnetic Silver Jewelry Clasp with Safety Snap is very secure, and easy to use. The clasp is an ideal solution if you have difficulties using clasps due to arthritis. Magnetic Silver Jewelry Clasp with Safety Snap will change any standard necklace, bracelet or chain clasp to one with a magnetic clasp, making it simple and easy to close. The Magnetic Jewelry Clasp with Safety Snap is a great, high quality clasp and it does not require a jeweler to install. The magnetic clasp can be easily connected to any necklace or bracelet that has a traditional claw and loop clasp. This innovative new jewelry accessory makes wearing any piece of jewelry a snap! The Magnetic Silver Jewelry Clasp with Safety Snap can be challenging for someone with weak hand conditions, but it makes putting on and removing the jewelry easier. Especially when used with the 3 In 1 Hooker Bracelet Fastener. Magnetic Silver Jewelry Clasp with Safety Snap Features: Easy to attach to any necklace or bracelet. Makes putting on and removing the jewelry easier.", "The Magnetic Silver Jewelry Clasp is very secure, and easy to use. The clasp is an ideal solution if you have difficulties using clasps due to arthritis. The Magnetic Silver Jewelry Clasp will change any standard necklace, bracelet or chain clasp to one with a magnetic clasp, making it simple and easy to close. The Gold Magnetic Jewelry Clasp is a great, high quality clasp and it does not require a jeweler to install. The magnetic clasp can be easily connected to any necklace or bracelet that has a traditional claw and loop clasp. This innovative new jewelry accessory makes wearing any piece of jewelry a snap! The Magnetic Silver Jewelry Clasp can be challenging for someone with weak hand conditions, but it makes putting on and removing the jewelry easier. Especially when used with the 3 In 1 Hooker Bracelet Fastener. Magnetic Silver Jewelry Clasp Features: Easy to attach to any necklace or bracelet. Makes putting on and removing the jewelry easier.", "The Knork is a simple, single utensil that functions as a knife and fork together as one. Its innovative shape has a balanced handle that provides stability and comfort. This design enables you to more easily cut food by using a rocking motion on the gently curved outside tines.This knife and fork combo utensil is also recognized as a daily living aid for people with limited hand mobility-- from temporary injuries such as sprains to permanent conditions such as severe arthritis. It can be invaluable to individuals with no use of one hand due to conditions such as hemi-paralysis and amputations. The Knork® has been implemented in rehabilitation centers and hospitals around the country. Individuals who would otherwise require that their food be cut for them-- or else greatly limit their meal choices-- can gain greater independence and freedom by using this remarkable eating tool. Knork Features: The Head: The Knork's outer tines are curved and beveled, creating rounded cutting edges that are not serrated or even sharp to the touch. This utensil is as safe to the mouth as a standard fork. The curved shape enables the head to be rocked back and forth in a motion that is very much like that of a rocking chair. It is the combination of the beveled edge and the rocking motion that gives the Knork® its amazing cutting ability. The Finger Platform: The Knork® has an enlarged finger platform located between the handle and head. When trying to cut foods using a regular fork, the finger can develop a painful \"indentation\" from pressing down on the side of the narrow handle or tines. When using the Knork®, the finger rests on the smooth, comfortable platform. It also reduces the effort needed to rock the head back and forth, creating the cutting motion. As a result, the Knork® can cut through tougher foods such as pizza. Contoured Handle: An enlarged, rounded end gives the Knork® enhanced leverage, balance and stability. It is designed to be equally easy to use with either the right or left hand. The Knork is 100% forged 18/10 stainless steel which makes it durable, and dishwasher safe.", "The Knee rest pillow's soft foam is more stable than regular pillows. The Knee Rest Pillow is designed to promote proper alignment, reduce pressure or elevate extremities. Knee rest pillow's can be placed under knees, arms, feet, or behind back. Knee Rest Pillow Features: Designed to promote proper alignment, reduce pressure or elevate extremities. Cotton cover is machine washable. Knee Rest Pillow Specifications: Measures 24 x 11 x 15 inches. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "The four Premium Plastic Knorks® included in this set are full 7\" dinnerware size. Their premium plastic construction is the strongest and most durable grade in the industry, making them re-usable and dishwasher safe. Their Vivid Red shade adds a splash of color and fun to indoor or outdoor tables. These Knorks® are perfect to tote along to picnics, campsites, restaurants and on travel. Red Plastic 4 Pack Knork Features: Red shade adds a splash of color and fun to any occasion! Use indoor and outdoor. Re-usable and dishwasher safe! Red Plastic 4 Pack Knork Specifications: Length: 7in. Made of strong, durable plastic.", "The KNORK® can be used as an eating aid for people with limited hand mobility, from temporary injuries to permanent conditions such as severe arthritis and hemi-paralysis (more commonly known as one-sided paralysis.)KNORK® looks like a normal eating utensil and attracts no attention when using it. People who would otherwise require that their food be cut for them-- or else limit their meal choices-- can gain increased independence by using the KNORK®.Because of KNORK®?s rising popularity with stroke victims, amputees and others who only have the use of one hand, KNORK®s are slowly infiltrating hospital rehabilitation units and cafeterias across the country.Unlike a knife, the knork cuts through food with a rocking motion which is facilitated by a finger platform on both sides of the handle. Knorks are symmetric and can be used by both left-handers and right-handers. Knork 4 Pack Features: Cut through food with a rocking motion. Finger platforms on both sides of the handle. Can be used by both left-handers and right-handers. Unlike anything else on the market! Knork 4 Pack Specifications: Enables a user to cut and spear food using only one utensil ? and one hand!", "Coated surface of the Easy Slider 24 inch Shoehorn makes it easy for the foot to slide into the shoe. Textured grip handle is easy to grasp. Enameled steel shaft. Easy Slider 24 inch Shoehorn Features: Textured grip handle is easy to grasp. Easy Slider 24 inch Shoehorn Specifications: Enameled steel shaft. Length: 24 inches.", "The Bridge Medical Telescoping Grip Grab Bar offers a unique extendable handle that allows the Portable Suction Grab Bar to lengthen and shorten as necessary to adjust to the specific needs of the user. The Telescoping Grip comes accommodates practically any need and the high quality, 4.7\" diameter suction cups offer the strongest and most reliable hold on the market today. The Telescoping Grip Grab Bar provides a safe means of getting in and out of the shower or bathtub. Designed as heavy duty Medical Devices that are tested and approved by health professionals, Bridge Medical's Portable Grab Bars give you the confidence you need to move freely and independently without worry. Bridge Medical Telescoping Grip Grab Bar Features: Does not require any drilling into wall for installation. Easily installs and uninstalls in seconds. Ideal for travel. Offers safety and support in the bathroom Bridge Medical Telescoping Grip Grab Bar Specifications: Length extends: 19-24 inches. 5\" minimum size tile required for solid adhesion.", "How much of your day and evening do you spend reading or working on detailed projects? Don?t you deserve The Finest Reading Lamp in the World™? With timeless design, all-metal construction, hand-polished antiqued brushed nickel or brass finishes, and microprocessor controlled power adapter, Heritage™ lamps are built to last generations ? Guaranteed! Backed by 50 years of research, Heritage™ scientifically tunes exclusive Full spectrum® indoor sunlight for readers? eyes ? it?s all the benefits of full spectrum daylight, without any of the harmful UV and glare. Plus, exclusive Verilux® technologies optimize black-white contrast and reduce harmful flicker and glare to eliminate eyestrain and enhance vision. Why not order one today? The form of the lamp is timeless and looks more like a fine scientific instrument than like a desk lamp. The full-rotation lamp head and height adjustment that telescopes 39? ? 53? allow for complete adjustability of your light source. Your Heritage™ Full spectrum Deluxe Floor Lamp includes the incomparable energy-saving Verilux® 27 W Global Cooling™ bulb and the 3-way switch allows you to adjust the brightness to the equivalent of 75, 100, or 150 W incandescent bulbs. And, since the bulb lasts 10X longer (10,000 hours), you save money on replacement bulbs and energy. Thousands of avid readers swear by their Heritage™ lamps and attest to the fact that their eyes actually relax the more they read. Now they can read several chapters and still feel refreshed, without eyestrain. The secret is in the Optix® Glare Control Filter system. This revolutionary filtration system actually focuses the rays of light so they provide unparalleled color rendering, higher black-and-white contrast and no glare from shiny magazine pages. Don?t wait another moment ? you deserve the Heritage™ reading lamp! Heritage™ Deluxe Floor Lamp Specifications: Multi-directional lamp shaft swivels 360°, while the lamp head turns up and down 180º. Lamp height ranges 39? ? 53?. Base diameter 10.5?, and head dimensions 10.5?L x 5.4? W x 2.6?H. Optix® Glare Control Filter: virtually eliminates the reflective and peripheral glare that causes eyestrain and headaches. Heritage™ Deluxe Floor Lamp Replacement Bulb - CFML27VLX", "Being on crutches is challenging enough. Having no way to carry your stuff only makes things worse. That?s the beauty of Crutch Tote™ - the ultimate crutch accessory!Strap this clever pouch to your crutches, and you have an instant, hands-free carry bag. Its two roomy pockets hold an amazing range of necessities.At home ? It?s a crutch bag that holds eyeglasses, remote controllers, magazines, and moreAt school ? It?s a handy saddlebag that keeps pens, notepads, and water bottles handyAt work ? It?s a convenient crutch accessory that corrals cell phones, writing supplies, organizers?even a folding umbrella!Wherever you are, this ingenious crutch caddy makes life on crutches SO much easier. It?s the must-have crutch accessory for people on the go! Crutch Tote Features: Fits underarm crutches of all heights (tuck the bottom pocket up for use with children?s crutches). Attaches easily with Velcro® straps. Machine washable.", "The Original BeasyTrans Transfer Board is ideal for automobile transfers. Longer length will accommodate patients and transfers in areas where space is not an issue. This model has been used successfully in boosting or repositioning patients in bed. The \"No-Lift\" Frictionless BeasyTrans™ Easy Transfer System BeasyTrans™ Systems are totally portable. With the BeasyTrans™ Systems, most users can achieve regular access to an automobile. For some, this may mean a greater quality of life. The visiting of friends and relatives may be resumed. Educational and cultural undertakings can be attended. The systems may even allow the user to live at home while receiving outpatient care, rather than living in a long term facility and even for travelling! Tissue Friendly - Elimination of Skin Friction It's a well documented fact: lifting leads to injury. For example, patient movement tasks statistically place nursing personnel in the top percentile of the U.S. labor force for back injuries. At the same time, the person being lifted is at risk for arm and brachial plexus type injuries as well as back injuries from being torqued or twisted. The risk of such injuries is tremendously reduced when lifting is eliminated. The frictionless, lateral slide is clearly the state of the art in patient transfer. Versatility The design of the BeasyTrans™ Easy Transfer Systems make it possible to apply sliding technology to a wide range of transfer and therapeutic functions in both the clinical and homecare environment. For example, strategic placement of the Beasy seat under a draw sheet allows a minimum number of caregivers to easily perform such difficult transfers as bed to gurney, supine, or boosting of patients.Because the seat easily rotates 360 degrees, the systems can be used for range of motion exercises for hands, feet or other body parts.", "Lightweight Easy Grip Scissors are ideal for people with decreased hand strength. Use your whole hand to gently close these scissors, and the plastic spring opens them automatically. These scissors can be used in either hand - great for lefties. Also included is a blade protector/hang-up holder. Stainless steel blades. Easy Grip Scissor Specifications: Long model measures 9 inches as overall length, with 3 inch long pointed blades. Shorter pointed model measures 7 1/2 inches long with 2 1/2 inch pointed blades. Rounded Safety blades measures 8 inches overall with 2 inch round tip blades.", "The Burn Resistant Smokers Apron is intended for individuals who smoke and require a protective cover to shield against hot ashes and dropped cigarettes. The adjustable neck strap is secured with a quick-release buckle and two sets of tie straps to secure the apron to the waist and thighs. Economy-light gray Smokers Apron - CPO4551E The Posey Economy Smoker?s Apron is price competitive and made from a wipe clean, silicone coated fiberglass fabric. Premium-navy blue Smokers Apron - CPO4551 The Posey Premium Smoker?s Apron is lighter in weight and made from a machine washable fire resistant Nomex® and Kevlar® fabric that is used in the outer shells of many firefighter suits. Burn Resistant Smokers Apron Features: Secured with a quick-release buckle. Adds a layer of insulation against burns and damage to clothing from cigarettes or falling ashes. Intended for people who may not move quickly enough to prevent hot ashes from falling in their lap. Burn Resistant Smokers Apron Specifications: Dimensions: 30\"W x 36\"H.", "This 16 oz. mug is specifically designed for individuals with grasping, fine motor, cognitive, or upper extremity disabilities. The Easy Grip-In Mug has an ergonomically curved internal handle that enables the hand to fit through the mug, eliminating the need for grasping.As an added bonus, when you fill the Easy Grip-In Mug with a warm beverage, you'll feel the gentle warmth on your hand, which can help ease joint pain.Recommended by OT's and Physical Therapists for medical rehabilitation as an adaptive drinking aid. Easy Grip-In Mug Features: Easy to open or close lid. 360 degree rotating lid. Adjustable drinking spout. Non-slip rubber grip base. Easy Grip-In Mug Specifications: Measures 7 3/4\" H x 11 1/4\" round. Weighs 10.4 oz. Color: Blue.", "The TriDerma® Everyday Bruise Relief is for those who bruise easily, have thin skin, or heal slowly. This extra rich cream provides fast healing. Gentle, yet powerful, this cream soothes and helps skin heal faster from bruises, redness, skin tightness, dryness or skin injury. It is ideal to use immediately after laser, waxing or peels to help calm, soothe and heal your skin. It contains Aloe and extra Arnica to help heal bruising, swelling, redness and pain caused by medications, everyday minor skin trauma or surgical procedures. The specialized formula contains select healing ingredients, proven botanicals, rich plant complexes and vitamins to help restore healthy skin. Everyday Bruise Relief Features: Extra rich cream will help to heal bruising, swelling, redness and pain. Non-comedogenic. Non-greasy and fragrance free. Everyday Bruise Relief Specifications: Size: Every Day Bruise Relief 4 oz. jar. Contains Aloe and extra Arnica. aloe barbadensis (AP4® genuine virgin organic aloe vera) leaf extract, methylsulfonylmethane (msm), arnica (montana flower) extract, cetearyl glucoside, allantoin, beeswax, glyceryl stearate, tocopherol acetate (vitamin e), cyclomethicone, triethanolamine, petrolatum, ibpc, phenoxyethanol, disodium edta", "The Handy Seat was designed for people who require either walking or resting assistance. Perfect for individuals who suffer from arthritis, hip or leg surgery, fibromyalgia, back injury or any other physical disability that makes walking for an extended period difficult. Having the Handy Seat available allows you to rest when needed or can be used as a walking cane. Lightweight aluminum has a cushioned grip handle, vinyl 7 1/2\" square seat, 3 rubber-tipped legs. Weighs only 28 ounces, supports up to 250 pounds! Folds to 25\" high.Perfect for everyday walking or sitting!Suitable for people 5'2\" (157 cm) to 6'2\" (188 cm) tall. Handy Seat Features: Handy Seat unfolds to provide instant seating for someone who needs to sit frequently for short periods of time. At 34\" tall, it makes for the perfect walking aid for everyday use. The 21\" seat height is perfect for waiting in line, watching events or shopping. Lightweight (28 ounces) so it?s easy to carry. Handy Seat Specifications: Material Content: polypropylene seat and handle, aluminum legs. Weight : 28 ounces. Weight Capacity : 250 lbs. Measurements: Folded: 9\" x 2\" x 34\". Unfolded: 9\" x 8\" x 22\". Cane Length: 34\" tall. Seat Height: 21\" tall. No assembly required.", "Bend it! Shape it! Twist it! The Twist Pillow holds ANY position for perfect comfort and support - Anywhere You Go!The Twist Massage Pillow bends into any position for custom comfort and support. Go ahead, twist it, bend it, shape it and it stays put! Now it even comes with soothing massage! Soft, comfy poly-foam with bendable linkage inside is what makes the difference. Wrap it around your neck to relieve stress and relax stiff muscles. Slip it around your waist to energize and soothe muscles your lower back. Or shape it over your shoulder to alleviate muscle strain. Soft, comfy poly-foam supports your lower back, neck, head, shoulders or legs or arms at home, at the office or while traveling. Custom shaping lets you target muscle groups like never before! Soft velour cover is zippered and removes to wash. Twist Massage Pillow Features: Bends and shapes into any position and stays put. Add massage to any position with just the flick of a switch. Twist it around your neck and up the side of your head for the most comfortable travel pillow that stays put. Bend it around your neck for reading or watching TV. Twist Massage Pillow Specifications: 26L x 4-1/2W x 4-1/2H. Color - Ecru. Batteries - 2 AA. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "Tension mounted, floor to ceiling Security Pole and Grab Bar that allows the user to rise from a sitting position with the pivoting Curve Grab Bar, which provides 4 hand grips at 4 different heights and locks in place every 45 degrees. Rubber pads on the top and bottom protect the ceiling and floor. Main pole easily separates into two 53\" pieces making it easy to transport. Includes wrench and no other tools are required for assembly. Fits ceiling heights 7 - 10 ft. Rust resistant Zinc plated steel. Weight capacity: 300lbs Frequently Asked Security Pole & Grab Bar Questions: How is it installed? The pole is tension mounted between the floor and the ceiling. It is not necessary to screw into the floor and ceiling, but screws are provided in case the user wants to. What tools are needed for assembly? A wrench is included with each unit and no other tools are needed for assembly. Does it damage the floor or ceiling? Rubber pads are on the bottom and top of the pole to protect the floor and ceiling. What ceiling heights does it accommodate? 7 to 10 ft. ceilings. Security Pole and Grab Bar Features: 2 products in 1: Floor to ceiling pole with pivoting Curve Grab Bar that locks in place at 4 different positions. Adjustable: fits ceiling heights 7 to 10 ft. Portable: Main pole easily separates into two 53? pieces making it easy to transport. Adaptable: No need for wall mounts, can be installed in virtually any area of a room, exactly where it is needed. Rust resistant zinc plated steel with durable powder coat finish. Wrench included and no other tools required for assembly. Security Pole and Grab Bar Specifications: Weight Capacity: 300 lbs. Weight of Product: 26 lbs. Fits ceiling heights: range of 7 - 10 ft. Ships via UPS Ground.", "Enjoy comfort and support 8 different ways! This 3-piece multi-functional wedge system relieves low back pressure, reduces swelling and improves blood flow to the lower legs. It provides complete back support and features the zero gravity position, placing your body at a 120-degree angle, the most relaxed position for your heart, body and nervous system. The BackMax Wedge also aids with conditions such as acid reflux, indigestion and nasal congestion. The knee wedge relieves low back pressure while leg elevation reduces swelling and improves blood circulation. Unique zippered connections allow adjustability. Replay BackMax Body Wedge Cushion Set Features: Multi-functional full body support system relieves low back pressure, reduces swelling and improves blood flow to the lower legs. Head elevation is great for acid reflux, indigestion, hietal hernia and sinus issues. Can be used in bed or on the floor. Perfect for watching television, outdoor concerts or reading. Unique, zippered design provides numerous positions for full-body comfort. Ultimate comfort for back, hips, legs and feet. Medical grade, high quality support foam. BackMax Body Wedge Cushion Set Specifications: Removable, washable cover. 70L x 20W x 16H. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "Bend it! Shape it! Twist it! The Twist Pillow holds ANY position for perfect comfort and support - Anywhere You Go!Custom shape this Twist Pillow to your neck, back, legs, any part of your body! Soft poly foam with bendable linkage inside holds any shape and stays put for a totally new twist on comfort! Wrap around your neck to relieve stress. Slip it around your waist for low back support. Or shape it over your shoulder to alleviate muscle strain. The Twist supports and aligns your body at home, in the car on the plane, anywhere you go -- it?s great for travel too. Replay Twist Neck Pillow Features: Shape into any position and it stays put. Bend it around your neck for reading or watching TV. Shape it for a bed time head pillow. Wrap it around your lower back for support. Twist Neck Pillow Specifications: Color - Ecru. 26L x 4.5W x 4.5H. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "FINALLY, A SLEEP AID THAT ADDRESSES COMFORT AND COMPLIANCE ISSUES FOR CPAP USERS.The people at Contour Living have developed a solution. It?s the CPAP Multi-Mask Sleep Aid .The American Sleep Apnea Association identifies CPAP therapy as the most common treatment for sleep apnea. CPAP therapy works by preventing the airway from closing during sleep. It is administered at bedtime through a nasal or facial mask held in place by velcro straps around the patient?s head. The mask is connected by a tube to a small air compressor. The CPAP machine sends air under pressure through the tube and into the mask, where it imparts positive pressure to the upper airways, preventing the tissues in the back of the throat from collapsing during sleep.This is an extremely effective form of treatment when used in compliance with doctors orders. However, non-compliance is a big issue. It has been estimated that over 65% of patients use the machine for a maximum of just 4 hours per night when it should be used for the duration of the patient?s sleep. Additionally, many patients report using the CPAP for just a few nights out of the week. Discomfort is a major factor contributing to non-compliance. During side sleeping or stomach sleeping, the mask presses and rubs against the patient?s face, which leads to discomfort and can also distort the mask, causing leaks and exacerbating the problem of non-compliance. CPAP Sleep Aid Pillow Features: Improves mask comfort. Freedom of movement during sleep. Multi-position sleeping for side, back and stomach sleepers. Neck support and spinal alignment. Reduces mask leaks. Mask pressure on face. Airway resistance due to better neck support. CPAP Sleep Aid Pillow Specifications: 20L X 13W x 4H. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "The Freedom Desert Bowl is a high sided bowl that screws down onto the Freedom-Pad. Users can now free themselves with no danger of the bowl moving or tipping over. The Desert bowl comes complete with the removable Freedom Non Skid, No Spill Vacuum Pad attached to the bottom.The Freedom Dinnerware non skid Desert Bowl was designed for people with hand tremors, paralysis, Parkinson's disease, arthritis, uncontrolled movement and disabilities that restrict hand movement necessary for eating independently. The Freedom Desert Bowl is also ideal for young children, helping them to eat and drink independently and at the same time reducing accidental spills.In addition, they reduce labour cost and time by helping to eliminate spills, laundry cleaning and damage to equipment, bedding and flooring.Shown holding the entire 4 ounces of ice cream. Freedom Desert Bowl Features: Comes complete with the removable Freedom Non Skid, No Spill Vacuum Pad. Reduce labor cost and time by helping to eliminate spills. Freedom Desert Bowl Specifications: Width - 4 1/2\". Height - 1 1/2\".", "The 3 In 1 Hooker Bracelet Fastener can be very helpful for people with arthritis, fibromyalgia, carpal tunnel or any other hand or finger disability. It is also great for those with trouble attaching small jewelry clasps. 3 In 1 Hooker Bracelet Fastener Features: Button aid. Zipper pull. Bracelet fastener. Extends reach 20 in.", "The KNORK® can be used as an eating aid for people with limited hand mobility, from temporary injuries to permanent conditions such as severe arthritis and hemi-paralysis (more commonly known as one-sided paralysis.)KNORK® looks like a normal eating utensil and attracts no attention when using it. People who would otherwise require that their food be cut for them-- or else limit their meal choices-- can gain increased independence by using the KNORK®.Because of Knork's rising popularity with stroke victims, amputees and others who only have the use of one hand, KNORK®s are slowly infiltrating hospital rehabilitation units and cafeterias across the country.Unlike a knife, the Knork cuts through food with a rocking motion which is facilitated by a finger platform on both sides of the handle. Knorks are symmetric and can be used by both left-handers and right-handers. Gloss 5 piece Knork Set Features: Eating aid for people with limited hand mobility. Looks like a normal eating utensil. Cuts through food with a rocking motion.", "TriDerma® Psoriasis Ointment contains specific healing ingredients clinically proven to help alleviate the symptoms of psoriasis. It quickly relieves redness, scaly white skin cell buildup, extreme dryness and burning. Daily use helps prevent flare-ups and helps restore and maintain healthy skin. Powerful, yet gentle enough to use on any sensitive skin area, including the scalp. Psoriasis is a chronic skin disorder cannot be cured, but it can be managed, safely and effectively, without the use of steroid products, coal tar or other prescription drugs. TriDerma Psoriasis cream contains specific healing ingredients recommended by the National Psoriasis Foundation to ease the symptoms of psoriasis. AP4 Genuine Virgin Aloe, Barbadensis, Salicylic Acid, Zinc PCA, Urea, Vitamin A,B,D,E and other advanced healing ingredients help promote fast tissue repair. Key ingredient is 3% Salicylic acid for the relief of Psoriasis and seborrheic dermatitis. Triderma Psoriasis Ointment Features: Clinically proven to help alleviate the symptoms of psoriasis. Quickly relieves redness, scaly white skin cell buildup, extreme dryness and burning. Helps prevent flare-ups and helps restore and maintain healthy skin. Triderma Psoriasis Ointment Specifications: Size: Psoriasis Power Ointment 4 oz. jar. Contains: Salicylic acid, AP4 Genuine Virgin Aloe, Barbadensis, Salicylic Acid, Zinc PCA, Urea, Vitamin A,B,D,E.", "TriDerma® Eczema Ointment quickly soothes and relieves redness, dryness, itching and burning. Fast healing cream provides relief for minor to severely damaged skin from eczema. Daily use helps prevent flare-ups and helps restore and maintain healthy skin. Powerful yet gentle to use on children and on any delicate, sensitive skin area. This special formula contains AP4 Genuine Virgin Aloe, Barbadensis, Zinc PCA, Vitamins A,B,D, E, Oat protein and other advanced healing ingredients to help promote fast tissue repair. It contains NO Cortisone or other harmful drugs so it is safe to use head to toe, as often as needed. This specialized non-greasy cream contains natural healing botanicals and vitamins to help relieve itching without harmful drugs. Triderma Eczema Ointment Features: Quickly soothes and relieves redness, dryness, itching and burning. Helps prevent flare-ups and helps restore and maintain healthy skin. Powerful, yet safe and gentle to use all over the body, face, scalp and even on sensitive skin. Contains NO Cortisone. Triderma Eczema Ointment Specifications: Size: 4 oz jar. Contains: AP4 Genuine Virgin Aloe, Barbadensis, Zinc PCA, Vitamins A,B,D, E, Oat protein.", "Large Safety Sure Transfer Slide is used primarily to: Transfer between a bed and X-ray/operating table, shower trolley, etc. Turn in bed. Large Safety Sure Transfer Slide Advantages: SST Slide Large is big enough to provide an undersurface from head to toe. The new and unique ULF (ultra low friction) material on the inside of the sliding mat makes it easy to move even a heavy patient. Large Safety Sure Transfer Slide Measurements: Dimensions: Length 78\" x Width 24\". Thickness: 1\" with padding. Weight: 30 oz.", "The Freedom Soup Bowl is a high sided bowl that screws down onto the Freedom-Pad. Users can now free themselves with no danger of the bowl moving or tipping over. The soup bowl comes complete with the removable Freedom Non Skid, No Spill Vacuum Pad attached to the bottom.The Freedom Dinnerware non skid Soup Bowl was designed for people with hand tremors, paralysis, Parkinson's disease, arthritis, uncontrolled movement and disabilities that restrict hand movement necessary for eating independently. The Freedom Soup Bowl is also ideal for young children, helping them to eat and drink independently and at the same time reducing accidental spills.In addition, they reduce labour cost and time by helping to eliminate spills, laundry cleaning and damage to equipment, bedding and flooring.Shown holding the entire 15 ounces of soup. Freedom Soup Bowl Features: Comes complete with the removable Freedom Non Skid, No Spill Vacuum Pad. Reduce labor cost and time by helping to eliminate spills. Freedom Soup Bowl Specifications: Width - 6\". Height - 1 3/4\"", "The Beasy II Transfer Board is perfect for smaller areas, especially bathroom transfers. May be used for independent transfers with professional approval. Many facilities use this system for boosting patients in bed. The \"No-Lift\" Frictionless BeasyTrans™ Easy Transfer System BeasyTrans™ Systems are totally portable. With the BeasyTrans™ Systems, most users can achieve regular access to an automobile. For some, this may mean a greater quality of life. The visiting of friends and relatives may be resumed. Educational and cultural undertakings can be attended. The systems may even allow the user to live at home while receiving outpatient care, rather than living in a long term facility and even for travelling! Tissue Friendly - Elimination of Skin Friction It's a well documented fact: lifting leads to injury. For example, patient movement tasks statistically place nursing personnel in the top percentile of the U.S. labor force for back injuries. At the same time, the person being lifted is at risk for arm and brachial plexus type injuries as well as back injuries from being torqued or twisted. The risk of such injuries is tremendously reduced when lifting is eliminated. The frictionless, lateral slide is clearly the state of the art in patient transfer. Versatility The design of the BeasyTrans™ Easy Transfer Systems make it possible to apply sliding technology to a wide range of transfer and therapeutic functions in both the clinical and homecare environment. For example, strategic placement of the Beasy seat under a draw sheet allows a minimum number of caregivers to easily perform such difficult transfers as bed to gurney, supine, or boosting of patients.Because the seat easily rotates 360 degrees, the systems can be used for range of motion exercises for hands, feet or other body parts.", "Protect your investment with a custom fitted Cover for the Contour CPAP Pillow .This case is 75% cotton, 25% polyester and it's custom designed with Velour and Quilted panels to provide a snug fit. The case is machine washable and has a zippered enclosure for easy removal.", "The Freedom Wand Extension adds an additional 6 1/2 inches in length to The Freedom Wand™. The Freedom Wand is a self-wipe, sanitary, easy to use, multipurpose, portable, personal toilet tissue aid. It's specifically designed for personal cleaning and hygiene for anyone with limited mobility.", "The Bed Desk™ is a book stand with legs like a bed tray. The two legs are collapsible and the desk can be adjusted to almost any angle for reading books, or to provide a in bed table.The Bed Desk is made with imported Baltic Birch, handle-carved legs, a pen hole, adjustable 0º-90º lid and ledge supports, a brass book binder clip, an embossed leather strap, and a slim, trim, light weight design.It is ideal in bed or on a desk, table, chair, or even in a car. It can also help relieve a person suffering with neck or back pain, by holding a book's binder and pages in place.The Bed Desk can be used as a Tabletop, or Laptop. Click here to view a quick video/audio presentation of The Bed Desk by the creator David Drake. Viewed best with DSL or Greater. The Bed Desk™ includes a brass clip that will help hold books, folders or binders in place.When the table is collapsed, the brass clip locks the legs in place and the embossed leather strap acts as a carry handle. The Bed Desk™ is made of natural bare wood and does not have a finish. Folding Bed Desk Features: Can be adjusted for comfortable reading angles. Smooth surface for eating, working or reading. Adjustable lid and ledge provides space for a 100 - 1000 page book. Great for people who spend a lot of time in bed or in a chair. Folding Bed Desk Specifications: Made of natural bare wood and does not have a finish. Weighs: 7 lbs. Weight capacity: 20 lbs. Table Surface: 17\" W x 11\"D. Dimensions of Base with legs open:20\" W x 11\"D.", "The Deluxe ,Tilt Top Over Bed Table tilts up to 70 degrees. The raised edge keeps objects from falling off. It features swivel casters that allow for easy maneuverability. The wood grain surface is a wipes clean with a sponge or damp cloth. The Deluxe ,Tilt Top Over Bed Table is easy and practical for use while eating, reading, writing or having a place to put other material while in a bed. Tilt Top Over Bed Table Features: Top can be raised or lowered in infinite settings. Chrome-plated steel with ?H? base provides security and stability. Table top is locked securely when height adjustment handle is released. Swivel casters allow for easy maneuverability. Tilts up to 70 degrees, 35 degrees to either side. Raised plastic edge keeps objects from falling off. Walnut, wood grain laminated top. Easily assembled. Tilt Top Over Bed Table Specifications: Adjustable height range: 30\" - 47\". Table top surface: 15\" D x 30\" L. Overall width at base: 26.5\". Overall depth at base: 15.5\".", "Why red? Studies show Alzheimer patients increase food intake by 24% and liquid by 84% due to red color. The Redware Tableware - Deluxe Set includes sectioned scoop dish with lid, Inner Lip plate, cup, fork and spoon. Basic Set includes scooper dish with nonskid base, cup, fork and spoon.People who have Alzheimer?s disease experience impairments not only in their cognitive abilities but also in their physiological status. Approximately 40% of Alzheimer?s patients experience significant weight loss. This weight loss may be due to many different factors but a study out of Boston University suggests that significant weight loss is due in part to the loss of the ability to distinguish contrast between colors.People with Alzheimer's are not able to distinguish light colored food and drink on or in typically light colored tableware. When using tableware that offered a high contrast to the food and drink (i.e.: bright red and bright blue), researchers noticed that the participants in the study increased their food intake by 24% and liquid intake by 84%. Redware Tableware Features: High contrast colors increase food intake. Redware Tableware Basic Set Specifications: Scooper Dish with Non-Skid Base. Built-Up Fork and Spoon. Drinking Cup. Redware Tableware Deluxe Set Specifications: Partitioned Scoop Dish with Lid. Built-Up Fork and Spoon. Drinking Cup. Inner Lip Plate.", "The Gripit Floss Holder holds floss very tightly so users don't have to pinch their fingers or put fingers in their mouth when flossing.Gripit Floss Holders are the only flossing tool to pop open and allow a fresh length of floss to be advanced in seconds. Gripits are also ergonomically designed to help people with weak hand or finger conditions floss more easily. Gripit Floss Holders make flossing an effortless routine.Refill with your favorite waxed, unwaxed, or flavored floss and most dental tapes Gripit Floss Holder Features: Refill with your favorite waxed, unwaxed, or flavored floss and most dental tapes. Ergonomically designed to help people with hand or finger impairments floss more easily. The only flossing tool to pop open and allow a fresh length of floss to be advanced in seconds. Holds floss very tightly so users don't have to pinch their fingers or put fingers in their mouth when flossing. Gripit Floss Holder Specifications: Comes in 4 different colors. Sorry, no color choice.", "Comfortably position your head and neck for improved airway alignment to reduce the most common causes of snoring, like sleeping on your back. A built-in air chamber in the center of this pillow allows adjustable support to help keep you off your back during the night. Simply inflate the air bubble with the connected tube to the desired height. The Anti Snore Pillow is made of natural latex foam flocks that regulate moisture and warmth and provide a soft, supportive sleeping surface. The pillow is curved to accommodate your neck area, and its anatomical shape ensures proper support during the night. The high quality Euro soft cotton cover is quilted for added comfort and luxury, and can be removed for washing. The pillow fits a queen size case and looks normal on your bed. Anti Snore Pillow Features: Adjustable anti-snore air chamber positions your head and neck to help prevent snoring via an easy to use inflate valve. The pillow?s curved shape accommodates your neck area. Open cell, natural latex foam regulates moisture and warmth and provides a soft, supportive sleeping surface. Promotes side sleeping. Quilted cover is removable for washing. Family members will sleep better with reduced snoring. Anti Snore Pillow Specifications: Fits in queen size pillow case. 25 L x 13 W x 6.25 H. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "The Safety Sure™ Transfer Boards help bridge the gap between two transfer points. The board?s anti-slip tape helps keep the board from sliding during transfer procedures. The upper side of the board is slick to allow the patient to slide easily. Flexible plastic. Safety Sure Transfer Board Features: Includes a Hand Hole on each end of board to assist with self transferring. Ideal for transfers between wheelchair, bed, car, and toilet/commode. Slick upper surface allows the user to easily slide across the board. Non-slip strips on the bottom surface help keep the board from moving during the transfer. Safety Sure Transfer Board Specifications: 23 inch SafetySure Transfer Board Dimensions: 23\"L x 12½\"W x 3/16\"D. 30 inch SafetySure Transfer Board Dimensions: 30\"L x 12½\"W x 1/4\"D. Weight Capacity: 250 lbs.", "The Razor Extension Handle helps eliminate painful bending and reaching when shaving hard to reach parts of your body. The 19 inch long Extender Handle has a bend to allow shaving at a more comfortable angle. Designed to hold most razors.Constructed out of a durable plastic. Razor Extension Handle Features: Designed for use on standard razors and electric razors. Razor holder can also be used to extend the reach on other utensils. A metal ring is used to adjust the VELCRO® brand hook and loop closure. Razor Extension Handle Specifications: Adds an additional 19\" of reach. Holds an object up to 2\" in diameter. Weighs ¼ lb This is a non-returnable hygiene item.", "This 18 inch Safety Sure Transfer Pivot Disc is designed for use by patients who are able to stand but cannot readily move their legs. For maximum support and safety for both the patient and the helper, we recommend that either a transfer belt or sling be used in conjunction with the Safety Sure Transfer Pivot Disc.An individual with impaired mobility from paralysis or limited upper body functions can use the Safety Sure Transfer Pivot Disc unassisted in a very efficient way. If the patient cannot use his/her upper extremities a helper will be needed.The Safety Sure Transfer Pivot Disc is placed on the floor with the label facing downwards. The patient's feet are to be positioned completely on the disc to facilitate a smooth transfer and reduce back strain on both patient and helper. The handle of the Safety Sure Transfer Pivot Disc should be placed facing the patient, to prevent interfering with the feet of the helper. The helper should place one of his/her feet on the disc to safely monitor and control the transfer. After using the Safety Sure Transfer Pivot Disc, it should immediately be removed from the floor to avoid accidents.Because of the lightweight and convenient grip handle, the Safety Sure Transfer Pivot Disc is easy to use and carry. The Safety Sure Transfer Pivot Disc is made of three high quality polymer plates, one turning on top of the other. The Safety Sure Transfer Pivot Disc is also equipped with anti-glide tapes on both sides to prevent slipping on the floor or when a patient is standing on the disc.Transfer between a chair and a wheelchair: The disc is \"locked\" in place when the helper places his/her heel comfortably on the floor and the rest of his/her foot firmly on the plate between the feet of the patient. The patient wears a transfer belt and the helper holds on to the handles while guiding the patient through the transfer.Transfer between a wheelchair and a toilet: Proper use of the disc in this situation is identical to above, except it is safer and easier with two helpers. The helper(s) can use their other, free hand(s) to help undress the patient before placing him/her on the toilet.Transfer between a wheelchair and a bed: Before you move a patient from a bed to a wheelchair, you should make sure that the wheelchair is positioned as close to the bed as possible, with the wheels locked.For better control and safety, always have the patient wear a transfer belt. 18 inch Safety Sure Transfer Disc Specifications: Weighs 2 pounds. 18 inch diameter. 1/2 inch thick. Weight limit 300 lbs.", "The composite outer layer of the UltraSlick® Transfer Board produces a constant slick surface that requires no waxing and never needs refinishing. The plastic surface over layers of select hardwood increase strength so the board is thin (7/16\") and very lightweight. A lacquered finish on the back allows for easy placement of board, while reducing board movement during transfers. \"Using [this] board, we have been able to teach high Quads to transfer independently. Prior to using the UltraSlick®, these patients required help to transfer.\" Kathy Dunn, rehabilitation clinical specialist \"The UltraSlick® is also helpful in wet transfers.\" Kathy Roy, Director of Spinal Cord Physical Therapy, VAMC San Diego The UltraSlick Transfer Boards are available in 24, 27 and 30 inch lengths. UltraSlick Transfer Board Features: Provides maximum strength with minimum weight. Technologically advanced composite surface solves many transfer problems. Dramatically reduces effort required to transfer. Very light weight and maneuverable. UltraSlick Transfer Board Specifications: Weight limit : 250 lbs. Board width: 8 inches.", "The Pivot and Tilt Over Bed Table is a fully assembled out of the box overbed table! The mast of the table can be adjusted and locked into one of three positions ranging from completely horizontal to 90 degrees, like a regular upright table. One of the main problems with overbed tables is that they are large, bulky and tend to get in the way when not in use. The unique design of the Pivot and Tilt Over Bed Table allows it to be used and then stored under the bed or folded flat to take when traveling. The unique design of the Pivot and Tilt Over bed Table also allows for versatility and flexibility not seen on any other over bed table on the market. With multiple height and tilt positions it can be used for everything from a low bed, to wheelchairs, to regular beds. The Pivot and Tilt Over Bed Table will adapt to your needs. Pivot and Tilt Over Bed Table Features: The pivot feature allows the table to be positioned closer to individuals in a bed or sitting in a wheelchair. Can be folded for storage. The table top tilts with the angle of the mast to provide a flat surface regardless of the mast angle. Pivot and Tilt Over Bed Table Specifications: Height adjusts: 28\" - 37\". Tabletop measures: 23 1/2\" x 15 3/4\". Base Measures: 25\" x 25\". 4 Casters: 2 locking, 2 non-locking.", "The UriBag® Female Urinal is more convenient than adapted toilets and is available whenever and wherever needed. Its compact storage tube, efficient shape and Latex construction are superior to any existing product. In every detail, the UriBag® is an improvement for the user requiring minimal privacy and may be used while either sitting or standing. Light, but durable, the UriBag's snap-lock seal provides a leak free seal. It is easily stored and can be used discreetly, sealed, then emptied and washed later. Holds 32 oz. The UriBag can be stored in a very small space and is small enough (3.5 x 3.5 x 3.5) to be carried in a purse - very discreet.Contains Latex Female Uribag Urinal Features: Snap-lock seal does not leak. Requires only minimal privacy. May be used while either sitting or standing. Available whenever and wherever needed. More convenient than adapted toilets. Female Uribag Urinal Specifications: Measures: 3.5 x 3.5 x 3.5 in. Capacity: 1000 mls or 32 oz Contains: Latex", "The Wheelchair Hemi Arm Positioner is designed to provide a padded secure platform to support and protect the arm and shoulder.Constructed from plywood and covered with black vinyl over 1-inch foam, the Hemi Arm Positioner is 5 inches wide and 19 inches long. It uses a 4 inch padded elbow guard and a 2 inch padded hand guard.The wrist may be secured by using the velcro attached to the board. The positioner is attached to the wheelchair arm rest with a 10 inch slotted aluminum channel. Wheelchair Hemi Arm Positioner Features: Secures and supports the arm & shoulder. Velcro strap may be used secure the wrist. Securely attaches to wheelchair arm rest. Wheelchair Hemi Arm Positioner Specifications: Measures: 5\"W x 19\"L. Padded elbow guard: 4\". Padded hand guard: 2\".", "Cozy Pressure Relief Slippers provide pressure relief for ulcers on the heel. Sling back adjusts with a hook and loop fastener and allows air to freely flow around the heel. Made from soft, synthetic fur and the non-skid soles help prevent falls. Machine washable. One pair per package. Posey Pressure Relief Slipper Specifications:   Size   Fits 6470SM Small/Medium  5 to 10 Womens, 5 to 8 Mens 6470ML Medium/Large  10+ Womens, 8 to 10 Mens Posey Pressure Relief Slippers Feature: Provide pressure relief for ulcers on the heel. Adjusts with a hook and loop fastener. Allows air to freely flow around the heel. Made from soft, synthetic fur. Non-skid soles help prevent falls. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "The Fleece Walker Hand Grip Covers are great covers for walker hand grips! Put these on, use them for awhile, and you'll wonder how you ever did without!Soft, thick, sheepskin-like fleece, wraps around the walker hand grips, providing cushioning protection for hands; especially important for sensitive skin. Note: The fleece is made extra thick and plush -- you'll notice the difference right away. The Walker Grip Wraps also have a special cotton lining with \"Grip Dots\" that help provide a sure grip by preventing the wraps from sliding. May be machine washed and dried. Made of 93% Polyester, 7% Acrylic Sheepskin-like Fleece, exclusive of trim; lining 100% cotton with Grip Dots. Fleece Walker Hand Grip Covers Feature: Extra thick fleece covered walker hand grip covers. \"Grip Dots\" provide a sure grip by preventing the wraps from sliding. Fleece Walker Hand Grip Cover Specifications: Size: 6.5\" x 6.5\". Sold as a pair.", "The Versa Crutch Pack attaches to either forearm crutches or standard-type crutches with Velcro-like hook and loop closures. The Crutch Pack has a roomy main zippered compartment large enough for a wallet, checkbook, comb/brush, medicine, etc. -- even an occasional sandwich. It may also be attached to the side of some power chairs (hangs toward the front of the armrest, partially on the armrest and partially on the metal tubing by the knee) and to the tiller of some scooters (ones that have tubing on which to attach the pack). Stabilizer straps on back of the Versa Crutch Pack prevents swinging. Made of durable, weather resistant nylon packcloth. Versa Crutch Pak Features: Roomy main zippered compartment. Stabilizers prevent swinging. Durable, weather resistant nylon packcloth. Versa Crutch Pak Specifications: Size: 6\" x 9\" x 2.5\". Attaches to either forearm crutches or standard-type crutches.", "Comfort, control and less stress distinguish the Right Brush® from all other paint brushes. The handle is ergonomically designed to fit comfortably in your hand, so most aches and pains are eliminated. The hanging hook is invaluable in keeping your work clean. Because the brush is of such fine quality it performs delicate tasks as well as swift broad coverage with ease. It is like having several top quality brushes in one. ?I wanted the brush to work like a natural extension of the hand...to be as comfortable, useful and beautiful as possible.? Mark Wholey Sculptor and Inventor\t\t\t\t\t\t \t\t\t\t\t\t\t \t\t\t\t\t\t \"The Right Brush's ergonomic design is made for your hand. The Right Brush allows your wrist to be in a more ?neutral? position allowing the stronger arm and shoulder muscles to be employed. This places less stress on the many small joints and muscles of the hand, wrist and forearm.\" Joy Twelves, Physical Therapist The Right Brush is a professional tool made with the finest push-chisel Polyester-Nylon bristles and stainless steel ferrule. The white polypropylene handle cleans up very nicely. Available in 2 1/2? angle cut. For Additional Right Brush Information Click Here \t\t\t\t\t\t \t\t\t\t\t\t\t \t\t\t\t\t\t \t\t\t\t\t\t Bad Hair Day The Right Brush Features: Ergonomically designed to fit comfortably in your hand. Finest push-chisel Polyester-Nylon bristles. White polypropylene handle. Hanging hook on paint brush. The Right Brush Specifications: Available in: 2 1/2? angle cut Bristles: push-chisel Polyester-Nylon \t\t\t \t\t\t\t \t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t \t\t\t\t", "The clamp-on Fishing Pole Holder for wheelchairs keeps a good grip on the pole while it makes the fishing reel available for one-handed operation.The pole can be easily removed from the holder. A clamp with a large wing nut makes it adaptable to any tubular wheelchair bar 7/8 to 1 1/8 inch diameter. The holder is also a perfect fit for use on lawn chairs or beach chairs. Wheelchair Rod and Reel Holder Features: Fishing pole or rod can be easily removed from the holder. Makes the reel available for one handed operation. Also works on lawn chairs or beach chairs. Wheelchair Rod and Reel Holder Specifications: Clamp fits bars: 7/8 to 1 1/8 inch diameter.", "The Gold Magnetic Jewelry Clasp is very secure, and easy to use. The clasp is an ideal solution if you have difficulties using clasps due to arthritis. The Gold Magnetic Jewelry Clasp will change any standard necklace, bracelet or chain clasp to one with a magnetic clasp, making it simple and easy to close. The Gold Magnetic Jewelry Clasp is a great, high quality clasp and it does not require a jeweler to install. The magnetic clasp can be easily connected to any necklace or bracelet that has a traditional claw and loop clasp. This innovative new jewelry accessory makes wearing any piece of jewelry a snap! The Gold Magnetic Jewelry Clasp can be challenging for someone with weak hand conditions, but it makes putting on and removing the jewelry easier. Especially when used with the 3 In 1 Hooker Bracelet Fastener. Gold Magnetic Jewelry Clasp Features: Easy to attach to any necklace or bracelet. Makes putting on and removing the jewelry easier.", "The Fleece Armrest Covers for Wheelchairs are soft, thick sheepskin like fleece that wrap around the wheelchair armrests, providing cushioning protection; especially important for sensitive skin. Easily attaches to armrest using Velcro-like hook and loop closures. We have this fleece made extra thick and plush to our specifications -- we think you'll really like it! Note: Fits standard width wheelchair armrests (does not fit the extra wide platform type). Made of 93% Polyester, 7% Acrylic. May be machine washed and dried. Available in two sizes: for full length (12\" to 15\") or desk size (8\" to 11\") armrests. Fleece Armrest Covers for Wheelchairs Features: Thick sheepskin like fleece that wraps around the wheelchair armrests. Easily attaches to armrest using Velcro-like hook and loop closures. Fleece Wheelchair Armrest Cover Specifications: Full length: 12\" to 15\" armrests. Desk size: 8\" to 11\" armrests.", "The Male UriBag® is a discreet male urinal that easily fits into a pocket. Standard urinals are bulky and conspicuous. The Uribag is light, but durable and its snap lock seal does not leak. It is easily stored and can be used discreetly, sealed, then emptied and washed later. For incontinent men who do not wear catheters, the Uribag is available whenever and wherever needed. It requires only minimal privacy and can be used while sitting or standing. Contains Latex Male Uribag Urinal Features: Snap-lock seal does not leak. Requires only minimal privacy. May be used while either sitting or standing. Can be stored in a small place such as a glove compartment. Male Uribag Urinal Specifications: Measures: 3.5 x 3.5 x 3.5 in. Capacity: 1000 mls or 32 oz Contains: Latex", "The Hand Held Square Self Inspection Mirror has a long 12 inch handle that bends and flexes easily. This feature makes them ideal for self examination of hard to see parts of the body. The self inspection mirrors also have adjustable hand loops that provide a firm grip. Hand Held Self Inspection Mirrors are easy to use and versatile. 5-1/2 inch square double-sided break resistant mirror comes with an adjustable hand loop on a 12 inch flexible shaft. Overall length is 23-1/2\". Square Self Inspection Mirror Features: Handles bend and flex to most any angle easily. Adjustable hand loop provides a firm grip. Ideal for self examination of hard to see parts of the body. Square Self Inspection Mirror Specifications: Mirror Size: 5-1/2 inch square. Handle: 12 inch flexible shaft.", "Premium Flip Away Wheelchair Armrest Half Tray with pre-installed bracket that flips tray up and out of the way. Enter and exit the wheelchair without removing the armrest. This armrest pivots upward for easy entry and exit from the wheelchair. A convenient beverage holder is built into the armrest. Thick padding provides comfort. ½ inch thick wood covered in 1 inch thick foam with black molded satin vinyl. Measures 6 in. wide at elbow, 10 ½ in. wide at front edge, and 22 in. long. Adjustable height channel bracket accommodates almost any wheelchair with a 2-1/2 in. x 1 in. armrest.The Flip Away Wheelchair Armrest Half Tray is available for either the right or left side Flip Away Wheelchair Padded Armrest Tray Features: 1/2\" thick wood covered with 1\" thick foam. Upholstered with black molded satin vinyl. Convenient built-in beverage holder. Flip Away Wheelchair Padded Armrest Tray Specifications: Measures: 6 in. wide at elbow, 10 ½ in. wide at front edge, and 22 in. long. Fits: wheelchairs with a 2-1/2 in. x 1 in. armrest.", "The BeasyGlyder Transfer Board is used to curve around wheelchairs with non-movable armrests. Also facilitates caregiver?s natural transfer motions. Seat and base are same diameter. The \"No-Lift\" Frictionless BeasyTrans™ Easy Transfer System BeasyTrans™ Systems are totally portable. With the BeasyTrans™ Systems, most users can achieve regular access to an automobile. For some, this may mean a greater quality of life. The visiting of friends and relatives may be resumed. Educational and cultural undertakings can be attended. The systems may even allow the user to live at home while receiving outpatient care, rather than living in a long term facility and even for travelling! Tissue Friendly - Elimination of Skin Friction It's a well documented fact: lifting leads to injury. For example, patient movement tasks statistically place nursing personnel in the top percentile of the U.S. labor force for back injuries. At the same time, the person being lifted is at risk for arm and brachial plexus type injuries as well as back injuries from being torqued or twisted. The risk of such injuries is tremendously reduced when lifting is eliminated. The frictionless, lateral slide is clearly the state of the art in patient transfer. Versatility The design of the BeasyTrans™ Easy Transfer Systems make it possible to apply sliding technology to a wide range of transfer and therapeutic functions in both the clinical and homecare environment. For example, strategic placement of the Beasy seat under a draw sheet allows a minimum number of caregivers to easily perform such difficult transfers as bed to gurney, supine, or boosting of patients.Because the seat easily rotates 360 degrees, the systems can be used for range of motion exercises for hands, feet or other body parts.", "The Clear Flip Away Wheelchair Armrest Tray is made of sturdy, transparent polycarbonate for a clear line of sight to lap and legs. This half lap tray pivots upward for easy entry and exit from the wheelchair. Tray measures 3/8 inch thick, 22 in. long, 8 in. wide at elbow and 9 ½ in. at front edge. Adjustable height channel armrest bracket measures 2 in. wide x 9 in. long x 1 in. thick, and accommodates maximum arm pad size 1 ½ in high x 2 ½ in. wide. Virtually unbreakable and scratch-resistant tray is available for either the right or left side. Clear Flip Away Wheelchair Tray Features: Sturdy, transparent polycarbonate for a clear line of sight to lap and legs. Pivots upward for easy entry and exit from the wheelchair. Clear Flip Away Wheelchair Tray Specifications: Measures: 3/8 inch thick, 22 in. long, 8 in. wide at elbow and 9 ½ in. at front edge. Armrest bracket measures: 2 in. wide x 9 in. long x 1 in. thick. Accommodates a maximum arm pad size: 1 ½ in high x 2 ½ in. wide.", "Large Safety Sure Transfer Slide is used primarily to: Transfer between a bed and X-ray/operating table, shower trolley, etc. Turn in bed. Large Safety Sure Transfer Slide Advantages: SST Slide Large is big enough to provide an undersurface from head to toe. The new and unique ULF (ultra low friction) material on the inside of the sliding mat makes it easy to move even a heavy patient. Large Safety Sure Transfer Slide Measurements: Dimensions: Length 78\" x Width 24\". Thickness: 0.1\" without padding. Weight: 8 oz.", "These One Way Valve Straws stay filled with fluid, even after removing the straw from a user's lips. This feature eliminates the possibility of sucking in too much air while drinking. New straw clip helps manage difficult situations by holding the straw securely to the cup. This kit comes with 3 one-way straws, 3 clips, and 1 lip block. Colors may vary. Wash with normal washing solutions or sterilize by boiling. Cup not included.Made in USA. One Way Straw Clip Assembly Features: One way straw valves stay filled with fluid, even after removing the straw from a user's lips. Eliminates the possibility of sucking in too much air while drinking. Straw clip holds the straw securely to the cup. One Way Straw Clip Assembly Specifications: Kit contains 3 one-way straws, 3 clips, and 1 lip block. Color: varies. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "Fast healing for skin chafing and nasal dryness due to oxygen or CPAP devise use. The TriDerma® Nasal Dryness & Chafing Aloe Gel soothes on contact, relieves cracked, dry, irritated skin and helps heal minor to severe skin irritations. May be used before, during and after oxygen therapy to keep skin healthy and protected from breaking down.Nasal Dryness & Chafing Aloe 2 oz. squeeze bottle. Triderma Nasal Dryness & Chafing Aloe Gel Features: Relieves cracked, dry, irritated skin. Helps heal minor to severe skin irritations. May be used before, during and after oxygen therapy. AP4 Genuine Virgin Aloe naturally contains three anti-inflammatory agents to reduce swelling, six antiseptics to fight bacteria and three analgesics to soothe pain. Triderma Nasal Dryness & Chafing Aloe Gel Specifications: Contains AP4 Genuine Virgin Aloe, and soothing and healing Allantoin. Size: 2 ounce squeeze bottle.", "Walking can be smooth again with the LaserCane ! Simply take normal steps as your LaserCane™ projects a bright red line across your path. The laser beam provides a safe, obstacle-free visual cue, which can enable Parkinson?s patients and others to break ?freezing? episodes and increase stride length. The laser beam line appears when you place the cane down and disappears when you lift the cane. The Laser Walking Cane is useful for patients with: Parkinson's disease, ALS, abnormal gait patterns and Stroke rehabilitation. The laser is powered by two AA batteries, which are easy to replace and typically last at least six months. Laser Walking Cane Features: Height-Adjustable for patients 5'0\" to 6'1\" tall. High-Quality and light weight! Laser Walking Cane Specifications: Battery Life 6 months. Height Adjustable from 5'0\" to 6'1\". Powered by two AA batteries.", "The Flex-A-Mirror is an inspection mirror designed for use by people with physical disabilities. The unit consists of a nearly unbreakable, lightweight acrylic, oval shaped mirror on a flexible shaft; the shaft is equipped with a handle and an adjustable hand loop. The unit is 19 inches long overall; the mirror is 4 x 6 inches, and the shaft is 9 inches long. Flex-A-Mirror Features: Nearly unbreakable, lightweight acrylic, oval shaped mirror. Flexible shaft, and an easy to grip handle. Flex-A-Mirror Specifications: Overall length: 19 inches. Flexible shaft: 9 inches. Mirror: 4 x 6 inches.", "The Freedom Wand is a self-wipe, sanitary, easy to use, multipurpose, portable, personal toilet tissue aid. It's specifically designed for personal cleaning and hygiene for anyone with limited mobility.The Freedom Wand™ comes in three pieces the handle, the extension and the head. Use the Freedom Wand™ with the handle and head for a total of 14 inches in length or add the extension for 21 inches. Because it's made from a polypropylene material, the freedom wand is very durable and easy to clean. Freedom Wand Features: Holds a large wad of tissue that you can use to wipe your bottom. Holds a small sponge the size of a bar of soap, to wash areas that you can't reach while in the shower. Holds a shaver or razor. Holds a small wad of tissue to apply ointment to the sensitive parts of your body with a rash. Disposes soiled tissue right into the toilet very easily and you don't have to touch it! Contoured for ease in holding and has a soft secure grip to eliminate slipping. Freedom Wand Specifications: 14 inches in length. Add the extension for 21 inches. The handle is approximately 8 inches long. The head is 9 inches long and has a slight curve to it to allow for proper reach. The head also has four \"fingers\" that extend out of the wand with the slide of a button. As they extend, they open to hold a shaver, sponge, ointment pad, tissue wad or other items. When sliding the button back, the fingers go back into the wand, securing it in place and giving a tight grip, strength and a smooth end. To release an item, just push and slide the button back. It is that easy! The rinse hold in the head helps aid with cleaning in case any soil should get in the wand. The Extension: The extension is a 6½ inch piece. When combined with the head and the handle, the wand becomes 21 inches long. If a shorter wand is desired, the head and the handle can be put together without the extension for a length of 14 inches. Both the extension and the handle have quick and easy release buttons. The Handle: The handle is approximately 8 inches long. It is contoured for ease in holding and has a soft secure grip to eliminate slipping. It also has a loop on the end so that you can hang it in a convenient spot.This is a non-returnable hygiene item.", "This ergonomically designed Swedish Meat Knife features a high quality stainless steel blade. The ergonomic handle design provides proper positioning allowing the arm, wrist and hand a neutral, relaxed working position. The design increases leverage in cutting, utilizing the power of the whole arm and conserving energy, thus making it easier to use for those with a weak grasp and/or reduced hand strength.In using the Swedish Meat Knife, you will avoid working with bent wrists to help prevent wrist strain and pain. The upright handles help reduce the risk of cutting injuries in the fingers, which can happen with traditional knives when the hand slides over the handle to the blade!The Swedish Meat Knife has a smooth edge - ideal for cutting meat and vegetables. Swedish Meat Knife Features: High carbon stainless steal blade retains it's sharpness longer. Ergonomic handle eliminates stress on wrist, hand, and fingers. Ideal for cutting meat and vegetables. Swedish Meat Knife Specifications: Smooth edge for cutting meat and vegetables. Stainless steel blade measures 8\" long. Weighs 6 oz.", "Designed for the customer who demands the best, the Telescoping Pivot Grip Grab Bar is the ultimate choice in bathroom safety.Because the ends pivot and rotate, the installation options are endless; including stretching across a shower corner, across the inside of a bathtub, or even for use on unparallel surfaces, the options are almost limitless! Our Best Portable Grab Bar is YOUR best value!Designed as heavy duty Medical Devices that are tested and approved by health professionals, Bridge Medical's Portable Grab Bars give you the confidence you need to move freely and independently without worry. Telescoping Pivot Grip Grab Bar Features: Ends pivot and rotate. Can be mounted horizontally, vertically or diagonally. Installs and uninstalls in seconds. Designed as a Serious Home Medical Device - Flimsy alternatives do not compare! Durable Commercial Grade Suction Cups give you the confidence you need to move freely and independently without worry. Telescoping Pivot Grip Grab Bar Specifications: Extends 27\" to 32\". Suction Cup Diameter: 4.7\". 5\" minimum size tile required for solid adhesion.", "The Blue Terry Cloth Adult Size Bib helps protect clothing while eating. Premium stainhider bib protects clothes and hides unsightly stains. These bibs are made of absorbent polycotton terry fused to waterproof vinyl. The navy fabric hides stains such as spaghetti sauce and coffee stains. Leakproof full length vinyl waterproof barrier covers the back side and doesn't let food or fluids leak through onto clothing.Blue Terry Cloth Adult Size Bibs measure 18 inches wide by 30 inches long. The neck opening of the adult bib fastens with a Velcro (R) hook and loop closure. Laundering instructions: No chlorine bleach, dry bibs at 150 degrees or lower. Blue Terry Cloth Adult Size Bib Features: Stain hider absorbent polycotton navy terry cloth front. Full waterproof vinyl back barrier. Hook & Loop Neck Closure. Blue Terry Cloth Adult Size Bib Specifications: Size: 18 inches wide x 30 inches long. Fabric: Polycotton terry fused to waterproof vinyl. Color: Navy Blue.", "The Gold Magnetic Jewelry Clasp with Safety Snap is very secure, and easy to use. The clasp is an ideal solution if you have difficulties using clasps due to arthritis. Gold Magnetic Jewelry Clasp with Safety Snap will change any standard necklace, bracelet or chain clasp to one with a magnetic clasp, making it simple and easy to close. The Magnetic Jewelry Clasp with Safety Snap is a great, high quality clasp and it does not require a jeweler to install. The magnetic clasp can be easily connected to any necklace or bracelet that has a traditional claw and loop clasp. This innovative new jewelry accessory makes wearing any piece of jewelry a snap! The Gold Magnetic Jewelry Clasp with Safety Snap can be challenging for someone with weak hand conditions, but it makes putting on and removing the jewelry easier. Especially when used with the 3 In 1 Hooker Bracelet Fastener. Gold Magnetic Jewelry Clasp with Safety Snap Features: Easy to attach to any necklace or bracelet. Makes putting on and removing the jewelry easier.", "Safe T Mate Wheelchair Front Anti Tippers have five height adjustments to accommodate variable height wheelchairs from full height to low hemi chairs. The front anti tipper can be uses to help prevent wheelchairs from tipping forward. Fits both 7/8 and 1 inch frame diameters. The wheelchair front anti tipping mechanism is made from durable powder coated steel tubing and heavy gage chrome plated steel. 2 inch easy gliding wheels. Mounting hardware and easy to follow installation instructions included. Wheelchair Front Anti Tipper Features: Helps prevent wheelchairs from tipping forward. Made from durable powder coated steel tubing and heavy gage chrome plated steel. Five height adjustments to accommodate variable height wheelchairs. Wheelchair Front Anti Tipper Specifications: Fits: 7/8 and 1 inch frame diameters. Wheels: 2? easy gliding.", "The Deluxe Sock Aid with Foam Handles helps you put on your socks without bending over. Great for those who experience difficulty leaning forward. Simply fit sock over device and use padded handles on long cords to pull on with ease.Foam Handles provide a large diameter surface for those with limited grasp. Flexible plastic sock aid is lined with nylon fabric on the inside that allows the foot to ?slide? into the sock. Terry cloth outer cover provides a non-slip resistance to the sock which helps prevent the sock from slipping off the sock aid before it is snug. Deluxe Sock Aid with Foam Handles Features: Designed to help an individual put on a sock or stocking. Great for those who experience difficulty leaning forward. Simply fit sock over device and use padded handles on long cords to pull on with ease. Deluxe Sock Aid with Foam Handles Specifications: Flexible plastic sock aid. Lined with nylon fabric. 2 foam Handles provide a large diameter gripping surface. Straps measure 29 inches long. Sock aid measures 9 inches long and 4 1/2 inches wide overall.", "This ergonomically designed Swedish Fork Knife features a high quality stainless steel blade. The ergonomic handle design provides proper positioning allowing the arm, wrist and hand a neutral, relaxed working position. The design increases leverage in cutting, utilizing the power of the whole arm and conserving energy, thus making it easier to use for those with a weak grasp and/or reduced hand strength.In using the Swedish Fork Knife, you will avoid working with bent wrists to help prevent wrist strain and pain. The upright handles help reduce the risk of cutting injuries in the fingers, which can happen with traditional knives when the hand slides over the handle to the blade!The Swedish Fork Knife is multipurpose knife with a two prong fork-like tip and a serration on half the blade. Few blades can cut through the thin skin of tomatoes as the 4.5 inch long blade of the Fork Knife. Excellent for food preparation and dining. Weighs 3 3/8 oz. Swedish Fork Knife Features: High carbon stainless steal blade retains it's sharpness longer. Ergonomic handle eliminates stress on wrist, hand, and fingers. Multipurpose knife with a two prong fork-like tip and a serration on half the blade. Swedish Fork Knife Specifications: Two prong fork-like tip and a serration on half the blade. Stainless steel blade measures 4.5\" long. Weighs 3 3/8 oz.", "The Thomas Steady Arm is a writing aid and arm support designed for use by children and adults with disabilities causing arm and hand tremors. The user's right or left arm is placed in the trough-style arm holder, the straps secured, and the tension adjuster set to counter the tremors, thus enabling the user to feed him or herself, write, turn pages, etc. The unit clamps to a tabletop or to a wheelchair. \"A woman hadn't fed herself in 14 years because of heavy tremors.\" Ms. Christie recalled. \"I wanted to invent something that would emulate an arm, something that would stabilize movement.\" \"Rebecca Christie never had visions of becoming an inventor. But as an occupational therapist who worked with a woman who had Parkinson's Disease and multiple sclerosis, she wanted to improve the quality of life of people who have difficulty using their arms.\" For all ages. Dishwasher safe. Note: Item is manufactured as ordered. Item takes 1-2 weeks to manufacture. Does not ship out immediately. **Adult size only, please call for Pediatric size information. Thomas Steady Arm Features: It moves in all axis and planes. The tension adjuster adjusts for any tremor, large or small. Graduated movements allow movement in complete controlled circular motions. Can be used by either right or left handed people. Height adjuster allows use by any size adult person. Mounts to any table top (except glass). Can be mounted to wheelchairs. Thomas Steady Arm Specifications: Length: 16 inches. Height adjusts: 4 - 9 inches. Weight: 5.5 lbs.", "The Gripper provides people who suffer from arthritis, grasp limitations and writer?s cramp, a comfortable, built-up cushion grip for increased control of pens, pencils and other utensils.The regular size grippers fit pens and pencils and have an inner diameter of 3/8 inch. The assorted size grippers have hole diameters ranging from 1/8 to 3/8 inch to fit eating utensils, artist?s brushes, crochet hooks and other items. Inside opening of the Gripper automatically conforms to the shape of the utensil being used ? round, square, etc. Easily slides onto most utensils including pens, pencils, paintbrushes and more. Made of soft vinyl. The Gripper Features: Automatically conforms to the shape of the utensil being used ? round, square, etc. Built-up grip for increased control of pens, pencils and other utensils. The Gripper Specifications: Regular: fit pens and pencils. Assorted: hole diameters ranging from 1/8 to 3/8 inch (.31 to .95 cm) to fit eating utensils, artist?s brushes, crochet hooks and other items. Regular: bag of 25 Assorted: bag of 14 Made of soft vinyl.", "The UpLift Commode Assist is a self powered, lifting commode chair helps users gently seat and raise themselves. Can be used standalone or over the toilet.Automatically locks into position when fully depressed. The UpLift Commode Assist will lift up to 80% of a person?s weight, and is adjustable for weight ranges between 80 ? 300 lbs. Folding model allows for easy storage or transport.Minimum assembly is required. UpLift Commode Assist Features: Self-powered lifting mechanism releases slowly as user stands. Steel frame is white powder coated to protect against moisture. Easy to clean snap-on seat. Removable back rest allows for easy positioning over toilet. Bucket slides out for easy cleaning. Includes splash guard and cover. Cushioning pads enhance comfort. UpLift Commode Assist Specifications: Lift: 10? @ 20°. Seat Height: Min 17? Max 23?. Seat Dimensions: 16.5? D x 16.5? W. Base Dimensions: 21? D x 26? W. Supports up to: 300 lbs. Weight: 21 lbs. ***Non-returnable hygiene product***", "The Padded Vinyl Raised Toilet Seat fits most standard-size toilets and commode seats. Attached velcro straps secure easily to the toilet seat and help keep the vinyl seat cushion from shifting during use. It features foam padding for maximum comfort and helps minimize pressure points. Constructed of foam padding upholstered in white vinyl measures 12\" wide and 15\" deep. Available in white only. Non returnable if packaging is opened. Padded Vinyl Raised Toilet Seat Features: Foam padding for maximum comfort and helps minimize pressure points. Easily attaches to seat with hook and loop straps. Fits most standard size toilet seats. Padded Vinyl Raised Toilet Seat Specifications: Constructed of: foam padding upholstered in vinyl. Raises the toilet seat height: by 2 or 4 inches.", "The Swing Away Offset Door Hinges give you the extra clearance needed for wheelchairs and walkers. The hinge is designed to swing your door completely clear of the opening.This easy to install Offset Door Hinge adds an additional 2 inches to any doorway. Offset Door Hinges are also known as Swing Clear Hinges as they will actually swing your door clear of the door frame making it easier to get a wheelchair or walker through the doorway. Rather than cutting a larger frame and installing a bigger door, Offset Hinges are cost effective and can be retro-fitted to handle most residential doors. These expandable Z shaped door hinges use the same screws and holes as the existing hinge. For residential doors only. Swing Away Offset Door Hinge Features: Adds an additional 2 inches to most any doorway. Cost effective and can be retro-fitted to handle most residential doors. Swing your door clear of the door frame making it easier to get a wheelchair or walker through the doorway. Swing Away Offset Door Hinge Specifications: Measures: 3 ½ in H x 2 in W. Weighs: 1.8 lbs per pair. 2 hinges per package.", "The Posey Adult Feeding Bib is strong, durable and highly absorbent adult sized bib. Constructed of a durable quilted polyester laminate, with a waterproof inner liner, this feeding apron shields against spilled food and beverages. The built-in ?catch? pocket collects food items to prevent scattering over the chair or floor. This reversible feeding apron is machine washable and fits the majority of the population. Posey Adult feeding Bib Features: Reversible white/blue. Machine washable. Built-in ?catch? pocket collects food items. Adult feeding Bib Specifications: Dimensions: 18W x 30L inches. One size fits all with hook and loop rear fastener. Material: Quilted polyester laminate with waterproof inner liner.", "Cut and prepare food on the polyurethane Adaptive Cutting Board . Aluminum food spikes hold food while cutting. This durable board has rounded edges and is easy to clean.Four rubber suction feet hold the board in place while working. Two polyurethane food guards prevent food from sliding off the board. Large board measures 11 X 11 inches, weights 2 lbs, 3 oz. Small board measures 7 ½ inches square and weighs 1 ¼ lbs.Dishwasher safe. Adaptive Cutting Board Features: Two food guards prevent food from sliding off the edges. Two aluminum spikes to hold food secure while cutting. Easy to clean. Adaptive Cutting Board Specifications: Large board measures 11 X 11 inches, weighs 2 lbs, 3 oz. Small board measures 7 ½ inches square and weighs 1 ¼ lbs.", "My Plate Mate provides the extra assistance needed at mealtime to eliminate spills and help get food onto your utensil every time. My Plate-Mate is specially designed to help you succeed as you continue your daily growth towards independence. Eliminate frustration and mess. This spill guard guides food onto your utensil while preventing food from spilling onto the table and floor. An innovative feeding aid that easily attaches and detaches to any round 8\"-11\" diameter plate. My Plate Mate Plate Guard Features: Minimizes messy spills when eating. Helps you successfully scoop food onto your utensil. Increase confidence and independence. My Plate Mate Plate Guard Specifications: Regular Fits: 9\"-11\" dinner plate. Extra Firm Fits: 8\"-10\" dinner plate. Cleaning: dishwasher safe.", "The SideKick Wheelchair Pouch can be attached to the wheelchair armrest or beneath the seat. Its main zippered compartment holds wallets, brushes and other small personal items. The main zippered pocket has a ring type zipper pull that is particularly helpful for those with limited hand dexterity. Fleece lined pocket is ideal for eyeglasses, sunglasses or other small items. Front bellowed pocket keeps other necessities close at hand. The SideKick Wheelchair Pouch is designed to hang on the inside of manual wheelchair armrests or beneath the seat or it may be hung on the outside of most power chair armrests. Easily and securely attaches using Velcro-like hook and loop. (Note: if you're planning on hanging it to the inside of the armrest, keep in mind that you need a little room. If you're thinking of the SideKick for your scooter, the scooter has to have the metal bar-type handles.) Made of durable, weather resistant packcloth and fleece. SideKick Wheelchair Pouch Features: Fleece lined pocket is ideal for eyeglasses, sunglasses or other small items. Made of durable, weather resistant packcloth and fleece. Securely fastens to chair with a Velcro strap. SideKick Wheelchair Pouch Specifications: Pouch Size: 12.25\" X 7\".", "The FREEDOM Grip® Plus Bed Transfer Handle (bed rail) is designed to help patients transfer from bed to wheelchair or commode, or to simply aid in getting in and out of bed. It helps those who want to get in and out of bed on their own to maintain their independence. It has all of the features and benefits of our popular FREEDOM Grip bed handle with an added advantage of a height adjustable handle to accommodate thicker mattresses. The top of the handle is covered with skin friendly foam for a comfortable grip and increased safety. The cushioned bed handle adjusts from 21.5\" to 24.5\" in height in 1\" increments. Installation is quick, easy and tool free. The FREEDOM Grip Plus Bed Handle is the best combination of safety and economy. The MTS Freedom Grip® Plus Bed Rail is manufactured right here in the USA.The transfer handle style of bed rail helps anyone get in and out of bed while reducing the risk of falls. It is ideal for stroke and Parkinson?s patients as well as those with severe back pain, arthritis or injuries. The bed handle serves as a reminder of where the edge of the bed is, and is useful in helping to turn over or move in bed. Freedom Grip Plus Bed Transfer Handle Features: Makes getting in and out of bed easier. Bed Handle slides between Mattress and Box Spring. Reduces risk of falling. Installs Easily. No tools required. Fits most any style Home Bed. Freedom Grip Plus Bed Transfer Handle Specifications: Handle Width: 9\". Bed Board Width: 20\". Bed Board Length: 29\". Product Weight: 11 lbs. Weight Capacity: 250 lbs.", "The see through Clear Wheelchair Work Tray is made of strong ¼ inch thick break-resistant polycarbonate. Clear plastic makes this tray more attractive and discreet than traditional lap trays. Attaches easily to all types of wheelchairs with hook and loop straps. The aluminum trim acts as a lip to keep items from falling off. This durable work tray measures 19 x 23-1/2 in. Abdominal cutout measures 15 in. wide. Clear Wheelchair Work Tray Features: Made of clear plastic polycarbonate. Economically priced general utility tray. Includes aluminum rim and hook-n-loop straps. Clear Wheelchair Work Tray Specifications: Tray measures: 19 x 23-1/2 in. Abdominal cutout measures: 15 in. wide.", "No Rinse Peri Wash is specifically formulated for incontinence and ostomy care. The Peri - Wash Formula is pH-balanced for gentle and easy cleaning. Ideal for camping, traveling and the elderly or infirm. Peri - Wash is a safe perineal wash from NoRinse cleaning urine, emesis and fecal matter. Ready to use. Absolutely no rinsing required. leaves skin clean and refreshed and odor free. No alcohol meaning no dryness. Gentle on sensitive skin, this is a safe and effective perineal cleanser that moisturizes as it cleans. Completely clean the body without water or rinsing! Available in an 8 ounce spray bottle. Gallon size is also available. NoRinse Peri Wash Perineal Cleanser Features: Cleans, moisturizes and controls odors in one step. Contains aloe and vitamin E. Non irritating. Eliminates odors. NoRinse Peri Wash Perineal Cleanser Specifications: Size: 8 ounces. Contains: no dyes or perfumes.", "Some seat belts are positioned so they are very difficult to reach. The Easy Reach Seat Belt Handle Extension is a flexible, one piece, lightweight device providing an easier way to reach your seat belt. This helps avoid twisting and turning which for some is uncomfortable. If you suffer from shoulder pain or arthritis, reaching over to pull on your seat belt can be an excruciating chore. The Easy Reach Seat Belt Handle offers an additional 6½\" to grab on to, making it easier to pull your seat belt toward you. At night, the Easy Reach glows in the dark to make it easy to see. The light-weight Easy Reach Seat Belt Handle is made of a ethylene methyl acrylate resin. It is a total of 9¼\" long and easily snaps onto your safety belt. Made in the U.S.A. The Easy Reach Seat Belt Handle is a perfect gift for individuals who have trouble reaching for the seat belt in their car. Easy Reach Seat Belt Handle Extension Features: Offers an additional 6½\" to grab on to. Easily snaps onto your safety belt. Glows in the dark. Easy Reach Seat Belt Handle Extension Specifications: Overall Dimensions: 9¼\" L x 2¾\" W. Handle Length: 6½?.", "The yankezz Zipper Grabbers are zipper pull extenders that make grasping and using zippers easier! Replace those small, hard-to-use zippers with yankezz™ Zipper Grabbers, or use our yankezz™ Zipper Repair system to repair broken jacket or suitcase zipper pulls. Small children, the elderly, and outdoor sportsmen will immediately see the benefit of using yankezz™ Zipper products. yankezz™ are made from a soft, space age polymer material that makes them easy to grab and hold onto. yankezz™ fit most common zippers, and are fast and easy to install; you just slip them over an existing zipper-pull tab. yankezz Zipper Grabber Repair Kit Features: Makes it fast and easy to replace a broken zipper pull. Easy to grab and hold onto. yankezz Zipper Grabber Repair Kit Specifications: Package contains: two tab adapters, and two yankezz™ Grabbers. Grabber measures 1 1/2 inches long, 1/2 inch wide overall. Made in USA.", "Naturally relaxing Lavender Scented Dead Sea Mineral Bathing Salt , 2 lb. jar. Relaxing Lavender is an all time favorite for relaxation. Masada Dead Sea Mineral Salts are concentrated with beneficial minerals that work to detoxify the body, stimulate circulation, ease aching muscles and joints, soften the skin, and provide deep relaxation. Masada salts have been physician recommended for over 25 years. User-friendly unbreakable jar. Lavender Scented Dead Sea Mineral Bathing Salt Features: Lavender is an all time favorite for relaxation. Works to detoxify the body. Helps stimulate circulation. Helps relieve athlete's foot, corns, calluses. Acts as a natural anti-bacterial. Lavender Scented Dead Sea Mineral Bathing Salt Specifications: Size: 2 lbs. Mineral concentration: Magnesium Chloride (MC12) 34.0% Potassium Chloride (KC1) 23.0% Calcium Chloride (CaC12) 0.7% Bromides (as Br) 0.4%", "The Handi Bracelet helps you easily and effortlessly fasten all of your lobster claw and toggle clasp bracelets by yourself! Is there anything more frustrating than trying to hold your bracelet on your wrist while you are trying to fasten it at the same time? The bracelet slips and slides and falls off your wrist, or the clasp moves out of reach just as you are about to fasten it -- all in an exasperating dance that many times ends with the bracelet being left at home and you going out with a naked wrist! Well, now you can dance for joy because Handi Bracelet helps you easily and effortlessly fasten all of your lobster claw and toggle clasp bracelets by yourself! Handi Bracelet is an attractive elastic bracelet with a hook that firmly holds your bracelet in place on your wrist so you can quickly fasten it with your free hand. Handi Bracelet Features: Helps you easily and effortlessly fasten all of your lobster claw and toggle clasp bracelets by yourself! Handi Bracelet Specifications: Size: One size fits all. Color: Multi-colored beads. Made in: USA.", "The Kind Reminder™ is a simple device that plays a comforting message recorded in the familiar voice of a caregiver, friend, or family member. It is especially helpful for those with early- to mid-stage Alzheimer's or age-related memory loss. A typical message might be \"Hi, Mom. Today is Tuesday, you have had a good breakfast and taken all of your medication. Mary is here with you, and I will be back this afternoon.\" A message like this, or a simple \"I love you, Mom\", played on demand, can calm and reassure someone who is often anxious and confused. The Kind Reminder™ was created by the daughter of someone who is an Alzheimer's patient. It is a recorder specifically designed for people with dementia. It may be worn as a pendant or placed on a nearby table or counter. It is compact, lightweight, and easy to operate - just press the one big visible button to hear a caring message. Caregivers can change messages easily and often. They can record messages that anticipate the frustrating, repetitive questions often asked by Alzheimer's patients. This can help reduce caregiver stress. The Kind Reminder™ can also comfort and support patients in hospitals and nursing facilities. A recorded personal message from a friend or family member is especially helpful where the primary language of the patient does not match the language of the health care providers. Kind Reminder Features: Relieves caregiver frustration - reduces the need for answering frequently-asked questions. Soothes anxiety - provides a source of comforting information to persons with short-term memory loss and to hospital/nursing facility patients. Listener hears, on demand, a familiar voice that reminds or reassures. Easily accessible, unlikely to be misplaced when worn as a pendant. Large \"Play\" button is the only accessible movable part on the Kind Reminder™. Kind Reminder Specifications: Recording time: 1 - 2 minutes Weight: 1.4oz Dimensions: W 2.25\" H 3.0\" D .5\" Battery: 1 AAA (Not provided)", "Ease knee pain immediately with the comfort of a Knee Angel knee support pillow. The Knee Angel eliminates pressure on knees, hips, and the lower back, restoring natural alignment. Its fully adjustable, compact, inflatable design provides effective relief of knee pain associated with osteoarthritis, knee surgery, athletic pain and sore knees. The Knee Angel features a soft, adjustable pad that provides a perfect fit. Unlike loose pillows, the Knee Angel stays where you want it all night long because of its adjustable velcro straps. The Knee Angel is one size fits most, latex free, non-restrictive and lightweight. Synthetic suede. Washable 9\" x 8\". Knee Angel Knee Support Pillow Features: Relieves lower back pain by properly aligning knees and hips. Eases point-to-point pressure on the knees. Restores natural alignment. Stays in place throughout the night. Infinitely adjustable. Knee Angel Knee Support Pillow Specifications: Measures: 9\" x 8\". Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "The Select Flow Valve helps straws stay full of fluid, reducing the amount of air ingested and effort required. Fluid flow can be adjusted by trimming this valve at designated areas, giving the user selective flow restriction. New straw clip helps manage difficult situations by holding the straw securely to the cup. The kit comes with 3 select-flow valves, 3 straws, 3 clips, and 1 lip block. Colors may vary. Made in USA. Cup not included. Select Flow Straw Clip Assembly Features: Select Flow Valve helps straws stay full of fluid, reducing the amount of air ingested and effort required. Fluid flow can be adjusted by trimming this valve at designated areas, giving the user selective flow restriction. Straw clip holds the straw securely to the cup. Select Flow Straw Clip Assembly Specifications: Kit includes 3 select-flow valves, 3 straws, 3 clips, and 1 lip block. Color: varies. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "The Triple Loop Quad Leg Lifter allows the arms to be used to help lift a leg onto a wheelchair rest, bed, or into a car. Three loops provide forearm assisted leg positioning. The leg lifter features a pre-formed foot support with a heavy gauge wire insert that can be modified by bending it to the desired shape. Made with 1 inch heavy-duty webbing. Reinforced webbing with metal rod will extend the user?s reach to assist in lifting one leg at a time. The loop is placed around the foot or cast and can be repositioned by the user. 40 in. long. Triple Loop Quad Leg Lifter Features: Can be modified by bending it to the desired shape. Three loops provide forearm assisted leg positioning. Triple Loop Quad Leg Lifter Specifications: Length: 40 inches. Made with: 1 inch heavy-duty webbing reinforced webbing with metal rod.", "The SerenaSeat™ offers an exceptionally solid, fold down shower seat with a slim profile that features the beauty and resiliency of Brazilian walnut. Removable backrest allows access to wall tiles for easy cleaning.**Potential 6-8 week lead time, call for availability. Serena Fold Away Shower Seat Features: Brazilian walnut seat Beautiful Brazilian walnut is naturally resistant to moisture, mildew and decay. Known for it?s considerable strength, it is up to 3 times stronger than teak. Fold away storage Simply fold up to store out of the way. No need to lock into place, a machined precision tension hinge prevents the seat from inadvertently falling down. Slim profile In fold away position, the low profile frame and discreet design complements accessories without being intrusive. Incredibly solid Two 15 inch concealed wall mount braces maximize wall contact and spread the weight-bearing surface for an exceptionally solid feel. Serena Fold Away Shower Seat Specifications: Seat Material: 1 inch/25cm Brazilian walnut. Seat Depth: 15 inch/38cm. Seat Width: 18 inch/46cm. Depth from wall (when folded): 3 inch/7cm. Frame Material: Sandblasted aluminum with clear powder coat. Weight Capacity: 450lbs/205kg. *Non returnable hygiene item.", "The Quad Care Mirror is an inspection mirror designed for use by people who are quadriplegic or who have other lower extremity disabilities. Designed to widen the field of view and allow individuals to examine many parts of their body or for self catheterization. Easy to use and versatile. Nearly unbreakable, lightweight acrylic mirror on a flexible shaft. Select from three styles to suit your individual needs. 4 X 6 in oval double-sided break-resistant mirror has an adjustable hand loop. Flexible shaft is 12 in long, overall length is 23 in. Additional finger loop on the shaft aids in holding and manipulating the mirror. The two handles make this mirror easy to bend or twist to the desired position. Handle measures 5 in long and has an adjustable-length hand loop. Quad Care Mirror Features: Designed to widen the field of view and allow individuals to examine many parts of their body or for self catheterization. Adjustable-length hand loop. Quad Care Mirror Specifications: Mirror: 4 x 6 inches. Flexible shaft: 12 inches long. Overall length: 23 inches long.", "Stop fumbling with and losing those tiny earring backs! Don't let arthritis, long fingernails, or difficult to reachplaces make wearing your jewelry a hassle. Little Fingers® are designed for teenagers to seniors,long fingernails, to those with less nimble fingers and hands, female or male.Sold in pairs, 1 large/1 small, the flexible Little Fingers accommodate all types of earring backs, including fine jewelry threaded posts. Little Fingers Earring Helper Features: Helps Attach and Remove Pierced Earring Backs in One Easy Move! Holds the earring back in place to prevent dropping. Allows you to hold the wand instead of fumbling with the tiny earring back. Designed for teenagers to seniors. Little Fingers Earring Helper Specifications: Sold in pairs 1 large/1 small to accommodate the different types and sizes of earring backs.", "The Assist-A-Tray is two products in one! This innovative mobility aid is designed to assist you getting in and out of your couch or chair as well as provide a convenient lap desk that swivels 360 degrees out of the way when it isn't in use. The Assist-A-Tray is a must have for anyone with impaired balance, arthritis back pain or recent surgery. Fully adjustable in both height and length, the Assist-A-Tray can be used by people of varying heights. The solid footrests adjust in length to fit securely under the legs on either side of your favorite chair or sofa, firmly stabilizing the safety handle as you raise or lower yourself. The durable, solid, birchwood tray (with cupholder and utensil space) swivels 360°. Super-grip rubber pads protect the floor. Easy assembly - everything you need is included. Works well with most any couch, chair, recliner, or lift chair. Assist-A-Tray Features: Ergonomic Safety Handle- Makes standing and sitting easy and safe. Swivel Tray- Multi-Use laptop/TV tray with cup holder and utensil compartment. Super Grip Rubber Pads- Ensure stability and protect floor from damage. Quick and easy assembly. Assist-A-Tray Specifications: Height of Tray: 26? to 32?. Height Adjustment Handle: 34? to 40?. Dimensions of Handle: 6? x 6? 1.25 Diameter. Base Length Adjustment: 20? to 36?. Weight: 19.5 lbs. Weight Limit of Tray: 30 lbs. Weight Limit of Handle: 250 lbs.", "The Couch Cane is designed to help you stand and sit easier. It offers sturdy support for sitting down or standing up from a couch, chair, or recliner. It is adjustable in length and height. The CouchCane is easy to use and install. Tool-free assembly ensures you are able to quickly assemble and use it immediately.The convenient pouch organizer provides 4 large pockets for extra storage. CouchCane Features: Ergonomic Safety Handle - Makes standing and sitting easy and safe. Saddle Bag Pouch - Four pockets keep convenient items close by. Adaptable - Adjusts in length and height to fit either side of your favorite couch or chair. Works great with a lift chair. Super Grip Rubber Pads - Ensure stability and protect floor from damage. CouchCane Specifications: Fits Couch Feet Distance: 21? to 33?. Cane Height: Adjustable from 29? to 32?. Width of Handle: 15?. Product Weight: 15 lbs. Weight Capacity: 300 lbs. Ships via UPS Ground.", "This ergonomically designed Swedish Bread Knife features a high quality stainless steel blade. The ergonomic handle design provides proper positioning allowing the arm, wrist and hand a neutral, relaxed working position. The design increases leverage in cutting, utilizing the power of the whole arm and conserving energy, thus making it easier to use for those with a weak grasp and/or reduced hand strength.In using the Swedish Bread Knife, you will avoid working with bent wrists to help prevent wrist strain and pain. The upright handles help reduce the risk of cutting injuries in the fingers, which can happen with traditional knives when the hand slides over the handle to the blade! Swedish Bread Knife Features: High carbon stainless steal blade retains it's sharpness longer. Ergonomic handle eliminates stress on wrist, hand, and fingers. Swedish Bread Knife Specifications: Serrated blade for cutting breads. Stainless steel blade measures 8\" long. Weighs 5 1/2 oz.", "The Safe T Mate Wheelchair Anti Rollback Device prevents a wheelchair from rolling backward by grabbing the tires as the user attempts to sit or stand. The center override lever makes backing up unoccupied wheelchair a cinch. Or opt to remove lever without effecting operation of anti-rollback device. Available with an optional battery-powered integrated alarm that sounds when anti-rollback device is engaged, to alert facility staff of clients movement. Includes an adapter kit for heavy seat cushions. Easy to install. How it works. The Anti-Rollback System attaches to the rear of most sling seat wheelchairs. A lever directly contacts the underside of the seat and is mechanically linked to the brake arms. If the patient begins to stand, the brake arms clamp down on the wheels, preventing the chair from rolling backwards. When the patient is seated, the brake arms automatically unlock, and the chair can continue to roll freely. The Wheelchair Anti Rollback Device fits most wheelchairs. Standard - CSM22S 16\" - 20\" chairs. Wide - CSM22W 22\" - 24\" wide chairs. Standard with Alarm - CSM22A 16\" - 20\" w/ integrated alarm. Wide with Alarm - CSM22WA 22\" - 24\" w/ integrated alarm. Wheelchair Anti Rollback Device Features: Automatically activates as the user begins to stand. A pair of brake arms grab the tires to prevent the chair from rolling back and away. Available with an integrated chair exit alarm that sounds as the anti-rollback device engages. 3 Height adjustments for regular, hemi and extra low chairs. 2 Depth adjustments moves pad forward to accommodate residents who slouch in their chairs. Articulating / Floating Seat Pad remains in proper alignment with seat bottom for greater comfort. Adjustable spring tension to accommodate a variety of seat cushions.", "The Corner Shelf with Integrated Grab Bar offers beauty and practicality. A convenient storage shelf with a Corian surface that can be easily removed for cleaning combined with an integrated grab bar for additional support and stability. Available in a chrome or powder coated white finish. Sleek curves and clever practicality never go out of style. The Corian® shelf provides a generous surface that can be removed for easy cleaning. The reliable support rail is always within reach to offer a helping hand. The Invisia™ Corner Shelf should only be installed in areas where the mounting surface is structurally sound. If you are not equipped to undertake the outlined work we recommend that you have your Invisia™ Corner Shelf installed by a qualified contractor. The Invisia™ Corner Shelf must be secured to wall with fasteners appropriate to the structural material. Fasteners must be rated for certain retention force each for maximum weight capacity (see within for recommendations). Mounting fasteners should be inspected monthly and tightened if necessary. Rail is capable of supporting a maximum suggested user weight of 350lbs/159kg. Note: Due to variances in needs, materials and local construction methods, the information contained within concerning mounting location, fasteners and wall fabrication is provided as suggestion only. Consult the appropriate local professionals for best advice. Invisia Corner Shower Shelf with Integrated Grab Bar Features: DuPontTM Corian® surfaces - Beautiful shatterproof surfaces that are nonporous and resist the growth of mold, mildew and bacteria. A seamless look and feel - Common design elements throughout the entire collection allow for a variety of charming combinations to create a consistent look in any bathroom. Integrated support rail - Professional grade construction combined with superior quality fittings ensure years of reliable service and rock-solid support. Invisia Corner Shower Shelf with Integrated Grab Bar Specifications: Rail Diameter: 1.25\" / 32cm Dimensions: (LxWxH) 9x9x3\" / 23x23x7.6cm Materials / Finishes: Magnolia white powder coat over stainless steel or bright triple chrome plate over steel. Weight Capacity: 350lbs/159kg.", "The Over Bed Table provides both stability and security. You will enjoy the elevated, flat table top surface for drinks, meals or for most any reason requiring a mobile table. The over bed table is fully adjustable between 28\" - 45\" as the table top can be raised or lowered and is locked securely when the height adjustment handle is released. The swivel casters allow for easy maneuverability. Over Bed Table Features: Walnut, wood grain melamine top. Table top can be raised or lowered in infinite positions between 28\"-45\". Chrome-plated steel ?H? base provides security and stability. Table top is locked securely when height adjustment handle is released. Swivel casters allow for easy maneuverability. Over Bed Table Specifications: Table Height Range: 28\" - 45\". Table Surface: 30\"w x 15\"D. Base: 26.5\" x 15.5\".", "This Padded Half Lap Board is designed to provide support to the arm and shoulder while sitting in a wheelchair. Constructed from plywood and covered with black padded vinyl.The board has an overall length of 19 inches and a width of 9 inches. The board securely attaches to the wheelchair armrest with a 10 inch long slotted aluminum channel. Available for the left or the right side of a wheelchair. Padded Half Lap Board for Wheelchairs Feature: Protects and supports the arm & shoulder while seated. Securely attaches to wheelchair arm rest. Flips up for easy access. Padded Half Lap Board for Wheelchairs Specifications: Length: 19 inches. Width: 9 inches.", "The Press-On One Handed Nail Clipper is a unique nail clipper that easily clips nails with just a gentle press of the hand. It is ideal for one handed use and for people who have difficulty manipulating small hand held nail clippers. The Base is extra long and extra wide to provide stability and leverage making this nail clipper very easy to use. Rubber feet on bottom hold clipper in place during operation. One Handed Nail Clipper Features: Designed for use with one hand. Easy to operate with minimum effort. Extra wide and extra long base provides stability and leverage. Rubber feet on base to hold the clipper tool in place. One Handed Nail Clipper Specifications: Product dimensions: 3 inch H x 11.5 inch L x 4 inch W", "The adult Quick Bib clothing protector offers the user a simpler, easier method of protecting their clothing while eating. No straining to reach behind to secure or worse, waiting for help. There are No Snaps, No Ties and No Velcro. Quick Bib® Clothing Protector uses a Patented flexible injection molded \"C\" shaped ring sewn into a comfortable collar that easily spreads open and has lasting memory. Because it slides on from the front, anyone with limited motion due to health or space issues can position it without having to reach around the neck. Available in 2 colors: Sage Green and Moody Blue. Quick Bib Features: Collar easily spreads open and has lasting memory. Anyone with limited motion can position it without having to reach around the neck. Waterproof vinyl back barrier. Machine washable and dryer safe without removing the ring. Built in crumb catcher collects dropped crumbs. Quick Bib Specifications: Color: Sage-Green & Moody Blue. Xtra Large: 18\" Neck Size, 18 W x 27 L inches. Large: 16\" Neck Size, 16 W x 26 L inches.", "The Sock-eez makes it simple and easy to remove socks, stockings and hosiery without straining a muscle. It is an assisted daily living dressing aid, developed and designed for those who suffer from Lymphodema, Deep Vein Thrombosis, Arthritis and Edema. The elderly and the physically challenged also benefit from the use of this remarkable, ergonomic dressing aid that removes the thickest and tightest compression hose with one easy strain free motion. Never have trouble removing your compression socks and stockings again. The new and innovative Sock-eez™ makes it simple and easy to remove socks without straining a muscle. Great for athletic socks, knee-highs and traditional dress socks too! Sock-eez Features: Ergonomically designed to ease the pain and frustration for anyone experiencing the difficulty of removing compression hosiery or socks. Sock-eez Specifications: Size: 20 inches long.", "The Accent Ring with Integrated Support Rail is a stylish and incredibly solid handrail that's designed to be installed around shower fixtures. Ideal for providing additional support and stability when reaching or accessing controls. Note: The Invisia™ Accent Ring should only be installed in areas where the mounting surface is structurally sound. If you are not equipped to undertake the outlined work we recommend that you have your Invisia™ Accent Ring installed by a qualified contractor. The Invisia™ Accent Ring must be secured to wall with fasteners appropriate to the structural material. Fasteners must be rated for certain retention force each for maximum weight capacity (see within for recommendations). Mounting fasteners should be inspected monthly and tightened if necessary. Rail is capable of supporting a maximum suggested user weight of 350lbs/159kg. Note: Due to variances in needs, materials and local construction methods, the information contained within concerning mounting location, fasteners and wall fabrication is provided as suggestion only. Consult the appropriate local professionals for best advice. Invisia Accent Ring with Integrated Support Rail Features: A unique and incredibly solid handrail designed to contour circular shower fixtures and provide support when accessing controls. Offers a seamless look and feel. Integrated support rail. Discreet wall stems with concealed screws. Multi-contact wall support. Invisia Accent Ring with Integrated Support Rail Specifications: Rail Diameter: 1.25\" / 32cm. Dimensions: 12x2.75\" / 30x6.99cm. Materials / Finishes: Magnolia white powder coat over stainless steel or bright triple chrome plate over steel. Weight Capacity: 350lbs/159kg.", "The Clear Vinyl Adult Feeding Bib with Cuff offers protection to clothes from spills and is easy to clean. Continuous cuff along the bottom catches food crumbs and liquids preventing them from dropping to the floor. Measures 18W x 36L inches (46 x 91 cm). Machine washable. Clear Adult Feeding Bib Features: Cuff along the bottom catches food crumbs and liquids preventing them from dropping to the floor or staining clothes. Clear vinyl adult bib wipes clean in minutes. Clear Adult Feeding Bib Specifications: Measures: 18 x 36¨. Material: Vinyl Eating Bib. Closure: Cloth Tie.", "The Wright Stuff Gift Certificates are convenient, practical and make great gifts for friends and family. Gift certificates may be used toward the purchase of any item in our product selection simply by visiting our website. Paying extra for rush postage or worrying that your gift may arrive late will not be a factor because gift certificates are delivered via email once the payer information is verified.Please allow for one business day for verification.*Gift Certificates are not redeemable in cash and expire after 6 months.", "The Wright Stuff Gift Certificates are convenient, practical and make great gifts for friends and family. Gift certificates may be used toward the purchase of any item in our product selection simply by visiting our website. Paying extra for rush postage or worrying that your gift may arrive late will not be a factor because gift certificates are delivered via email once the payer information is verified.Please allow for one business day for verification.*Gift Certificates are not redeemable in cash and expire after 6 months.", "The Wright Stuff Gift Certificates are convenient, practical and make great gifts for friends and family. Gift certificates may be used toward the purchase of any item in our product selection simply by visiting our website. Paying extra for rush postage or worrying that your gift may arrive late will not be a factor because gift certificates are delivered via email once the payer information is verified.Please allow for one business day for verification.*Gift Certificates are not redeemable in cash and expire after 6 months.", "This unique sun visor accessory allows the easy storage and display of the state mandated handicap permit. Drivers and passengers that utilize the handicap parking spaces are required to have the state issued permit visible when parking in designated spaces. The Handi-Card storage and displayer makes it convenient for the handicapped person to comply with displaying the permit. It makes it easy to store the permit and then display it from the same location; just pull the sun visor down. The handicapped parking permit which has been stored is now ready to swivel into display position. When no longer in use, it swivels back into rest position, as the sun visor is returned to original position. Handi-Card, improves safety. When properly used, insures the driver?s view is not obstructed by the permit. Handi Card :: Handicapped Parking Permit Display Features: Stores and displays the handicap parking permit. Swivels out of the way when not in use. Insures the driver?s view is not obstructed by the handicap parking permit. Handi Card :: Handicapped Parking Permit Display Specifications: Color: Black.", "The MediBeads Foot Wraps are designed to provide hot or cold therapy to tired, aching ankles and feet. Because the MediBeads Foot Wraps are ready for use in just a minute and are applied directly to the site of pain, relief begins immediately. The foot wraps continue to deliver therapeutic moist heat to the feet for up to thirty minutes. This is the medically recommended treatment time for heat therapy within a three to four hour period. MediBeads recharge quickly and can be used again as necessary. Medibeads safely deliver a clean moist 20 minute heat treatment when microwaved for only 60 seconds. They take their moisture from the air, so it is not necessary to add water. Medical professionals recommend moist heat because it penetrates deeply and quickly to increase blood flow to reduce pain and relax muscles. Alternatively, Medibeads can be put in the freezer to provide cold therapy when it is desired. MediBeads Foot Wraps Features: Provides effective hot and cold therapy to the feet. Helps provide fast relief for tired, aching sore feet. An effective way to soothe and warm cold feet. Washable and reusable. MediBeads Foot Wraps Specifications: Incldues: one pair. Fits: up to men's size 12. Measures: 5 X 13 inches. Care Instructions: Hand wash in a mild detergent and allow to air dry 24 hours. Material: Non-toxic and latex free. Made in: USA.", "The Elasto-Gel Hot or Cold Therapy Mitten allows you to apply hot or cold therapy directly to the hand without being uncomfortable. This Wrist and Hand Heat or Ice Wrap is made of a tough, flexible gel covered with a four-way stretch material, which allows maximum conformity, heat transfer, and comfort. This single product serves both hot and cold therapy applications. Cold: The wrap remains soft and flexible at temperatures as low as -20 degrees F. The cold wrap will usually numb the treated area within 5 minutes without the severe shock and pain experienced with ice or ice water treatments. The wraps will remain cold for 20 to 40 minutes. Hot: Moist heat quickly penetrates muscles and joints when a warm wrap is applied. The wrap will continue to provide moist heat for 20 to 30 minutes before it will need to be reheated. Heat helps to restore flexibility and provides excellent therapy for minor injuries during, and after rehabilitation exercises.Elasto-Gel therapy products are made utilizing a tough, flexible high glycerine gel that is covered with a four-way stretch material that allows maximum conformity, hot and cold transfer and comfort. A single Elasto-Gel product serves for both hot and cold applications. Elasto-Gel Therapy Mitten Features: The hot or cold therapy will last 20 to 40 minutes per application. Will not leak even if punctured. Durable and easy to use. Microwaveable. Elasto-Gel Therapy Mitten Specifications: Weight: 2 Lbs. Dimensions: 3 in. H x 10 in. W x 12 in. D", "Walk with confidence with the contemporary looking Metro Walker , one of the most compact, foldable, portable, easy to open and close Walkers available. When folded, the Metro Walker is about four times smaller than the average walker. It fits in small spaces like the overhead bin on an airplane or a tiny car trunk. The unique design allows it to open and fold up effortlessly. To fold, just raise the easy-release lever with one hand and the walker collapses. To open, slide the handles apart. The Metro Walker is lightweight but sturdy and strong, supporting up to 250 lbs. The innovative height adjustment feature adjusts to accommodate users from 4' 10\" to 6' 8\" with ease. You?ll also appreciate the 4\" urethane front wheels and rear easy-glide feet, all contributing to ease of maneuverability. Metro Walker Foldable Walker Features: Portable - Quickly and easily folds up for storage in small spaces. 4 inch Urethane Wheels & Rear Easy-Glide Feet - Allows for trouble-free maneuvering over all surfaces. Patented Height Adjustment - Innovative mechanism allows for easy touch variation. Contemporary Look - Three stylish colors to choose from. Metro Walker Foldable Walker Specifications: Includes two side pouches. Weight: 6.5 lbs. Weight Capacity: 250 lbs. Collapsed Dimension: 6 x 4 x 32 inches. Wheels: 4 inch diameter. Colors: Black Walnut, Artisan Amber, Regal Rose. Height Adjustment: 32 to 36 inches for users 4?10? to 6?8?.", "Two products combined to create one great solution. The Automobility Solution includes the Handybar® allowing people to get in and out their car more easily, while the Swivel Cushion allows you to swing your legs out, without putting strain on your body.The Automobiltiy Solution is especially useful for people with back or leg problems or other physical challenges, expectant mothers, and people recovering from surgery or injuries. Automobility Solution Features: Can be beneficial for low or high vehicles. Convenient size and weight. Soft, flexible swiveling car cushion. Conforms to most any car seat. Low profile, lightweight and portable. Automobility Solution Specifications: Swivel seat measures: 17.5\" diameter. Weight Capacity: 350 lbs.", "The Easy Toilet Riser is an easy-to-use handicapped toilet riser that boosts the seat without any of the hassles that those old raised toilet seats created. This is a toilet seat riser that you install only once and that blends in with the bathroom. It was created to solve the problems created by those old, clunky disabled toilet seats.There have always been a range of handicapped and disabled toilet seats on the market. But until now, users of these toilet seat risers had to compromise their comfort and dignity. The old toilet seat risers were clunky, ugly and flimsy. They were unsanitary and hard to clean. And they were a pain to mount and remove after every use. In other words, there was plenty of room for improvement. The Easy Toilet Riser requires little additional cleaning. But most importantly, the Toilet Riser™ won?t force you to change your bathroom experience.There are no new tools to use. No extra parts. You?ll get to use the same toilet you?re familiar with. The Easy Toilet Riser™ just boosts it a little higher.The Easy Toilet Riser™ comes in a kit with everything you need for easy installation. Although The Medway Corporation Easy Toilet Riser™ ships in an 11 lb. package, the toilet seat riser is made with sturdy and high quality PVC strong enough to support up to 500 lbs. Easy Toilet Riser Features: You get to sit on your toilet ? not on a plastic accessory on top of your toilet. You don?t have an extra apparatus to clean between uses. It?s a raised toilet seat that?s made in the USA. Easily attaches to the floor. Discreet design with low profile. Great for home or commercial use. Easy Toilet Riser Specifications: Dimensions: 21 ¼\"L x 11 ½\"W x 4\"H. Elevation: 4\". Color: white. Includes: Toilet Seat Riser, two (2) 6\" long closet bolts, two (2) wax rings, one (1) extended water pipe, two (2) washers, two (2) nuts, installation manual. ***Non-returnable hygiene product***", "The Medibeads Compress is designed to drape comfortably around the neck and shoulders to relieve tension and stress. It can also be used as a wrist rest while typing, or placed on the face to relieve headaches and sinus pressure. MediBeads Microwave Activated Moist Heat Wraps provide a naturally occurring therapeutic moist heat treatment that is effective, clean, convenient and economical. Safe and easy to use, the wraps are ready in just minutes. They are washable, odor free, do not dry out or support bacteria growth. No added water, wires, boiling or covers needed. Medibeads Compress Features: Can be used for moist heat or cold therapy. Microwave Activated! Ready in just minutes. Recommended for neck, shoulders, face, and head. Medibeads Compress Specifications: Size: 4 x 22 inches. Made in: USA.", "Natural Pain Relief Cream is a Homeopathic preparation of Chamomile, synergistically formulated with: super-antioxidant Alpha Lipoic Acid (ALA) protection nourishing vitamins natural antibacterial Dead Sea Minerals This potent combination helps to provide temporary relief of the most common symptoms of Peripheral Neuropathy such as pain, tingling and numbness caused by Diabetes and other causes. Recent tests prove that Natural Pain Relief Cream also provides temporary relief from pain and discomfort due to Fibromyalgia. Natural Pain Relief Cream Features: Helps ease the sensation of pain, tingling, and numbness in hands and feet. Potent antioxidant protection. Neutralizes free radical damage. Helps enable regenerative processes in damaged cells. Replenishes vital minerals. Natural Pain Relief Cream Specifications: Size: 4 oz.", "We have put together this handy Jewelry Helper Accessory Kit to assist with your necklace and earring needs. This Kit Contains: 1 -Hooker - Style No. 1300 - Our 3 In 1 Fastener. Bracelet Fastener, Zipper Assist and Button Pull. 2 - Magnetic Jewelry Clasps (1 Gold, 1 Silver). 2 - Adjustable Necklace Extenders (1 Gold, 1 Silver) Adjustable 3-6 Inches. 4 - Sheets Of Repair-A-Tear And 8 Earring Stabilizers.", "Additional insert for Wheelchair Amputee Board for Double Amputee. Insert measures 6 x 28 inches with a 6W x 9L x 3H inch vinyl covered pad. Wheelchair Double Amputee Board Insert Features: Additional insert for Wheelchair Amputee Board for Double Amputee. Wheelchair Double Amputee Board Insert Specifications: Insert measures 6 x 28 inches. 6W x 9L x 3H inch vinyl covered pad.", "The Rotating Round Shower Stool is ideal for narrow tubs or shower stalls, anywhere where a regular chair won't fit. Seat rotates 360 degrees in either direction making it easy to enter and exit the shower. This seat is all plastic, so it won't rust. Wide 18\" footprint and non-skid, suction cup feet hold the chair securely in place. Height adjusts from 16\" to 21\". Diameter of seat is 16\". Supports up to 300 lbs. Rotating Round Shower Stool Features: Swivel seat rotates 360 degrees in both directions providing freedom of movement within the shower. Provides a safe, comfortable seat for people who have difficulty standing for any length of time. Conveniently sized to fit into small spaces. Easy to assemble; no tools required. Non-slip feet hold it securely in place. Rotating Round Shower Stool Specifications: Height adjustable legs: 16 to 21\" (40.64 to 53.24 cm). Seat diameter: 16? (40.64). Supports up to: 300 lbs. Ships via UPS Ground. Non-returnable hygiene item.", "The Key Turner Kit makes keys easier to hold and turn. The kit contains strips of low temperature thermoplastic for creating custom handles that make keys comfortable to grasp and turn. Ideal for people with limited hand strength and dexterity due to arthritis.When heated in a pan on your stove-top, the material becomes soft and pliable and can be molded onto keys for a custom fit. Kit includes material for 4 keys and a chain to link keys together. Key Turner Kit Features: Ideal for people with limited hand strength and dexterity. When heated, the material becomes soft and pliable and can be molded onto keys for a custom fit. Key Turner Kit Specifications: Kit includes: material for 4 keys. Heating method: stove-top.", "The Maddox Professional Helper Knife is a rocker knife designed for use by individuals with upper extremity disabilities or use of only one hand. This knife requires predominantly downward pressure and minimal rocking motion to cut. The knife has a weighted blade with a hollow ground 440 stainless steel edge. The knife is designed on a vertical axial plane design that provides control when pushing down, limiting slippage and increasing force. The tall wood and epoxy handle keeps hands and fingers suspended above the cutting area and the groove notch at the top provides a thumb index centering the hand above the blade for single hand use. In addition, the handle provides sufficient surface area for two hands to clasp the sides of the handle and generate cutting force. The knife includes a snap-on, snap-off Kydex sheath for transport and storage. Maddox Professional Helper Knife Features: Rocker knife designed for use by individuals with upper extremity disabilities or use of only one hand. Requires predominantly downward pressure and minimal rocking motion to cut. Weighted blade with a hollow ground 440 stainless steel edge. Handle keeps hands and fingers suspended above the cutting area. Snap-off Kydex sheath for transport and storage. Maddox Professional Helper Knife Specifications: Dimensions: 6.25 inches long and the handle is 4.25 inches tall. Weight: 5.1 ounces.", "The Swivel Car Seat Cushion helps to reduce pain on the back, hips and knees when getting out of a car. It is ideal for car seats, the seat rotates 360 degrees for a smooth and easy transfer from a sitting to standing position. The Swivel Cushion comes with a soft quilted padding cover and a non-slip base that keeps the cushion in place. Swivel Car Seat Cushion Features: Comfortable rotating car cushion. Reduces harmful twisting motion. Conforms to any car seat. Low profile and portable. Non-slip bottom surface. Swivel Car Seat Cushion Specifications: Product weight: 3 lbs. Weight capacity: 300 lbs. Material: Cotton and Nylon.", "Naturally relaxing Eucalyptus Dead Sea Mineral Bathing Salt , 2 lb. jar. Purifying Eucalyptus helps clear the sinuses naturally. Masada Dead Sea Mineral Salts are concentrated with beneficial minerals that work to detoxify the body, stimulate circulation, ease aching muscles and joints, soften the skin, and provide deep relaxation. Masada salts have been physician recommended for over 25 years. User-friendly unbreakable jar. Eucalyptus Scented Dead Sea Mineral Bathing Salt Features: Helps clear the sinuses naturally. Works to detoxify the body. Helps stimulate circulation. Helps relieve athlete's foot, corns, calluses. Acts as a natural anti-bacterial. Eucalyptus Scented Dead Sea Mineral Bathing Salt Specifications: Size: 2 lbs. Mineral concentration: Magnesium Chloride (MC12) 34.0% Potassium Chloride (KC1) 23.0% Calcium Chloride (CaC12) 0.7% Bromides (as Br) 0.4%", "The Wheelchair Amputee Board provides a leg rest for below knee amputee. It helps to maintain comfort and proper positioning of the stump to assist in preventing knee flexion contracture of the amputated limb and edema in the stump. This durable 5-ply birch plywood box is designed to be placed under the wheelchair cushion to provide maximum comfort and support to the user. The Amputee Board comes with one insert. An additional insert is available for a double amputee. Insert measures 6 in. x 28 in. with a 6 in. x 9 in. x 3 in. vinyl covered pad. The vinyl covered pad provides maximum support to the affected limb. Finish is lacquered natural wood. The box is available in dimensions of 16 x 16 x 1 and 16 x 18 x 1 inches. For double amputee, order amputee board and additional insert. Wheelchair Amputee Board Features: Supports and protects residual limbs of below-knee amputees. Helps reduce stump swelling and the formation of dependent edema. Helps prevent knee-flexion contracture. Wheelchair Amputee Board Specifications: Insert measures: 6W x 28L inches. Pad measures 6W x 9L x 3H inches.", "Sweep up dust and dirt without having to bend over with the Long-Handled Dust Pan & Broom . The Long-Handled Dust Pan & Broom measures 35 1/2\" (88.9cm) tall. Dust pan measures 11 1/2\" (28cm) wide.The brush attaches to the dust pan handle for convenient storage. Dust pan has deep walls to hold dirt. The ergonomic handle helps prevent wrist/hand strain. Long Handled Dust Pan & Broom with Ergo Handle Features: Extra-long broom handle reduces reaching and bending. Dustpan and broom snap together for easy storage. Ergonomic handles for added comfort. Large dust pan for bigger jobs. Long Handled Dust Pan & Broom with Ergo Handle Specifications: Broom: 7\" x 2\". Dust pan: 10\" x 9\" x 2\". Pole: 30\". Includes pan and broom.", "The Squiggle Wiggle Writer is a battery operated vibrating pen that allows the creative writer to turn straight lines into a series of loops, circles, or curves, depending on how closely it is held to the writing surface. It gives the user tactile stimulation and encourages appropriate grasp.Occupational Therapists and Developmental Therapists love these with young writers. Great input as the pen wiggles but also has proprioceptive input as the pen itself is weighted! Squiggle Wiggle Writer Features: Triangular in shape and weighted, this is a great tool for developing pen and pencil grasp. Outrageously fun curly-cue writing and drawing. Designed for use by children with upper extremity fine motor disabilities. Squiggle Wiggle Writer Specifications: Includes four different color refills. Uses a single AA battery, not included. Colors may vary.", "The Posey Geri Chair Comfy Seat adds seating comfort and helps prevent skin breakdown. Covers openings in a wheelchair to help prevent pinching. The soft, fiber-filled cushion easily attaches to wheelchairs with ties. Reinforced openings allow use of a positioning belt. Posey Geri Chair Comfy Seat Features: Adds seating comfort and helps prevent skin breakdown. Soft micro-fiber filling for added comfort. Easily attaches to geri-chairs with ties. Reinforced slits allow use of a positioning belt. Posey Geri Chair Comfy Seat Specifications: Meets CA #117 flame retardancy standards. Attaches with ties. Machine washable.", "The Pill Turtle Organizer XL Pill Organizer features a reminder alarm to help people take their medicine on time. This medication organizer has 7 large compartments with raised letters and Braille markings. The pill case is a large capacity weekly pillbox with one compartment per day and up to 4 daily alarms.Easy to handle, easy to hear and easy to open compartments. Set the alarms once and they auto repeat every day (no reset required). Never forget to take your medications again. Feel better. Avoid medication errors by organizing all your medicine once a week. Weekly Pill Turtle Organizer XL with Reminder Alarm Features: Alarm Reminder can be set up to 4 times a day. Easy to read raised letters and Braille markings. Large digital readout and back light. Reminder clock and timer. Weekly Pill Turtle Organizer XL with Reminder Alarm Specifications: 7 Daily Pillboxes. Dimensions: 8 1/8 inches wide, 4 5/8 inches high, x 1 1/8 inches deep. Uses 2 AAA batteries, included.", "The PocketDresser is a combination button hook, zipper pull, and button aid designed for use by individuals with fine motor or upper extremity disabilities. The device incorporates a large button-hook, a small button-hook, a zipper pick, and a closed loop buttoning aid, all of which fold into a pocket-knife-style handle. The zipper pick functions as a zipper pull and can be used to free a buried zipper tab or untie knotted shoelaces.A spring-tensioned design secures the tools to the handle and allows for wear over time. A loop on the handle aids in grasping the device. All four tools are manufactured from fully-hardened 301 stainless steel and will flex slightly and maintain their original shape. Open triangles above each tool are consecutively indexed to allow identification by touch or feel. A pocket clip is included to secure the tools in a pocket or purse. PocketDresser Features: All PocketDressers are shipped with an installed black strap. Four tools in one pocketknife style tool. Accommodates a wide range of button and zipper sizes. Lightweight and easy to use. PocketDresser Specifications: DIMENSIONS: The strap is 10 millimeters and the triangles are 15 millimeters. Weighs just 4.1 ounces. Closed Length: 124mm / 4 7/8 in. Open Length: 219mm 8 5/8 in.", "The U-Bend-It Utensils are the perfect bendable eating utensils, fork and spoon, for people with upper extremity weakness or reduced range of motion. These stainless steel utensils feature a twist in the shaft that allows them to be easily hand-bent to the left or the right at any angle comfortable to the user. Angling the utensil also helps to reduce wrist strain. The built-up handle is contoured and textured, making it easy to hold and comfortable to use for people with wrist or hand ailments. A tab on the end can be used to attach a wrist strap. Handle is made of polypropylene. Top rack dishwasher safe. Measures 8-1/2? Long x 1-1/2? Wide.The spoon and fork are sold separately. U-Bend-It Bendable Fork and Spoon Features: Easy to bend to your ideal angle. Durable stainless steel. Built-up contoured handle. Top rack dishwasher safe. U-Bend-It Bendable Fork and Spoon Specifications: Product dimensions: 8.5 inch L x 1.5 inch W.", "The Placard Hanger?s J-hook design fastens safely and securely to the neck of your rear-view mirror. That area is not even visible from the driver?s seat, and it is the main reason why parking tags often tear during the process. Simply hang your placard on the J-hook and GO, it?s that easy! Fits ANY vehicle! Don?t you wish that parking tag of yours would just slip on and off your mirror as easy as a warm knife cuts butter? Well now, for less than the price of a coffee and donut, it can. Invented by a handicapped placard owner who became very frustrated every time he tried to hang his parking tag from the mirror, this ingenious product has made life a lot easier for many people. As you know, the mirror arm that these parking tags hang from cannot be seen from the driver?s seat. That means you have to lean forward, crank your head and neck and basically twist your body into positions it was never designed to be in just so you can see where to hang your tag. You know what I?m talking about. It?s a real pain in the ?you know what?. Some folks are so bothered by the pain and struggle of hanging their placards, they just leave them up all the time. Maybe you know someone who drives around with their handicapped placard hanging off the mirror. Maybe you?ve even done it yourself. Handicap Placard Hanger Features: Makes it easy to display and remove your placard. No Need to Stretch, Twist or Struggle. Easy, simple, painless. Designed to stay cool even in scorching hot interiors in the middle of the summer. Handicap Placard Hanger Specifications: Installs: on ANY Vehicle.", "The MED-E-LERT Electronic Pill Reminder, Organizer & Dispenser is a medication reminder and automated pill dispenser in one easy to use device. The most affordable device of its kind, the Med-E-Lert Automatic Pill Dispenser is ideal for use in both the home and care centers. The Med-E-Lert Automatic Pill Dispenser gives patients, caregivers, and loved ones peace of mind by ensuring that only the prescribed dose of medication is available and patient compliance is achieved. Designed with safety and convenience in mind, the Med-E-Lert Automatic Pill Dispenser features a secured, tamper-proof, locking key system to avoid over-medication. With 28 medication compartments, the Med-E-Lert Automatic Pill Dispenser can be used for medication taken up to 4 times daily. Three different alarm tones and a blinking light alert the patient when medication needs to be taken and will not turn off until the pill dispenser is tilted on its side to dispense the pills. The Med-E-Lert Automatic Pill Dispenser includes three discs that can be inserted to indicate the day of the week and the time of day depending on the number of doses needed daily. Despite its compact size, the Med-E-Lert Automatic Pill Dispenser also features the largest pill compartments of any other pill dispenser. The Med-E-Lert Automatic Pill Dispenser is designed especially for people with complicated daily medical regimes. Medical care facilities can enjoy the savings the Med-E-Lert Automatic Pill Dispenser brings them by reducing the need for personnel to distribute medication. MED-E-LERT Electronic Pill Reminder & Dispenser Features: Easy to SET-UP. SIMPLE to use. Long Duration Buzzer Sounds Continuously Until The Pills Are Removed. Compartment Size 20% Larger Than Other Automatic Pill Dispensers. Safe - Lockable With KEY. Tamper Proof (Unable To Get To Medications Before It Is Time). Low battery Alarm - Batteries Included. MED-E-LERT Electronic Pill Reminder & Dispenser Specifications: Compartment Size: Holds Up To 18 Aspirin Size Pills. Dimensions: 8 inches diameter by 1.5 inches high. Number of Compartments: 28. Capacity: ONE Week's Supply Of Pills Up To FOUR Times per Day. Alarm: LOUD SOUND + Blinking Light.", "The Hip Chair was designed to benefit the person with partial or total hip replacement, arthritis, or knee surgery to provide comfort in sitting and standing up from the seated position. Its perfect height allows for minimum movement of the hip. Hip Chair Features: For those with recent hip surgery. Can also use as a shower chair. Blow-molded plastic seat and back with textured finish. Rust-proof, high-strength, polished aluminum frame. Height is adjustable. Hip Chair Specifications: Seat Size: 18.75 x 13 inches. Seat Height: 25 - 28.75 inches. Base Width: 20 - 20.5 inches. Base Depth: 23 - 24.5 inches. Seat to Top of Back: 12.5 inches. Armrest Height from Floor: 30 - 34 inches. Seat to Top of Arm: 5.5 inches. Distance Between Armrests: 18.75 inches. Weight Capacity: 250 lbs. Non returnable hygiene item. Item ships via UPS Ground.", "Naturally relaxing Unscented Dead Sea Mineral Bathing Salt , 2 lb. jar. Masada Dead Sea Mineral Salts are concentrated with beneficial minerals that work to detoxify the body, stimulate circulation, ease aching muscles and joints, soften the skin, and provide deep relaxation. Masada salts have been physician recommended for over 25 years. User-friendly unbreakable jar. Unscented Dead Sea Mineral Bathing Salt Features: Helps soothe itching, burning skin irritations. Works to detoxify the body. Helps stimulate circulation. Helps relieve athlete's foot, corns, calluses. Acts as a natural anti-bacterial. Unscented Dead Sea Mineral Bathing Salt Specifications: Size: 2 lbs. Mineral concentration: Magnesium Chloride (MC12) 34.0% Potassium Chloride (KC1) 23.0% Calcium Chloride (CaC12) 0.7% Bromides (as Br) 0.4%", "The Combination Dressing Stick and Shoehorn is simple in design but comes in very handy for removing clothes and shoes. Specially angled large hook holds and pulls clothing without the clothing slipping off. Two pushers work well for removing shoes and clothes. The long shoehorn has a notch for taking off socks. This combo dressing aid can also be used for pushing and pulling drawers, doors and other items, turning on and off light switches, and retrieving clothing from beds, floors and closets. It also makes a great back scratch-er. Made of hard, sturdy plastic and measures 24\" in length. Dressing stick also has a hole designed for easy hanging. Combination Dressing Stick and Shoehorn Features: Specially angled large hook that holds and pulls clothing without the clothing slipping off. 2 pushers for removing shoes and clothing. Long shoehorn with a notch for taking off socks. Combination Dressing Stick and Shoehorn Specifications: Length: 24\" (60.96 cm).", "The Patriot Leg Lifter gives many increased freedom of mobility and can assist you in moving your legs around in the bed while lying down or sitting down. Leg lifters can help you reposition your legs in chairs, wheelchairs and scooters and are invaluable in transferring from a chair to a wheelchair or scooter, then to bed.The loop is placed around the foot or cast and can be re-positioned by the user. Patriot Leg Lifter Features: Pre-formed foot support with a heavy guage wire insert that can be modified by bending it to the desired shape. Rein- forced webbing with metal rod will extend the user?s reach to assist in lifting one leg at a time. Patriot Leg Lifter Specifications: Made with 1 inch heavy duty webbing. 40 inches long. Color: red, white and blue.", "The Tub Mounted Swivel Shower Seat turns 360 degrees, and locks every 90° allowing easier entry to and exit from seat. Seat mounts to most tub walls for space savings in smaller bathrooms.Arm Rests are optional. Tub Mounted Swivel Shower Seat Features: Bench mounts to most tub walls for space savings in smaller bathrooms. Rust-proof, high-strength, polished aluminum frame. Blow-molded plastic seat and back with textured finish. Tub Mounted Swivel Shower Seat Specifications: Seat Size: 20.25 x 18.5 inches. Back Size: 17 x 15 inches. Base Width: 26.5 inches. Base Depth: 27.5 to 31.5 inches. Distance Between Arms: 16.5 inches. Weight Capacity: 250 lbs. Item ships via UPS Ground. Non-returnable hygiene item.", "The innovative mounting style of our Safe T Mate Rear Anti Tippers provide a universal fit. The unique sliding adjustment allows for easy transfer between various makes and models of chair and permits you to position them at any height that you deem appropriate. Made from solid bar stock with 2 inch diameter easy gliding wheels. 10 full inches of height adjustment. Wheelchair Rear Anti Tipper Features: Helps prevent wheelchairs from tipping backward. Offers 10 full inches of infinite height adjustment. Wheelchair Rear Anti Tipper Specifications: Wheels: 2 inch diameter easy gliding. Height adjustment: 10 inches.", "The Posey Extra Large Positioning Wedges are ideal for keeping bed-ridden patients repositioned, eliminating pressure points over the bony prominences and reducing the incidence of pressure ulcers. Lightweight positioning Wedges provide both positioning support and comfort.Positioning edges can be easily placed in position and unlike foam pillows, it is possible to turn the patient without assistance by using the wedges. The unique construction of an outer vinyl mesh, breathable fabric shell and a non-absorbent, polystyrene bead fill allows air to flow through the wedge, eliminating the discomfort of conventional foam pillows, which build up heat. All the Wedges feature a zippered closure, enabling beads to be added or removed for patient accommodation. Posey X-Large Lateral Wedge Features: Ideal for keeping bed-ridden patients repositioned, eliminating pressure points over the bony prominences and reducing the incidence of pressure ulcers. Lightweight, polystyrene filled wedges offer both positioning support and comfort. Posey X-Large Lateral Wedge Specifications: Large lateral wedge measures 23L x 7W x 9H inches. Machine washable. One per package. Non returnable if packaging is opened.", "The Ingrid Cane or Crutch Tip with Retractable Spike is designed and manufactured in Sweden, the cane or crutch tip is made of high quality polyurethane and provides an excellent grip both indoors and outdoors. The retractable spike is made of stainless steel and will not rust. The Retractable Spike provides a firm grip on snow, ice and most other outdoor surfaces. Spike easily retracts for use during summer months or while indoors. Retracted spike will not damage floors. The tread pattern at the bottom of the tip does not wear as quickly as a conventional can or crutch tips. Inside the tip is a rust proof zinc-plated washer that prevents the cane or crutch from wearing through the tip. The tip has a patented elastic neck that adjusts to the dimension of the cane or crutch shaft making it easy for the user to replace or substitute tips as needed. Retractable Ice & Snow Spike Tip for Canes & Crutches Features: Provides a firm grip on snow, ice and most other outdoor surfaces. Retracted spike will not damage floors. Easy to install. Retractable Ice & Snow Spike Tip for Canes & Crutches Specifications: Fits: cane or crutch shafts measuring 5/8 inch - 7/8 inch (16 - 22 millimeters). Color: Black. One per package.", "Thanks to having both a hook and a prop, the INGRID Cane Holder lets you hang your walking cane or crutch on chairs, shopping carts, tables, counter tops, etc.The INGRID Cane Holder was developed in 1998 following consultation with Swedish experts in design and steel manufacturing, resulting in a unique combination of elegance and function. The walking cane holder is made of high quality thermoplastic rubber (Santoprene) and has a stainless steel spring specifically designed for the Cane Holder. It has a simple snap-on fitting and may be attached by users with reduced muscular strength. INGRID Cane Holder :: Walking Cane Holder Features: Simple snap-on fitting. Lets you hang your cane or crutch on chairs, shopping carts, tables, counter tops, etc. INGRID Cane Holder :: Walking Cane Holder Specifications: Fits cane sizes: 19-25 mm (3/4\"-1\").", "The Wright Stuff Gift Certificates are convenient, practical and make great gifts for friends and family. Gift certificates may be used toward the purchase of any item in our product selection simply by visiting our website. Paying extra for rush postage or worrying that your gift may arrive late will not be a factor because gift certificates are delivered via email once the payer information is verified.Please allow for one business day for verification.*Gift Certificates are not redeemable in cash and expire after 6 months.", "The Bath One Shower Commode Chair is a multi-purpose, shower chair and commode to help improve positioning and safety during toileting and bathing. It increases safety and stability while transferring a person with special needs in the bathroom and also eliminates the need for multiple pieces of costly equipment. Its ease of use and compact size also make the Bath One Shower Commode Chair a perfect travel companion. Simply unsnap the legs and back of the seat. When it is time to reassemble, just snap the pieces back together. This commode chair is perfect for home use, camping, and even when traveling. It is built to withstand up to 250 lbs. The polished aluminum legs, molded plastic seat and back ensure that the commode will not rust. The seat is comfortable and covered with a textured anti-slip cover. ***ARMRESTS ARE NOT INCLUDED - SOLD SEPERATELY. Bath One Travel Commode Chair Features: Great for travel, camping, visiting family. Compact storage ? 20.5 x 18.5 x 4 inches. Molded plastic seat and back, aluminum legs ? no rust. Bucket with lid, splash guard included. Optional arms/urine splash cap attach quickly. Bath One Travel Commode Chair Specifications: Seat Size: 20.25 x 18.5 inches. Seat Height: 14.25 - 19.25 inches. Base Width: 18.5 - 18.75 inches. Base Depth: 19 - 20 inches. Required Clearance: 11.5 - 16.5 inches. Seat to Top of Back: 15.5 inches. Armrest Height from Floor: 21.25 to 26.25 inches. Seat to Top of Arm: 7 inches. Distance Between Armrests: 16.5 inches. Weight Capacity: 250 lbs. Non-returnable hygiene item. Item ships via UPS Ground.", "The 4 inch Tile Grip Grab Bar from Bridge Medical easily installs and removes without any tools or professional installation. The powerful commercial-grade rubber suction cups strongly adhere to smooth, flat, non-porous surfaces. It is the strongest and most reliable suction grip grab bar on the market today. Four Inch Tile Telescoping Portable Grab Bar Features: Telescoping Handle extends to adapt to most any tile configuration. Installs without tools or expensive professional installation. Tested and approved by health professionals including orthopedic surgeons and occupational therapists. High Quality 3.7\" Rubber Suction Cups provide a very strong hold. Install and remove anytime just about anywhere. Four Inch Tile Telescoping Portable Grab Bar Specifications: Suction Cup Diameter: 3.7 inch. Length: adjust from 15 to 18 inches.", "Optional ArmRests for the Bath One Shower Chair attach easily and quickly.Armrests only. The chair is sold separately. Bath One Shower Chair and Commode ArmRest Features: Attach easily and quickly. Bath One Shower Chair and Commode ArmRest Specifications: Fits: Bath One Shower and Commode Chairs, CEH7200, CEH71000, CEH67762 and CEH67993. Armrest sold as: a pair. Non-returnable hygiene item. Item ships via UPS Ground.", "The Bath One Shower Chair is a lightweight chair with height adjustability and a wide seating surface. Sturdy, lightweight, aluminum frame resists rusting. Legs adjust in increments with just a push of a button to an ideal height between 14.25 and 19.25 inches. Textured, molded seat and backrest with built in handholds provide extra safety. Rubber feet grip even wet surfaces. A very popular bath safety item. This portable shower chair is great for traveling. It is easy to assemble, the legs and back snap in place and can be put in luggage when traveling. The Bath One Shower Chair allows the legs and back to clip to the seat, folding up neatly for easy travels. ***ARMRESTS ARE NOT INCLUDED - SOLD SEPERATELY Bath One Shower Chair :: Travel Shower Chair Features Great for travel, camping, visiting family. Easy to assemble ? legs and back snap in place. For convenient carrying, legs and back clip to seat. Compact storage ? 20.5 x 18.5 x 4 inches. Molded plastic seat and back, aluminum legs ? no rust. Bath One Shower Chair :: Travel Shower Chair Specifications Seat Size: 20.25 x 18.5 inches. Seat Height: 14.25 - 19.25 inches. Base Width: 18.5 - 18.75 inches. Base Depth: 19 - 20 inches. Seat to Top of Back: 15.5 inches. Armrest Height from Floor: 21.25- 26.25 inches. Seat to Top of Arm: 7 inches. Distance Between Armrests: 16.5 inches. Weight Capacity: 250 lbs. Non returnable hygiene item. Item ships via UPS Ground.", "HTA (Heat Therapy Activator) Pain Relief Spray is the first in a family of heat activated analgesic products that have been clinically tested and proven to deliver effective and deeply penetrating pain relief. Quick, deep penetrating relief from arthritis pain, joint stiffness and muscle aches is just a spray away. Unlike pain pills that take up to 20 minutes to act, this aloe-based, all-natural pain reliever - applied directly to the source of pain - works in seconds. Use with MediBeads Moist Heat Wraps to enhance absorption. This pain relief spray is odorless, stainless, grease less and irritation free. Heat Therapy Activator all-natural ingredients include: Aloe Vera: A natural first-aid gel and anti-inflammatory that penetrates deeply while moisturizing and soothing. Chamomile: An all-natural anti-inflammatory and anti-microbial that has a soothing and calming effect on the skin. Everlasting: A natural anti-inflammatory agent and analgesic sometimes used in the treatment of eczema and psoriasis. Buckthorn: A moisturizing treatment used for dry skin disorders and to reduce skin damage caused by sunburn. Allantoin: A skin protector, conditioning agent and cell proliferation agent that assists in the formation of new skin tissue. HTA (Heat Therapy Activator) Pain Relief Spray Features: Helps reduce painful inflammation. Application of heat enhances absorption of active ingredients. Helps increase circulation to flush away harmful chemicals that cause pain. Helps promote healing and helps restore muscles to their natural and healthy state. HTA (Heat Therapy Activator) Pain Relief Spray Specifications: Size: 4 oz spray bottle. Made in: USA.", "These specially made Therapy Gloves are a great way to help relieve the pain associated with arthritis. They provide light compression to help relieve swelling, as well as a layer to keep the skin warm - which can help reduce pain. The material is thin enough to be worn during daily activities and leaves your fingertips free.Black with red trim. Women's Arthritis Therapy Gloves Features: Great for Arthritis Sufferers. Women's Arthritis Therapy Gloves Specifications: Comes in pairs.", "These colorful Pen & Pencil Weights assist sensory motor planning. Adding weight to a writing instument provides feedback for those with difficulty in vestibular or proprioceptive processing. O-Rings secure the weights and allow positioning anywhere on the writing instrument. Daily use of these colorful pen and pencil weights makes writing easier for people with difficulty processing fine motor skills necessary for proper handwriting. These writing utensil weights provide feedback for those with difficulty in vestibular, proprioceptive processing, or sensory motor feedback. Not for use with small children, or any children prone to placing items in mouth due to choking hazzard. Pen & Pencil Weight Kit Features: Assist sensory motor planning. Provides feedback for those with difficulty in vestibular or proprioceptive processing. Pen & Pencil Weight Kit Specifications: Weights are approximately 1.5 ounces. O-Rings secure the weight to the writing instrument. Kit includes: 6 Pencil Weights, 3 Pencil Grips and one dozen #2 Pencils.", "The Snap-N-Save Sliding Transfer Bench with Padded Seat and Back eases the process of getting in and out of the bathtub. It consists of a plastic molded seat with attached sliding rings, left and right leg frame, a backrest, two sliding rails and four legs. Patented design makes assembly easier and structure more solid for higher weight capacity. Ideal for traveling. Bench slides for easy mobility. Backrest is adjustable for left or right facing tubs. Durable lightweight aluminum frame. Locking mechanism for stability during transfer. Sliding Transfer Bench with Padded Seat and Back Features: Padded seat and back. Heat-sealed upholstery resists moisture penetration. Very easy to assemble, no tools required. Strong suction tipped legs. Backrest can be installed on either side of seat. Velcro closing lap safety belt. Sliding Transfer Bench with Padded Seat and Back Specifications: Seat Size: 17.5 x 13.5 x 1.5 inches. Seat Height: 18.5 - 22.75 inches. Base Width: 39 - 40 inches. Base Depth: 18.5 - 20.5 inches. Required Clearance: 14 - 18.5 inches. Back Height from Floor: 30.5 - 35 inches. Weight Capacity: 400 lbs. Item ships via UPS Ground. Non-returnable hygiene item.", "The MediBeads Carpal Cuff helps prevent and treat repetitive motion injury. It's unique design ensures comfortable and proper positioning of the wrist. Simply place the Carpal Cuff in the microwave for 30 seconds and the patented MediBeads are ready to provide doctor-recommended moist heat therapy. The Carpal Cuff helps relieve the pain associated with arthritis, joint pain, tendonitis, hand stiffness, and carpal tunnel syndrome. MediBeads, formed through a proprietary process that infuses the beads with a natural antibacterial agent, stay clean and odor-free. The Cuff adapts well to all wrist sizes and is comfortabl enough to wear during typing or range of motion exercises. MediBeads Carpal Cuff Features: Designed to help prevent and treat pain caused by Carpal Tunnel Syndrome. Unlike other grain and pellet products, MediBeads need no special covers, they will not dry out, dissolve or disintegrate. When microwaved, MediBeads draw moisture from the air and release it as clean, deeply-penetrating moist heat - no need to add water. Can be used for cold therapy. Washable and reusable. MediBeads Carpal Cuff Specifications: Measures: 4.5 x 4.5 inches. Care Instructions: Hand wash in a mild detergent and allow to air dry 24 hours. Material: Non-toxic and latex free. Made in: USA.", "The CleanWave® UV-C Portable Sanitizing Wand lets you sanitize your home away from home. Hotel rooms contain billions of germs, bacteria and viruses left by countless guests. Fresh towels and sheets don?t always assure clean. Use the Portable Wand on hotel room bedding, telephones, remote controls, door knobs and bathroom surfaces to eliminate the germs and bacteria waiting for you when you check in. Outside the hotel, it?s invaluable too. Public restrooms, headrests on planes and trains, all benefit from the sanitizing properties of UV-C light. Portable Sanitizing Wand Features: Push button operation. Built in light to indicate unit is active. Wrist strap for ease of use. Low battery warning light. One year limited manufacturer warranty. Portable Sanitizing Wand Specifications: Dimensions: 10.39 inches H x 1.5 inches W . Weight: 0.3 lbs. Uses four AA batteries (not included). Portable Sanitizing Wand Instruction Manual", "These specially made Therapy Gloves are a great way to help relieve the pain associated with arthritis. They provide light compression to help relieve swelling, as well as a layer to keep the skin warm - which can help reduce pain. The material is thin enough to be worn during daily activities and leaves your fingertips free.Black with red trim. Men's Arthritis Therapy Gloves Features: Great for Arthritis Sufferers. Lightweight neoprene for day-long comfort. Men's Arthritis Therapy Gloves Specifications: Comes in pairs.", "The Shower Chair with Arms, Back and Replaceable Cut Out Seat features a seat with a replaceable cut out for personal washing. This shower chair offers stability, comfort, and tool free assembly. The legs are fully adjustable and can be adjusted in 1 inch increments. Shower Chair with Arms, Back and Replaceable Cut Out Seat Features: Replaceable cut out seat aids in perinea washing. Rust-proof, high-strength, polished aluminum frame. Suction tipped legs prevent movement on wet surfaces. Legs are height adjustable. Shower Chair with Arms, Back and Replaceable Cut Out Seat Specifications: Seat Size: 19 x 14.5 inches. Seat Height: 16 - 20 inches. Base Width: 18.5 - 19.25 inches. Base Depth: 18 - 20 inches. Seat to Top of Back: 12.5 inches. Armrest Height from Floor: 21.5- 25.5 inches. Seat to Top of Arm: 5.5 inches. Distance Between Armrests: 18.75 inches Weight Capacity: 350 lbs. Ships via UPS Ground. Non-returnable hygiene item.", "The Snap-N-Save Sliding Transfer Bench with Molded Cut Out Seat is equipped with a non-slip surface, lightweight aluminum frame and adjustable height in 1/2\" increments. The cut-out section in the seat can be easily removed and replaced as needed for perineal washing. This transfer bench can be used as a cut-out seat or a regular molded seat after placing the center section. The Sliding Transfer Bench with 2 in 1 Cut Out Molded Seat slides smoothly over polished, high-strength aluminum tubes. The sliding transfer bench has rust-proof, all-aluminum construction. It's height is adjustable to accomodate both your needs and bathtub clearance. Sliding Transfer Bench with Molded Cut-Out Seat Features: Very easy to assemble, no tools required. Bench slides for easy mobility. Strong suction tipped legs. Velcro closing lap safety belt. Removable center section for perineal washing. Backrest can be installed on either side of seat. Plastic model seats have a larger seating area and come with a Shower Head Holder. Sliding Transfer Bench with Molded Cut-Out Seat Specifications: Seat Width: 19 inches. Seat Depth: 14.5 inches. Base Width: 39.5 - 41 inches. Base Depth: 19.5 ? 21.5 inches. Required Clearance: 15 - 19 inches. Back Height from floor: 32.5 - 37 inches. Weight Capacity: 400 lbs. Non returnable hygiene item.Item ships via UPS Ground.", "The PocketDresser is a combination button hook, zipper pull, and button aid designed for use by individuals with fine motor or upper extremity disabilities. The device incorporates a large button-hook, a small button-hook, a zipper pick, and a closed loop buttoning aid, all of which fold into a pocket-knife-style handle. The zipper pick functions as a zipper pull and can be used to free a buried zipper tab or untie knotted shoelaces.A spring-tensioned design secures the tools to the handle and allows for wear over time. A loop on the handle aids in grasping the device. All four tools are manufactured from fully-hardened 301 stainless steel and will flex slightly and maintain their original shape. Open triangles above each tool are consecutively indexed to allow identification by touch or feel. A pocket clip is included to secure the tools in a pocket or purse. PocketDresser Features: All PocketDressers are shipped with an installed black strap. Four tools in one pocketknife style tool. Accommodates a wide range of button and zipper sizes. Lightweight and easy to use. PocketDresser Specifications: DIMENSIONS: The strap is 10 millimeters and the triangles are 15 millimeters. Weighs just 4.1 ounces. Closed Length: 124mm / 4 7/8 in. Open Length: 219mm 8 5/8 in.", "The All-Purpose DuoGlide 8 Inch All-Purpose Chef?s Knife is an essential tool you'll use every day. Whether used for cutting, slicing, or worked in a rocking motion for chopping, the unique design makes this your go-to knife for ease and versatility. DuoGlide 8 Inch All-Purpose Chef?s Knife Features: Now you can cut, chop, or slice with greater comfort and less fatigue. Ultra-soft, right-sized handle that can be gripped in several ways for more comfort and control. Precise control for reduced wrist, arm and hand discomfort. DuoGlide 8 Inch All-Purpose Chef?s Knife Specifications: 8 inch high-carbon, stainless steel blade is individually ground and honed for the ultimate edge, corrosion resistant, designed for ultra thin slicing, and features a professional grade cross polish. Handle is soft, right-sized and textured for a secure grip, plus stain-resistant and sealed to the blade for utmost sanitation.", "Blue ink refills for the Evo Pen. Package of three.", "DVD video for persons with Alzheimer's and other Dementia. The Video for Alzheimer's Patients contains pictures of flowers along with music from the early 20th century brings back warm memories in a beautiful, relaxing format. In the fall of 2007, my mom asked if I would help keep track of her checking account. She expressed a fear of making a serious financial mistake because she had been forgetting to write entries in her ledger. My mother had never missed a payment, successfully balancing her checkbook to her 80th year. But there she was, asking me for help. This thoroughly independent lady painfully relinquished control of her finances. As time went on, she had to give up more and more control as she experienced a number of strokes and the onslaught of Alzheimer's. By the end of 2008, she could no longer live independently and moved into an assisted living facility. The doctors told her she had Alzheimer's/Dementia for a number of years, which was taking a toll on her health. She was in and out of hospitals five times in her last year. One of the hospitals provided a television channel with 24/7 videos and music. We watched for hours, and I quizzed her on the flowers and trees on the television. You see, I am a landscape designer with a background in horticulture. My mom got me interested in plants at a young age. She helped me get a job at a local nursery when I was 13 years old. One day in the hospital, I thought about using the thousands of flower photographs I have taken over the years to make a DVD video for persons with Alzheimer's and other dementia. The pictures of flowers along with music from the early 20th Century bring back warm memories in a beautiful, relaxing format. The video is 60 minutes long and has over 400 high-quality images of flowers. Some pictures include birds, bees or butterflies. The music consists of classics such as America The Beautiful, Shine On Harvest Moon, Just A Closer Walk, A Bicycle Built For Two, Amazing Grace, and God Be With You Till We Meet Again. My mother lost her battle with Alzheimer's in June of 2009, but her legacy lives on through the video by helping others appreciate the beauty of God's creation. Alzheimer's Video Beautiful Floral Memories Features: Video: 60 minutes long. Images over 400 high-quality images of flowers, birds, bees, or butterflies.", "The design of the EzGrip pen allows writing to be comfortable and effortless. Using the ergonomic EzGrip® ResQ Gel Pen is a unique experience -- not only for its writing abilities ? described as ??floating on paper,? but having the distinction as a pen that cradles and conforms to your extended finger and tip. Only the slightest touch of that one first finger tip is needed to provide downward writing pressure. Like touching a computer key ? but lighter. The other fingers can just \"go along for the ride.\" It?s not the usual everyday writing experience, but one more comfortable and advanced.The gel ink is closest to fountain pen ink or rollerball in it's writing characteristics. It flows smoothly, and dries quickly.By using the EzGrip ResQ Gel Pen, it?s possible to never again get writer?s cramp ? never again contemplate the onset of any \"Itis\" ? Tendonitis, Arthritis? or repetitive Stress Injuries (RSI?s) such as Carpal Tunnel Syndrome. In practical terms it also means that even having those conditions will not matter. Their mechanisms or weaknesses will not enter into the writing process. The EzGrip pen is often called the \"miracle pen\" for persons with arthritis, tendonitis, other hand problems or cramping. It neutralizes hand difficulties immediately. Here?s How: Using the EzGrip ergonomic pen as described, the built-in mechanisms within our hands and arms that create those weaknesses are actually disconnected or bypassed.The patented EzGrip enables the individual to switch positions, relying on other fingers. Many of us write in personal ways ? with different finger holds. The EzGrip allows users to switch fingers at any time to adapt to their individual style of writing. More specifically, the side of the thumb can be used for downward writing pressure ? even the middle finger knuckle. There is no incorrect way to hold and use an EzGrip. It?s your choice. And it's a choice that can save you pain and discomfort. Uses Parker style refills. EzGrip ResQ Gel Pen Features: Clinically tested ergonomic design. EzGrip pen helps reduce writing fatigue. Requires up to 57% less pressure than standard pens. EzGrip ResQ Gel Pen Specifications: Pen color: silver w/ navy grip, soft rubber. Ink color: black. Refills: uses Parker style.", "The Accu-Grips are much-needed, state-of-the art wheelchair grips that replace the existing leg rest and wheel lock grips on manual wheelchairs. The unique design and bright yellow color enable wheelchair users and their caregivers to more readily locate the grips. Products like Accu-Grips™ do not currently exist on the market. Because the product developer worked directly with wheelchair users throughout her career as a health care provider, she noticed that the majority of her patients had difficulty seeing or feeling the original grips on their wheelchairs. Her committment to her patients and her willingness to solve this challenge led to the development of Accu-Grips™. Accu-Grips Features: Highly visible due to bright yellow color. Touch-friendly - ideal for conditions affecting the hand. Replaces wheelchair grips on most manual wheelchairs. Unique ergonomic design. Easy to install. Accu-Grips Specifications: Material: ABS plastic. 4-piece set: 2 Grips for the Wheel Locks and 2 Grips for the Leg Rests.", "Weeding is easy with the Weed Grabber . Just push the 3-prong head over the base of the weed and turn -- ratchet action makes it easy to turn a full 360 degrees-then simply pull the weed out, roots and all! Weed Grabber Features: Rip out weeds with minimal bending. Works best in soft soil. Does not work on very small weeds. Weed Grabber Specifications: Made of rust resistant aluminum with sure grip plastic handles. 20 inches long.", "This soft conforming MediBeads Compress Wrap drapes over the shoulder, neck, head, back or hips to relieve pain anywhere it strikes. Versatile wrap is secured in place with convenient soft ties. This compress can be used for moist heat or cold therapy. MediBeads are the natural choice for fast pain relief at home. Microwave activated moist heat compress wrap continuously draws moisture from the air and releases it as clean, deep penetrating moist heat. These patent pending wraps are safe and easy to use, washable, odor free, do not dry out or support bacteria growth. No added water, wires, boiling or covers needed. Medibeads Compress Wrap Features: Can be used warm or cold. Versatile wrap around design. Microwave activated and ready in just minutes. Recommended for neck, back, and shoulders. Medibeads Compress Wrap Specifications: Measures: 5.5 x 18.5 inches. Made in: USA.", "The Comfort Wipe extends your reach 15-3/4 inches for better cleaning when reaching is difficult. Ergonomically designed for ease, comfort and cleanliness. Ergonomic shape helps those with limited dexterity. A soft flexible head grips toilet paper, tissue or pre-moistened wipes securely. Unique release button for fast, sanitary disposal. Comfort Wipe Features: Ergonomic shape helps those with limited dexterity. Soft flexible head grips toilet paper, tissue or pre-moistened wipes securely. Contains a unique release button for fast, sanitary disposal. Comfort Wipe Specifications: Length - 15-3/4 inches. Due to hygiene reasons, this item is non-returnable.", "The KISS MY BACK ™ mesh back support for chairs helps provide your back with the ergonomic support it needs with its mesh back support. Its body conforming design decreases back strain and pain and makes sitting more comfortable. It's an ideal solution for the car, office or at home. The mesh fabric allows air flow to help you stay comfortable. Kiss My Back Features: Helps provide your back with ergonomic support. Body conforming design decreases back strain and pain and makes sitting more comfortable. An ideal solution for the car, office or at home. Mesh fabric allows comfortable airflow, minimizing perspiration. Comes with bungee cords to provide a secure and universal fit. Durable, lightweight and portable. Kiss My Back Specifications: Fits most chairs. Measures: 16.5 inches wide x 15 tall x 6 deep.", "The Shower Chair with Arms and Replaceable Cut Out Seat features a seat with a replaceable cut out for personal washing. This shower chair offers stability, comfort, and tool free assembly. The legs are fully adjustable and can be adjusted in 1 inch increments. Shower Chair with Arms and Replaceable Cut Out Seat Features: Replaceable cut out seat aids in perinea washing. Rust-proof, high-strength, polished aluminum frame. Suction tipped legs prevent movement on wet surfaces. Legs are height adjustable. Shower Chair with Arms and Replaceable Cut Out Seat Specifications: Seat Size: 19 x 14.5 inches. Seat Height: 16 - 20 inches. Base Width: 18.5 - 19.25 inches. Base Depth: 18 - 20 inches. Armrest Height from Floor: 21.5- 25.5 inches. Seat to Top of Arm: 5.5 inches. Distance Between Armrests: 18.75 inches Weight Capacity: 350 lbs. Ships via UPS Ground. Non-returnable hygiene item.", "The Heavy Duty Bariatric Shower Seat provides a wide and deep seating surface for those who need extra stability in the shower. This 500 pound weight capacity shower chair comes with contoured seat and backrest and adjustable height legs. Durable aluminum frame provides maximum stability for larger individuals. Heavy Duty Bariatric Shower Seat Features: Rust-proof, high-strength, polished aluminum frame. Heavy duty chair supports up to 500 lbs. Adjustable height legs. Snaps together easily and quickly without any tools for easy storage and transport. Strong suction tipped legs prevent movement on wet surfaces. Heavy Duty Bariatric Shower Seat Specifications: Seat Size: 20.25 x 18.5 inches. Seat Height: 17 - 21 inches. Base Width: 26.25 - 27.25 inches. Base Depth: 19.75 - 21.5 inches. Seat to Top of Back: 15.25 inches. Armrest Height from Floor: 22 - 26 inches. Seat to Top of Arm: 4.5 inches. Distance Between Armrests: 23.75 inches. Weight Capacity: 500 lbs. Non returnable hygiene item. Item ships via UPS Ground.", "The Toilet Roll Holder with Integrated Grab Bar from the Invisia collection is the perfect combination of style and safety. Its convenient location close to the toilet provides additional support when standing or sitting. As a toilet roll holder, you can store up to three rolls of paper. Available in chrome or a powder coated white finish. Soft lines and graceful curves blend effortlessly with practicality and function. Corian® shelves provide ample space for toilet roll storage or other items while the discrete hand rail offers trustworthy support. Note: The Invisia™ Wall Toilet Roll Holder should only be installed in areas where the mounting surface is structurally sound. If you are not equipped to undertake the outlined work we recommend that you have your Invisia™ Wall Toilet Roll Holder installed by a qualified contractor. The Invisia™ Wall Toilet Roll Holder must be secured to wall with fasteners appropriate to the structural material. Fasteners must be rated for certain retention force each for maximum weight capacity (see within for recommendations). Mounting fasteners should be inspected monthly and tightened if necessary. Rail is capable of supporting a maximum suggested user weight of 350lbs/159kg. Note: Due to variances in needs, materials and local construction methods, the information contained within concerning mounting location, fasteners and wall fabrication is provided as suggestion only. Consult the appropriate local professionals for best advice. Invisia Toilet Roll Holder with Grab Bar Features: A seamless look and feel. Integrated support rail. Multi-contact wall support. Discreet wall stems with concealed screws. Beautiful shatterproof surfaces that are nonporous and resist the growth of mold, mildew and bacteria. Invisia Toilet Roll Holder with Grab Bar Specifications: Rail Diameter: 1.25\" / 32cm. Dimensions (LxWxH): 21.75x7.25x3\" / 55.25x18.42x7.62cm. Materials / Finishes: Magnolia white powder coat over stainless steel or bright triple chrome plate over steel. Weight Capacity: 350lbs/159kg.", "The Flo-Trol Convalescent Feeding Cup allows dribble-free drinking without the need for the person to sit up or raise the head. Merely placing a finger over the vent hole in feeding cup controls the amount of liquid coming through the mouthpiece. This aid to daily living reduces the amount of liquid accidentally spilled. Flo-Trol Convalescent Feeding Cup Features: Dishwasher & autoclave safe. Graduated at 4, 6 and 8 oz. levels. Opening in mouthpiece is large enough for a straw . Flo-Trol Convalescent Feeding Cup Specifications: 8 oz capacity.", "Make a bold statement with this luxurious centerpiece. Removable soap dish is easy to clean and features the seamless elegance of Corian®, a shatterproof surface that resists the growth of mold and bacteria. Stability and good looks are within reach of the new Soap Dish with Integrated Grab Bar from the Invisia Collection. The removable soap dish is easy to clean and features the seamless elegance of Corian, a shatterproof surface that resists the growth of mold and bacteria. Available with a chrome or powder coated white finish.Note: The Invisia™ Soap Dish should only be installed in areas where the mounting surface is structurally sound. If you are not equipped to undertake the outlined work we recommend that you have your Invisia™ Soap Dish installed by a qualified contractor. The Invisia™ Soap Dish must be secured to wall with fasteners appropriate to the structural material. Fasteners must be rated for certain retention force each for maximum weight capacity (see within for recommendations). Mounting fasteners should be inspected monthly and tightened if necessary. Rail is capable of supporting a maximum suggested user weight of 350lbs/159kg. Note: Due to variances in needs, materials and local construction methods, the information contained within concerning mounting location, fasteners and wall fabrication is provided as suggestion only. Consult the appropriate local professionals for best advice. Invisia Soap Dish with Grab Bar Features: A seamless look and feel. Integrated support rail. Discreet wall stems with concealed screws. Multi-contact wall support. Invisia Soap Dish with Grab Bar Specifications: Rail Diameter: 1.25\" / 32cm. Dimensions: 12x2.75\" / 30x6.99cm. Materials / Finishes: Magnolia white powder coat over stainless steel or bright triple chrome plate over steel. Weight Capacity: 350lbs / 159kg.", "The Padded Shower Chair with Back and Arms has a padded ergonomic seat for more comfortable seating and a higher level of bathroom safety. Armrests allow the user to sit down or stand up safely and easily. Suction tips on legs add stability. Easy to assemble without tools. Padded Shower Chair with Back and Arms Features: Rust-proof, high-strength, polished aluminum frame. Adjustable height. Suction tips on legs add stability. Easy Assembly. Padded Shower Chair with Back and Arms Specifications: Seat Size: 16 x 13 inches. Seat Height: 16.5 - 20.5 inches. Base Width: 18.25 - 19 inches. Base Depth: 17.5 - 19 inches. Seat to Top of Back: 12.5 inches. Armrest Height from Floor: 21.75- 25.5 inches. Seat to Top of Arm: 4.5 inches. Distance Between Armrests: 18 inches. Weight Capacity: 250 lbs. Item ships via UPS Ground. Non-returnable hygiene item.", "The Stickey Cup No-Spill Drink Holders put an end to accidental spills in the kitchen, at restaurants, in the office, anywhere spills are possible. Specially designed with a super strong suction cup, Stickey Cups can hold containers of various sizes without any fear of tipping or spilling. Works on virtually ANY flat surface such as Glass, Plastic, Granite, Laminate and some woods.Ever just need a third hand, perhaps while pouring from a heavy jug? Let Stickey Cups hold your glass steady and leave your two hands free to lift and pour! Stickey Cup Features: Strong and durable suction cup base. Ridges on the inside of holder allow for easy removal of containers. Two colors available, Blue and Pink. Portable; great for restaurants, travel, trays, overbed tables. Top rack dishwasher safe. Great for kids and adults, regardless of motor skill ability. Stickey Cup Specifications: 4?w diameter x 4.25?h (overall measurements). Rigid polypropylene cup with rubber suction cup bottom. BPA and lead free.", "The Raised Toilet Frame with Padded Seat is a multi-functional bathroom safety product that helps save your money and bathroom space. It is a padded four in one commode / raised toilet seat. The height adjustable Toilet Safety Frame is equipped with a comfortable padded seat, non-slip finish, a splash guard, and supports up to 300 pounds. No tools are required to assemble, so this Toilet Safety Frame is easily disassembled for storage or travel. Ideal for bathroom safety, this Raised Toilet Frame with Padded Seat is a necessity for anyone needing extra assistance in the bathroom. Raised Toilet Frame with Padded Seat Features: With the commode pail installed, it functions as a bedside commode. With the splash-guard installed, it becomes a raised toilet seat with a built-in safety frame. With bucket/splash-guard removed, it becomes a height-adjustable shower chair with a comfortable padded seat. The padded seat resists moisture penetration. Raised Toilet Frame with Padded Seat Specifications: Seat Size: 15 x 15.5 inches. Seat Height: 18 - 22 inches. Base Width: 25.75 - 26.25 inches. Base Depth: 18 - 18.5 inches. Required Clearance: 14 - 18 inches. Armrest Height from Floor: 24 - 28 inches. Seat to Top of Arm: 6 inches. Distance Between Armrests: 19.25 inches. Weight Capacity: 300 lbs. Item ships via UPS Ground. Non-returnable hygiene item.", "The Entry side of the Extra Short Snap N Save Sliding Tub-mount Transfer Bench with Padded Swivel Seat and Back mounts to most tub walls for space savings in smaller bathrooms. What makes the Extra Short Snap N Save Sliding Tub-mount Transfer Bench with Padded Swivel Seat and Back unique is the space saving tub-mounting features. Compared to most transfer benches, this one doesn't have any legs extending outside of the bathtub, saving space in the bathroom and helping to keep water from splashing outside of the bathtub. With a swivel seat, this Transfer Bench enables users to turn 90 degrees before getting in and out of the bath tub. This helps make patient transfers easy and safe. Also features a double safety lock for inside and outside of the tub. The legs adjust to a variety of heights. Tub Requirements Tub Wall Width: 2.75 - 5.75 inches. Inside Tub Width (at Bottom): 15.5 inches.(minimum) *Inside Tub Width (at Top): 21 inches.(minimum) Tub Wall Height (inside): 13 - 17.5 inches. Extra Short Snap N Save Sliding Tub-mount Transfer Bench with Padded Swivel Seat and Back Features: Swivel seat turns 360 degrees, and locks every 90° allowing easier entry to and exit from bench. Entry side of bench mounts to most tub walls for space savings in smaller bathrooms. Seat platform slides smoothly over polished, high-strength aluminum tubes. Comfortable padded seat and back. Backrest can be installed on either side of seat. Height adjustable in 1/2\" increments. Extra Short Snap N Save Sliding Tub-mount Transfer Bench with Padded Swivel Seat and Back Specifications: Seat Size: 16 x 13 x 1.75 inches. Back Size: 15.75 x 8.25 x 1.25 inches. Seat Height: 5 inches above tub wall. Weight Capacity: 350 lbs. Item ships via UPS Ground. Non-returnable hygiene item.", "The new Great Grips Two Lever Doorknob Grippers are an inconspicuous addition that makes any round doorknob easy to turn with a closed fist, elbow, or even a single finger. They give everyone, young and old, the ability to grip and turn doorknobs effortlessly. The Great Grips Two Lever Doorknob Grippers are designed to provide extra leverage and grip for individuals with hand conditions that cause grip weakness. Soft and comfortable, these doorknob grips feature a small lever that makes gripping and turning round doorknobs unbelievably easy.Great Grips Two Lever Doorknob Grippers are easy to install. The soft material easily stretches to fit the knob. The material becomes even more flexible after immersing it in hot water for 10 seconds. The material is durable, and can be cleaned in a dishwasher.Choose between a clear or glow in the dark style. With the glow in the dark Great Grips Two Lever Doorknob Grippers normal exposure to sunlight, special \"glow\" crystals embedded within the grip will enable it to be visible at in the dark for up to 6 hours! Great Grips Two Lever Doorknob Grippers Features: Lever makes gripping and turning very easy. Soft and comfortable material. Received Caregiver Magazine?s 2010 Caregiver Friendly® award. Great Grips Two Lever Doorknob Grippers Specifications: 2 Grippers per package. One size fits all. Fits most round doorknobs. Choose between a clear or glow in the dark style. Easy installation - just slip over the door knob.", "This Snap-N-Save XX Long Sliding Transfer Bench eases the transfer into a bathtub from the toilet by allowing you to sit down, and slide the seat into the tub area. The sliding seat is made of sturdy molded plastic with a non-slip textured finish. Includes a safety belt. The backrest can be installed on either side of the transfer bench seat. Seat glides over polished, high-strength aluminum tubes. Molded plastic seat and back, textured finish. Rust-proof aluminum construction. Adjustable height to fit user and bathtub clearance. Strong suction tipped legs stop movement on wet surfaces. XX Long Toilet to Tub Sliding Transfer Bench Features: Very easy to assemble, no tools required. Bench slides for easy mobility. Height adjustable in 1/2\" increments. Splayed leg configuration for added stability. Backrest can be installed on either side of seat. Optional arm rests attach easily and quickly. XX Long Toilet to Tub Sliding Transfer Bench Specifications: Seat Size: 20.25 x 18.5 inches. Back Size: 17 x 15 inches. Seat Height: 19.5 to 24 inches. Base Width: 63.5 to 64 inches. Base Depth: 20.5 to 22.5 inches. Required Clearance: 14.5 to 19 inches. Back Height from Floor: 34.5 to 39 inches. Distance between arm rests: 16.5 inches. Weight Capacity: 350 lbs. Item ships via UPS Ground. Non-returnable hygiene item.", "Travel Bag for the Bath One Shower Chair. With this convenient carry bag, you are ready to go anywhere, anytime. Bath One Shower Chair Travel Bag Features: Convenient Travel Bag. Bath One Shower Chair Travel Bag Specifications: Fits: Bath One Shower Chair. Dimensions: 20 inches long x 18 inches high x 5 inches wide.", "Travel Bag for the Bath One Commode Chair. With this convenient carry bag, you are ready to go anywhere, anytime. Bath One Commode Chair Travel Bag Features: Convenient, sturdy and lightweight.", "This Snap-N-Save Sliding Transfer Bench with Padded Swivel Seat and Back eases the transfer into a bathtub by allowing you to sit down, and slide the seat into the tub area. The sliding seat is made of sturdy molded plastic with a non-slip textured finish and an integral shower-head holder. Includes a safety belt. The backrest can be installed on either side of the transfer bench seat. Seat glides over polished, high-strength aluminum tubes. Molded plastic seat and back, textured finish. Swivel seat, locking every 90°, allows easier entry to and exit from bench. Rust-proof aluminum construction. Adjustable height to fit user and bathtub clearance. Strong suction tipped legs stop movement on wet surfaces. Sliding Transfer Bench with Padded Swivel Seat and Back Features: Swivel seat turns 360 degrees, and locks every 90° allowing easier entry to and exit from bench. Padded seat and back resist moisture penetration. Moveable backrest fits either side of seat. Suction style feet for added stability in the bathtub. Locking seat mechanism for added safety. Sliding Transfer Bench with Padded Swivel Seat and Back Specifications: Seat Size: 17.5 x 13.5 inches. Seat Height: 19.5 - 23.75 inches. Base Width: 39.5 - 40.5 inches. Base Depth: 18.5 - 20.5 inches. Required Clearance: 14 - 18.5 inches. Back Height from Floor: 31.5 - 36 inches. Weight Capacity: 400 lbs. Item ships via UPS Ground. Non-returnable hygiene item", "The Snap-N-Save Sliding Transfer Bench with Padded Cut Out Seat is equipped with a non-slip surface, lightweight aluminum frame and adjustable height in 1/2\" increments. The cut-out section in the seat can be easily removed and replaced as needed for private area washing. This transfer bench can be used as a cut-out seat or a regular molded seat after placing the center section. The Sliding Transfer Bench with Padded Cut Out Seat slides smoothly over polished, high-strength aluminum tubes. The sliding transfer bench has rust-proof, all-aluminum construction. It's height is adjustable to accomodate both your needs and bathtub clearance. Sliding Transfer Bench with Padded Cut Out Seat Features: Padded seat and back with cut-out allow for personal washing of private areas. Seat glides over polished, high-strength aluminum tubes. Heat-sealed upholstery resists moisture penetration. Very easy to assemble, no tools required. Strong suction tipped legs. Backrest can be installed on either side of seat. Adjustable in height to fit both user needs and bathtub wall clearance. Sliding Transfer Bench with Padded Cut Out Seat Specifications: Seat Size: 15 x 15.5 inches. Seat Height: 19.5 - 24 inches. Base Width: 39 - 40 inches. Base Depth: 18.5 - 20.5 inches. Required Clearance: 14 - 18.5 inches. Back Height from Floor: 30.75 - 35 inches. Weight Capacity: 400 lbs. Non returnable hygiene item. Item ships via UPS Ground.", "Add a simple yet elegant touch to any bathing area. The 24 inch Towel Bar with Integrated Grab Bar provides ample space to display virtually any towel set while the graceful arc of the integrated support rail creates a functionally superb design element. Note: The Invisia™ Towel Bar should only be installed in areas where the mounting surface is structurally sound. If you are not equipped to undertake the outlined work we recommend that you have your Invisia™ Towel Bar installed by a qualified contractor. The Invisia™ Towel Bar must be secured to wall with fasteners appropriate to the structural material. Fasteners must be rated for certain retention force each for maximum weight capacity (see within for recommendations). Mounting fasteners should be inspected monthly and tightened if necessary. Rail is capable of supporting a maximum suggested user weight of 350lbs/159kg. Note: Due to variances in needs, materials and local construction methods, the information contained within concerning mounting location, fasteners and wall fabrication is provided as suggestion only. Consult the appropriate local professionals for best advice. Invisia 24 inch Towel Bar with Integrated Grab Bar Features: A seamless look and feel: Common design elements throughout the entire collection allow for a variety of charming combinations to create a consistent look in any bathroom. Integrated support rail: Professional grade construction combined with superior quality fittings ensure years of reliable service and rock-solid support. Discreet wall stems with concealed screws: Meticulously designed wall interface stems render screws and mounting areas virtually invisible and allow the Invisia™ Collection to naturally blend within its environment. Multi-contact wall support: While two-point contact with the wall structure is standard for most grab bars and bathroom accessories, much of the Invisia™ Collection overachieves with up to 4 points of contact for maximum structural support. Invisia 24 inch Towel Bar with Integrated Grab Bar Specifications: Rail Diameter: 1.25\" / 32cm. Weight Capacity: 350 lbs / 159 kg. Materials / Finishes: Magnolia white powder coat over stainless steel or bright triple chrome plate over steel.", "Add a simple yet elegant touch to any bathing area. The 16 inch Towel Bar with Integrated Grab Bar provides ample space to display virtually any towel set while the graceful arc of the integrated support rail creates a functionally superb design element. Note: The Invisia™ Towel Bar should only be installed in areas where the mounting surface is structurally sound. If you are not equipped to undertake the outlined work we recommend that you have your Invisia™ Towel Bar installed by a qualified contractor. The Invisia™ Towel Bar must be secured to wall with fasteners appropriate to the structural material. Fasteners must be rated for certain retention force each for maximum weight capacity (see within for recommendations). Mounting fasteners should be inspected monthly and tightened if necessary. Rail is capable of supporting a maximum suggested user weight of 350lbs/159kg. Note: Due to variances in needs, materials and local construction methods, the information contained within concerning mounting location, fasteners and wall fabrication is provided as suggestion only. Consult the appropriate local professionals for best advice. Invisia 16 inch Towel Bar Features: A seamless look and feel: Common design elements throughout the entire collection allow for a variety of charming combinations to create a consistent look in any bathroom. Integrated support rail: Professional grade construction combined with superior quality fittings ensure years of reliable service and rock-solid support. Discreet wall stems with concealed screws: Meticulously designed wall interface stems render screws and mounting areas virtually invisible and allow the Invisia™ Collection to naturally blend within its environment. Multi-contact wall support: While two-point contact with the wall structure is standard for most grab bars and bathroom accessories, much of the Invisia™ Collection overachieves with up to 4 points of contact for maximum structural support. Invisia 16 inch Towel Bar Specifications: Rail Diameter: 1.25\" / 32cm. Weight Capacity: 350 lbs / 159 kg. Materials / Finishes: Magnolia white powder coat over stainless steel or bright triple chrome plate over steel.", "This Snap-N-Save Sliding Transfer Bench with Cut Out Swivel Seat eases the transfer into a bath tub by allowing you to sit down, and slide the seat into the tub area. The sliding seat is made of sturdy molded plastic with a non-slip textured finish. Includes a safety belt. The backrest can be installed on either side of the transfer bench seat. Seat glides over polished, high-strength aluminum tubes. Molded plastic seat and back, textured finish. Swivel seat, locking every 90°, allows easier entry to and exit from bench. Rust-proof aluminum construction. Adjustable height to fit user and bathtub clearance. Strong suction tipped legs stop movement on wet surfaces. Cut out seat assists with washing the perineum. Sliding Transfer Bench with Cut-Out Swivel Seat Features: Swivel seat turns 360 degrees, and locks every 90° allowing easier entry to and exit from bench. Seat glides over polished, high-strength aluminum tubes. Molded plastic seat and back, textured finish. Rust-proof aluminum construction. Adjustable height to fit user and bathtub clearance. Cut out seat assists with washing the perineum. Sliding Transfer Bench with Cut-Out Swivel Seat Specifications: Seat Size: 20.5 x 13.5 inches. Seat Height: 20.75 - 25 inches. Base Width: 39.5 - 40.5 inches. Base Depth: 18.5 - 20.5 inches. Required Clearance: 14 - 18.5 inches. Back Height from Floor: 33 - 37.25 inches. Weight Capacity: 400 lbs. inches. Item ships via UPS Ground. Non-returnable hygiene item.", "EZ Reachers with round silicone tips provide a powerful and secure grip with delicate sensitivity. Constructed of lightweight aluminum with a stainless steel spring mechanism for heavy-duty use. The handle is comfortable to hold and has an easy-to-operate pistol grip full finger trigger. EZ Reachers will handle objects of different shapes and sizes up to 5 lbs. The jaws open to 4.5 inches wide. The locking model has an automatic locking mechanism to hold the jaws securely around the item being retrieved. A flip of the thumb releases the lock. Optional wrist support provides added arm support for people with limited strength. 26 inch models weigh 10 oz. 26 inch EZ Reacher with SAF-T-LOK Features: Round silicone tips provide a powerful and secure grip with delicate sensitivity. Constructed of lightweight aluminum. Handle is comfortable to hold. Easy-to-operate pistol grip full finger trigger. Automatic locking mechanism to hold the jaws securely around the item being retrieved. 26 inch EZ Reacher with SAF-T-LOK Specifications: 26 inch models weigh 10 oz. Jaws open to 4.5 inches wide.", "The Bath Step adds safety and stability when getting in and out of the bathtub. It provides a four-inch boost, with slip-resistant textured top and rubberized feet enabling users to confidently climb over the tub wall, even in wet conditions.Sold individually. Additional steps can be stacked on top, adding two inches each. Bath Safety Step Features: Adds 4\" to your step. Rubberized feet to help prevent sliding. Modular design offers secure stack ability. Bath Safety Step Specifications: Construction: plastic. Measures: 19 3/4 x 16 x 4 inches. Supports up to 418 pounds.", "The Leg Wrap Positioning Aid attaches to the user in 3 places to assist in repositioning the leg and transferring to or from a bed, chair, sofa, wheelchair or toilet seat.Convenient upper and lower handles eliminate the need to grab clothing and create a controlled movement thereby reducing injury caused by dropping the legs. The Leg Wrap Positioning Aid measures 33 inches long, maximum circumference measures 11 ½ inches, 18 ½ inches, 24 ½ inches for the ankle, knee and thigh positions. The loops can be made smaller, but not larger than these sizes. Leg Wrap Positioning Aid Features: Assists in repositioning a weak or casted leg. Leg Wrap Positioning Aid Specifications: Attaches to the user in 3 places. Made of 2 inch (2.54 cm) wide, high strength, nylon webbing. Measures: 33 inches long, maximum circumference measures 11 ½ inches, 18 ½ inches, 24 ½ inches for the ankle, knee and thigh positions.", "The Maddagrip Opener conforms to almost any size cap permitting the user to effortlessly open anything from small vials and bottles to large jars. The longer shape and textured outside grip provide a better grip for weak hands. The large diameter of the grip fits into the entire hand and offers extra turning power.Bright orange Maddagrip Opener color for greater visibility. Maddagrip Opener Features: Large, soft, and easy to grip. Textured outside grip.", "The Privacy Cover attaches securely to back of wheelchair or onto bed rail using Velcro-like hook and loop closures to discreetly conceal a catheter bag.Urinary drainage bag hangs inside the Privacy Cover on a polycarbonate support bar; Velcro-like hook and loop strap (inside the Privacy Cover) stabilizes the UD bag.Front modesty panel may be kept open for monitoring urinary output or closed for privacy.Extended zippered opening (around sides and bottom) allows the front of the Privacy Cover to be folded up and out of the way when emptying the UD bag; the Privacy Cover does not have to be removed to drain the UD bag. Privacy Cover Catheter Bag Cover Features: Catheter bag cover attaches securely to back of wheelchair or onto bed rail using Velcro-like hook and loop closures. Front modesty panel may be kept open for monitoring urinary output or closed for privacy. Zippered opening allows the front to be folded up and out of the way when emptying the UD bag. Privacy Cover Catheter Bag Cover Specifications: Color: blue or black. Size: 12.5 x 15.5 x .75 inches. Made of durable, weather resistant pack-cloth. Note: It's a good idea to remove the polycarbonate support bar before laundering.Due to hygiene reasons, this item is non-returnable.", "No more hand pain! The Evo Pen eliminates the pain and cramping when writing. The evo.pen has received a Commendation from the Arthritis Foundation and is recommended by hand and occupational therapists.Designed for pain-free writing.Arthritis Today Magazine reports \"evo.pen's kidney shaped body let's you cup the pen in the palm of your hand - using the entire hand, rather than isolated fingers muscles,\" and was chosen by the therapists & editors of the magazine as a \"Solution\" and \"Natural Remedy\" that can help \"keep fatigue and hand soreness at bay\".The evo.pen is a great gift to yourself or a loved one !!It is also perfect when in closed position as a rounded stylus for PDA or keyboard use. Evo Pen Features: For lefties or righties...natural and ergonomic. Ink refills are available. Evo Pen Specifications: 2 pens per pack. Red pen with blue ink.", "Control weeds safer, easier and more efficient with the Weed Roller Herbicide Applicator. Simply fill the applicator with weed killer and roll over weeds. Goes exactly where you roll it without affecting surrounding plants. Windproof non-spray liquid applicator rolls around trees and hedges with ease. Environmentally friendly.The weed roller is designed to act as a reservoir outside the main handle reservoir. The weedroller is made of a special durable foam storage compound that acts as a dynamic surface. The continual flexing of the roller during operation pumps the liquid from within the roller to the outside surfaces. Weed Roller Features: Goes exactly where you roll it without affecting surrounding plants. No spray drift or overspray. Weed Roller Specifications: Can be used with Round Up, horticultural vinegar, or other weed control products.", "The Twist-n-Write Pencil was designed especially for children's small hands. These innovative new pencils feature the same ergonomic design as our PenAgain Pens, with a #2, 2 mm lead that never needs sharpening. The wishbone-shape design naturally promotes an efficient tripod grasp. Non-refillable, in fun assorted colors. Twist-n-Write Pencil Features: Does not need sharpening. Designed specifically for smaller hands. Simply twist the tip to expose more lead. Twist-n-Write Pencil Specifications: Non-refillable disposable pencils. Fun assorted colors. 2 mm pencil lead. Includes dual erasers.", "With a wide blade that enhances control, the DuoGlide 5 inch Utility Knife is perfect for small jobs that used to seem monumental. It?s ideal for slicing, dicing, and chopping parsley, vegetables, fruit, and other ingredients. DuoGlide 5 inch Utility Knife Features: Now you can cut, chop, or slice with greater comfort and less fatigue. Ultra-soft, right-sized handle that can be gripped in several ways for more comfort and control. Precise control for reduced wrist, arm and hand discomfort. Certified \"Ease-of-Use Commendation\" by The Arthritis Foundation. DuoGlide 5 inch Utility Knife Specifications: 5 inch high-carbon, stainless steel blade is individually ground and honed for the ultimate edge, corrosion resistant, designed for ultra thin slicing, and features a professional grade cross polish. Handle is soft, right-sized and textured for a secure grip, plus stain-resistant and sealed to the blade for utmost sanitation.", "The DuoGlide 3 3/8 inch Paring Knife should be a staple in every kitchen. It has a sharp, precision-ground, extra-wide blade that will easily cut through most any material. It's made from high-carbon stainless steel, so the cutting edge will retain its sharpness. DuoGlide 3 3/8 inch Paring Knife Features: Now you can cut, chop, or slice with greater comfort and less fatigue. Ultra-soft, right-sized handle that can be gripped in several ways for more comfort and control. Precise control for reduced wrist, arm and hand discomfort. Certified \"Ease of Use Commendation\" by the Arthritis Foundation. DuoGlide 3 3/8 inch Paring Knife Specifications: 3 3/8 inch high-carbon, stainless steel blade is individually ground and honed for the ultimate edge, corrosion resistant, designed for ultra thin slicing, and features a professional grade cross polish. Handle is soft, right-sized and textured for a secure grip, plus stain-resistant and sealed to the blade for utmost sanitation.", "This DuoGlide 7 ½ inch Bread/Slicer Knife provides an easy, safe, and comfortable way to slice sandwiches, bread, tomatoes and other vegetables as well as fruits. The blade?s edge features specially designed scallops that form super sharp cutting edges. The cutting points help retain the knife?s sharpness. DuoGlide 7 ½ inch Bread/Slicer Knife Features: Now you can cut, chop, or slice with greater comfort and less fatigue. Ultra-soft, right-sized handle that can be gripped in several ways for more comfort and control. Precise control for reduced wrist, arm and hand discomfort. DuoGlide 7 ½ inch Bread/Slicer Knife Specifications: 7 ½ inch high-carbon, stainless steel blade is individually ground and honed for the ultimate edge, corrosion resistant, designe for ultra thin slicing, and features a professional grade cross polish. Handle is soft, right-sized and textured for a secure grip, plus stain-resistant and sealed to the blade for utmost sanitation.", "These colorful Pen and Pencil WeightsPackage of 3 provide sensory motor feedback. O-Rings secure the weights and allow them to be placed anywhere on the pen or pencil. Daily use of these colorful writing utensil weights makes writing at school a breeze for children with difficulty processing the fine motor skills necessary for proper handwriting. These weights provide feedback for those with difficulty in vestibular, proprioceptive processing, or sensory motor feedback. Not for use with small children, or any children prone to placing items in mouth due to choking hazzard. Pen and Pencil Weights Feature: Helps provide sensory motor feedback. Assist sensory motor planning. Pen and Pencil Weight Specifications: Weights are approximately 1.5 ounces. Set of 3 weights with 6 o-rings.", "Chair Tai Chi from the Chair Aerobics For Everyone Series is a safe effective exercise video for men and women of all ages and fitness levels. This totally seated workout consists of a series of gentle, slow flowing movements that will help tone and firm muscles without strain. Chair Tai Chi will also help to lower blood pressure and relieve stress making you feel relaxed and revitalized. Chair Tai Chi has been designed for people who are inflexible, cannot stand for prolonged periods of time or are just beginning a regular exercise routine. Chair Tai Chi will also benefit people at higher fitness levels wanting to exercise in limited space or at the office. Chair Tai Chi is an effective alternative to conventional exercise and is an excellent way to start toning and shaping your body while obtaining a calm and tranquil mind. Chair Aerobics for Everyone - Chair Tai Chi DVD Features: REDUCE STRESS - IMPROVE POSTURE - HELPS RELIEVE BACK PAIN - COMPLETELY SEATED WORKOUT - FOR ALL AGES. Chair Aerobics for Everyone - Chair Tai Chi DVD Specifications: Run time: 38 minutes.", "LED Technologies DPL, Deep Penetrating LED Light Therapy System , provides a proprietary light wave design that penetrates deep into the skin to erase the appearance of aging, fine lines, wrinkles, enlarged pores, and crow's feet. Deep Penetrating Light Therapy is an affordable, natural, and healthy way to look younger without surgery, lasers, peels or injections.The DPL System can also aid wound healing and pain relief for sore, aching joints. Efficiently treat minor muscle and joint aches, minor sprains, minor back pain, muscle spasms and minor pain and stiffness associated with arthritis. An easily adjustable, strapping system helps you place one or both panels almost anywhere on your body allowing you to comfortably relieve pain and stiffness while relaxing, reading or watching TV.Each DPL Deep Penetrating Light Therapy System includes two removable LED panels, a stand, and both quick start and user guides to help you get your treatment started. Most users begin to see and feel results after a few 9 minute treatments, but for full results, it is recommended you use the DPL Light Therapy System for approximately 10 weeks. DPL has been shown to work on all skin types with a 90 percent success rate. For pain relief applications, the DPL Deep Penetrating Light Therapy System can be used on any part of the body. DPL - Deep Penetrating LED Light Therapy System Features: Non-Invasive Approach To Anti-Aging and Pain Management. Minimizes the appearance of fine lines and wrinkles. Reduces the appearance of crow's feet. Stimulates the regeneration of collagen. Treats minor muscle and joint aches, minor sprains, minor back pain, muscle spasms and minor pain and stiffness associated with arthritis. Velcro straps for hands free operation. Minimal heat output. Most users see and feel results after only a few treatments. DPL - Deep Penetrating LED Light Therapy System Specifications: Two removable LED panels. Large treatment area - 9? X 14? surface area. 20 - 660nm Red LEDs. 154 - 880nm Infrared LEDs. Comprehensive user guide included. Quick start guide included. DPL - Deep Penetrating LED Light Therapy System Instructions", "Designed for the ultimate in crutch comfort and skin protection! Gel Forearm Crutch Handle Covers can aid in healing existing sores and/or abrasions. Pair of fore-arm covers feature 1/2 inch GEL pad with zipper closure. The Gel Forearm Crutch Handle Covers attach over the existing foam or rubber hand grips. The cover is a chloroprene rubber with a nylon surface, similar to wet suit material. Inside is open cell foam and a polyurethane solid GEL. It is referred to as a ?SOLID GEL? and will not leak out. Gel Ovations ™ products incorporate a latex-free, solid GEL and have a durable neoprene nylon surface, which is soft, easy to clean, and highly efficient at distributing pressure. They protect bony prominences and reduce abrasions, shear, and harmful pressure-related problems. Do NOT put pads/covers in a washing machine.Do NOT submerge them in water or agitate.Do NOT put in clothes dryer. With HEATED DRYING turned OFF, you may wash them in the top rack of an automatic dishwasher. Alternatively, wipe the surface with any normal household soap or cleaning solution that is not irritating and to which you are not allergic. Gel ForeArm Crutch Handle Cover Features: Conforms to the shape of the hard object while simultaneously continuing to provide support. Durable neoprene nylon surface, which is soft, easy to clean, and highly efficient at distributing pressure. Covers work best and fit best if put on right over the existing foam pad, handle or grip. Will not harden or soften in the cold or heat. Odorless, colorless and can be ingested without any negative effects. Does not breakdown in water. Gel ForeArm Crutch Handle Cover Specifications: Fits all standard crutches. Sold as a pair. Material: medical grade silicone, solid polymer polyurethane.", "No more hands in the garbage disposal! The Alligetter ™ reacher grabber easily and safely removes precious or improper objects from a garbage disposal and other hard-to-reach places. Use the Alligetter™ in any hard to reach place, such as under or next to a stove or refrigerator, between or under furniture and between your car seat and console. Alligetter Features: No risk of injury or cut fingers from accidental garbage disposal powering on. Foldable handle for easy storage in drawer or under-sink cabinet. Fits easily in all size hands. Tip-mounted removable LED light with a convenient rear-mounted switch. Flap spreader for garbage disposal with rubber flaps. Alligetter Specifications: Clear ABS plastic construction for strength, visual appeal, and light dispersion. Spring loaded trigger for easy grasping. 4 AG3 batteries included. 15 inches long.", "Designed for the ultimate in crutch comfort and skin protection! Gel Crutch Top Covers can aid in healing existing sores and/or abrasions. The Gel Crutch Top Pad is installed over the existing TOP foam and secured with Velcro.Pair of GEL and Foam Crutch Top Covers stretch to fit the top of all standard crutches. Installed over the existing foam crutch pads and secured with Velcro®.The cover is a chloroprene rubber with a nylon surface, similar to wet suit material. Inside is open cell foam and a polyurethane solid GEL. It is referred to as a ?SOLID GEL? and will not leak out.Do NOT put pads/covers in a washing machine.Do NOT submerge them in water or agitate.Do NOT put in clothes dryer. With HEATED DRYING turned OFF, you may wash them in the top rack of an automatic dishwasher. Alternatively, wipe the surface with any normal household soap or cleaning solution that is not irritating and to which you are not allergic. Gel Crutch Top Covers Features: Conforms to the shape of the hard object while simultaneously continuing to provide support. Durable neoprene nylon surface, which is soft, easy to clean, and highly efficient at distributing pressure. Covers work best and fit best if put on right over the existing foam pad, handle or grip. Will not harden or soften in the cold or heat. Odorless, colorless and can be ingested without any negative effects. Does not breakdown in water. Gel Crutch Top Covers Specifications: Fits all standard crutches. Sold as a pair. Material: medical grade silicone, solid polymer polyurethane.", "The Flexible Finger Control Grips help provide better grip control when using small hand tools.The grips attach to your tools using high strength elastic to wrap around the handle and hook and loop (Velcro) closure. To attach the grips, lay your tool on a flat surface, hold one side of the grip, then wrap (stretch) the elastic finger grip around your tool and press the hook and loop closure (Velcro) together tightly on the handle. Then you just leave it on the handle permanently if you want. Water, dirt, oil, or soap does not hurt the Finger Grips.The Flexible Finger Control Grips can be used to: Attach to the handles of needle nose pliers, regular pliers, wire cutters, wrenches, etc. You can use them on small handle garden tools such as pruning shears, hand cultivators, hand trowels, etc. They can even be used on thicker handle kitchen utensils, such as, large serving spoons, spatulas and thick handle arthritic dinner table utensils. Tired of dropping your tools when working in tight places or because the tool becomes slippery, then you need Flexible Finger Control Grips.3 different sizes of Flexible Finger Control Grips are available: small to medium, large, and extra large. Use a flexible tape measure to measure the handles and determine the size you need. Small to Medium fits handles 1 ½ to 2 inch diameter around the handle. ( metal to thin rubber coated handles on pliers, needle nose, wire cutters, etc.) Large fits handles 2 to 2 ½ inch diameter. (thicker rubber coated on many of the newer pliers, needle nose pliers, etc.) Extra Large fits handles 2 ½? to 3 ½ inch diameter.(small garden hand tools, thick handle kitchen utensils, etc.) Flexible Finger Control Grips Feature: The elastic material gives you more control with your fingers and hand. Your fingers become part of the tool, but still allows flexibility due to the elastic finger slot. Gives you more control, especially if you have grip problems. Reduces hand fatigue with repetitive action. Flexible Finger Control Grip Specifications: Each package has 2 grips, (1 pair) made out of heavy duty elastic and Velcro. Elastic finger slot fits 2 to 3 fingers. Measure 3 inches long.", "The Entry side of the Extra Short Snap N Save Sliding Tub-mount Transfer Bench with Swivel Seat and Back mounts to most tub walls for space savings in smaller bathrooms. What makes the Extra Short Sliding Tub-mount Transfer Bench with Swivel Seat and Back unique is the space saving tub-mounting features. Compared to most transfer benches, this one doesn't have any legs extending outside of the bathtub, saving space in the bathroom and helping to keep water from splashing outside of the bathtub. With a swivel seat, the Snap-N-Save Sliding Tub Mount Transfer Bench with Molded Swivel Seat enables users to turn 90 degrees before getting in and out of the bath tub. This helps make patient transfers easy and safe. Also features a double safety lock for inside and outside of the tub. The legs adjust to a variety of heights. Tub Requirements Tub Wall Width: 2.75 - 5.75 inches. Inside Tub Width (at Bottom): 15.5 inches.(minimum) *Inside Tub Width (at Top): 21 inches.(minimum) Tub Wall Height (inside): 13 - 17.5 inches. Extra Short Sliding Tub-mount Transfer Bench with Swivel Seat and Back Features: Swivel seat turns 360 degrees, and locks every 90° allowing easier entry to and exit from bench. Entry side of bench mounts to most tub walls for space savings in smaller bathrooms. Seat platform slides smoothly over polished, high-strength aluminum tubes. Backrest can be installed on either side of seat. Height adjustable in 1/2\" increments. Extra Short Sliding Tub-mount Transfer Bench with Swivel Seat and Back Specifications: Seat Size: 16 x 13 inches. Back Size: 16 inches wide x 9.5 high. Seat Height: 5 inches above tub wall. Weight Capacity: 350 lbs. Item ships via UPS Ground. Non-returnable hygiene item.", "The Ezy As reduces the effort and pain when applying compression garments to both arms and legs. It is designed to be used by people on their own or by caregivers of patients who are unable to apply their own stockings. Great for use on both the leg and arm, this Garment Applicator is compatible with open and closed toe and knee high and full leg stockings, tubular bandages, anti-embolism stockings, arm sleeves and gauntlets. The Ezy As doesn't disturb dressings or pull on fragile skin. It takes only seconds to apply as opposed to over 10 minutes with other applicators and can be used on a variety of different sorts of stockings. This user friendly applicator comes available in three color-coded sizes and is completely portable and great for use while traveling. Ezy-As™ Videos Video Instructions Below are some video clips that demonstrate how to operate the applicator and show how easy the applicator is to use. Loading the applicator Applying a stocking to another person Applying a stocking unassisted Using the handle attachment Removing a stocking Applying arm garments Applying tubular bandages For proper size: measure around the calf or the bicep: Red Small: 11 - 13.5\" Gold Medium: 12.5 - 15.75\" Blue Large: 15 - 18.5\" Ezy-As :: Compression Stocking Tool Features: Quick and easy to use. Can be easily used on upper and lower limbs. Can be used with a variety of bandages. Provides minimal to no disruption to an injury / dressing (less traumatic). Ezy-As :: Compression Stocking Tool Specifications: Small: 11\"-13.5\". Medium: 12.5\" - 15.75\". Large: 15\" - 18.5\". A handle attachment is sold separately", "The 26 inch EZ Reachers with round silicone tips provide a powerful and secure grip with delicate sensitivity. Constructed of lightweight aluminum with a stainless steel spring mechanism for heavy-duty use. The handle is comfortable to hold and has an easy-to-operate pistol grip full finger trigger. EZ Reachers will handle objects of different shapes and sizes up to 5 lbs. The jaws open to 4.5 inches wide. 26 inch model weighs 10 oz. 26 inch EZ Reacher Features: Round silicone tips provide a powerful and secure grip. Constructed of lightweight aluminum. Stainless steel spring mechanism for heavy-duty use. 26 inch EZ Reacher Specifications: Lift objects up to 5 lbs. Jaws open to 4.5 inches wide. 26 inch model weighs 10 oz.", "The Leg Loop Leg Lift allows a person to safely and effectively reposition the leg and foot onto a footrest, a bed, into a car, etc. by providing a more secure grip than merely tugging on a piece of clothing.The Leg Loop™ consists of two loops - a hand loop and a foot loop, one at each end of a rigid middle section. The Leg Loop Leg Lift helps people with limited lower extremity strength lift the leg and foot. It is designed to help people who have medical conditions in which they either partially or completely lose the ability to independently move their leg. Paraplegia, hemiplegia, paraparesis, hip surgery, and knee surgery are fairly common examples.The foot loop stays open until the strap is pulled and then conforms to the shape of the foot for a secure and comfortable grip. Rigid middle section allows for easy maneuverability. Once pulled, the loop closes and conforms to the shape of the foot for a secure and comfortable fit. This, combined with the rigid middle section\" he asserts \"makes it easier to place on the foot than other leg lifts and reduces the risk of the foot falling out and becoming injured. Leg Loop Leg Lift Specifications: Made of 1 inch (2.54 cm) wide, high strength, nylon webbing. 36 inches (91.4 cm) in length.", "Make cleaning easier with the Good Grips Broom and Dustpan Set . These durable cleaning tools feature the ergonomically designed Good Grips rubber handles. The handles let you comfortably hold the broom and dustpan giving you greater control while sweeping. Perfect for kitchen and hardwood floors all around your home. OXO Good Grips Upright Sweeper features durable nylon bristles and a silver handle. The dust pan has a rubber lip for optimal contact with the floor and locks in place for more controlled dust pickup and disposal. For compact storage the dust pan swivels upright and the broom and dust pan handles snap together. Good Grips Long Handle Broom and Dustpan Set Features: Rubber lip on dust pan optimizes floor contact. Broom handle has oval cross-section to prevent spinning. Broom and dust pan snap together and store compactly. Dust pan locks in place for better control. Hanging hole for storage. Good Grips Long Handle Broom and Dustpan Set Specifications: Measures: 36\" x 8.75\" x 3\". Color: Black. Broom: 10-inch bristle width.", "The Wedge Cup is an invaluable drinking aid for a wide variety of patients with injuries or those who suffer from dysphagia or other swallowing disorders. This includes patients with limited muscle control or decreased strength, those with weak or limited range of arm or upper body motion, and those recovering from arm or neck injuries. Wedge Cup is the ideal solution for any patient with injuries or swallowing disorders that make drinking difficult. Perfect for healthcare facilities, physicians, physical therapists or individual patients ? Wedge Cup is the best way to help patients drink most any liquid easily and safely. View Wedge Cup product demonstration video. Wedge Cup Features: Works with thickened liquids. Rotating inner liner for either left or right-handed patients. Attractive overall appearance. Safe for home or institutional use. Separate cup insert insulates outer mug. Can be used with hot or cold liquids. Simple snap-together assembly. One-piece lid and drinking spout. Easy disassembly for cleaning. Wedge Cup Specifications: Fully adjustable flow control. Constructed of polypropylene plastic. Microwave safe.", "The Lace-Amatic is the perfect gadget for you if it is difficult for you to lace and tie your shoes every time you go outside. This small two-part plastic mechanism acts as a ratchet to tighten up pre-tied shoes allowing users to slip on their shoe and tighten it up without retying a bow every time. The lace-amatic slips over the shoe's laces and once twisted, it tightens the laces just like tying them.Designed to help people with reduced mobility, the lace-amatic is ideal for people with arthritis, autistics, the elderly, single hand and arm amputees, ALS, MS, Parkinson's, post op hip and knee surgery, pregnancy, stroke, bad backs, overweight and hand or arm joint injury. The lace-amatic can help make bending down to tie their shoes a less difficult task. Lace-Amatic Features: Allows you to slip in and out of laced-up shoes without having to struggle with tight laces and knots. Device does not need a lot of strength or dexterity to operate. Shoes can be tightened and secured with a finger, thumb or the heel of a hand. Ideal for people with arthritis, the elderly, single hand and arm amputees or people recovering from post-operative hip or knee surgery. Lace-Amatic Specifications: Made from strong, clear polycarbonate plastic and is weather-resistant, durable, flexible and non-marking. Weighs only - 11 grams (0.38oz).", "The Jazz Backpack has a foam-lined back and semi-rigid top that helps hold its shape and structure, making the zippers easier to open and close. It is designed to hang on the back of wheelchairs using web straps that easily adjust to fit most wheelchair seat backs. (Use upper buckle placement for manual wheelchairs; criss cross straps at top and use lower buckles for scooters and power chairs with scooter-type upholstered seat backs.)Front pocket is divided into two roomy compartments - sized to easily hold sport type water bottles. (You can actually get two 1-liter water bottles in each compartment!) Additional front pocket holds small items and has a reflective strip to help ensure visibility. Ring-type zipper pulls are particularly helpful for those with limited hand dexterity.Small web loops at the back, bottom corners may be used to secure the Jazz Backpack to your chair if desired. Also has Velcro-like hook and loop strap at center back that may be used to secure the backpack to the bar of a sport type wheelchair. Jazz Backpack Features: Great for power and manual wheelchairs, with and without push handles, and scooters. Large capacity main compartment has plenty of room for bulky items such as jacket and notebooks. Two interior slash pockets for tucking away smaller items. Jazz Backpack Specifications: Main Compartment - 13.75 x 13.25 x 5.25 inches. Front Pocket - 13.75 x 10.5 x 3.5 inches (has center divider). Made of durable, weather resistant pack-cloth.", "The high quality Easi-Grip Weeder garden tool has a specially angled ergonomic handle making it comfortable to use. By keeping your hand and wrist at a natural angle it helps eliminate the strains and blisters that can be caused by conventional style garden tools.The green ?soft-feel? grip has a non-slip waterproof finish making the garden tool easy to grip even if you have wet hands. The highly polished finish of the stainless steel stops soil sticking to the tool making the tool easier to use and clean. Easi Grip Weeder Features: Ideal for digging out dandelions and other pesky weeds. Ergonomically angled handle keeps hand and wrist in a natural position, preventing strain whilst gardening. \"Soft feel\" non-slip handle. Easi Grip Weeder Specifications: Overall length: 13 inches. Weight: 10.8 oz. Stainless steel, high quality metal. The Easi Grip Weeder tool can be used with the plug-in arm support cuff which allows the strength of the forearm to also be used.", "Designed for the ultimate in walker comfort and skin protection! Gel Walker Handle Covers can aid in healing existing sores and/or abrasions. Pair of 5 inch long Gel Walker Hand pads for U shaped walkers. They fit over the side tubes of all brands of traditional walkers. The pads are OPEN at both ends and are applied over the existing hand grips. These are for walkers that have a mostly straight circular grip like found on bicycles and U shaped walkers. Regardless of the covering on the hand grip - they Velcro® over the existing grip. These covers are NOT for use on walkers (rollators) with the wide and unusually shaped orthotic grips. The cover is a chloroprene rubber with a nylon surface, similar to wet suit material. Inside is open cell foam and a polyurethane solid GEL. It is referred to as a ?SOLID GEL? and will not leak out. Gel Ovations ™ products incorporate a latex-free, solid GEL and have a durable neoprene nylon surface, which is soft, easy to clean, and highly efficient at distributing pressure. They protect bony prominences and reduce abrasions, shear, and harmful pressure-related problems. Do NOT put pads/covers in a washing machine.Do NOT submerge them in water or agitate.Do NOT put in clothes dryer. With HEATED DRYING turned OFF, you may wash them in the top rack of an automatic dishwasher. Alternatively, wipe the surface with any normal household soap or cleaning solution that is not irritating and to which you are not allergic. Gel ForeArm Crutch Handle Cover Features: Conforms to the shape of the hard object while simultaneously continuing to provide support. Durable neoprene nylon surface, which is soft, easy to clean, and highly efficient at distributing pressure. Covers work best and fit best if put on right over the existing foam pad, handle or grip. Will not harden or soften in the cold or heat. Odorless, colorless and can be ingested without any negative effects. Does not breakdown in water. Gel ForeArm Crutch Handle Cover Specifications: Fits U shaped walkers. Sold as a pair. Material: medical grade silicone, solid polymer polyurethane.", "Designed for the ultimate in Rollator comfort and skin protection! Gel Rollator Handle Covers can aid in healing existing sores and/or abrasions. This pair of zip on Gel Rollator Handle Covers improves COMFORT for people using Rollators - the 4 wheel walkers with the wide and unusually shaped orthotic grips. These zip on - over the open end of the grip and on top of the existing handle. The GEL is placed on top of the grip. When the zipper is closed - the cover fits securely and will not twist or turn. These pads are NOT for use on traditional U shaped walkers which require a pad that is open at BOTH ends. The cover is a chloroprene rubber with a nylon surface, similar to wet suit material. Inside is open cell foam and a polyurethane solid GEL. It is referred to as a ?SOLID GEL? and will not leak out. Gel Ovations ™ products incorporate a latex-free, solid GEL and have a durable neoprene nylon surface, which is soft, easy to clean, and highly efficient at distributing pressure. They protect bony prominences and reduce abrasions, shear, and harmful pressure-related problems. Do NOT put pads/covers in a washing machine.Do NOT submerge them in water or agitate.Do NOT put in clothes dryer. With HEATED DRYING turned OFF, you may wash them in the top rack of an automatic dishwasher. Alternatively, wipe the surface with any normal household soap or cleaning solution that is not irritating and to which you are not allergic. Gel ForeArm Crutch Handle Cover Features: Conforms to the shape of the hard object while simultaneously continuing to provide support. Durable neoprene nylon surface, which is soft, easy to clean, and highly efficient at distributing pressure. Covers work best and fit best if put on right over the existing foam pad, handle or grip. Will not harden or soften in the cold or heat. Odorless, colorless and can be ingested without any negative effects. Does not breakdown in water. Gel ForeArm Crutch Handle Cover Specifications: Fits: 4 wheel walkers with the wide and unusually shaped orthotic grips. Sold as a pair. Material: medical grade silicone, solid polymer polyurethane.", "The Seat Lift Chair Table is designed for use with lift chairs, standard recliners, or couches. It features a durable table top that can support a wide variety of activities such as eating, writing, crafts, working on a laptop computer, reading, or playing games. It also features right or left positioning with 180° rotation so that the chair can be placed by any wall and the table top pivots 360° at the touch of a hand. Seat Lift Chair Table Demonstration Video Please specify right vertical post (as displayed in photo); or left vertical post. Table only, chair is not included. Seat Lift Chair Table Features: Designed for use with a lift chair, standard recliner or couch. A built-in magazine rack provides added convenience. Can be used for many activities such as eating, writing, crafts, working on the computer, reading and games. Requires no attachments. Furniture weight secures table in place. Right or left positioning with 180° rotation so that the chair can be placed by any wall. Table top pivots 360° at the touch of a hand. Teak wood grain laminate finish is attractive, easy to clean and scratch resistant. Seat Lift Chair Table Specifications: Tabletop Adjustment Highest: 33inches. Tabletop Adjustment Lowest: 23.5 inches. Tabletop Width: 30 inches. Tabletop Depth: 15 inches. Weight Capacity: 50 lbs. Product Weight: 39 lbs.", "Introducing the NoBow ShoeTie - a simple device! Any lace up shoe can be tied quickly and easily using only one hand! The No Bow Show Tie becomes part of the lacing system of the shoe. As soon as you put your shoes on, it's ready to go. The knot formed is simple, secure and easy to release. No matter the reason to tie your shoe with one hand - the No Bow Shoe Tie is for you! NoBow ShoeTie Features: Any lace up shoe can be tied quickly and easily using only one hand! NoBow ShoeTie Specifications: Color: clear, white, brown, and black. Package: one pair.", "Designed for the ultimate in crutch comfort and skin protection! Gel Crutch Handle Covers can aid in healing existing sores and/or abrasions. Pair of 4 inch wide GEL hand pads attach to crutch handle with Velcro®. The Gel Crutch Handle Covers attach right on top of the existing foam or rubber hand grips with Velcro. The cover is a chloroprene rubber with a nylon surface, similar to wet suit material. Inside is open cell foam and a polyurethane solid GEL. It is referred to as a ?SOLID GEL? and will not leak out. Gel Ovations ™ products incorporate a latex-free, solid GEL and have a durable neoprene nylon surface, which is soft, easy to clean, and highly efficient at distributing pressure. They protect bony prominences and reduce abrasions, shear, and harmful pressure-related problems. Do NOT put pads/covers in a washing machine.Do NOT submerge them in water or agitate.Do NOT put in clothes dryer. With HEATED DRYING turned OFF, you may wash them in the top rack of an automatic dishwasher. Alternatively, wipe the surface with any normal household soap or cleaning solution that is not irritating and to which you are not allergic Gel Crutch Handle Covers Features: Conforms to the shape of the hard object while simultaneously continuing to provide support. Durable neoprene nylon surface, which is soft, easy to clean, and highly efficient at distributing pressure. Covers work best and fit best if put on right over the existing foam pad, handle or grip. Will not harden or soften in the cold or heat. Odorless, colorless and can be ingested without any negative effects. Does not breakdown in water. Gel Crutch Handle Covers Specifications: Fits all standard crutches. Sold as a pair. Material: medical grade silicone, solid polymer polyurethane.", "The curved shape of the Rest Mate Bed Wedge is designed to provide upper body support while lying on back or side. It's wedge shape helps provide total comfort and prevents the body from shifting. Designed with soft polyurethane foam and hypoallergenic fiber fill to allow air circulation. Zippered, removable, machine washable white polyester/cotton cover. Can be used with or without a personal pillow. Rest Mate Bed Wedge Features: Provides total comfort while lying on back or side. Prevents body from shifting. Designed to allow air circulation. Can be used with or without a personal pillow. Rest Mate Bed Wedge Specifications: Size 36\" x 24\" x 7\". Color White. Made from soft polyurethane foam and hypoallergenic fiber fill.", "Exercise for the bedridden and the physically challenged is designed for people who would like to exercise in the comfort of their own bed. The exercises in this video will help increase energy levels while strengthening muscles and boosting your immune system. Bed exercises include a combination of stretches, light resistance training and meditation. You will learn how to perform several different arm presses, a core workout and lots of exercises to promote flexibility and reduce stiffness. Chair Aerobics for Everyone - Bed Exercises DVD Features: Designed for people who would like to exercise in the comfort of their own bed. Chair Aerobics for Everyone - Bed Exercises DVD Specifications: Run time: 38 minutes.", "Granny Jo Ponchos are warm, cozy, lightweight, soft, and are longer on the arm than traditional ponchos and call to mind a warm hug. Ponchos are a wonderful upper body wrap for wheelchair users, and are just the thing to put on quickly when feeling a chill.Simple tasks like putting on and taking off a sweater or jacket can present challenges. A poncho that goes on and comes off easily can be a big help.Double stitching surrounding the notch collar and hem is just one of the details that make the new Granny Jo Poncho a warm, welcome addition to any wardrobe. The fleece poncho is soft, warm, and cuddly and full cut.The large/extra large poncho measures 27.5 inches from the neckline to the hem all the way around the poncho.Simple movements related to putting on or taking off a sweater present a challenge for wheelchair or scooter users. A poncho that goes on and comes off easily can be a big help.This Fleece Poncho is ideal for men or women desiring a lightweight warm, shoulder covering while reading or resting. This poncho has attractive double stitching on the hem and neckline, a roomy front pocket and is available in sm/med, and large/x-large for men and women. Fleece Wheelchair Poncho Features: Large, roomy front pocket. Can be put on and taken off easily. Double stitching surrounding the notch collar and hem. Fleece Wheelchair Poncho Specifications: Large/extra large poncho measures 27.5 inches from the neckline to the hem all the way around the poncho. Machine wash and dry.", "Chair Yoga , from the Chair Aerobics For Everyone Series, is an effective alternative to traditional yoga. This totally seated Yoga workout is easy to follow, and is designed for men and women who are unable to sit on the ground or need to use a chair for stability. It can also be used for people who are inflexible. Chair Yoga will teach you how to release tension, increase circulation and firm/tone your muscles. Chair Yoga focuses on breathing, a central component of yoga and meditation. This video then leads you through a series gentle stretches and easy to perform yoga positions. Incorporating this video into your daily routine will help revitalize the body, mind and spirit. Chair Aerobics for Everyone - Chair Yoga DVD Features: REDUCE STRESS - TONE MUSCLES - INCREASE FLEXIBILITY - PROMOTES GOOD CIRCULATION FOR ALL AGES. Chair Aerobics for Everyone - Chair Yoga DVD Specifications: Run time: 38 minutes.", "The Wander Alarm with Motion Detector can prevent a loved one or patient from wandering away. It can detect the movement of a person in a bed, chair, room or doorway. A small receiver (remote monitoring device) can be mounted wherever convenient, and the chimes either sound or send a discreet signal up to 100 feet away. Wander Alarm with Motion Detector Features: Detector can be used on a bed, chair, hallway or door. Includes a receiver for remote monitoring. Can be set to chime at local alarm, or can send a remote signal to the receiver. Wander Alarm with Motion Detector Specifications: No batteries included, requires two 9 volt batteries (one for the sender, and one for the receiver). Receiver range up to 100 feet depending on building construction. When set to chime the alarm will sound at the sensor. When set toremote, a signal will be sent to the pager/receiver up to 100 feet away.", "The Ezy-As Compression Applicator Handle is designed to assist people who have poor balance and difficulty reaching their feet. The handle is designed to fit any size applicator in the Ezy-As™ range. * The Ezy-As Compression Applicator is sold separately. Ezy-As Compression Applicator Handle Video", "The Wireless Wander Door Alarm alerts caregivers or staff when a family member, resident or patient attempts to leave a room or window, or wanders into an unsupervised area. This wireless alarm system has a door or window sensor which attaches easily to a door and doorjamb or to a window and window frame.This two-part alarm system has a door sensor mounted in the resident's room and a wireless receiver/alarm carried by the caregiver. The receiver will alert you with a beep or vibrate. The door sensor attaches easily to both sides of the doorjamb. When the door or window is opened, the electronic signal is sent to the remote receiver. The signal alerts the caregiver that the resident is either wandering out of safe range or entering a non-supervised area. Excellent for home use - offers caregivers the peace of mind and freedom to attend other duties.System includes a battery in the sending unit and mounting instructions. Wireless Wander Door Alarm Features: Signal alerts the caregiver that the resident is wandering. When a door is opened, an electronic signal is sent to the remote receiver. Excellent for home use. Door sensor attaches easily. Alert can be set to Beep or Vibrate. A low-battery indicator light alerts you when to change batteries. Wireless Wander Door Alarm Specifications: Range: up to 100 feet. Alerting chime rings at 80 to 85 decibels. Sending unit uses one 9V battery (not included). Receiver uses one 12V battery (included).", "The Wireless Personal Pager allows you to summon help without having to yell. With the push of a button, bedridden or disabled individuals can summon help up to 100 feet away without having to raise their voice.This pager helps when you are caring for a bedridden loved one or a patient that is at risk for falling and you need to be in constant contact with them. The Wireless Personal Pager is a reliable and affordable paging system that enables your patient to contact you from up to 100 feet away. Wireless Personal Pager Features: Allows you to summons help at the push of a button. It works up to a range of about 100 feet both indoors and out. Includes a cord to keep the transmitter handy. Paging receiver has a clip for attaching to a belt. No installation is required. Wireless Personal Pager Specifications: Two alarm modes: chime and vibrate. Dimensions (receiver): 3.5\" W x 2.5\" H x 1\" D. Dimensions (transmitter): 2.75\" H x 1.5\" W x 0.75\" D. Transmitter uses a 12 volt battery (included). Receiver uses two AA batteries (not included).", "The Independence 2 Handled Nosey Cup is ideal for those with swallowing problems. Two handles allow for easier holding and manipulation.Nosey cups have a cut out for the nose to allow drinking without bending the neck or tilting the head.Made of durable, translucent polypropylene to allow monitoring of hot and cold liquid intake. One cup with one nosey attachment. 2 Handled Nosey Cup Features: Allows monitoring of hot and cold liquid intake. Ideal for those with swallowing problems and poor grasp. Allows drinking without bending the neck or tilting the head. 2 Handled Nosey Cup Specifications: Measures 4-1/2\"H x 3\"D (11.4 x 7.6 cm). Latex free. Holds 8 oz. Microwave safe and dishwasher safe to 228 degrees F.", "This specially designed Wanchik's Pediatric Writer device slides comfortably on, wrapping around your hand between the thumb and the index finger. Insert your standard pen or pencil into the holder. The tool supports your writing utensil for a more relaxed hand when writing.This writing utensil holder holds the pen for you! Children with decreased dexterity will be able to hold the writing finger in the proper position. Wanchik's Pediatric Writer Features: Wraps comfortably around the palm. Helps give individuals with weakened hand, finger and/or wrist dexterity the support and control needed to write. Wanchik's Pediatric Writer Specifications: Plastic-covered aluminum. Designed to fit pencils and thin ballpoints. Easily bendable for a customized fit.", "The TelAgenda Digital Calendar and Photo Display Frame connects by phone line to keep forgetful seniors \"on track\" by displaying Appointments, Occasions, Medication Schedules and Text Messages on the day of their occurrence. This information is entered by their loved ones on our password-protected website. This is a quick and convenient way for family and friends to convey important information to your loved one from anywhere in the world! The TelAgenda Frame even has its own email address so anyone can email photos directly to the frame.TelAgenda?s mission is to improve the quality of life of Independent Seniors through the daily delivery of critical information from Caregivers.Our team draws from their experiences with Seniors at all stages of life and medical conditions to provide care management products and services that are effective and easy to use.Our website allows Caregivers (Family members, Friends, Care Facilities) the ability to enter and communicate important information that is critical for ongoing daily care and social well being of the independent senior. Schedule information is transmitted by an existing phone line or WiFi (wireless internet) connection on a daily basis and is displayed on an Eye Catching and Easy-to-Read Digital Picture Frame designed for this purpose.Here's how it works: Family and friends just enter their loved one's calendar information and custom messages on the TelAgenda.com website, then the information is automatically transferred to the TelAgenda photo frame over night by standard telephone phone line or WiFi (if available)...your loved one doesn't have to do a thing...no PC or internet is required on their part. There are NO complicated electronics to operate...just plug it in!The TelAgenda Frame includes an annual service plan providing access to the TelAgenda.com website for one year. Renewals for subsequent years are available. Unlimited family and friends have access to the TelAgenda password-protected site to view their loved one's calendar and send messages. TelAgenda Features: Display Daily Reminders Of Personalized Schedule Information Maintained on our Secured Site. Display Messages from Friends & Family. Email Digital Photos to our 8? Digital Frame. No Computer or Internet Required? uses standard phone line to connect daily! TelAgenda Specifications: No Computer or Internet is Required. Connects by phone line. Digital Frame to Display Senior?sSchedule, Messages, and Photos included.", "The Self-Adjusting Straw Holder will hold drinking straws from 1/4 to 3/4 inch diameter. The flexible joints in this straw holder make it automatically adjust to hold firmly and securely. It is made of extremely light weight stainless steel. Simply slide any size straw into the straw clip and attach the holder to the side of any water bottle, cup or glass. The straw will not move! **Long Drinking Straw and Cup Holder shown in image are sold separately. Self Adjusting Straw Holder Features: Automatically adjusts for different straw sizes. Prevents your straw from moving. Self Adjusting Straw Holder Specifications: Fits: Straw sizes 1/4 up to 3/4 inch diameter. Material: Light weight stainless steel.", "Chair Aerobics for Everyone is an effective alternative to conventional exercise if you have never exercised, cannot stand for a prolonged amount of time or are just returning to a fitness routine. Chair Aerobics is also challenging enough for people at higher fitness levels wanting to exercise in limited space, such as at the office. Nikki Glazer has more than 10 years experience as a certified fitness expert. Nikki provides optimal results for the beginner or the most experienced fitness client. By incorporating cardiovascular exercises, weights and circuit training, Nikki shows you how to isolate and tone your muscles without momentum through resisting against our own body weight. We have created a low impact routine to tone and shape your entire body that is fun and effective. Chair Aerobics for Everyone DVD Features: BURN INCHES - TONE YOUR ENTIRE BODY - RESTORE ENERGY - ONLY LIMITED SPACE REQUIRED - FOR ALL AGES. A low impact routine to tone and shape your entire body that is fun and effective. Chair Aerobics for Everyone DVD Specifications: Run time: 38 minutes.", "Designed to be the ultimate in wheelchair comfort and skin protection! Gel Wraps for Swing Away Wheelchair Footrests provide lower leg protection when using a wheelchair. This pair of gel wheelchair leg wraps can aid in healing existing sores and abrasions. Gel Wraps for leg rests protect wheelchair user's legs that may come in contact with the hard metal of elevating leg rests or footrests. These gel pads fit on the down leg of 70 degree swing-away foot rests and measure 2 1/2 x 9 1/2 inches. Gel Ovations ™ gel is a medical grade silicone solid gel. It does not flow or leak out when cut, will not rot or dry out, does not retain heat, is latex free, and odorless. This gel is highly efficient at distributing pressure, protecting bony prominences and reducing abrasions, shear, and harmful pressure-related problems. The Gel Ovations cover is a durable neoprene nylon rubber with a nylon surface, similar to wet suit material, which is soft and easy to clean.Product Care Information Gel Ovations Products: Do NOT put pads or covers in a washing machine. Do NOT submerge them in water or agitate. Do NOT put in clothes dryer. With HEATED DRYING turned OFF, you may wash them in the top rack of an automatic dishwasher. Alternatively, wipe the surface with any normal household soap or cleaning solution that is not irritating and to which you are not allergic. Gel Wraps for Swing Away Wheelchair Footrest Features: Provide lower leg protection. Durable neoprene nylon surface, which is soft, easy to clean, and highly efficient at distributing pressure. Will not harden or soften in the cold or heat. Odorless, colorless, and latex free. Secured with Velcro to swing-away footrests of standard wheelchairs. Gel Wrap for Swing Away Wheelchair Footrest Specifications: Fits: standard swing away wheelchair leg rests. Sold as: one pair. Material: medical grade silicone gel. Cover: neoprene. Gel pad thickness: 0.5 inch. Dimensions: 12 inches long, 4 inches wide.", "The Long Loop Easi Grip Scissors have been designed to help overcome difficulties encountered by those with weak hand or grip conditions that make the use of conventional style scissors uncomfortable or impossible.Using the index finger to provide guidance and control, the middle, ring and little fingers are inserted through the loop to provide the strength for the cutting action. Alternatively for those with very limited movement the fingers can be placed over the long loop. Gently squeeze the scissors shut, the spring-action of the handle will automatically reopen the scissors as soon as the grip is eased.Recommended for Weak Grip or for Poor Hand Control Long Loop Easi Grip Scissors Features: Long loop handle allows the strength of middle, ring and little finger to be used while the index finger is placed outside the loop and used for guidance. Colour coded handles easily identify whether for right hand (blue), or for left hand (green). Blade guard supplied for safety when not in use. High quality handle that will not snap and retains spring action. Long Loop Easi Grip Scissors Specifications: 3 inch Pointed Stainless steel blades. Ultra lightweight.", "The Crutcheze Underarm Crutch Bag has one main pouch plus a side stretchable fashion pocket for extra storage space. Specifically designed to attach at the underarm or hand grip of an underarm crutch for flexibility and ease of use.To outfit your crutches, simply attach bag at underarm or hand grip with top removable, adjustable straps and side hook/loop for secure fit.Crutcheze Underarm Crutch Bag - stretch crutch bag with side pocket. Water proof, stain resistant. Size 6.5\"W x 9\"L. Lots of room for personal items. One size fits all standard underarm crutches.*Matching padded hand grips pictured sold separately. Crutcheze Underarm Crutch Bag Features: Main pouch is stretchable, water proof, stain resistant, bacteria/fungus resistant, lightweight, soft to the touch and washable. Plenty of room to carry all of your personal items, including water bottles, electronic devices, wallets, etc. Pouch features an inside liner pocket to securely carry and access your cell phone, iPod, etc. Bag easily attaches to crutch and adjusts to reach at underarm or hand grip with removable, adjustable straps. Crutcheze Underarm Crutch Bag Specifications: Made in USA of domestic padding and imported stretch fabric. Measures - 6.5\"W x 9\"L. One size fits all standard underarm crutches. Weight: 1.8 oz. One bag per package.", "The Heelift Bariatric Suspension Boot boasts all of the same qualities as Heelift Standard, but is designed specifically for bariatric patients (patients who weigh up to 600 pounds). Healthcare professionals are increasingly recognizing obesity as a risk factor for diabetes and associated complications, including heel pressure ulcers. Heelift® Bariatric Suspension Boot helps prevent heel pressure ulcers in patients who are particularly prone to suffer from the condition. Specifically, Heelift Bariatric was developed for patients weighing up to 600 pounds who have a calf circumference of between 12 to 23 inches. Like Heelift Standard, Heelift Bariatric offloads the heel by redistributing pressure from the heel to the patient's calf. The design of Heelift Bariatric minimizes contact between the patient's leg and objects that can cause pressure at the heel or at folds in the skin. Rounded, adjustable straps and a smooth, friction-free tricot backing also ensure that the Heelift will not rub against or cause impressions on the patient's other leg. Together with diligent care and monitoring, Heelift Bariatric can help even the most at-risk patients prevent heel pressure ulcers. Boot is non-returnable if packaging is opened. Heelift Bariatric Suspension Boot Features: Extended Stitching: Located along the top rim, the added stitching narrows the forefoot and increases support to provide improved protection against foot drop, equines deformity, or heel cord contracture. \"Easy-on, easy-off\" rounded straps and D-ring closures: Padded Velcro® straps are easy for the patient and/or healthcare professional to use and can easily be adjusted to accommodate specific patient needs. Friction-free tricot backing: Unlike other suspension products, which can have sharp edges on the back that can rub against the patient's other leg, Heelift is manufactured with a smooth tricot backing that aids in patient mobility and helps ensure patient safety. Smooth foam: Heelift Bariatric is available in Smooth foam only. Smooth foam is ideal for patients with edematous legs as it will not create \"impressions\" on the leg. Ventilation holes: Ventilation holes provide additional air circulation to promote increased patient comfort. Tricot covered stiffener: This feature prevents Heelift from buckling for added patient comfort and safety. The Heelift features forefoot support using a spring back technology to keep the foot upright. The Heelift can be autoclaved for sterilization. Close the straps and place in a normal autoclave wrapper. The Heelift can be machine-washed and dried. Simply tighten the straps and enclose in a net laundry bag or a pillow case. Heelift Bariatric Suspension Boot Specifications: Can be autoclaved for sterilization. For calf circumference of between 12 to 23 inches. For patients weighing up to 600 pounds.", "Today?s lifestyle requires ease of movement over various surfaces, and the old-fashioned ?hop-hop-hop? method is not acceptable for people on the move. There is no better alternative to EZ Glyder Walker Glides . This tested and proven design meets all the needs of anyone that uses a walker. EZ Glyders glide over all types of surfaces with ease and they are made of a long-lasting plastic material that can withstand many years of use, unlike our competitors, who tend to wear out within weeks! EZ Glyder Walker Glides Features: Solves the \"hop, hop, hop\" problem for anyone having to use a walker. Easily over many types of surfaces, including concrete, vinyl, carpet and wood. EZ Glyder Walker Glides Specifications: Made of a long-lasting plastic material that can withstand many years of use. Fits walker legs with 1 inch diameter tubing.", "The Fleece Lined Hooded Poncho was designed for wheelchair and scooter users. Clean, classic lines - perfect for both men and women. Fleece lined for cozy warmth. Cut shorter in back for comfort when sitting. Ample over-the-knee coverage. Water repellent shell made of 100% nylon Supplex. Completely lined with cozy 100% polyester fleece. 14\" zippered front opening for easy on and off. Features: Fleece lined for cozy warmth. Cut shorter in back for comfort when sitting. Water repellent shell made of 100% nylon Supplex. Specifications: One size fits most. Approximate Measurements - Front length: 40\"; Back length: 25-1/2\"; Neck to wrist length: 22\". Machine wash warm, delicate cycle, tumble dry low.", "Comfortably and safely enter the tub with the Health Circle Sliding Transfer Bench . Sit down then lift your legs into the tub and slide over. The sliding seat moves with you. Easy lock seat release self-locates and locks into position when you are safely in the tub area. Shower curtain can still fit inside tub to keep the floor dry. Individually height adjustable legs accommodate most all tub shapes and models. Hand held shower holster on both sides.Non returnable hygiene item. Health Circle Sliding Transfer Bench Features: Self draining seat. Suction feet help stability in the tub. Reversible design. Soap caddy and handle. Easy lift release lock. Health Circle Sliding Transfer Bench Specifications: 5 minute assembly. Seat height adjusts from 18.5 inches to 22.5 inches high. Seat size - 22 inches Wide x 16 inches Deep. Back size - 13 inches High x 18 inches Wide. Foot print - 36 inches Wide x 15.5 inches Deep. 300 lb weight rated.", "Sleeve Guards are made to slip comfortably over your forearms to protect your shirt sleeves, jackets, and skin against moisture and dirt. Sleeve Guards are typically used by manual wheelchair users, but they can be used by anyone looking to protect their arms. Dirt and moisture can ruin expensive clothes. So can wheel wear. Sleeve Guards slip over your forearms to protect your jacket and shirt sleeves. Once you get where you're going, slip them off of your clean sleeves. Sleeve Guard Features: Protects your shirt sleeves, jackets, and skin against moisture and dirt. Can be used by anyone looking to protect their arms when using wheelchairs. Sleeve Guard Specifications: Size: one size fits all.", "Our DiabEase™ Exfoliating Foot Scrub provides gentle but thorough exfoliation that will help keep feet moisturized and silky smooth. Dead Sea minerals improve circulation and draws out toxins. Antiseptic Tea Tree helps protect skin from impurities. Botanical Green Tea, Ginseng, Vitamin C, Thyme, Sage, and Rosemary revitalize the skin.As part of a total, natural diabetic foot care regimen, this gently exfoliating botanical/mineral Foot Scrub helps purify and soften the feet while removing dry, dead skin layers. Helps improve the penetration of foot moisturizers. DiabEase Foot Therapy Scrub Features: Antibacterial Dead Sea Minerals stimulate circulation and draw out toxins. Botanical Green Tea, Ginseng, Thyme, Sage, and Rosemary revitalize the skin. Antiseptic Tea Tree helps protect skin from impurities. Vitamin C helps keep feet smooth and soft. DiabEase Foot Therapy Scrub Specifications: 6 oz. tube. Ingredients: Water, Carthamus Tinctorius (Safflower) Seed Oil, Walnut Shell Powder, Stearic Acid, Glyceryl Stearate, Cetyl Alcohol, Glycerin, Dead Sea Mineral Salt, Propylene Glycol, PEG-100 Stearate, Menthol, Aloe Barbadensis, Pumice, Camillia Sinensis (Green Tea) extract, Panax Ginseng, Thymus Vulgaris (Thyme) Extract, Melaleuca Alternifolia (tea tree) Leaf Oil, Ascorbic Acid (vitamin c), Phytonadione (vitamin k), Salvia (sage) extract, Rosemarinus Officinalis (rosemary) extract, Citric acid, Hydroxyethylcellulose, Tetrasodium Edta, Phenoxyethanol, Tocopherol (vitamin E), Ethylparaben, Propylparaben, aromatic essences.", "The decorative aluminum Beige Floral Designer Folding Cane features an attractive floral pattern. The cane is 3/4 inch in diameter. Four sections extend automatically when removed from pocketbook or purse to provide a convenient support cane from 33 to 37 inches. A Polished contour wood derby top style handle provides a secure grip. Slip resistant rubber tip for safety. Lightweight Adjustable Designer Cane, Beige Floral Features: Attractive pattern. Compact folding design fits in a pocket book or carrying case. Includes slip resistant rubber tip for safety. Lightweight Adjustable Designer Cane, Beige Floral Specifications: Construction: strong, lightweight anodized 3/4 inch aluminum tubing. Height: adjusts from 33 to 37 inches in 1 inch increments. Weight capacity: 250 pounds.", "The CleanWave Sanitizing Furniture & Bed Vac eliminates odors and up to 99.9% of viruses (including H1N1), bacteria (including MRSA), germs, mold, bed bug, dust mite and flea eggs on household surfaces without harsh chemicals that can damage fabrics, upholstery and the environment.CleanWave deodorizes and kills germs, bed bugs, dust mite and flea eggs on mattresses and bedding without damaging fabrics.Tested by United States independent third party laboratories. CleanWave is proven to be a fast and effective sanitizer. UV-C light is effective at killing bed bug eggs and bed bug nymphs. Testing has been performed by a United States independent third party laboratory using UV-C light against bed bug eggs and bed bug nymphs. Cleanwave Sanitizing Furniture & Bed Vac Features: 400 Watts of power creates superior and consistent suction. Cyclonic action keeps dust and debris away from the filter, maintaining a strong suction. Easy empty, bagless design and 2-stage micro-allergy filtration prevents recirculation of pollutants. Detachable hand vacuum for quick cleanups and hard to reach places. Cleanwave Sanitizing Furniture & Bed Vac Specifications: One year limited manufacturer warranty. Body Length: 13? Long. Body Width: 5.25?. Weight: 5.0 lbs.", "The swivel tray is sold as an accessory to the couch cane (the two items together is the same as the Assist-a-Tray AST2050).So, if you already have the couch cane, now you can add the swivel tray. Swivel Tray for Couch Cane Features: Allows you to upgrade your couch cane to an Assist-A-Tray. Includes a cup holder and pencil holder. No tools required for assembly. Tray swivels and arm pivots 360 degrees. Swivel Tray for Couch Cane Specifications: Fits AST412 Couch Cane. Easy installation. Measures 16 x 18 inches. 30 pound weight limit.", "Use the Walker Caddy to carry a variety of personal items, even drinks and meals safely and independently on your walker. Convenient tray and basket enable user to even carry drinks and meals. Attaches and removes quickly and conveniently to folding walkers. Does not interfere with walker handles. Basket underneath tray enables patients to carry a variety of personal items. Made of tough durable plastic. Easy to clean. Walker Caddy Features: Convenient tray with under-tray storage. Does not interfere with walker handles. Easily attaches to any standard walker. Walker Caddy Specifications: Measures 15.47? x 12.41? x 5?.", "The TO2TE® Walker O2 Bag easily attaches an E size oxygen tank to a wheeled walker without tools. The holder allows you to maneuver an oxygen tank and a rolling walker at the same time. It helps users regain their confidence and independence to move about as needed.Lightweight, machine washable nylon includes a pocket for an oxygen wrench. Sturdy Velcro® attachment straps. E Size Oxygen Tank Holder for Walkers Features: Helps users regain their confidence and independence to move about as needed. Easily attaches an oxygen tank to a wheeled walker without tools. Includes a pocket for an oxygen wrench. E Size Oxygen Tank Holder for Walkers Specifications: Holds one \"E\" cylinder. Rugged, nylon construction. Sturdy Velcro® straps. Attaches to most 2 wheeled walkers. *Walker, cylinder and valve wrench are not included.", "The Cane Expressions Blue Cane Cover dresses up old and unadorned canes with a stylish stretchy pull-on royal blue colored cane sleeve. This beautiful blue fabric sleeve transforms your mobility aid into a fashion accessory. Cane Expressions Blue Cane Cover Features: Royal blue colored cane sleeve helps to dress up an unadorned cane. Sleeve easily slips over the walking cane shaft. Fits both aluminum and wooden canes. Cane Expressions Blue Cane Cover Specifications: Length: Sleeve is 27 inches long. Material: Made of washable neoprene and spandex. Fabric Care: Cold wash and rinse, air dry. Color: Royal Blue.", "The Granny Jo Products Wheelchair, Walker, or Scooter Bag attaches easily by using adjustable straps and clip fasteners. The bag is 100% cotton featuring an outside pocket with zippered compartment for a cell phone and interior slots for credit cards and ID. This 16\" by 9\" Wheelchair/Walker/Scooter Bag is 100% cotton duck with Velcro closure. The bag features adjustable length straps that are secured with clip fasteners. The interior of the bag has a keyring holder and slots for credit cards or ID. The outside has a pocket with a zippered compartment ideal for holding a cell phone.For wheelchair use the bag can be attached on the inside or outside of the chair's arm depending on the wheel configuration or hung on the back of the chair.Scooter users can adjust the straps to fit the width of the arm on their machine. Granny Jo Wheelchair, Walker or Scooter Bag Features: Outside pocket has a zippered compartment ideal for holding a cell phone. Interior compartment has a keyring holder and slots for credit cards or ID. 100% cotton-duck fabric. Attaches easily to wheelchairs walkers and scooters. Granny Jo Wheelchair, Walker or Scooter Bag Specifications: Attaches using adjustable straps and clip fasteners. Construction: 100% cotton duck with Velcro closure. Measures: 16 x 9 inches. One Walker/Wheelchair Bag.", "The Heelift Petite Smooth Suspension Boot is indicated for pediatric patients or for patients who are smaller than what is considered the average size for an adult. Specifically, Heelift® Petite works best for patients ranging in height from 3'10 to 5'4 and whose calf circumferences measure 6 to 10 inches. Children, just like adults, are at risk for heel pressure ulcers if they are stationary for long periods of time due to health conditions or multihour surgery. Heelift Petite, together with turning and careful monitoring of the skin, can aid in preventing pressure ulcers in these young patients. Boot is non-returnable if packaging is opened. Heelift Petite Smooth Suspension Boot Features: Shorter length proximal to the heel: To accommodate short patients, the length of Heelift Petite is shorter than Heelift Standard. Extended Stitching: Located along the top rim, the added stitching narrows the forefoot and increases support to provide improved protection against foot drop, equines deformity, or heel cord contracture. \"Easy-on, easy-off\" rounded straps and D-ring closures: Padded Velcro® straps are easy for the patient and/or healthcare professional to use and can easily be adjusted to accommodate specific patient needs. Friction-free tricot backing: Unlike other suspension products, which can have sharp edges on the back that can rub against the patient's other leg, Heelift is manufactured with a smooth tricot backing that aids in patient mobility and helps ensure patient safety. Smooth or Convoluted foam: Heelift Petite is available in either Smooth or Convoluted foam. Smooth foam is ideal for patients with edematous legs as it will not create \"impressions\" on the leg. Convoluted foam is slightly cooler to wear. Ventilation holes: Ventilation holes provide additional air circulation to promote increased patient comfort. Tricot covered stiffener: This feature prevents Heelift from buckling for added patient comfort and safety. The Heelift features forefoot support using a spring back technology to keep the foot upright. The Heelift can be autoclaved for sterilization. Close the straps and place in a normal autoclave wrapper. The Heelift can be machine-washed and dried. Simply tighten the straps and enclose in a net laundry bag or a pillow case. Heelift Petite Smooth Suspension Boot Specifications: Can be autoclaved for sterilization. For calf circumferences measuring 6 to 10 inches. For patients ranging in height from 3'10 to 5'4. Petite Boot measures 10.5 inches from heel to calf, 6.75 inches from heel to toe.", "The new EZ - Access 4 ft Suitcase Ramp Signature SS4 features an extruded non-skid tread for superior traction, and a self-adjusting bottom transition plate for easy conversion from ramp to ground. The Signature Series Suitcase Ramps are ultra-strong, single-fold ramps that provide the safety and strength required while remaining lightweight and portable. The hinge features a no-pinch, non-protruding live hinge for safe, silent, and maintenance free operation. The ergonomically designed flexible, non-breakable handles offer convenient carrying and a comfortable grip. The 800 lb weight capacity allows the ramp to safely support power scooters, power wheelchairs and manual wheelchairs. Welded construction provides long-term durability and safety. EZ - Access 4 FT Ramp Features: Non-skid surface. Built-in carrying handle. Lightweight and portable. Easy conversion from ramp to ground. EZ - Access 4 FT Ramp Specifications: Usable size: 4 feet x 30 inches. Folded size: 48 inches x 15 inches x 4 inches. Weight: 23 pounds. Weight capacity: 800 pounds. Warranty: Manufacturer's 3 year. Made of: Aluminum.", "The Heelift Petite Convoluted Suspension Boot is indicated for pediatric patients or for patients who are smaller than what is considered the average size for an adult. Specifically, Heelift® Petite works best for patients ranging in height from 3'10 to 5'4 and whose calf circumferences measure 6 to 10 inches. Children, just like adults, are at risk for heel pressure ulcers if they are stationary for long periods of time due to health conditions or multihour surgery. Heelift Petite, together with turning and careful monitoring of the skin, can aid in preventing pressure ulcers in these young patients. Boot is non-returnable if packaging is opened. Heelift Petite Convoluted Suspension Boot Features: Shorter length proximal to the heel: To accommodate short patients, the length of Heelift Petite is shorter than Heelift Standard. Extended Stitching: Located along the top rim, the added stitching narrows the forefoot and increases support to provide improved protection against foot drop, equines deformity, or heel cord contracture. \"Easy-on, easy-off\" rounded straps and D-ring closures: Padded Velcro® straps are easy for the patient and/or healthcare professional to use and can easily be adjusted to accommodate specific patient needs. Friction-free tricot backing: Unlike other suspension products, which can have sharp edges on the back that can rub against the patient's other leg, Heelift is manufactured with a smooth tricot backing that aids in patient mobility and helps ensure patient safety. Smooth or Convoluted foam: Heelift Petite is available in either Smooth or Convoluted foam. Smooth foam is ideal for patients with edematous legs as it will not create \"impressions\" on the leg. Convoluted foam is slightly cooler to wear. Ventilation holes: Ventilation holes provide additional air circulation to promote increased patient comfort. Tricot covered stiffener: This feature prevents Heelift from buckling for added patient comfort and safety. The Heelift features forefoot support using a spring back technology to keep the foot upright. The Heelift can be autoclaved for sterilization. Close the straps and place in a normal autoclave wrapper. The Heelift can be machine-washed and dried. Simply tighten the straps and enclose in a net laundry bag or a pillow case. Heelift Petite Convoluted Suspension Boot Specifications: Can be autoclaved for sterilization. For calf circumferences measuring 6 to 10 inches. For patients ranging in height from 3'10 to 5'4. Petite Boot measures 10.5 inches from heel to calf, 6.75 inches from heel to toe.", "The new EZ - Access 2 ft Suitcase Ramp Signature SS2 features an extruded non-skid tread for superior traction, and a self-adjusting bottom transition plate for easy conversion from ramp to ground. The Signature Series Suitcase Ramps are ultra-strong, single-fold ramps that provide the safety and strength required while remaining lightweight and portable. The hinge features a no-pinch, non-protruding live hinge for safe, silent, and maintenance free operation. The ergonomically designed flexible, non-breakable handles offer convenient carrying and a comfortable grip. The 800 lb weight capacity allows the ramp to safely support power scooters, power wheelchairs and manual wheelchairs. Welded construction provides long-term durability and safety. EZ - Access 2 FT Ramp Features: Non-skid surface. Built-in carrying handle. Lightweight and portable. Easy conversion from ramp to ground. EZ - Access 2 FT Ramp Specifications: Usable size: 2 feet x 30 inches. Folded size: 24 inches x 15 inches x 4 inches. Weight: 11 pounds. Weight capacity: 800 pounds. Warranty: Manufacturer's 3 year. Made of: Aluminum.", "The Metro Walker Replacement Wheels fit the Standers Metro Walker. Allow for trouble-free maneuvering of the Metro Walker over a variety of surfaces. The replacement wheels come in a package of 2. The wheels are 4 inches in diameter and are made of urethane. These replacement wheels only fit the Metro Walker (not for other types of walkers). Replacement Wheel Features: Large, durable wheels. For use with the Standers Metro Walker. Replacement Wheel Specifications: Wheel Diameter: 4 inches. Package: Set of 2.", "The Metro Walker Ski Glides fit the Standers Metro Walker and are packaged in a set of 2. The Ski Glides move smoothly over most surfaces and are used to stabilize the walker and control the user's pace. Metro Walker Ski Glide Features: Set of 2. Helps stabilize walker.", "The Ingrid Cane or Crutch Tip with Retractable Spike easily retracts for use during summer months or while indoors. The Retractable Spike also provides a firm grip on snow, ice and most other outdoor surfaces. Designed and manufactured in Sweden, the cane or crutch tip is made of high quality polyurethane and provides an excellent grip both indoors and outdoors. The retractable spike is made of stainless steel and will not rust. Retracted spike will not damage floors. The tread pattern at the bottom of the tip does not wear as quickly as a conventional cane or crutch tip. Inside the tip is a rust proof zinc-plated washer that prevents the cane or crutch from wearing through the tip. The tip has a patented elastic neck that adjusts to the dimensions of the cane or crutch shaft making it easy for the user to replace or substitute tips as needed. Retractable Ice & Snow Spike Tip for Canes & Crutches Features: Provides a firm grip on snow, ice and most other outdoor surfaces. Retracted spike will not damage floors. Easy to install. Retractable Ice & Snow Spike Tip for Canes & Crutches Specifications: Fits: cane or crutch shafts measuring 13/16 inch - 1 1/16 inches (21 - 27 millimeters). Color: Black. One per package.", "The Ingrid Cane or Crutch Tip with Retractable Spike provides a firm grip on snow, ice and most other outdoor surfaces. The spike easily retracts for use during summer months or while indoors. Retracted spike will not damage floors. Designed and manufactured in Sweden, the cane or crutch tip is made of high quality polyurethane and provides an excellent grip both indoors and outdoors. The retractable spike is made of stainless steel and will not rust. The tread pattern at the bottom of the tip does not wear as quickly as a conventional can or crutch tips. Inside the tip is a rust proof zinc-plated washer that prevents the cane or crutch from wearing through the tip. The tip has a patented elastic neck that adjusts to the dimension of the cane or crutch shaft making it easy for the user to replace or substitute tips as needed. Retractable Ice & Snow Spike Tip for Canes & Crutches Features: Provides a firm grip on snow, ice and most other outdoor surfaces. Retracted spike will not damage floors. Easy to install. Retractable Ice & Snow Spike Tip for Canes & Crutches Specifications: Fits: cane or crutch shafts measuring 1/2 inch - 11/16 inch (13 - 17 millimeters). Color: Black. One per package.", "The Ingrid Classic Cane or Crutch Tip is manufactured in Sweden and made of high quality polyurethane. The use of this material makes them extremely durable and provides for an excellent grip both indoors and outdoors. Safety is enhanced because the tread pattern at the bottom of the tip does not wear as quickly as a conventional tip. Inside the tip is a rust proof metal washer made of zinc plated steel which prevents the cane or crutch from wearing through the tip. The \"tire track\" treads at the point of contact provide an excellent grip on most surfaces. The convex bottom enhances both walking comfort and durability. This cane tip has a patented elastic neck which adjusts to the dimension of the cane or crutch shaft, making it easy for the user to replace tips as needed. Ingrid Classic Cane or Crutch Tip Features: Extremely durable and provides for an excellent grip both indoors and outdoors. Tip does not wear as quickly as a conventional tip. Convex bottom enhances both walking comfort and durability. Ingrid Classic Cane or Crutch Tip Specifications: Fits: cane and crutch shafts measuring 5/8 inch - 7/8 inch (16 - 22 millimeters). Color - black.", "The Quick Desk is a comfortable work surface to write on when at home or on the road. Its sturdy, light weight design adjusts effortlessly to fit anyone.The Quick Desks™ locking legs ensure a snug, comfortable fit for anyone. Proper fit is achieved by simply pushing a release button and sliding The Quick Desks legs to your leg for the perfect fit. It's that easy.When you use The Quick Desk you will find that it's unique design along with its lightweight and versatility make it a must have for yourself and the perfect gift to give to others. The Quick Desk Features: Locking legs ensure a snug, comfortable fit for anyone. Small size allows it to be stored very easily. The Quick Desk Specifications: Lightweight and versatile. Size: 7 3/4 W x 9 1/2 L.", "The Extra Long Flexible Drinking Straw combines flexibility and stability to provide hands free drinking. The straw contains 4 flexible sections to allow adjustment to almost any angle. Two flexible sections in the center PLUS one near each end will allow you to bend it to the position you need for your best access. The Extra Long Flexible Drinking Long Straw can be cut with standard scissors. Shorten it to any length that will work best for you. That is one reason it is made so long; everybody needs a different length. It is washable and reusable. The super long drinking straw has the same diameter as original jumbo drinking straws as found in sports drinks. *The cup holder and straw holder shown in the picture are sold separately. Extra Long Flexible Drinking Straw Features: 4 flexible sections. Washable. Reusable. Extra Long Flexible Drinking Straw Specifications: Length: 28 inches. Inside Diameter: 0.35 inches. Package includes: 10 straws.", "EZ Access Universal Crutch Carry - On features a large inside pocket, front zipper pocket, small side pocket and outer mesh pocket. The Crutch Carry - On is specifically made for underarm crutches or forearm crutches. Universal fit easily attaches to crutch handles using adjustable hook and loop straps. Removal is simple and easy too. The Crutch Carry - On keeps essential items handy without interfering with mobility. Ideal for storing and carrying keys, glasses, papers, water bottles and other personal items. EZ Access Universal Crutch Carry On Features: Keeps items close and accessible. Large inside pocket. Front zipper pocket. Small side pocket. Outside mesh pocket. Easily attaches to canes or crutches. EZ Access Universal Crutch Carry On Specifications: Material: durable nylon. Length: 10 inches. Width: 5 ½ inches. Depth: 1 ¾ inches. Color: black.", "Power Chair Covers are specifically designed to protect a power wheelchair from the weather during carrier transportation and from dust during storage. Easily slip the cover over a power chair and tie it down using either the (4) metal grommets found on regular cover models, or by the (12) reinforced tie down loops found on heavy duty cover models. *Please note: Power chair Mobility Covers are not intended for highway use without using a securing device such as rope or cords over the top and through the grommet holes or tie down loops. This will reduce the amount of excess room under the cover and prevent billowing at high speeds. Power Chair Cover Features: Protects a power chair from the weather and dust. Great for transportation and storage. Standard Fabric Model MDV1300 includes a carrying pouch. Power Chair Cover Specifications: Warranty: Manufacturer's 1 year. Measures: 38H x 18W x 44L inches. 124 inch circumference. Regular Model: 4 metal grommet tie down points. Heavy Duty Model: 12 reinforced tie down loops. Made: USA.", "The Stander 30 Inch Safety Bed Rail with Padded Pouch helps prevent the user from falling out of bed. The bed rail can also be conveniently used as a hand rail to help assist in getting in and out of bed. Included is a safety bumper pad with an 8 pocket organizer pouch with 4 convenient pockets per side. The collapsible Safety Bed Rail pivots down the side of the bed making it easy to make up the bed. The Safety Bed Rail is easily installed to either side of any size home or hospital bed with the dual safety strap. This provides stability and the assurance that the rail will not be bumped out of place. Safety Rail with Padded Pouch Features: Rail pivots down to side of bed to allow user to get out of bed or provide space for making bed. Prevents falling from bed and can be used for assistance to sit up in bed. Safety bumper pad with 4 convenient pockets per side. Can be placed on either side of the bed. Secures bed rail to any sized home or hospital bed frame. Safety Bed Rail with Padded Pouch Specifications: Width of Rail: 30 inches. Height of Rail: 23 inches high from the base of mattress. Gap Between Rails: 3 inches. Weight Capacity: 400 lbs. Assembly: Installs in minutes with 4 bolts and Allen Wrench (Included).", "The EZ Access Scooter Pack features a mesh sleeve that easily slips over the back of the scooter seat for a comfortable and secure fit. The Scooter Pack has large privacy compartments to store and transport personal items and valuables. Features a carrying handle which allows this scooter back pack to be used as a portable tote. EZ Access Scooter Pack Features: Large privacy compartments. Carrying handle for easy portability. Mesh sleeve for a comfortable and secure fit. Keeps personal items safe. EZ Access Scooter Pack Specifications: Dimensions: 16 inches x 14.5 inches x 6 inches. Color: black. Material: durable weatherproof nylon.", "The Diestco 2 Piece Scooter Seat and Tiller Cover helps protect your power scooter and tiller from moisture by preventing any unwanted water damage to your power scooter. It works great with your power scooter seat and tiller on lifts or for storing outside. When using the tiller cover in operations, controls are still visible. The seat cover not only protects your seat from moisture, you can also sit in your seat while the cover is on. Locking drawstring keeps it tight around the base of your seat. These covers form fit to your power mobility vehicle. Simply slip it over your scooter and use the locking drawstrings along the bottom to secure. (Seat and Tiller Covers are also sold separately). Scooter Cover Features: Helps provide protection from the elements. Covers form fit to your mobility vehicle. Scooter Cover Specifications: Material: Water-resistant nylon fabric and plastic. Attachment: Locking drawstrings. Includes: Regular Tiller Cover MDV2100 and Seat Cover MDV2010.", "The Standers 30 Inch Safety Bed Rail is collapsible and pivots down the side of the bed to help the user get in and out of bed.The Safety Bed Rail also works as a side rail to help prevent user from falling out of bed. The Safety Bed Rail attaches easily to any size home or hospital bed and is reversible, allowing the rail to be placed on either side of the bed. Included is a dual safety strap that secures the bed rail to the bed frame. The easy yet sturdy design allows you install the rail within minutes with only 4 bolts and an Alan wrench. The Safety Bed Rail helps keep loved ones safe and gives caregivers peace of mind. 30 Inch Safety Bed Rail Features: Collapsible rail folds down to side of bed. Easy to install, includes all necessary parts. Fits on either side of bed. Prevents falls and assists with mobility. 30 Inch Safety Bed Rail Specifications: Assembly: installs in minutes and includes all necessary tools. Rail Width: 30\". Rail Height: 23\" high from the base of mattress. Gap Between Rails: 3\". Weight Capacity: 400 lbs.", "The Stander Recliner Riser is a safe and easy solution to helping you get up safely from your recliner. When you stand from the typical recliner, it tilts forward, dropping the arms and seat of an already low chair by 3 - 4 inches. Simply raising the chair by 5 or 6 inches, necessary for independent standing, makes it dangerously unstable. When Recliner Risers are installed, they raise a chair 1 ¾ inches and limit the forward tilt allowing an additional 3 - 4 inches of lift. The 4 - 6 total inches of extra support gives a weakened person a biomechanical advantage and enables them to stand on their own. Recliner Risers attach quickly and easily to the wooden base of your favorite recliner. Our patented design raises your effective seat height 4 - 6 inches while only raising your chair 1 ¾ inches. The Riser helps give your chair a lift. Standers Recliner Riser Features: Makes standing or sitting easy. Does not interfere with rocking or reclining of chair. Slip resistant and non-marking pads protect floor. Installs quickly with included wood screws. Matches look and feel of furniture. Limits forward tilt to make standing safe and easy. Standers Recliner Riser Specifications: Riser Dimensions: 1.75 inches high x 2.5 inches wide x 6 inches long. Weight Capacity: 800 lbs (including furniture). Includes: four Recliner Risers, two Rocker Limiters, 16 screws, Velcro, and instruction manual.", "The EZ Access Wheelchair Pack features large privacy compartments, including spacious main section with zippered closure. The Wheelchair Pack is easily attached and has several compartments to store your personal belongings. It also features deep side pockets which are perfect for holding water bottles, newspaper, and other items. A convenient carrying handle makes this pack usable as a portable bag. Buckle straps fasten over seat and handle loops slip over wheelchair canes for easy and secure attachment. Made out of a durable weatherproof nylon. EZ Access Wheelchair Pack Features: Large compartments. Zippered main compartment for added safety. Deep Side pockets hold water bottles. Usable as a portable tote. Carries personal items conveniently on back of a wheelchair. EZ Access Wheelchair Pack Specifications: Measurements: 15 inches x 15 inches x 5 inches. Color: black. Material: durable, weatherproof nylon.", "Lend-A-Hand is a large universal sleeve that helps hold fishing rods, pot scrubbers, spatulas, rakes, brooms, paint rollers, shovels ? any tool with a handle. Lend-A-Hand was originally developed to help the physically challenged play golf. This universal assistant device provides additional arm support, leverage and strength to help perform daily activities. The base pad has a soft fleece lining to prevent skin irritation. The attached holder is made of durable ballistic nylon with colored stripe indicating the opening to accept the handle. The 1 ¼ inch diameter opening accepts a variety of handle sizes. Tape or cohesive flexible bandage wrap or tape around the handle may be used to achieve a better fit and prevent the handle from slipping or turning inside Lend-A-Hand. Lend-A-Hand can be used on the forearm or attached to the lower leg. Select the 3 appropriate length straps to fit your forearm or lower leg and slide them through attached D rings. See videos for various applications and uses of the versatile Lend-A-Hand. Hand wash, gentle soap, warm water, no bleach, air dry. Lend-A-Hand Features: One size fits most. Soft fleece lining to prevent skin irritation. Accepts a variety of handle sizes. Lend-A-Hand Specifications: Opening for Accessories: 1 ¼ inches. Base Pad Length: 7 ½ inches. Base Pad Width: 2 ½ inches at open end, 3 inches at closed end. Includes: 5 straps in varying lengths - 15, 13, 11, 9 and 7 inches. Color: green.", "The Standers Bedside Econorail helps allow for easy transfer in and out of bed. The Econorail is the smallest, most affordable bed rail on the market. The full size cushion handle allows for comfortable transfer in and out of bed. Made of aircraft-grade, hardened anodized aluminum, it weighs less than 2 lbs, and supports up to 300 lbs. Includes an organizer pouch to keep items handy, and carrying case to use for travel when collapsed. Installs on any home or hospital bed. Collapsible ? fits in small spaces, even carry-on suitcases. No-slip grips and safety strap secures rail in-between mattress and bed frame. Universal height accommodates home and hospital bed. Snap together assembly ?installs in seconds with no tools required. Bedside Econorail Features: Full size cushion handle. Lightweight and strong. Collapsible and portable. 4 pocket organizer pouch included. Travel tote included. Bedside Econorail Specifications: Weight: 1.5 pounds. Weight capacity: up to 300 lbs. Includes: organizer pouch. Product Dimensions: 21.5 inches long, 20 inches wide, 16 inches high.", "The new EZ - Access 8 ft Suitcase Ramp Signature SS8 features an extruded non-skid tread for superior traction, and a self-adjusting bottom transition plate for easy conversion from ramp to ground. The Signature Series Suitcase Ramps are ultra-strong, single-fold ramps that provide the safety and strength required while remaining lightweight and portable. The hinge features a no-pinch, non-protruding live hinge for safe, silent, and maintenance free operation. The ergonomically designed flexible, non-breakable handles offer convenient carrying and a comfortable grip. The 800 lb weight capacity allows the ramp to safely support power scooters, power wheelchairs and manual wheelchairs. Welded construction provides long-term durability and safety. EZ - Access 8 FT Ramp Features: Non-skid surface. Built-in carrying handle. Lightweight and portable. Easy conversion from ramp to ground. EZ - Access 8 FT Ramp Specifications: Usable size: 8 feet x 30 inches. Folded size: 96 inches x 15 inches x 4 inches. Weight: 47 pounds. Weight capacity: 800 pounds. Warranty: Manufacturer's 3 year. Made of: Aluminum.", "The new EZ - Access 7 ft Suitcase Ramp Signature SS7 features an extruded non-skid tread for superior traction, and a self-adjusting bottom transition plate for easy conversion from ramp to ground. The Signature Series Suitcase Ramps are ultra-strong, single-fold ramps that provide the safety and strength required while remaining lightweight and portable. The hinge features a no-pinch, non-protruding live hinge for safe, silent, and maintenance free operation. The ergonomically designed flexible, non-breakable handles offer convenient carrying and a comfortable grip. The 800 lb weight capacity allows the ramp to safely support power scooters, power wheelchairs and manual wheelchairs. Welded construction provides long-term durability and safety. EZ - Access 7 FT Ramp Features: Non-skid surface. Built-in carrying handle. Lightweight and portable. Easy conversion from ramp to ground. EZ - Access 7 FT Ramp Specifications: Usable size: 7 feet x 30 inches. Folded size: 84 inches x 15 inches x 4 inches. Weight: 41 pounds. Weight capacity: 800 pounds. Warranty: Manufacturer's 3 year. Made of: Aluminum.", "With the PowerCuff on your reacher you will be able to grab and hold objects weighing as much as 25 lbs. It also means that you will be able to get very tight grasp on very thin objects. The patented PowerCuff was designed to increase the pressure between the rubber cups on flexible steel EZ Reachers. *Not recommended for grabbers over 44 inches. PowerCuff Features: Designed to increase the pressure between the rubber cups on flexible steel EZ Reachers. PowerCuff Specifications: Weight Capacity: 25 pounds maximum.", "The new EZ - Access 6 ft Suitcase Ramp Signature SS6 features an extruded non-skid tread for superior traction, and a self-adjusting bottom transition plate for easy conversion from ramp to ground. The Signature Series Suitcase Ramps are ultra-strong, single-fold ramps that provide the safety and strength required while remaining lightweight and portable. The hinge features a no-pinch, non-protruding live hinge for safe, silent, and maintenance free operation. The ergonomically designed flexible, non-breakable handles offer convenient carrying and a comfortable grip. The 800 lb weight capacity allows the ramp to safely support power scooters, power wheelchairs and manual wheelchairs. Welded construction provides long-term durability and safety. EZ - Access 6 FT Ramp Features: Non-skid surface. Built-in carrying handle. Lightweight and portable. Easy conversion from ramp to ground. EZ - Access 6 FT Ramp Specifications: Usable size: 6 feet x 30 inches. Folded size: 72 inches x 15 inches x 4 inches. Weight: 34 pounds. Weight capacity: 800 pounds. Warranty: Manufacturer's 3 year. Made of: Aluminum.", "The Adjustable Folding Cane adjusts from 33 inches to 37 inches. This cane is designed with a comfortable ergonomic style hand grip. Four folding sections snap out automatically for use when opened to provide a steady support cane. The shaft is made of 7/8 inch anodized aluminum. Includes an attractive carrying case. Adjustable Black Folding Cane Features: Includes folding sections that snap out automatically for easy use. Contoured plastic ergonomic handle. Positive locking ring for added safety and security. Folds compactly for storage. Adjustable Black Folding Cane Specifications: Construction: strong, lightweight 7/8 inch anodized aluminum . Height: adjusts from 33 inches to 37 inches in 1 inch increments. Weight capacity: 250 pounds.", "A Panoramic Mirror can reduce your blind spots and make driving much safer. Big vehicles always have bigger mirrors, but now you can get the additional safety too. Easy to clip on over your existing mirror, you can be using it in minutes. Panoramic Mirror Features: Widens your view to help reduce blind spots while driving. Over-sized mirror which assists with the drivers? peripheral vision. Creates a complete - seamless view. Assists with backseat monitoring. Panoramic Mirror Specifications: Clips on over-top of your existing mirror. Mirror size is 17 inches x 3 inches. Made of a treated anti-glare crystal glass. Non-glare convex mirror Shatterproof.", "The Pendulator Universal Cup Holder keeps your beverage in the upright position. The unique design of this cup holder allows it to pivot reducing spills! The wheelchair cup holder is constructed of high-density plastic withstanding the wear and tear of regular use. Includes a mounting kit for attaching to flat surfaces or 1 inch square or round tubing. This cup holder is not only for wheelchairs but also for golf carts, lawn mowers, tool boxes, and more! Holds cans, cups, bottles, and travel mugs from 12 ounces to 20 ounces. Pendulator Universal Cup Holder Features: Universal mounting kit included. Pivoting spill resistant design keeps beverage in the upright position. Constructed of dark gray high-quality, impact resistant plastic. Also works great for golf carts, tool boxes, lawn mowers, machinery, strollers, and more. Pendulator Universal Cup Holder Specifications: Cup Holder Capacity: 12 ounce to 20 ounce cans, cups, bottles, and travel mugs.", "The Adult Denim Bandana Bib features a waterproof breathable backing with cotton front and a Velcro neck closure. The bandanna bib front is absorbent and the backing is waterproof and breathable. The bandanna bib waterproof backing will keep the wearer from becoming cold, damp and wet. This adult size bib is machine washable and made in USA. Adult Denim Bandana Bib Features: Keeps the wearer from becoming wet, cold, or dirty. Velcro neck closure. Machine washable. Adult Denim Bandana Bib Specifications: Size: adult. Color: denim. Material: cotton front with waterproof breathable backing. Width: 14 inches. Length: 14½ inches in front from neck to bottom.", "The SafetySure Mary's Aide Transfer Sling provides caregivers with a secure hold and control during patient transfers. The Mary's Aide transfer sling is made of woven nylon with hook and loop closures on both sides for easy application and removal. Shaped like and undergarment, it is worn over the patient's clothing. During the transfer, the Mary's Aide stays securely in place without binding or riding up. It also has a hand grip on the back so that the transfer sling can be used during ambulation as an alternative to a gait belt. SafetySure Mary's Aide Transfer Sling Features: Hand grip on the back can be used during ambulation as an alternative to a gait belt. Helps provides secure transfers. Reduces caregiver back strain. Worn over patient clothing. Won't bind or ride up. Hook and loop closure on both sides for easy application and removal. SafetySure Mary's Aide Transfer Sling Specifications: One size fits most adults. Latex free. Weight capacity 250 lbs. Machine wash and dry or wipe clean.", "The Lightweight Adjustable Folding Designer Cane is perfect for people on the go because it will fit conveniently and compactly in a purse or carrying case. This aluminum cane is available in an attractive designer color of green ice, and it features a derby top wood handle that offers style and flair to both men and women. Adjustable height from 33 inches to 37 inches in 1 inch increments. Lightweight Adjustable Folding Designer Cane Features: Folds compactly for storage. Derby top wood handles. Includes slip resistant rubber tip for safety. Lightweight Adjustable Folding Designer Cane Specifications: Construction: strong, lightweight anodized 3/4 inch aluminum tubing. Height: adjusts from 33 to 37 inches in 1 inch increments. Weight capacity: 250 pounds.", "Protect a Folding Manual Wheelchair during travel or storage from weather and dust with a durable Wheelchair Cover . With convenient quick release buckle and Velcro side access, the wheelchair cover can easily slip over the arm on a wheelchair lift. Features a front sewn elastic band which wraps tightly around the wheelchair footrests, and a rear cinch drawstring to secure the cover bottom around the wheels. Includes (4) grommet tie down points for highway travel and a handy carrying pouch. Made in the USA. Comes with a 1 year Manufacturer's warranty. *Please note: The Folding Manual Wheelchair Cover is not intended for highway use without using a securing device such as rope or cords over the top and through the grommet holes. This will reduce the amount of excess room under the cover and prevent billowing at high speeds. Manual Wheelchair Cover Features: Protects folding manual wheelchairs from the weather and dust. Great for travel, wheelchair lifts and storage. Velcro seam with a snap buckle enables use with carrier lift arms. Front elastic band wraps tightly around footrests. Rear drawstring cinch (Cord Lock) secures the cover bottom to wheels. (4) Underside tiedown grommets work with bungee-style cords (cords are not included). Manual Wheelchair Cover Specifications: Measures: 38 L x 9 W x 44 H inches. Includes a carrying pouch. 1 year Manufacturer's Warranty. Made in the USA.", "Moisture can slip into the vulnerable, exposed areas of your scooter controls to cause electrical problems. The Diestco Scooter Tiller Cover slips over the top of your mid to large size scooter tiller to protect it from moisture. Plastic top lets you see through the top. Openings let you slide your hands into the Tiller Cover to keep warm and dry, too! Tiller controls can be operated even with the tiller cover left on. Made from high-quality, durable nylon with urethane coating for years of durable, moisture-resistant use! Regular size scooter tiller cover is for mid to large sized scooters. Regular Size Power Scooter Tiller Cover Features: Helps protect your power scooter controls from moisture. Clear window lets you see through the top. Tiller controls can be operated even with the tiller cover left on. Regular Size Power Scooter Tiller Cover Specifications: Width: 16 inches. Depth: 9 inches. Height: 15 inches. Circumference: 52 inches", "The Adult Navy Bandana Bib is a stylish yet serviceable bib featuring a waterproof breathable backing with cotton front. The bandanna bib waterproof backing will keep the wearer from becoming cold, damp and wet. The bandanna bib front is absorbent and has a velcro neck closure. Adult size bib. The bandana bib is machine washable. Made in USA. Adult Navy Bandana Bib Features: Keeps the wearer from becoming wet, cold, or dirty. Velcro neck closure. Machine washable. Adult Navy Bandana Bib Specifications: Size: adult. Color: navy. Material: cotton front with waterproof breathable backing. Width: 14 inches. Length: 14½ inches in front from neck to bottom.", "The Diestco Scooter Tiller Small Cover form fits to your mobility vehicle. Simply slip it over your scooter tiller handles and secure. The small size cover is designed for small travel scooters. The cover will help protect your scooter controls on tiller from moisture to prevent any unwanted water damage. Made of water-resistant nylon fabric and plastic. It will also help keep your hands warm and dry. Diestco Scooter Tiller Small Cover Features: Protects scooter controls on tiller. Made of water resistant nylon fabric. Hands stay warm and dry. Diestco Scooter Tiller Small Cover Specifications: Width: 16 inches. Depth: 8.5 inches. Height: 9 inches. Circumference: 42 inches.", "The Youth Navy Bandana Bib has a waterproof breathable backing with cotton front and a Velcro neck closure. The bandanna bib front is absorbent and the backing is waterproof and breathable. The bandanna bib waterproof backing will keep the wearer from becoming cold, damp and wet. Youth size bib. The bandana bib is machine washable. Made in USA. Youth Navy Bandana Bib Features: Keeps the wearer from becoming wet, cold, or dirty. Velcro neck closure. Machine washable. Youth Navy Bandana Bib Specifications: Size: youth. Color: navy. Material: cotton front with waterproof breathable backing. Width: 12½ inches. Length: 13½ inches in front from neck to bottom", "The Folding Walker Tray was designed with two recessed beverage holders and a high edge on all four sides. Constructed of lightweight durable plastic that won't make a walker \"front heavy\". Clip-on walker tray folds out of the way when not in use. Tray mounts with adjustable clips that snap on most standard walkers with no tools required. Tray size: 16\" width x 11.75\" diameter. Weight capacity 5 lbs. Folding Walker Tray Features: Folds out of the way when not in use. Tool free assembly, tray mounts with adjustable clips that snap on to most walkers. Folding Walker Tray Specifications: Construction: durable gray plastic. Assembly: tool free. Tray size: 16 in. x 11-3/4 in. Weight capacity: 5 lbs.", "The new EZ - Access 5 ft Suitcase Ramp Signature SS5 features an extruded non-skid tread for superior traction, and a self-adjusting bottom transition plate for easy conversion from ramp to ground. The Signature Series Suitcase Ramps are ultra-strong, single-fold ramps that provide the safety and strength required while remaining lightweight and portable. The hinge features a no-pinch, non-protruding live hinge for safe, silent, and maintenance free operation. The ergonomically designed flexible, non-breakable handles offer convenient carrying and a comfortable grip. The 800 lb weight capacity allows the ramp to safely support power scooters, power wheelchairs and manual wheelchairs. Welded construction provides long-term durability and safety. EZ - Access 5 FT Ramp Features: Non-skid surface. Built-in carrying handle. Lightweight and portable. Easy conversion from ramp to ground. EZ - Access 5 FT Ramp Specifications: Usable size: 5 feet x 30 inches. Folded size: 60 inches x 15 inches x 4 inches. Weight: 29 pounds. Weight capacity: 800 pounds. Warranty: Manufacturer's 3 year. Made of: Aluminum.", "The Printed Burgundy Double Sided Quilted Walker Bag conveniently hangs over the walker crossbar and is held in place by hook-and-loop closures. This designer inspired, decorative cotton walker bag has roomy pockets in the front and back so you can take your belongings wherever you go. Machine wash and tumble dry. Printed Burgundy Double Sided Quilted Walker Bag Features: Conveniently hangs over walker crossbar. Machine wash and tumble dry. Printed Burgundy Double Sided Quilted Walker Bag Specifications: Pocket dimensions: 13 inches x 9 inches. Length: 15.5 inches. Width: 6.5 inches. Depth: 1.5 inches. Color: Printed Burgundy.", "The new EZ - Access 3 ft Suitcase Ramp Signature SS3 features an extruded non-skid tread for superior traction, and a self-adjusting bottom transition plate for easy conversion from ramp to ground. The Signature Series Suitcase Ramps are ultra-strong, single-fold ramps that provide the safety and strength required while remaining lightweight and portable. The hinge features a no-pinch, non-protruding live hinge for safe, silent, and maintenance free operation. The ergonomically designed flexible, non-breakable handles offer convenient carrying and a comfortable grip. The 800 lb weight capacity allows the ramp to safely support power scooters, power wheelchairs and manual wheelchairs. Welded construction provides long-term durability and safety. EZ - Access 3 FT Ramp Features: Non-skid surface. Built-in carrying handle. Lightweight and portable. Easy conversion from ramp to ground. EZ - Access 3 FT Ramp Specifications: Usable size: 3 feet x 30 inches. Folded size: 36 inches x 15 inches x 4 inches. Weight: 17 pounds. Weight capacity: 800 pounds. Warranty: Manufacturer's 3 year. Made of: Aluminum.", "The Standers Stable Rail provides assistance for easy transfer in and out of bed and is adjustable in height to accommodate any home or hospital bed. Includes extendable legs which provide added stability when standing up. The ergonomic cushion handle allows for easy transfer in and out of bed. Anti-slip grips secure rail in-between mattress and bed frame. The rail is easily installed and can be installed in seconds. Supports 300 lbs. The Stable Rail is an ideal device for those that need added support and assistance when getting in and out of bed. Includes a 4 pocket organizer which provides storage space for handy items. Standers Stable Rail Features: Provides extra stability when standing up. Allows for easy transfer in and out of bed. Accommodates any home or hospital bed. Installs in seconds with no tools required. Standers Stable Rail Specifications: Height adjustment from floor to top of handle: 21 inches - 44 inches. Height adjustment from mattress base to top of handle: 17.5 inches - 22.5 inches. Rail width: 19 inches. Height range from floor to horizontal support structure under mattress: 13.5 inches - 21.5 inches. Depth of horizontal support structure under mattress: 25 inches. Weight of product: 8 lbs. Weight capacity: 300 lbs. Made of: Steel frame with durable powder coat finish.", "The Burgundy Quilted Walker Tote Bag is an attractive, roomy cotton tote which makes it the perfect accessory for keeping personal belongings safe and close by. It features a sewn in key ring, an outside pocket for easy access to often used items and a carry strap that allows the user to hold the bag when not being used on the mobility device. Easy to use, plastic clips make it simple to attach and remove. Burgundy Quilted Walker Tote Bag Features: Easy access to personal items. Fits walkers, wheelchairs and rollators. Includes carrying strap for easy transport. Burgundy Quilted Walker Tote Bag Specifications: Length: 11 inches. Width: 14½ inches. Depth: 5 inches.", "The Right Angle Utensil Pocket is used with a universal cuff to position an eating utensil at a right angle to the palm. This eating utensil holder consists of an L-shaped aluminum bar and an ADL adaptive pocket which swivels perpendicular to the plane of the palm. The Right Angle Pocket can be used in the right or left hand and accommodates standard size utensil handles. Use this eating utensil pocket with a universal cuff, such as the Utensil Holder CKE2520, Universal ADL Cuff ASP148, Palm Clip with Pocket ASP1503, or the Utensil Hand Clip CMI74615. (Universal cuff is not included.) Right Angle Utensil Pocket Features: Allows the user to best position an eating utensil for self feeding. Provides vertical orientation of an eating utensil. Can be used with universal cuffs, holders, clips and wrist supports. Right Angle Utensil Pocket Specifications: Construction: leather and aluminum. Material: latex free. Measures: 1 inch wide, 2 1/2 inches long. Made in: USA.", "The Peeling Plate is an adapted plate with an attached vegetable and fruit holder. Two sharp plastic prongs securely hold vegetables or fruit for peeling with one hand. The Peeling Plate makes one-handed peeling easy. All parts are food safe and dishwasher safe. Includes a rubber non slip mat to be placed under the plate to prevent the plate from slipping. Peeling Plate Features: Securely holds vegetables and fruit for peeling with one hand. Two sharp plastic prongs. Dishwasher safe. Peeling Plate Specifications: Size: 8 inch square plate with rounded curved edges. Holder Base Height: 1 ¼ inches. Holder Base Diameter: 1 ¾ inches. Prong Height: 1 inch. Prong Spacing: 1 inch apart.", "The MED-E-LERT Electronic Pill Reminder, Organizer & Dispenser gives patients, caregivers, and loved ones peace of mind by ensuring that only the prescribed dose of medication is available and patient compliance is achieved. This medication reminder and automated pill dispenser is easy to use and the most affordable device of its kind. The Med-E-Lert Automatic Pill Dispenser is ideal for use in both the home and care centers. Designed with safety and convenience in mind, the Med-E-Lert Automatic Pill Dispenser features a secured, tamper-proof, locking key system to avoid over-medication. With 28 medication compartments, the Med-E-Lert Automatic Pill Dispenser can be used for medication taken up to 4 times daily. Three different alarm tones and a blinking light alert the patient when medication needs to be taken and will not turn off until the pill dispenser is tilted on its side to dispense the pills. The Med-E-Lert Automatic Pill Dispenser includes three discs that can be inserted to indicate the day of the week and the time of day depending on the number of doses needed daily. Despite its compact size, the Med-E-Lert Automatic Pill Dispenser also features the largest pill compartments of any other pill dispenser.The Med-E-Lert Automatic Pill Dispenser is designed especially for people with complicated daily medical regimes. Medical care facilities can enjoy the savings the Med-E-Lert Automatic Pill Dispenser brings them by reducing the need for personnel to distribute medication. MED-E-LERT Electronic Pill Reminder & Dispenser Features: Easy to set up. SIMPLE to use. Long Duration Buzzer Sounds Continuously Until The Pills Are Removed. Compartment Size 20% Larger Than Other Automatic Pill Dispensers. Safe - Lockable With KEY. Tamper Proof (Unable To Get To Medications Before It Is Time). MED-E-LERT Electronic Pill Reminder & Dispenser Specifications: Compartment Size: Holds Up To 18 Aspirin Size Pills. Dimensions: 8 inches diameter by 1.5 inches high. Number of Compartments: 28. Capacity: ONE Week's Supply Of Pills Up To FOUR Times per Day. Alarm: LOUD SOUND + Blinking Light. Low battery Alarm - Batteries Included.", "The Ingrid Classic Cane or Crutch Tip features a convex bottom which enhances both walking comfort and durability. The Tip is manufactured in Sweden and made of high quality polyurethane. The use of this material makes them extremely durable and provides for an excellent grip both indoors and outdoors. Safety is enhanced because the tread pattern at the bottom of the tip does not wear as quickly as a conventional tip. Inside the tip is a rust proof metal washer made of zinc plated steel which prevents the cane or crutch from wearing through the tip. The \"tire track\" treads at the point of contact provide an excellent grip on most surfaces. This cane tip has a patented elastic neck which adjusts to the dimension of the cane or crutch shaft, making it easy for the user to replace tips as needed. Ingrid Classic Cane or Crutch Tip Features: Extremely durable and provides for an excellent grip both indoors and outdoors. Tip does not wear as quickly as a conventional tip. Convex bottom enhances both walking comfort and durability. Ingrid Classic Cane or Crutch Tip Specifications: Fits: cane and crutch shafts measuring 1/2 inch - 11/16 inch (13 - 17 millimeters). Color - black.", "The Ingrid Classic Cane or Crutch Tip features enhanced safety because the tread pattern at the bottom of the tip does not wear as quickly as a conventional tip. Inside the tip is a rust proof metal washer made of zinc plated steel which prevents the cane or crutch from wearing through the tip. The \"tire track\" treads at the point of contact provide an excellent grip on most surfaces. The Tip is manufactured in Sweden and made of high quality polyurethane. The use of this material makes them extremely durable and provides for an excellent grip both indoors and outdoors. The convex bottom enhances both walking comfort and durability. This cane tip has a patented elastic neck which adjusts to the dimension of the cane or crutch shaft, making it easy for the user to replace tips as needed. Ingrid Classic Cane or Crutch Tip Features: Extremely durable and provides for an excellent grip both indoors and outdoors. Tip does not wear as quickly as a conventional tip. Convex bottom enhances both walking comfort and durability. Ingrid Classic Cane or Crutch Tip Specifications: Fits: cane and crutch shafts measuring 13/16 inch - 1 1/16 inches (21 - 27 millimeters). Color - black.", "The NoRinse Peri - Wash helps soothe private parts and leave them clean and odor-free. Plus, it's much more economical than disposable wipes! Peri - Wash contains skin softeners and cleansers for a healthy clean. It has light, powdery fragrance to help you feel fresh. Peri - Wash is a gentle hygienic cleanser that you spray onto soiled areas or directly onto toilet paper before you wipe. Toilet tissue alone may not leave you feeling fresh and moist wipes are expensive! Use the NoRinse Peri - Wash gallon size to refill your 8 oz plastic pump bottle. All you need is a couple of pumps to dampen the tissue each time you wipe, so each bottle lasts a long time. For an even greener solution, spray this perineal cleanser directly onto soiled areas and clean them with a warm damp cloth. The NoRinse Peri - Wash is better than dry toilet paper alone. It freshens and leaves you clean and odor free! Ingredients: Deionized water, triethanolamine lauryl sulphate, cocamidopropyl betaine, propylene glycol, aloe vera, vitamin E, fragrance, diazolidinyl urea, methylparaben, propyleparaben, citric acid. NoRinse Peri - Wash Features: Gallon size refill for 8 ounce bottles. Alcohol free and pH balanced. Leaves skin clean, refreshed and odor free. Formulated with aloe vera, vitamin E and moisturizers. Gentle on sensitive skin. NoRinse Per - Wash Specifications: Size: 1 gallon. Made of: natural ingredients. Non-returnable: if package is opened.", "The Joystick Cover slips over the joystick to protect it from moisture. Moisture can slip into the vulnerable, exposed areas of your power wheelchair joystick to cause electrical problems. A plastic top lets you see through the top. An adjustable buckle lets you tighten the cover closely to the armrest and joystick, or leave it loose enough to slide your hand into the cover so that it stays warm and dry, too. The Joystick cover is made from high-quality durable nylon with urethane coating, for years of durable moisture-resistant use. Measures 13 inches long, 5 1/2 inches wide, 4 inches deep. Joystick Cover Features: Slips over the joystick to protect from moisture. See through plastic top. Tightens or loosens with an adjustable buckle. Joystick Cover Specifications: Material: durable nylon with urethane coating. Measurements: 13 x 5 1/2 x 4 inches. Color: Black. Made in: USA.", "The Adult Weighted Universal Deluxe Holder can be used with pens, pencils markers, paintbrushes, crayons and any item that measures 1/8 in to 7/16 inch diameter. Provides added weight for those having difficulty in bearing down with a writing device or have shaky hands. Three adjustable set screws holds items securely. Adult Weighted Universal Deluxe Holder Features: Can be used with any item that measures 1/8 in to 7/16 inch diameter. Comes with an allen wrench and 3 extra long screws for smaller objects. Assists in stabilizing the hand. Deluxe model has plastic vinyl handle. Adult Weighted Universal Deluxe Holder Specifications: Measures: 5 inches long. Diameter: 1 1/8 inches. Weighs: 7 oz.", "The Wear Ease Shoe Fastener Kit includes 2 fasteners in each color (package of 8). These shoe fasteners convert regular lace-up shoes into shoes with simple to use hook-and-loop closures, allowing for easier fastening and unfastening of shoes. D-rings facilitate closing and opening of the strap. Each fastener fits 2-3 eyelets. Wear Ease Shoe Fastener Kit Features: Provides easy fastening, and unfastening of shoes. Wear Ease Shoe Fastener Kit Specifications: Includes: 2 of each color (black, brown, white, tan).", "It is very tough to get kids to brush their teeth and brush correctly. The Benefit 3D Clean Toothbrush Junior makes better brushing simple and easy. The brush's unique flexible three independent head design allows kids to clean all tooth surfaces in a single brushing stroke while effectively removing plaque and gently massaging gum tissue. The Benefit Toothbrush brushes your teeth right every time almost automatically. The bristles completely surround the teeth, and automatically adjust to tooth contours, lengths and widths. It makes brushing easier, faster and better. It is accepted by the American Dental Association. Benefit 3D Clean Toothbrush Junior Features: 3 flexible heads. Tongue cleaner. Non slip grip handle. Benefit 3D Clean Toothbrush Junior Specifications: Overall length: 6½ inches. Handle length: 4½ inches. Width: ¾ inch. Colors: Assorted (sorry, no color choice).", "The Norco Molded Sock Aid with One Handle is designed for people who have pain, limited motion or weakness in their hips, legs or back. This Sock Aid is ideal for one handed use. Assists in putting socks on with less bending over. Has a semi-flexible plastic trough that holds a sock or stockings in place while being pulled onto the foot. The trough may be adjusted using a heat gun. Good hand strength is required to flex the sock aid. A foam disc on the underside of the trough prevents the sock from sliding off before it is completely on the foot. Ideal for conditions such as arthritis, stroke or following total hip replacement surgery. Soft foam handle for a comfortable grip. Firm design holds its shape, keeping sock open for easier application. Norco Molded Sock Aid with One Handle Features: 33 inch cord handle can be cut to adjust length. Soft foam handle. Ideal for one-handed users. Norco Molded Sock Aid with One Handle Specifications: Cord Length: 33 inches. Trough measurements: 4 inches wide x 9 ½ inches long x 3 inches deep. Handle measurements: 1 inch diameter, 4 inches long. Material: nylon cord, soft foam handle. Recommended for: people who have some degree of strength in their legs.", "The TO2TE D Size Oxygen Holder holds an oxygen tank safely and securely and helps the user move about freely. The holder allows you to maneuver an oxygen tank and a rolling walker at the same time. The holder easily attaches a D size oxygen tank to either a 2-wheeled walker or a wheelchair. The holder attaches with secure hook and loop straps that adjust without tools.This oxygen tank holder helps users regain their confidence and independence to move about as needed. Lightweight, machine washable nylon includes a pocket for an oxygen wrench.*Walker, cylinder and valve wrench are not included. D Size Oxygen Holder for Walkers Features: Attaches to most 2-wheeled walkers. Convenient valve wrench pocket. Sturdy Velcro straps. Holds one D cylinder. D Size Oxygen Holder for Walkers Specifications: Material: rugged nylon.", "The Benefit 3D Clean Toothbrush is accepted as an effective cleansing device that has been shown to remove plaque and reduce gingivitis when used as directed in a program of good oral hygiene to supplement regular professional care. The unique three brush, flexible head design allows users to clean all three tooth surfaces while it removes plaque buildup and stimulates the gums. The Benefit Toothbrush brushes your teeth right every time almost automatically. The bristles completely surround the teeth, and automatically adjust to tooth contours, lengths and widths. It makes brushing easier, faster and better. It is accepted by the American Dental Association. Benefit 3D Clean Toothbrush Features: 3 flexible heads. Tongue cleaner. Non slip grip handle. Benefit 3D Clean Toothbrush Specifications: Overall length: 7 inches. Handle length: 4½ inches. Width: 1 inch wide at ends, tapered in center. Colors: Assorted(sorry, no color choice).", "The Medium Muff Vest is designed to provide arm control and support even when the user is bending forward. Created by the spouse of a stroke survivor, the Muff Vest provides support for a flaccid arm. The weight of the stroke arm is distributed and effectively supported over both shoulders. The large front horizontal pocket is opened on both ends, allowing the wearer to reach through the pocket to place their impaired arm in the support. Two handy patch pockets offer convenient storage and accessibility for small frequently used items. Constructed of a cotton and polyester blend, machine washable fabric, with durable reinforced stitching. Hook and loop tab closure back opening. Ideal for hemiplegic upper extremities. Medium Muff Vest Features: Provides support for a flaccid arm. Constructed of 65 percent polyester/35 percent cotton blend, machine washable fabric. Hook and loop tab closure back opening. Medium Muff Vest Specifications: Universal fit: for either left or right arm support. Colors: khaki. Size: medium, fits 125 - 150 pounds.", "Easie Eaters with Shields feature a safety shield which prevents the utensil from entering the mouth too deeply. These angled utensils are specially designed by an occupational therapist. The Easie Eaters curved utensils promote greater success with hand-to-mouth feeding and the built-up handles make them easier to hold. For right-or left-hand use. Built-up 3 inch long handles are the perfect size for children. Set includes spoon and fork. Sorry, no color choice. Wash before initial use. Dishwasher safe or wash in hot water using a mild liquid soap. Rinse thoroughly. Not recommended for children with a strong bite reflex. Easie Eaters with Shields Features: Safety shield prevents utensil from entering mouth too deeply. Angled utensils for right or left hand use. Easy to hold. Dishwasher safe. Easie Eaters with Shields Specifications: Set includes: 1 fork and 1 spoon. Right handed set with shield: AMS100RS. Left handed set with shield: AMS100LS.", "The SerenaSeat™ Foldable Shower Seat is an exceptionally solid, fold down shower seat with a slim profile that features the beauty and resiliency of Brazilian walnut. Removable backrest allows access to wall tiles for easy cleaning. **Potential 6-8 week lead time, call for availability. Serena Fold Away Shower Seat Features: Brazilian walnut seat Beautiful Brazilian walnut is naturally resistant to moisture, mildew and decay. Known for it?s considerable strength, it is up to 3 times stronger than teak. Fold away storage Simply fold up to store out of the way. No need to lock into place, a machined precision tension hinge prevents the seat from inadvertently falling down. Slim profile In fold away position, the low profile frame and discreet design complements accessories without being intrusive. Incredibly solid Two 15 inch concealed wall mount braces maximize wall contact and spread the weight-bearing surface for an exceptionally solid feel. *Non returnable hygiene item. SerenaSeat™ Foldable Shower Seat Specifications: Seat Material: 1 inch/25cm Brazilian walnut. Seat Depth: 15.75 inches/40 centimeters(Complies with ADAAG and Ontario Building Code section 3.8.3.13). Seat Depth(when folded): 3 inches/7 centimeters. Seat Width: 26 inches/66 centimeters. Weight Capacity: 450 pounds/205 kilograms Frame Material: sandblasted aluminum with clear powder coat.", "The FeatherLite Reacher Long 32 inch features a sturdy, plastic jaw that provides gripping power that lets you lift heavier objects with confidence. The handy magnet on the top of the jaw is useful for picking up small metal objects. An ergonomic trigger design minimizes the effort required to securely grasp objects. Use the reacher as a hook to pull clothing or blankets that are out of reach. Ideal for people who have difficulty bending. The Featherlite Reacher Long 32 inch is lightweight and allows you to grasp hard-to-reach items easily. This reacher helps you pick up items without bending over, retrieve items from hard-to-reach places and reach places where your hand can't fit. A great tool for persons with arthritis or hip replacements. FeatherLite Reacher Long 32 inch Features: Easy-to-squeeze trigger. Magnet tip. Pulling lug. Durable lightweight frame. Strong plastic jaw. FeatherLite Reacher Long 32 inch Specifications: Standard length: 32 inches. Weight: 7.2 ounces. Maximum jaw opening: 2¾ inches. Maximum jaw capacity: 3 pounds.", "Penco Patriotic Walkerballs help increase mobility by allowing walkers with front wheels to glide effortlessly on most surfaces. These high quality, felt or plush covered hollow rubber balls are pre-cut, simple to install and ready for you to use. Walker balls offer a unique alternative to the rubber tips and glides for walkers. With Walkerballs, you can add personality to your walker and enjoy effortless, scuff-free movement across the floor. Designed to fit most walkers. Penco Patriotic Walkerball Features: Easy to use. Pre-cut to prevent injuries from cutting tennis balls. Fits most walker legs regardless of the tube diameter. Penco Patriotic Walkerball Specifications: Color: red, white, and blue.", "The FeatherLite Reacher Standard 26 inch is lightweight and allows you to grasp hard to reach items easily. The ergonomic trigger design minimizes the effort required to securely grasp objects. Use the reacher as a hook to pull clothing or blankets that are out of reach. The FeatherLite Reacher is ideal for people who have difficulty bending. The FeatherLite Reacher Standard 26 inch features a sturdy, plastic jaw that provides gripping power that lets you lift heavier objects with confidence. The handy magnet on the top of the jaw is useful for picking up small metal objects. This reacher helps you pick up items without bending over, retrieve items from hard-to-reach places and reach places where your hand can't fit. A great tool for persons with arthritis or hip replacements. FeatherLite Reacher Standard 26 inch Features: Easy-to-squeeze trigger. Magnet tip. Pulling lug. Durable lightweight frame. Strong plastic jaw. FeatherLite Reacher Standard 26 inch Specifications: Standard length: 26 inches. Weight: 6.2 ounces. Maximum jaw opening: 2¾ inches. Maximum jaw capacity: 3 pounds.", "Penco Blue Walkerballs allow you to add personality to your walker and enjoy effortless, scuff-free movement across the floor. Designed to fit most walkers, Walkerballs help increase mobility by allowing walkers with front wheels to glide effortlessly on most surfaces. These high quality, felt or plush covered hollow rubber balls are pre-cut, simple to install and ready for you to use. Walkerballs offer a unique alternative to the rubber tips and glides for walkers. Penco Blue Walkerball Features: Easy to use. Pre-cut to prevent injuries from cutting tennis balls. Fits most walker legs regardless of tube diameter. Penco Blue Walkerball Specifications: Color: blue.", "The Covered Spoon helps children and adults with tremors, limited coordination or hand weakness keep food on the utensil. The design of the spoon also helps limit the amount of spillage. The lid covers about 2/3 of the spoon bowl. It can be used with liquids and smaller type foods such as corn, rice, peas, etc. Conveniently comes apart for easy cleaning. Top rack dishwasher safe. Covered Spoon Features: Keeps food on the utensil. Helps limit the amount of spillage. Comes apart for easy cleaning. Covered Spoon Specifications: Measures: 7 inches long overall. Bowl measures: 2 inches long. Width: 1 ½ inches at widest part. Package of 2 Covered Spoons", "The Embroidery Hoop Holder helps make one-handed needlework easy. This unique holder clamps on to a tabletop or wheelchair frame measuring up to 1 inch thick. A ring at the top serves as a clamp for a crocheting needle or an 8 inch embroidery hoop. Easily adjust the long, flexible gooseneck in any direction needed. Reduces fatigue, eyestrain and stitching mistakes. It is portable and lightweight. This holder lets you do needlecraft projects with just one hand. Can be used for knitting, crocheting, embroidery and darning. Embroidery Hoop Holder Features: Great for one-handed needlecraft projects. Long metal gooseneck bends in any direction. Ring at the top serves as a clamp for a crocheting needle. Embroidery Hoop Holder Specifications: Gooseneck length: 13½ inches (34 centimeters). Included: Holder, darning ring and 8 inch (20 centimeters) hoop with shaft.", "The Posey Replacement Gel Pads are replacement gel pads made for the Posey Gel Heel Pillow CPO6118. Removable gel pads fits underneath the calf for hot or cold therapy applications. The Posey Premium Gel Heel Pillow is sold separately. Posey Replacement Gel Pad Features: Fit underneath the calf for heel pressure relief. For hot or cold therapy applications. Posey Replacement Gel Pad Specifications: Included: Set of 2. Measures: 4 inches wide, 9 inches long", "The Lightweight Adjustable Folding Designer Cane is an aluminum cane in an attractive designer color of cyclone blue and a derby top wood handle that offers style and flair to both men and women. These folding canes are perfect for people on the go and they fit conveniently and compactly in a pocketbook or carrying case. Adjustable height from 33 inches to 37 inches in 1 inch increments. Lightweight Adjustable Folding Designer Cane Features: Folds compactly for storage. Derby top wood handles. Includes slip resistant rubber tip for safety. Lightweight Adjustable Folding Designer Cane Specifications: Construction: strong, lightweight anodized 3/4 inch aluminum tubing. Height: adjusts from 33 to 37 inches in 1 inch increments. Weight capacity: 250 pounds.", "The Adjustable Folding Cane features four folding sections that snap out automatically for easy use and to help provide steady support. This folding cane adjusts from 33 to 37 inches in 1 inch increments. The shaft is made of 7/8 inch anodized aluminum, and the cane is designed with a comfortable ergonomic style hand grip. Includes an attractive carrying case. Adjustable Bronze Folding Cane Features: Includes four folding sections that snap out automatically for easy use. Contoured plastic ergonomic handle. Positive locking ring for added safety and security. Folds compactly for storage. Adjustable Bronze Folding Cane Specifications: Construction: strong, lightweight 7/8 inch anodized aluminum tubing. Height: adjusts from 33 inches to 37 inches in 1 inch increments. Weight capacity: 250 pounds.", "The Lightweight Adjustable Folding Designer Cane features a derby top wood handle that offers style and flair to both men and women. This aluminum cane is available in an attractive designer color of cyclone green as well as other colors. These folding canes are perfect for people on the go and they fit conveniently and compactly in a pocketbook or carrying case. Adjustable height from 33 inches to 37 inches in 1 inch increments. Lightweight Adjustable Folding Designer Cane Features: Folds compactly for storage. Derby top wood handles. Includes slip resistant rubber tip for safety. Lightweight Adjustable Folding Designer Cane Specifications: Construction: strong, lightweight anodized 3/4 inch aluminum tubing. Height: adjusts from 33 to 37 inches in 1 inch increments. Weight capacity: 250 pounds.", "The Lightweight Adjustable Folding Designer Cane features four folding sections that snap out automatically for easy use. This aluminum cane is available in an attractive designer color of green ice as well as other colors. The derby top wood handle offers style and flair to both men and women. These folding canes are perfect for people on the go and they fit conveniently and compactly in a pocketbook or carrying case. Adjustable height from 33 inches to 37 inches in 1 inch increments. Lightweight Adjustable Folding Designer Cane Features: Folds compactly for storage. Derby top wood handles. Includes slip resistant rubber tip for safety. Lightweight Adjustable Folding Designer Cane Specifications: Construction: strong, lightweight anodized 3/4 inch aluminum tubing. Height: adjusts from 33 to 37 inches in 1 inch increments. Weight capacity: 250 pounds.", "The Adult Pink Bandana Bib helps keep the wearer from becoming cold, damp and wet with the waterproof backing. The bandanna bib features an absorbent cotton front and a backing that is waterproof and breathable. The bib also has a convenient velcro neck closure. Adult size bib. The bandana bib is machine washable. Made in USA. Adult Pink Bandana Bib Features: Keeps the wearer from becoming wet, cold, or dirty. Velcro neck closure. Machine washable. Adult Pink Bandana Bib Specifications: Size: adult. Color: pink. Material: cotton front with waterproof breathable backing. Width: 14 inches. Length: 14½ inches in front from neck to bottom.", "Cane Stay keeps your walking cane in place and upright where you need it ? on tables, countertops, or leaning against walls. Use this cane holder anywhere to keep your walking cane upright without worrying about it falling. Unique design allows users with disabilities to easily position the cane holder. Squeeze the CaneStay to fit standard ¾ inch diameter or larger canes. It is easy to both attach and remove which facilitates sharing among multiple canes. Your cane will not slide or slip. No more bending and reaching to retrieve your cane after it has dropped or slipped to the floor. Once in place, it won?t slip and your cane won?t fall. Great for use in the bathroom for sanitation purposes. Made of strong, durable, pliable, long-lasting plastic. Cane Stay Features: Keeps your cane in place. Prevents your cane from falling. Strong, long lasting plastic. Easy to attach and share among your canes Cane Stay Specifications: Fits: standard size canes ¾ inch in diameter or more. Length: 3 inches. Width: 4 inches. Height: .7 inches. Material: strong, durable, pliable plastic. Manufactured: USA. Color: black.", "The Foam Bath Mitt enables people with sensitive skin to apply body wash without using coarse sponges that can irritate the skin. This velvety soft, extremely luxurious lotion and wash mitt applies lotions smoothly and evenly. Hypoallergenic cosmetic grade closed cell foam gently stretches to fit your hand and will not flake or crumble with repeated use. The mitt can be rinsed and reused over and over. Foam Bath Mit Features: Velvety soft and won't irritate sensitive skin. Double sided to fit right or left hand. Use with any lotion, soap or body wash. Foam Bath Mitt Specifications: Length: 9 inches. Width: 7 inches at widest part. Wrist opening: 4 inches.", "The Burgundy Double Sided Quilted Walker Bag ia a designer inspired, decorative cotton walker bag with roomy pockets in the front and back so you can take your belongings wherever you go. Conveniently hangs over the walker crossbar and is held in place by hook-and-loop closures. Machine wash and tumble dry. Burgundy Double Sided Quilted Walker Bag Features: Conveniently hangs over walker crossbar. Machine wash and tumble dry. Burgundy Double Sided Quilted Walker Bag Specifications: Pocket dimensions: 13 inches x 9 inches. Length: 15.5 inches. Width: 6.5 inches. Depth: 1.5 inches. Color: Solid Burgundy.", "The MagnaEye LED Pocket Magnifier has a 3X magnifier with a 6X bi-focal insert. For use in full light or with the super bright LED in low-light situations. Replaceable button cell battery lets you use this for years and years. Brilliant LED light illuminates with easy on/off button. Compact, lightweight, ultra slim design makes this magnifier a breeze to carry along. Slip it in your pocket, purse or wallet for magnification any time you need it. Great for travel and everyday use at home, work or school. Portable magnifier is perfect for reading menus and maps. Free vinyl pouch keeps the magnifier protected. Magna Eye LED Pocket Magnifier Features: 3x main lens with a 6x insert for close-up inspection. Super bright LED light lets you see in low-light situations. Replaceable battery means you can use this for years. Compact, lightweight and ultra-slim. LImited lifetime warranty. Magna Eye LED Pocket Magnifier Specifications: Height: 3.375 inches. Length: 2.125 inches. Width: 0.375 inches. Includes: 2 CR2016 batteries and a vinyl travel pouch.", "The Gray Quilted Walker Tote Bag features a sewn in key ring, an outside pocket for easy access to frequently used items and a carry strap that allows the user to hold the bag when not being used on the mobility device. This attractive, roomy cotton tote is the perfect accessory for keeping personal belongings safe and close. Easy to use, plastic clips make it simple to attach and remove. Gray Quilted Walker Tote Bag Features: Easy access to personal items. Fits walkers, wheelchairs and rollators. Includes carrying strap for easy transport. Gray Quilted Walker Tote Bag Specifications: Length: 11 inches. Width: 14½ inches. Depth: 5 inches.", "The Printed Quilted Crutch Bag makes it easier to carry personal items while using crutches. The deep pocket of this crutch tote bag provides plenty of room to hold several items. The smaller front pocket provides convenient storage for your cell phone, wallet or keys. Attaches to the side of the crutch and will not interfere with movement. Machine wash and air dry. Available fabric may be different from image displayed. Printed Quilted Crutch Bag Features: Stylish bag is just the right size for active crutch users. Frees the hands to manipulate the crutches. Can also be used on walkers. Printed Quilted Crutch Bag Specifications: Length: 9 inches. Width: 6½ inches. Depth: 2 inches.", "Every Lip Block Combination Pack contains 5 lip blocks which prevent individuals from inserting a straw too far into their mouth or biting the straw. Use them to encourage lip closure, lip rounding, and tongue retraction. Helps to correct overall tongue position too. Insert the long tapered end of the mouthpiece inside the upper end of a regular standard size straw. The Every Lip Block Combination Kit contains three rigid lip blocks in three different lengths, one firm flexible lip block and one soft flexible lip block. Flexible firm and flexible soft material can be cut to desired length. Every Lip Block Combination Pack Features: Fits into any regular straw. Prevents individuals from inserting straw too far into mouth. Every Lip Block Combination Pack Specifications: Includes: three rigid lip blocks in three different lengths: ¼ inch, ½ inch, and standard ¾ inch; one firm flexible ¾ inch, and one soft flexible ¾ inch. Colors: vary. Construction: medical grade materials that are FDA compliant and contain no lead, phthalates, PVC, BPA or latex.", "Dycem Yellow 8 inch Round Pads are non toxic non-slip mats that can be used on tables or trays to keep plates, cutlery, cups, pens or pencils from rolling. The non-slip material grips on both sides to secure objects, and still removes easily. Great for holding things firmly and securely in place, allowing the elderly, arthritic and disabled to perform everyday tasks. Holds a plate, bowl or glass secure, as well as reduces spillages while enabling people to retain their independence by feeding themselves. Dycem mats are ideal for one handed activities. When the pads become dirty and dusty, simply restore the non-slip properties by washing in warm soapy water and allowing to dry. Mats are available in blue, red, and yellow. Color contrast is important for many partially sighted, elderly people because the contrast helps to make items easier to see against work surfaces. Placing a brightly colored Dycem mat under a bowl will help make it easier to see as well as making the bowl more stable. The Dycem yellow has been endorsed for visually impaired by the Royal National Institute of Blind People. Dycem Yellow 8 inch Round Pads Features: Stop plates, glasses or bowls from sliding on the table surface. Reduces spillages. Ideal for one handed activities. Dycem Yellow 8 inch Round Pads Specifications: Size: 8 inches. Shape: Round. Color: Yellow. Not effective when wet.", "Dycem Red 8 inch Round Non-slip Pads help make it easier to see against work surfaces as well as making the item more stable. The non-slip material grips on both sides to secure objects, and still removes easily. Great for holding things firmly and securely in place, allowing the elderly, arthritic and disabled to perform everyday tasks. Non toxic non-slip mats can be used on tables or trays to keep plates, cutlery, cups, pens or pencils from rolling. Holds a plate, bowl or glass secure, as well as reduces spillages while enabling people to retain their independence by feeding themselves. Dycem mats are ideal for one handed activities. When the pads become dirty and dusty, simply restore the non-slip properties by washing in warm soapy water and allowing to dry. Dycem non-slip mats are available in blue, red, and yellow. Color contrast is important for many partially sighted, elderly people because the contrast helps to make items easier to see against work surfaces. The Dycem yellow has been endorsed for visually impaired by the Royal National Institute of Blind People. Dycem Red 8 inch Round Non-slip Mat Features: Stop plates, glasses or bowls from sliding on the table surface. Reduces spillages. Ideal for one handed activities. Dycem Red 8 inch Round Non-slip Mat Specifications: Size: 8 inches. Shape: Round. Color: Red. Not effective when wet.", "Dycem Blue 8 inch Round Non-slip Mats prevent items from sliding or rolling. The non-slip material grips on both sides to secure objects, and still removes easily. Great for holding things firmly and securely in place, allowing the elderly, arthritic and disabled to perform everyday tasks. Non toxic non-slip mats can be used on tables or trays to keep plates, cutlery, cups, pens or pencils from rolling. Holds a plate, bowl or glass secure, as well as reduces spillages while enabling people to retain their independence by feeding themselves. Dycem mats are ideal for one handed activities. When the pads become dirty and dusty, simply restore the non-slip properties by washing in warm soapy water and allowing to dry. Dycem non-slip mats are available in blue, red, and yellow. Color contrast is important for many partially sighted, elderly people because the contrast helps to make items easier to see against work surfaces. Placing a brightly colored Dycem mat under a bowl will help make it easier to see as well as making the bowl more stable. The Dycem yellow has been endorsed for visually impaired by the Royal National Institute of Blind People. Dycem Blue 8 inch Round Non-slip Mat Features: Stop plates, glasses or bowls from sliding on the table surface. Reduces spillages. Ideal for one handed activities. Dycem Blue 8 inch Round Non-slip Mat Specifications: Size: 8 inches. Shape: Round. Color: Blue. Not effective when wet.", "The Printed Blue Double Sided Quilted Walker Bag has handy, roomy pockets on each side of the bag so you can carry your personal belongings everywhere you go. Conveniently hangs over the walker crossbar and is held in place by hook-and-loop closures. This decorative bag allows you to carry your wallet or cell phone in the inside pocket for safety and carry your newspapers or magazines in the outside pocket. Machine wash and tumble dry. Printed Blue Double Sided Quilted Walker Bag Features: Conveniently hangs over walker crossbar. Machine wash and tumble dry. Printed Blue Double Sided Quilted Walker Bag Specifications: Pocket dimensions: 13 inches x 9 inches. Length: 15.5 inches. Width: 6.5 inches. Depth: 1.5 inches. Color: Printed Blue.", "The Norco Molded Sock Aid with Two Handles has a semi-flexible plastic trough that holds a sock or stockings in place while being pulled onto the foot. This Sock Aid is designed for people who have difficulty reaching their feet to put socks or stockings on. Allows a person to put on socks without having to bend over. Has a semi-flexible plastic trough that holds a sock or stockings in place while being pulled onto the foot. The trough may be adjusted using a heat gun. Good hand strength is required to flex the sock aid. A foam disc on the underside of the trough prevents the sock from sliding off before it is completely on the foot. Helpful for people who have pain, limited motion or weakness in their hips, legs or back. Ideal for conditions such as arthritis, stroke or following total hip replacement surgery. Soft foam handles for a comfortable grip. Firm design holds its shape, keeping sock open for easier application. Norco Molded Sock Aid with Two Handles Features: The 33 inch cords can be cut to adjust length. Soft foam handles. Semi-flexible plastic trough holds sock in place while pulling onto foot. Norco Molded Sock Aid with Two Handles Specifications: Cord length: 33 inches. Trough measurements: 4 inches wide x 9 ½ inches long x 3 inches deep. Handle measurements: 1 inch diameter, 4 inches long. Material: nylon cord, soft foam handles. Recommended for: people who have some degree of strength in their legs.", "The amazing lamp-mounted Verilux Magnifier is perfect for reading a book and doing fine detail work. With two magnifiers in one, this hands-free magnifier turns fine text into large print with two separate magnification ranges ? most of the lens is 2X magnification, plus a 6X spot lens is implanted in the first lens for seeing tiny details. The large 5 inch size is perfect for reading and needlework, and eyeglass-quality acrylic means there?s no distortion. The 18 inch flexible gooseneck stays put and makes perfect positioning easy. The built-in handle lets you adjust the scratch-resistant magnifier to any angle without putting fingerprints on the lens. But just in case you do get fingerprints or dust on the lens, a microfiber lens cloth is included. Verilux Magnifier for use with: Original Deluxe Natural Spectrum floor lamp. EasyFlex Deluxe Natural Spectrum floor lamp. Ivory Verilux Magnifier Features: Flexible All-Steel Gooseneck offers precise positioning and decades of durability. Ivory finish matches the EasyFlex Deluxe and Original Full spectrum ivory floor lamps. Optical Quality Acrylic, resists scratching and breaking; distortion-free. Ivory Verilux Magnifier Specifications: Magnification zones: 2X lens and 6X spot lens. Includes: microfiber polishing cloth.", "The ErgoTek Plus 32 inch Reacher ergonomic designed handle and trigger allows the heel of your hand and fingers to be in a more natural position. Picking up larger items such as cans is easier with this longer reacher with jaws that open to 3 1/4 inches. Use the magnetic tip in the end of the reacher for picking up small metal objects like paper clips. The upright pulling post on the tip end of the reacher is useful for dragging objects. A spring clip is included for storing the reacher on round tubing of your walker, wheelchair or bedside rail. This lightweight ergonomic grabber is ideal for light duty activities of daily living including dressing or picking up items from the floor. ErgoTek Plus 32 inch Reacher Features: Only 8 oz of pressure is required at the trigger to close the jaws. Lightweight and durable aluminum 32 inch long reacher. Helps grasp items from hard to reach places. Ideal for dressing and activities of daily living. Includes magnetic tip, clip for storing, and pulling post. ErgoTek Plus 32 inch Reacher Specifications: Jaws open: 3 1/4 inches. Length: 32 inches. Weight: 7.2 oz.", "The Youth Weighted Fork helps stabilize the tremulous hand while eating. The plastic vinyl handle is shaped to fit small hands. Youth Weighted Fork Features: Assists in stabilizing hand tremors to promote self feeding. Built up handles aid in grasping. Youth Weighted Fork Specifications: Handle diameter: 7/8 inch. Handle length: 3 1/4 inches. Weight: 4 ounces. Material: stainless steel with textured vinyl coated handle.", "The Youth Weighted Teaspoon helps assist in stabilizing hand tremors and allowing your child to feed him or herself. The plastic vinyl handles are shaped to fit your child's fingers. This adapted spoon weighs 4 ounces and has a 3 1/4 inch long handle. Youth Weighted Teaspoon Features: Built up handles aid in grasping. Assist in stabilizing hand tremors to promote self feeding. Dishwasher safe. Youth Weighted Teaspoon Specifications: Handle diameter: 7/8 inch. Handle length: 3 1/4 inches. Weight: 4 ounces. Material: stainless steel with textured vinyl coated handle. Color: gray.", "The Large Muff Vest was designed to allow the wearer to reach through the pocket to place their impaired arm in the support. Developed by the spouse of a stroke survivor, the Muff Vest provides support for a flaccid arm. The weight of the stroke arm is distributed and effectively supported over both shoulders. The Muff Vest provides arm control and support, even when the user is bending forward. The large front horizontal pocket is conveniently opened on both ends for left or right arm support. Two handy patch pockets offer convenient storage and accessibility for small frequently used items. Constructed of a cotton/polyester blend, machine washable fabric, with durable reinforced stitching. Hook and loop tab closure back opening. Ideal for hemiplegic upper extremities. Large Muff Vest Features: Provides support for a flaccid arm. Constructed of 65 percent polyester/35 percent cotton blend, machine washable fabric. Hook and loop tab closure back opening. Large Muff Vest Specifications: Universal fit: for either left or right arm support. Unisex design: can be worn by either sex. Colors: khaki. Size: large, fits 150 - 200 pounds.", "Relieve the symptoms of the Winter Blues and seasonal change with the HappyLight 6000 . HappyLight is a sunshine supplement light system that provides Natural Spectrum® light when sunshine is unavailable. 6,000 LUX of white light emulates daylight to help prompt your body?s positive physiological responses to natural light to improve mood and overall sense of well-being. Experience improved energy, mood and concentration naturally with HappyLight. A patented Verilux bulb activates natural mood enhancers, Circadian Rhythms, without exposing you to harmful UV rays or EMFs. Compact unit delivers therapy-strength Natural Spectrum light using exclusive Verilux Flicker-Elimination Technology. At just 2 pounds and 12 inches tall, this ultra-portable unit makes it easy to get the nourishing light you need to brighten your mood, well-being, and thinking. HappyLight 6000 Sunshine Supplement Light System Features: Up to 6,000 LUX of Natural Spectrum daylight lifts spirits, sharpens concentration and improves energy levels. Helps recalibrate and normalize Circadian Rhythms for a healthy night's sleep. Emulates natural sunshine to improve mood and well-being. Energy efficient bulb uses only 36 Watts to produce 300 Watts of Natural spectrum light. UL listed in United States and Canada. HappyLight 6000 Sunshine Supplement Light System Specifications: Dimensions: 12 inches high x 3.9 inches wide x 5.6 inches deep. Weight: 2 pounds. Recommended daily use: 2 1/2 hours 18 inches from light; 1-6 hours per day. Color: white base, white cover, black power cord 8 ft long.", "The Small Muff Vest was designed by the spouse of a stroke survivor. The Muff Vest provides support for a flaccid arm. The weight of the stroke arm is distributed and effectively supported over both shoulders. The Muff Vest provides arm control and support, even when the user is bending forward. The large front horizontal pocket is opened on both ends, allowing the wearer to reach through the pocket to place their impaired arm in the support. Two handy patch pockets offer convenient storage and accessibility for small frequently used items. Constructed of 65% polyester 35% cotton blend, machine washable fabric, with durable reinforced stitching. Hook and loop tab closure back opening. Ideal for hemiplegic upper extremities. Small Muff Vest Features: Provides support for a flaccid arm. Hook and loop tab closure back opening. Fits male or female. Small Muff Vest Specifications: Universal fit : for either left or right arm support. Color : khaki. Size : small, fits 100 - 125 pounds.", "Penco Red Walkerballs are pre-cut to prevent injuries from cutting tennis balls. These high quality, felt or plush covered hollow rubber balls are simple to install and ready for you to use. Walkerballs help increase mobility by allowing walkers with front wheels to glide effortlessly on most surfaces. These hollow rubber balls offer a unique alternative to the rubber tips and glides for walkers. With Walkerballs, you can add personality to your walker and enjoy effortless, scuff-free movement across the floor. Designed to fit most walkers. Penco Red Walkerball Features: Easy to use. Pre-cut to prevent injuries from cutting tennis balls. Fits most walker legs regardless of tube diameter. Penco Red Walkerball Specifications: Color: red.", "Penco Grey Walkerballs are designed to fit most walkers. Walkerballs help increase mobility by allowing walkers with front wheels to glide effortlessly on most surfaces. These high quality, felt or plush covered hollow rubber balls are pre-cut, simple to install and ready for you to use. Walkerballs offer a unique alternative to the rubber tips and glides for walkers. With Walkerballs, you can add personality to your walker and enjoy effortless, scuff-free movement across the floor. Penco Grey Walkerball Features: Easy to use. Pre-cut to prevent injuries from cutting tennis balls. Fits most walker legs, regardless of tube diameter. Penco Grey Walkerball Specifications: Color: grey.", "The Adult Weighted Universal Standard Holder will securely hold most round or irregular shaped items with three adjustable set screws. This large weighted holder can be used with pens, pencils markers, paintbrushes, crayons and any item that measures 1/8 in to 7/16 inch diameter. Provides added weight for those having difficulty in bearing down with a writing device or have shaky hands. The holder includes an allen wrench and three extra long screws enabling you to hold small diameter objects in the holder.Large weighted holder weighs approximately 6 1/2 ounces. Adult Weighted Universal Standard Holder Features: Can be used with any item that measures 1/8 inch to 7/16 inch diameter. Comes with an allen wrench and 3 extra long screws for smaller objects. Assists in stabilizing the hand. Adult Weighted Universal Standard Holder Specifications: Measures: 5 inches long. Diameter: 3/4 inch. Weighs: 6 1/2 oz.", "The See 4 Safety Mobility Light clips onto walkers, canes and rollators and provides users with additional light for safety. This automatic light source turns itself on when in motion and when it senses a low level light environment. It turns itself off after 30 seconds if there is no motion or when it senses a well-lit environment. Patented, hands-free, automatic illumination personal visual aid. Simply flip the on/off switch to the on position, clip the light to round tubing of a cane, walker or rollator and start moving. Three bright LEDs lights are powered by two AAA batteries (included). The light uses two sensors. First, a motion sensor determines movement. After 30 seconds of not being moved, the light turns off. Second, the light uses a lighting sensor to determine if it is in a low level light environment. Only when it is in a low light environment and in use will the light illuminate. Saves batteries and time. Choose the off setting position to turn the light off. See 4 Safety Mobility Light Features: Patented motion- and light-activated technology. Three super-bright, long-life LEDs for enhanced visibility. Easy to use clamp with foam padding for a secure grip. Great for nighttime bathroom trips. Automatically turns on and off. Attaches to any size walker, rollator, or cane tubing. Senses both low light level and motion. See 4 Safety Mobility Light Specifications: Includes: 2 standard AAA batteries. Length: 7 3/4 inches. Width: 4 5/8 inches. Height: 1 1/2 inches. Warranty: guaranteed to be free of manufacturing defects for a period of one year from date of purchase. At our option, NEPA Partners LLC will repair or replace any unit found to be defective in materials or workmanship under normal use. THIS WARRANTY DOES NOT COVER BATTERIES.", "The Carex Enablers Dexterity Kit combines five items specifically designed to improve functional performance of common tasks and make daily life easier. The curved design of the EZ-Key turner begins the turning effort, so completion of the turn is accomplished with minimum additional stress. The Button Hook / Zipper Pull puller eliminates the stress and frustration of buttoning a button by pulling the button into position. The Pen and Pencil Cushion is designed in both shape and density to alleviate stress while providing a secure grip. The Spoon and Fork holders fit onto spoons and forks providing a larger gripping surface. The Lamp Switch Enlarger fits over the existing twist style switch to provide a larger gripping area for an easy, stress free grasp. The Enablers Dexterity Kit includes the necessary tools to make daily life easier and improve functional performance of common tasks. Packaged together, these items meet some of the most common daily household challenges faced by people with arthritis, hand tremors or other conditions. Designed for arthritis sufferers to help decrease joint pain and enhance hand function. Made of lightweight plastic, these items can help make simple tasks around the house a little easier. Return policy: Due to hygiene purposes, this item is non-returnable. Enablers Dexterity Kit Features: Enhances hand function. Reviewed by Certified Hand Therapist. Helps control arthritic deformities (Wrist Radial Drift, MCP Joint Ulnar Drift, Boutonierre Deformity, Swan Neck Deformity, and IP Joint Angulation Deformity). Enablers Dexterity Kit Specifications: Includes: 3 EZ Key Turners (AEN15), 3 Pen and Pencil Cushions (AEN21), 2 Lamp Switch Turners (AEN23), 2 Spoon and Fork Holders (AAM137), and 1 Button Hook/Zipper Pull. Material: lightweight plastic.", "Easy to Use Walker Coasters are a welcoming upgrade from traditional walker glides, walker wheels, and walker balls. These brightly colored, lightweight footpads are highly visible, making them easy for you to see where the legs of the walker are to avoid tripping or stumbling. Made of a special polymer blend, durable plastic that easily glides in all directions over concrete, carpets, and linoleum floors with very little effort. The unique design of these replacement walker footpads includes an O-ring to securely attach the Walker Coasters without tools. Unlike walker balls and tennis balls, Walker Coasters don?t absorb water or collect debris. Easy to Use Walker Coaster Features: Glides over doorways, sidewalks, and carpets. No tools required for assembly. Securely attaches to walker with O-ring design. Bright, easy to see color. Great alternative to tennis balls. Easy to Use Walker Specifications: Fits: all standard 1 inch walker legs. Width: 2 ½ inch diameter. Height: 1 ½ inches. Made: USA. Material: smooth, durable plastic. Color: bright yellow. Includes: package of 2.", "A Fitness Experience exercise DVD is ideal for strengthening to help prevent falls and improve balance. This strength training program was created by a certified exercise physiologist who specializes in senior adult fitness, health and wellness programs. He identified the lack of strength programs geared to those individuals who may have some physical limitation or have trouble getting started with conventional exercise programs. A Fitness Experience provides a great place to start. Using the exercises regularly could help prevent falls and significantly improve your balance. The introduction and closing includes valuable fitness and wellness information. Fitness Experience exercise video running time is 48 minutes. It is divided into 8 sections: warm up, legs and hips, back and shoulders, arms, abdominals, grip, balance and relaxation. You can use all of the program or only those sections for your specific needs. Testimonials: ?It?s a wonderful video? Ted Podleski, Director of Arizona Osteopathic Medical Association. ?I think the fitness video was a great idea and something very much needed.? Cindy Manning, State President, AAAP. A Fitness Experience Exercise DVD Features: Strength building program for the mature adult. Easy to follow directions. Real people, average 85 years old, performing real exercises. Toning workout video for beginners or lower level fitness clients. Most, but not all exercises are done from a seated position. A Fitness Experience Exercise DVD Specifications: Format: DVD. Length: 48 minutes.", "Fire Gone is a fire extinguisher disguised as a compact easy to use aerosol can. Cooking mishaps are the leading cause of fires in the home, according to the National Fire Protection Association. Traditional fire extinguishers are large, heavy, difficult to use, and often challenging for people with arthritis hands. Fire Gone delivers a strong targeted stream of specially formulated fire fighting foam that goes right to the source of the fire. This single use fire suppressant is effective on most electric, grease, fabric and wood fires. Just pull the safety tab, aim and squeeze the trigger. Fire Gone Fire Extinguisher foam is biodegradable so it is easy to clean up and won?t damage surfaces. Fire Gone Fire Extinguisher Features: Stops fires fast. Simple to use can and spray nozzle design. Biodegradable foam fire suppressant is simple to clean up. More effective than traditional fire extinguishers on most common fires. Contains no CFCs. AFFF Foam UL Certified. Fire Gone Fire Extinguisher Specifications: Diameter: 2 ½ inches. Height: 10 inches. Manufactured: USA.", "The EZGrip Pen Grips feature an ergonomic design that is aimed at reducing grip pressure for people suffering from decreased hand strength and carpal tunnel. This pen grip allows the use of one fingertip instead of three fingers. The unique design of this grip allows one finger to exert downward pressure for writing and no squeezing is necessary. The pen/pencil with the applied grip is held lightly without falling out or through the fingers. The Pen Grip greatly reduces grip forces needed to write. Can be used on a pencil, pen, scalpel or any other pencil-like instrument. EZGrips are patented and have been awarded U.S. Utility and Design patents. EZGrip Pen Grips are especially helpful to persons with poor grip strength, cramping/dystonia, Carpal Tunnel and any type of grip impairment or for just plain comfort. They are used for finger stress relief as well as prevention of cramping, or other difficulties. EZGrip Pen Grip Features: Helps prevent cramping, stress and injuries. Requires up to 57% less pressure than standard pens. Can be attached to any pencil, pen, scalpel or any other pencil-like instrument. EZGrip Pen Grip Specifications: Material: hypoallergenic rubber compound, latex free. Measurements: 1 1/8 inch in length and 6/8 inch at widest point. Includes: package of 3 (one of each: red, white, blue).", "The Vibrating Alarm Medication Reminder is an easy to use pill box that helps you organize your daily pills and reminds you with an audio and/or vibrating alarm 4 times per day. This remarkable little device is a handy and helpful addition to any medication regimen. Ideal for personal use and use in clinical applications, this compact little pill organizer is an assistive living aid that exceeds expectations. With simple, straightforward programming and easy alarm selection, this vibrating pill timer reminder is a convenient compliance device. This compact daily alarm pillbox has 4 large tablet compartments, an integrated clock with dedicated alarm, 4 different audio and vibration alarms. The digital LCD clock face displays the time, alarm type and the alarm number with a crisp blue backlight. Strong but discreet vibrating alarm only you will know it is going off, or loud beeping alarm or both, vibrating AND beeping alarm. Snooze alarm repeats after 4 and 8 minutes. Manufacturer one year warranty. Vibrating Alarm Medication Reminder Features: Displays time with backlight. Four programmable daily alarms. Set both audible and vibration alarms at the times of your choice. Four pill containers hold 8 aspirin sized tablets per compartment. Slim design slips easily into pockets or purses. Alarm remembers your settings each day. Vibrating Alarm Medication Reminder Specifications: Measures: 2 3/4 inches x 2 1/2 inches x 7/8 inch. Power: 1 AAA battery (not included), 3 button cells LR44 (included). Weight: 3 ounces (with batteries).", "Soft Flexible Lip Blocks allow you to cut the length to the perfect size. Lip Blocks help discourage an individual from biting the straw or thrusting the tongue. It also corrects tongue position and prevents the straw from going too deep inside the mouth. Lip blocks can be helpful with tensing for controlled lip and tongue movement. Lip blocks should only be used by a professional therapist or by a caregiver trained in their use and should be supervised at all times. Soft Flexible Lip Block Features: Use with regular straws. Prevents the straw from being inserted too deeply into your mouth. Can be cut for custom length. Dishwasher Safe. Soft Flexible Lip Block Specifications: Made: in USA. Mouthpiece size: ¾ inch. Length: 2 ½ inches. Diameter: ½ inch. Construction: medical grade material, latex free. Includes: package of 3. Color: lilac, color may vary.", "Do you struggle getting out of your favorite chair? Need a boost? The affordable Little Boost Platform is ideal for those who suffer from weak knees, bad backs, stroke or arthritis. This platform is the safest and sturdiest chair riser on the market today. It is simple - requires no assembly and there are no moving parts. The security lip around the top and the rubber pads installed in each corner are safety features that help prevent your chair from moving or sliding. The platform will fit almost all recliners and chairs up to a chair base of 27 inches x 27 inches. Measure your chair base to ensure a proper fit. After your Little Boost Platform arrives at your home, set your chair on the platform and experience the difference. With your chair elevated 3 inches you will be able to stand up and sit down with a lot less effort and you will feel totally secure at the same time. Made in USA. Little Boost Platform Features: Fits recliners and regular chairs up to 27 inches x 27 inches. No tools or assembly are required. Security lip all around the top. Square rubber pads on each corner hold your chair securely in place. Elevates chair 3 inches. Little Boost Platform Specifications: Construction: durable, recyclable ABS black plastic. Weight: 17 pounds. Weight capacity: 400 pounds. Overall Dimensions: 29 inches x 29 inches x 3.5 inches.", "The Natural Spectrum PageLight evenly illuminates each page while marking your place. Bright, natural light is spread gently across the page from a flat panel screen lit by LED Natural Spectrum lights. Measuring 7 inches x 6 inches, it's just the right size for a paperback, but sheds enough light for a hardcover book or magazine without glare. Read easily in bed or on dimly lit planes or trains without disrupting others around you. The PageLight features a dimming switch to adjust the intensity of light and serves as a page marker for your book. The PageLight will soon become a must have in your car for those long rides. Natural Spectrum PageLight Features: Light is spread evenly across the flat panel screen and illuminates each page without glare. Light stays on the page and provides excellent black and white contrast. Built-in dimmer switch allows you to adjust the light level as preferred. 3-AAA batteries (sold separately) provide up to 50 hours of reading pleasure. Natural Spectrum PageLight Specifications: Warranty: 1 year limited. Size: 7 inches x 6 inches. Weight: 0.4 pounds.", "The Natural Spectrum Book and Travel Light is a 2.2 oz book light that slips into your purse, pocket or briefcase for flicker-free, glare-free indoor daylight anywhere. Clips to books or laptops for hands-free operation.The advanced cold-cathode bulb (included) never needs replacing. Fully adjustable with a unique double-articulating head, the book light head also swivels to place full spectrum illumination precisely on any surface. The Book and Travel Light also includes a built-in charger if you decide to use rechargeable batteries. When you plug it into your computer, the batteries will be recharged at the same time for an additional 4-6 hours of run time.Small print appears clearer and the high/low intensity switch allows you to tune the light for the specific application. It clips to books and menus or stands on its own. Natural Spectrum Book and Travel Light Features: Full spectrum daylight book light and computer light. Palm-sized travel light features exclusive Verilux technology that scientifically tunes light to the human eye to help improve vision, and reduce eyestrain. Book Light head turns 180º to shine light exactly where you need it. Clips or stands and folds down to form its own protective, travel-ready case. Operates battery-free via USB connection to computer. Uses either 2 regular or rechargeable AA batteries (not included). Natural Spectrum Book and Travel Light Specifications: Colors: silver or white. Height Range: 9 inches - 3.5 inches. Size: 3 inches x 3.4 inches. Warranty: 1 year limited.", "The BipGrip Pen Grip makes any standard pen, pencil or crayon easy to hold by reducing the required gripping power. It works for left and right handed users and is good for all ages. This ergonomic writing aid simplifies writing and drawing for even the weakest grip. BipGrip is latex free. The BipGrip can be used with crayons giving them added girth and weight and you can adjust the length of crayon to your own ideal setting. It's so easy to use: just unscrew, put in a pen, pencil or crayon and screw together. BipGrip Pen Grip Features: Makes any standard pen, pencil or crayon easy to use. Simplifies writing and drawing for weak grip or arthritis. Latex free. Made in the USA. BipGrip Pen Grip Specifications: Length: 4 1/2 inches. Diameter: 1 inch. Color: Red. Material: plastic.", "Back Spa Back Scrubber is a unique back scrubber made of the same soft bristles as our famous Soapy Soles. It is designed for massaging and cleaning your back without all the twisting and turning. This long handled scrubber can even be used on the soles of your feet while lying in the tub. The opposite side of Back Spa Back Scrubber has well-placed ?bumps? for a more stimulating rub down. The Back Spa Back Scrubber would be great for anyone, but it is ideal for those with balance and mobility issues. Almost 1000 flexible fingers span the length of this body scrubber to work up an amazing lather and allow you to wash your body quickly and easily. This is what makes the Back Spa so great. It does an amazing job washing your back, but it is not limited to that use. Easily modify the way you hold it to wash legs, feet, buns, necks, arms and more without bending your body or straining in any way. Back Spa Back Scrubber Features: Long and flexible, easy to hold handles. Soft, gentle bristles side cleans and exfoliates, renewing the skin?s surface. Soft, nubby mounds on other side massages and stimulates circulation to tired, sore muscles. No more twisting and turning to clean your back. Stimulating back massage. Back Spa Back Scrubber Specifications: Color: pearl blue. Size: 41 inches long by 2 3/4 inches wide. Material: 100 percent PVC.", "The large 5 inch Verilux Magnifier is perfect for reading and needlework, and eyeglass-quality acrylic means there?s no distortion. With two magnifiers in one, this hands free magnifier turns fine text into large print with two separate magnification ranges - most of the lens is 2X magnification, plus a 6X spot lens is implanted in the first lens for seeing tiny details. Attach the Magnifier to the Verilux Easy Flex or Verilux Original Floor lamp to task or read with ease. The 18 inch flexible gooseneck stays put and makes perfect positioning easy. The built-in handle lets you adjust the scratch-resistant magnifier to any angle without putting fingerprints on the lens. But, just in case you do get fingerprints or dust on the lens, a microfiber lens cloth is included. Verilux Magnifier for use with: Original Deluxe Natural Spectrum floor lamp. EasyFlex Deluxe Natural Spectrum floor lamp. Graphite Verilux Magnifier Features: Flexible All-Steel Gooseneck offers precise positioning and decades of durability. Graphite finish matches the EasyFlex Deluxe and Original Full spectrum graphite floor lamps. Optical Quality Acrylic, resists scratching and breaking; distortion-free. Satisfaction guaranteed by Verilux. Graphite Verilux Magnifier Specifications: Magnification zones: 2X lens and 6X spot lens. Includes: microfiber polishing cloth.", "The Blue Scooper Plate can help people maintain independence and enjoy dining. For people with muscle control issues, hand ailments, severe arthritis or similar conditions, successful self feeding can be a real challenge. All scooper plates have a slightly taller rim on one side that has a reverse curve. The curve helps in scooping food onto a utensil. As food is pushed into this curve, it naturally rolls back onto a spoon or fork. Higher edges around the rest of the plate help corral foods and reduce the opportunity for spills. Scoop dishes are suitable for both adults and children. However, they are typically smaller than regular dinner plates, which is ideal for better portion size control. The Blue Scooper Dish is made of a darker blue plastic and the dark blue background provides high contrast for light color foods which may not be easily identified on white plates by persons with declining vision (a frequent occurrence with Alzheimer's patients). The Blue Scooper Plate diameter is 6 ¾ inches and has a circular shape. The edges are curved and half inch high with a one inch high reverse curve for scooping food. The bottom has a one-quarter inch rim. The scoop plate is molded of heat-resistant blue plastic and is dishwasher safe. The Blue Scooper Plate is also available with a suction cup base. See Scooper Plate with Suction Base CMI108. Blue Scooper Plate Features: Reverse curve for scooping food. Blue color provides high contrast for low vision. Also available with suction base. Dishwasher safe. Blue Scooper Plate Specifications: Diameter: 6¾ inches. Reverse curve height: 1 inch. Material: heat resistant plastic. Color: blue.", "The Verilux Natural Spectrum EasyRead Lighted Magnifier is an easy to use and lightweight portable illuminated magnifier that will brighten and magnify anything you want to read. With a pair of Natural Spectrum LED bulbs to help illuminate the reading material clearly, no other illuminated magnifier on the market today lights up the page like the Verilux Natural Spectrum EasyRead Lighted Magnifier! The Verilux EasyRead Lighted Magnifier is great for taking in the car or keeping in your purse or pocket. The 4.25 inch diameter lens is made of precision quality optical glass that provides crystal clear 2.5X magnification with a handy 5X spot magnifier. This lighted magnifier uses 2 AAA batteries which will last months under normal usage. The magnifier also comes with a switch to change from high to low to suit whatever the lighting condition is that you're in. Don't be stuck trying to read in the dark again! Verilux Easy Read Illuminated Magnifier Features: 2 LED Bulbs evenly light every page with Natural Spectrum high contrast illumination for better vision, even in dim light. 5X spot magnification lens. Lightweight and portable. Verilux EasyRead Illuminated Magnifier Specifications: Dimensions: 9.5 inches x 4.25 inches x 1 inch. Weight: 13 ounces. Includes: padded case and lens cloth.", "The CleanWave UV-C Portable Toothbrush Sanitizer is the safe and easy way to sanitize your toothbrush. Germs and bacteria thrive in the moist environment of a toothbrush, and live long after you are finished brushing and rinsing your toothbrush. The powerful UV-C light safely eliminates viruses, bacteria and germs from your toothbrush. The automatic 6-minute sanitizing cycle begins the moment you place your toothbrush in the sanitizer after brushing. When it?s time to brush your teeth again, your toothbrush will have been sanitized. The sturdy case is perfect for traveling and keeps your toothbrush sanitized and germ-free.The Verilux CleanWave UV-C Portable Toothbrush Sanitizer uses the same advanced UV-C light technology used to sterilize hospital equipment for over 30 years. CleanWave UVC Portable Toothbrush Sanitizer Features: 6-minute built-in-timer provides automatic sanitizing cycle. Uses 2-AAA batteries (not included). Automatic UV-C light shut-off when opened during operation. CleanWave UVC Portable Toothbrush Sanitizer Specifications: Dimensions: 8.58 inches high x 2.17 inches wide x 1.18 inches deep. Weight: 5.3 ounces.", "The LEVO LED Book Light is a handy book light, a reading light, and a multipurpose light for all sorts of applications. Super bright light is the perfect choice to light up our LEVO BookHolders, and it doubles as a handy portable light to use around your home. Whether you're reading a good book, fixing the kitchen sink, or working on hobbies, this multipurpose LED light will become one of your favorite lights. 28 super bright LED lamps provide enough white light to light an entire magazine. Flexible goose neck allows the light to be positioned where you need it. It's a clip on book light for reading, and it's a handy light that rests on flat surfaces. 3 power choices: AC adapter ? included, plugs into your AC wall outlet, USB Cable ? included, plugs into your PC USB port to light your keyboard or desk; 4 AA batteries ? not included, use batteries for cordless convenience. LEVO LED Book Light Features: Sits flat for desktop use or can be clipped on surfaces. Great for hobbies, nighttime reading, camping and BBQs. Flexible goose neck allows for easy positioning. Easy-on touch sensitive switch. LEVO LED Book Light Specifications: Included: AC adapter and USB Cable. Bulb life: up to 10,000 hours. Weight: 2 pounds.", "The LEVO Book Holder Stand is completely adjustable for your reading comfort. Now anyone can enjoy reading hands-free with this innovative book stand. Using the 6 unique movements you will be able to perfectly place your book in the most comfortable, ergonomic reading position. Whether reclining in your favorite chair, or lying in bed with your favorite novel, this book holder allows you to read at eye-level, effectively reducing neck and back strain to zero, and removes the stress of arched necks and fatigued hands. Patented design allows this book holder to extend from either the right or left side of your furniture. You can even read in bed with your book upside-down. It's quick and simple to adjust, and no tools are required. From 4 pound novels to lightweight paperbacks, the revolutionary design and sturdy construction of the LEVO Book Holder can hold it all. A heavy duty 13 x 13 inch cast iron base with swivel caster wheels lets you easily move the LEVO bookstand from room to room and even makes a great cookbook holder. The page holders spring action and soft rubber ends make turning pages a snap, even with one hand. The telescoping stand adjusts in height from 58?37 inches. The stand tilts around the horizontal axis and moves closer or further away to allow users to position reading materials directly in their line of vision. Users can swing materials out of the way when finished reading. LEVO BookHolder Stand Features: Platform tilts 360 degrees for reading convenience. Books strap firmly to the platform. Telescoping stand is height adjustable 26 to 48 inches. Allows reading at eye-level. Reduces neck strain and soreness. LEVO BookHolder Stand Specifications: Dimensions: 12 inches high x 16.5 inches wide. Weight: 35 pounds. Base measurement: 13 inches x 13 inches.", "The LEVO Desk Book Holder easily clamps to a desk or table and places your reading material in the most ergonomically correct height and angle to your line of vision for your reading comfort. It is the only book holder for desks that can hold a 5 pound book completely upside-down! The book board securely holds your book and rotates 360 degrees. Telescoping adjustable height from 4 to 8 inches above the desk (measured from the bottom of the book board). Spring action page holders have soft rubber ends and allow turning pages with one hand. The LEVO Desk Book Holder clears your desktop space so you can take notes, type, or relax with your favorite author. Ideal for limited work space areas. Takes the stress and strain out of having to hold your book. Easily clamps to a desk or table up to 2 inches thick. No more aching arms and stiff neck when you use the LEVO Desk Book Holder! LEVO Desk Book Holder Features: Specially engineered page holders keep book wide open. Improves posture. Reduces pain in neck. LEVO Desk Book Holder Specifications: Maximum desk thickness: 2 inches . Minimum height: 4 inches above desk (measured from bottom of book). Maximum height: 8 inches above desk (measured from bottom of book). Reach: 22.5 inches from pole to middle of book board. Construction Materials: steel, nylon (super strong polymer), and ABS (book board). Weight: 6.7 pounds.", "Health Craft Super Pole System is a floor-to-ceiling grab bar. This award winning modular support system provides support and balance assistance to those who need extra help transitioning from a seated position to a standing position. SuperPole is a secure structure that can be installed in minutes between a floor and ceiling and is held by a jackscrew expansion. The screw expands the pole to create enough tension between the floor and ceiling to hold the pole securely. Rubber pads on the ceiling plate and the floor plate hold the transfer pole in place and prevent marring of the ceiling or floor. Installs easily with no structural reinforcements needed. Foam hand grip provides a comfortable gripping surface, particularly useful for those with limited hand strength. Installs anywhere there is a floor and ceiling, placing transfer support directly where it is needed. Use it beside a bed, bath, toilet or chair. The SuperPole accessories are also available to meet changing needs: The SuperBar, SuperTrapeze, SuperTray and Safety Island. Note: The SuperPole™ System should only be installed between floors and ceilings of solid construction or injury may result. The SuperPole System™ should not be installed on loose floor coverings, in rooms with radiant ceiling heating, in mobile homes, or in suspended or angled ceilings. Recommended weight limits are 300lbs.All designs and specifications subject to change without notice. Made in Canada © 2007. Health Craft Super Pole System Features: Floor to ceiling pole makes transfers easier. Hand grip provides secure grip. Easy to install. Rubber pads prevent marring of ceiling and floor. Health Craft Super Pole System Specifications: Material: Heavy duty steel 1.5 inch diameter, 90 inches long. Finish: Anti-microbial powder coat white gloss finish. Grip material: Grey, premium high quality grip 20 inches long. Does not contain rubber or latex. Expansion Mechanism: steel jackscrew, zinc plated 1 1/8 inch fine cut thread. Base Plate: 5 inch diameter, non marking base plate rubber, ribbed for better gripping. Maximum Weight Capacity: 300 pounds.(Standard) Pole length (floor to ceiling): 93-99 inches; 7 feet 9 inches to 8 feet 4 inches. Standard Pole Weight: 13 pounds.(18 pounds with hardware)", "Health Craft Super Pole with Super Bar System is a floor-to-ceiling grab bar with a 16 inch horizontal center extension for additional assistance. This award winning modular support system provides support and balance assistance to those who need extra help transitioning from a seated position to a standing position. The Super Bar unlocks and pivots freely to move with you step by step. The Super Bar locks every 45 degrees for stability during standing and sitting transfers. It automatically locks when released preventing forward or lateral falls, and provides full support when making two or three step transfers. SuperPole is a secure structure that can be installed in minutes between a floor and ceiling and is held by a jackscrew expansion. The screw expands the pole to create enough tension between the floor and ceiling to hold the pole securely. Rubber pads on the ceiling plate and the floor plate hold the transfer pole in place and prevent marring of the ceiling or floor. Installs easily with no structural reinforcements needed. Foam hand grip provides a comfortable gripping surface, particularly useful for those with limited hand strength. Installs anywhere there is a floor and ceiling, placing transfer support directly where it is needed. Use the Super Pole with Super Bar beside a bed, bath, toilet or chair. It is more compact than a walker in small restricted areas such as washrooms, and is useful for pivot transfers in narrow areas such as between bed and wall, narrow hallways, etc. This transfer aid allows weight shift, moving, standing, leaving or getting into bed, or transfer to wheelchair, walker or bedside commode. In a shower, the Super Pole with Super Bar provides complete support for stepping over the tub wall without reaching for wall grab bars. The SuperBar can pivot away from shower curtains, allowing them to fully close during a shower. For toilet transfers, the Super Bar permits pulling up to standing and can provide leaning support while managing clothing. Please note : The SuperPole System should only be installed between floors and ceilings of solid construction or injury may result. Should not be installed on loose floor coverings, in rooms with radiant ceiling heating, in mobile homes or in suspended or angled ceilings. SuperPole System with SuperBar Features: Easy to use. No reaching, stretching or twisting required. Can be used in a variety of settings. SuperPole System with SuperBar Specifications: Material: Heavy duty steel 1.5 inch diameter, 90 inches long. Finish: Anti-microbial powder coat white gloss finish. Grip material: Grey, premium high quality grip 20 inches long. Does not contain rubber or latex. Expansion Mechanism: steel jackscrew, zinc plated 1 1/8 inch fine cut thread. Base Plate: 5 inch diameter, non marking base plate rubber, ribbed for better gripping. Maximum Weight Capacity: 300 pounds. Pole length (floor to ceiling): 93-99 inches; 7 feet 9 inches to 8 feet 4 inches. Standard Pole Weight: 13 pounds (18 pounds with hardware) SuperBar: Measures 1.5 inch diameter, 16 inch length, locks every 45 degress (8 positions), height adjustable typically 24-38 inches (from floor, with limit of 58 inches from ceiling to top of bar).", "The SuperPole Unifit Extender increases the floor to ceiling range on the SuperPole. The extension tube is a must for extra high ceilings. The extender installs between the pole and the top plate to increase the standard height range from 93-99 inches/236-251 centimeters, to 100-120 inches/254-305 centimeters. Increases height of the Super Pole by 20 inches. The Uni-Fit extender is a separate piece that slides over the top end of the SuperPole and has pre-drilled holes to adjust the height properly. The top end of the tube is secured to ceiling anchor plate with a second locking pin. SuperPole Unifit Extender Features: Easy to install. Increases the floor to ceiling height range of the SuperPole from 100 inches to 120 inches. SuperPole Unifit Extender Specifications: Construction: powder coated steel.", "The Extra Large Muff Vest was designed by the spouse of a stroke survivor. The Muff Vest helps the wearer function better with a disabled arm. The weight of the stroke arm is distributed and effectively supported over both shoulders. The Muff Vest provides arm control and support, even when the user is bending forward. The large front horizontal pocket is opened on both ends, allowing the wearer to support either the left or right arm. Two handy patch pockets offer convenient storage and accessibility for small frequently used items. Constructed of 65% polyester 35% cotton blend, machine washable fabric, with durable reinforced stitching. Hook and loop tab closure back opening. Ideal for hemiplegic upper extremities. Extra Large Muff Vest Features: Provides support for a flaccid arm. Hook and loop tab closure back opening. Fits male or female. Extra Large Muff Vest Specifications: Universal fit: for either left or right arm support. Color: khaki. Size: X Large, fits 200 - 250 pounds.", "The Easy On Easy Off Sock Aid Kit is designed to assist individuals who have difficulty bending to put on or take off their socks. The Easy On Sock Aid consists of a U-shaped half cylinder mounted at an angle on a flat base. The base has a hook for positioning the Easy Off Sock Aid. To put on your sock, place the Easy On Sock Aid on your lap or between your thighs, place the toe of the sock in the middle of the half cylinder pointing down, and roll the upper portion of the sock down on the outside of the half cylinder. The sock will be inside out down to the foot and open. Then place the Sock Aid on the floor, insert your foot into the sock, and slide the heel down along the half cylinder to complete putting on the sock. The Easy Off Sock Aid consists of a shaft with an end piece that has two prongs with a curved loop in between. To remove your sock, slide the loop end of the tool between the top of the sock and the ankle and push the sock down past the heel with the two prongs catching the cuff of the sock. Then let the shaft drop to the floor and steps on it with the other foot. The foot is removed from the sock, while the sock remains attached to the prongs. Return the Easy Off Sock Aid to an upright position and bring the sock within reach. It can be used to remove light compression garments also. Easy On Easy Off Sock Aid Kit Features: No bending required for putting on or taking off socks. Easy for one-handed users. Unique cordless system. Compact design for storing or travel. Easy On Easy Off Sock Aid Kit Specifications: Included: One Easy On Sock Aid and one Easy Off Sock Aid. Easy On Sock Aid Measures: 9.5 inches long, 4 inches wide, 6.5 inches high. Easy On Sock Aid Weighs: 26 ounces. Easy Off Sock Aid Measures: 18.9 inches long. Easy On Sock Aid Weighs: 12 ounces.", "The Granny Jo Dignity Mug is a unique ceramic mug with two extra-large handles intended for those who no longer have the strength or dexterity to hold a mug with one hand. The design of the Granny Jo Dignity Mug permits multiple grip options - the user can either grasp the outside of both handles, slide their fingers through the wide openings, or grip the body of the mug directly. The multiple grip options allow for increased stability and control by the drinker, improving their ability to maintain independence and personal dignity while drinking. Granny Jo Dignity Mug Features: Unique two handled mug. Allows multiple grip positions. Holds 8 ounces. Microwave and dishwasher safe. Granny Jo Dignity Mug Specifications: Dimensions: height 3.75 inches, mouth opening 3 inch diameter, overall width (handle to handle) 6.5 inches. Construction: ceramic. Color: beige.", "The Pediatric Universal Weighted Holder provides a means to hold a wide variety of writing or marking devices. Use with a pen, pencil, marker or crayon to reduce trembling when writing. Added weight assists in stabilizing the hand for people with Parkinson?s disease or ataxia. Also helps those having difficulty in bearing down with a writing device. To secure the item in the holder, tighten each set screw evenly with the allen wrench that is included. To avoid damaging the item being held by the set screws do not over-tighten. Pediatric Universal Weighted Holder Standard Features: Holds most round or irregular shaped items to 5/16 inches. Helps reduce trembling when writing. Includes an allen wrench and a no. 2 pencil. Pediatric Universal Weighted Holder Standard Specifications: Length: 3.5 inches. Outer Diameter: 5/8 inch. Inside Diameter: 1/8 - 5/16 inch. Weight: 3.75 ounces.", "The Verilux Rise and Shine Natural Wake-Up Light aligns the body's circadian rhythms that regulate normal sleeping and waking patterns. The light progressively dims or brightens while simultaneously decreasing or increasing the sound to create a natural, restful sleeping and waking experience. Unlike the sudden jolt of an alarm clock, the natural sunrise of the Rise and Shine won't disrupt the stages of sleep. Awaken peacefully, rested, revitalized and ready to start your day. The Sleep Mode feature simulates the setting of the sun by gradually dimming the light and allowing you to fall asleep gradually and peacefully. The Rise and Shine is a radio, natural alarm clock, dawn and dusk simulator and lamp that wakes you gently just as nature intended. Choose from four soundscapes or your favorite FM radio station to accompany your wake-up program. Rise and Shine Wake Up Light Features: 15 minute wake up program. Light progressively brightens prior to waking. Sleep mode gradually dims the light over a 5, 15, 30, or 60 minute period of time. High quality FM radio sound system. Dual alarms and 20 levels of brightness snooze feature. Rise and Shine Wake Up Light Specifications: Soundscapes: songbird serenade, ocean rhythms, pond life harmony, streamside melodies. Dimensions: 12 inches x 9 inches x 6 inches. Weight: 2.4 pounds.", "The Elasto-Gel Lumbar Wrap provides an ideal therapeutic hot or cold application for pain, caused by injury, tension or muscle fatigue. Unique shape conforms to the contours of the lower back and offers relief of minor muscular and joint aches and pains. It is a deluxe contoured thermal therapy wrap designed to provide both cold compress and soothing heat therapy to the lower back and hips. Specially formulated patented glycerine gel material with exceptional properties for transferring heat. The gel provides moist heat therapy or soothing cold therapy. These remarkable therapy packs are guaranteed to be 100 percent leak proof, even if punctured. Two sizes are available to ensure the best fit. Featuring wide and supportive Velcro strapping, the wrap moves with the user. Elasto-Gel Lumbar Wrap Features: Can be used for both hot and cold treatment. Contours to the shape of the wearer. Specially selected 4 way stretch outer cover. Tough flexible gel. Retains temperatures for 20 ? 40 minutes. Made in USA. Elasto-Gel Lumbar Wrap Specifications: Small/Medium Size: fits waist sizes 24 ? 36 inches. Weight: 4 pounds.", "The Elasto-Gel Cervical Collar helps alleviate pain and discomfort from minor muscular and soft tissue cervical injuries, soreness, stiffness and more. Made to specifically mold to the cervical neck region, this wrap can provide either hot or cold therapy relief for the neck and upper spine areas. This neck brace is made of a tough yet soft, flexible gel that is covered with a four-way stretch, soft lycra material. This allows for maximum conformity, heat transfer, and comfort. For moist heat treatment, heat the neck collar in the microwave or a conventional oven. Simply heat the pack according to the included directions. When a warm wrap is applied, heat quickly penetrates muscles and joints. Elasto-Gel Cervical Collar continues to provide heat for an estimated 20 to 30 minutes before reheating becomes necessary. For cold therapy, place the wrap in freezer. The wrap remains soft and flexible at temperatures as low as -20 degrees F. Usually the cold wrap will numb the treated area within 5 minutes without the harsh shock and pain that is sometimes experienced with ice or ice water treatments. The wraps will remain cold for approximately 20 to 40 minutes. Store the Elasto-Gel Cervical Collar in the freezer until ready to use. Elasto-Gel Cervical Collar Features: Microwaveable. Will not leak if punctured. Will not dry out. Conforms to cervical spine curves. Indestructible gel, cover and strap are all latex-free. For Hot or Cold therapy treatment. Elasto-Gel Cervical Collar Specifications: Measurement: 20 inches long, 10 inches wide center, 4 inches at front closure. Straps with Velcro front closure: 2 x 6 inches.", "The Health Craft Smart Rail System Bed Rail provides assistance for moving, standing and transferring into and out of bed. This safety bed rail unlocks and pivots outward to provide better standing support with less reaching and twisting. Provides a great solution for those needing help with bed transfers. Attaches to standard beds, not hospital beds or futons. Constructed of strong tubular steel. Easily installs in seconds by inserting the support frame between the box spring and mattress. Safety straps secures bed rail. Simple to unlock by lifting handle. Grey deluxe foam hand grip (does not contain latex). For many, getting in and out of bed can be quite a chore. Unlike fixed-style bed rails, the Smart-Rail Bed Rail is an innovative bed assist rail designed for those requiring a little help for moving, standing and transferring in and out of bed. A simple solution to bed mobility and independence, the Smart-Rail Bed Rail can unlock and pivot out wards to provide better standing support with less reaching and twisting. Top of rail is 30 inches from the floor. Note: VERTICAL LOAD BEARING ONLY. Product intended for moderate vertical weight bearing on rail only. Do not use if side ward (lateral) support is needed. Avoid rail latch unlocking - Ensure that rail is at least 2 inches/50 millimeters off floor when rail is in locked position. (Soft type box spring beds can compress downward under load allowing support frame to move down, and rail to become unlatched). Do not use on wet or slippery floors. Do not use with electric or hospital style beds. Both supplied straps must be installed for secure operation. Product intended for moderate assist with sitting up and standing only. Smart-Rail System Bed Rail Features: Installs in seconds. Provides standing and transferring support. Unique safety latch design. Unlocks and pivot outwards to provide better standing support. Requires less reaching and twisting. Smart-Rail System Bed Rail Specifications: Important Note: this bed rail will not work on hospital beds or futons. Measurement under the mattress: 23 inches. Top of Rail from floor: 30 inches. Support Rail Measurements: 31.5 inches high, 16.5 inches wide, frame 32 x 21.25 inches. Weight Capacity: 250 pounds. Measurement: 16.5 inches horizontally.", "The Smart-Rail Leg Extenders are for use with the Healthcraft Smart-Rail Pivoting Bed Rail. Smart-Rail Leg Extenders adjust rail height from 31.5 inches to 34.5 inches. For use with 8 - 12 inch mattresses. Leg Extenders are sold as a pair. Smart-Rail Leg Extender Features: For use with Smart-Rail Pivoting Bed Rail. Adjust rail height from 31.5 inches to 34.5 inches. For use with 8 - 12 inch mattresses. Leg Extenders sold as a pair. Smart-Rail Leg Extender Specifications: Color: White. Height Adjustment: 31.5 to 34.5 inches. Includes: 2 leg extenders.", "The Elasto-Gel Sinus Mask is a microwavable hot or cold therapy mask designed for relief of sinus headaches, sinus infections or post eye surgery. This gel sinus mask is great for those suffering with sinus headaches or may be used as a sleep aid to reduce excessive light for daytime sleeping. Cool the mask in the freezer or refrigerator to be used cold for reducing swelling, numbing an area, and for pain relief. By heating the mask in the microwave, the warm, relaxing gel mask can help to stimulate blood circulation and relieve pain. One size sinus mask fits most. The outside cover has a hole at the top for easily removing the gel pad from the cover for washing. Elasto-Gel Features: Ideal for sinus headaches or light shield for daytime sleeping. Apply gel pack for Hot or Cold therapy treatment. Will not leak if punctured. Microwavable and provides soothing moist heat. Remains flexible and soft at temperatures as low as 20 degrees. Elasto-Gel Sinus Mask Specifications: Made in: USA. Material: Latex free. Size: Universal (one size fits all). Includes: One sinus mask.", "The Finger Loop Teaspoon is designed with a loop on the handle that helps the user to properly position the utensil in their hand. An occupational therapist developed this adapted teaspoon for people with little or no grip strength. The user places their thumb, or a finger, through the loop on the handle, and stabilizes the handle of the utensil with the web of their hand. The vinyl coating on the handle provides a comfortable and secure feel. Stainless steel teaspoon is dishwasher safe. Finger Loop Teaspoon Features: Looks and feels like a traditional spoon. Handle loop provides greater leverage and support. Dishwasher safe. Finger Loop Teaspoon Specifications: Teaspoon measures: overall length 6 inches; bowl measures 2 inches long and 1 inch wide. Loop measures (inside): 1 1/8 inch wide, 7/8 inch high. Made of: stainless steel with vinyl coating.", "Silipos Achilles Heel Sleeve protects the tender Achilles tendon area while slowly releasing medical grade mineral oil to help soften and moisturize your skin. This protective heel sleeve provides gentle compression and dissipation of pressure around and inflamed Achilles tendon. The soft conforming gel pad protects the posterior of the heel from pressure, impact, and friction. The Achilles Heel Sleeve is an ideal recovery tool for heel and Achilles tendon surgeries. It is also used to prevent discomfort caused by ski boots, skates, cleats, athletic footwear, and boots. It is recommended by medical professionals for people with Achilles tendonitis, bursitis, heel prominences, pump bumps or hardened heel skin. This heel sleeve and gel pad does not create bulk in your shoe like a heel cup or heel insert. It is a lightweight, comfortable toe-less sleeve that can be worn with casual, dress and work shoes. The Silipos Gel contains a medical grade mineral oil which gradually diffuses onto the skin for continuous, soothing relief. It is naturally supple and moist, conforms to the contours of your skin, and stays in place so you can get around and resume your normal activities. Silipos Achilles Heel Sleeve Features: Toeless sleeve molds to the foot for a comfortable, secure fit. Gel pad absorbs pressure and friction at the Achilles tendon. Slips on comfortably without taking up space in your shoe. Silipos gel slowly releases a medical-grade mineral oil. Washable and reusable. Latex free and hypoallergenic materials. Silipos Achilles Heel Sleeve Specifications: Material: nylon, spandex. Made in: USA. Package: one heel sleeve.", "Silipos Moisturizing Gel Heel Sleeves have a thin gel pad that is anatomically molded to fit the heel. Silipos gel is a triblock polymer gel infused with medical grade mineral oil that continuously moisturizes and softens the skin. Silipos gel heel pads are more effective and last longer than silicone based gels. These lightweight gel heel sleeves are perfect to use overnight to provide relief from dry, hard, cracked skin. They can be used in conjunction with other skin moisturizing creams and lotions. Silipos Moisturizing Gel Heel Sleeves are not recommended when walking and are not for use with shoes. All Silipos products are dermatology tested, diabetic friendly, latex-free, washable and reusable. One size fit most. Non-returnable hygiene item. Silipos Moisturizing Gel Heel Sleeves Features: Thin gel pads mold to fit the heel. Moisturizes and softens dry, cracked skin. Can be used creams and lotions. Diabetic friendly and latex free. Silipos Moisturizing Gel Heel Sleeves Specifications: Sizing: one size fits most. Package: 1 pair. Made in: USA. Care: hand wash, air dry.", "Silipos Moisturizing Gel Terry Cloth Gloves are soft terry cloth gloves fully lined with Silipos gel that releases soothing mineral oils to moisturize and soften hands and nails. The patented gel polymer is encapsulated in lightweight terry cloth providing a warm, plush environment. Use 20 minutes a day to reveal softer, smoother skin. Clinical tests show that the gel used in the moisturizing gloves reduced dryness by 66% after 2 weeks, and 86% after 4 weeks. Silipos gel is a triblock polymer gel that is infused with medical grade mineral oil to continuously moisturize and alleviate dry hands, cracked skin and calluses caused by overuse, seasonal dryness, excessive hand washing or other skin conditions. These gloves provide warmth and comfort for arthritic hands. The abundance of vitamins, nutrients, and essential oils pamper your skin, soothe and soften your hands. Silipos gloves are washable and reusable for up to 40 treatments. Made in the USA. Dermatology tested, diabetic friendly, latex-free, washable and reusable. One size fits most users. Non-returnable hygiene item. Silipos Moisturizing Gel Terry Cloth Gloves Features: Soothe and soften hands. Fully lined with mineral oil gel. Reusable for up to 40 treatments. Silipos Moisturizing Gel Terry Cloth Gloves Specifications: Size: one size fits most. Includes: one pair of gloves. Material: cotton and polyester. Made in: USA. Care: hand wash, air dry. Color: blue.", "Silipos Moisturizing Gel Elbow Sleeve is a stretchable sleeve with gel pad that comfortably contours around the elbow to protect the area from pressure, friction and shear forces. Silipos triblock polymer gel is infused with medical grade mineral oil that continuously moisturizes, softens, and rejuvenates dry, flaky skin. This elbow protector effectively helps prevent elbow ulcerations and provides olecranon bursa protection, lightweight elbow protection, or ulnar nerve protection. All Silipos products are dermatology tested, diabetic friendly, latex-free, washable and reusable. One size fits most. The minimum sleeve circumference is about 9.5 inches (The sleeve will stretch much larger, but measure your arm circumference to ensure it will not be too loose fitting.) The sleeve measured flat is 5 3/4 inches wide and 8 inches long. Non returnable hygiene item. Silipos Moisturizing Gel Elbow Sleeve Features: Guards against friction and impact. Mineral oil softens dry skin. Provides elbow protection. Silipos Moisturizing Gel Elbow Sleeve Specifications: Sizing: fits most arms, left or right. Includes: 1 piece. Made in: USA. Care: hand wash, air dry.", "Synergel Dimensions Gel Cushions use a medical grade silicone gel designed with a three dimensional layout that helps provide ventilation and protection from skin shear and friction while providing a high level of cushioning. The gel used in Synergel Dimensions Gel Cushions remains pliable and soft in extreme temperatures and is water insoluble. This proprietary silicone polymer was designed to mimic the same physical characteristics as human fat tissue. These characteristics make it ideal for use in places where the pad might get wet, like wheelchair seat cushions. Silicone gel won't rot or dry out, will not flow or leak if cut or punctured. It is specifically designed to reduce pressure, impact, and vibration and provide protection from shearing and friction. Unlike other gel pads, these cushions will not retain heat and are odorless. Synergel Dimensions Gel Cushions are very durable and made in USA. Synergel Dimensions Gel Cushions Features: Cell design allows air flow. Helps prevent pressure sores. Does not retain heat. Odorless. Synergel Dimensions Gel Cushions Specifications: Sizes: 14 x 14, 16 x 16 and 18 x 18 inches. Thickness: 1/2 inch. Material: medical grade silicone. Made: in USA.", "The Gel Armrest Pad is designed for the ultimate in comfort and protection. This medical grade silicone gel can help to spread pressure evenly over a larger surface area. This shock-absorbing 1.5 inch thick gel armrest pad is ideal for wheelchair, power chair or scooter users to rest their arms on while riding. A gel cushion armrest is perfect for those who want a softer and safer way to rest their arms and prevent elbow pressure sores. The Gel Armrest Pad is made with a wooden base and plastic base guard providing a stabilizing surface for cushioning and protection. The neoprene nylon cover can be easily washed. The gel pad will not dry, rot or leak if punctured. The gel pad bolts directly to the armrest tubing and hardware is included. Sizes and lengths are available for a desk length armrest or full length armrest. Gel Ovations Gel Armrest Pad Features: Solid gel armrest pad cushions and redistributes pressure. Gel does not dry, rot or leak if punctured. Wooden base provides extra stability. Washable neoprene nylon cover. Gel Arm Rest Pad Specifications: Includes: One armrest gel pad. Available Sizes (width x length): 2 x 12 inches; 3.5 x 10 inches; 3.5 x 12 inches; 3.5 x 14 inches; 3.5 x 16 inches. Weight: 0.75 lbs. Assembly: Some Required. Fits: Armrest of most standard wheelchairs and mobility scooters.", "The Sock Horse Sock Aid helps you put on your socks quickly and easily. This sock aid has rubber grips that help to pull the sock over the heel and up the calf. Unlike other sock aids, your sock will not slip off the Sock Horse Sock Aid. The rubber grips are smooth and do not snag delicate socks or stockings. Simply insert the sock over the rubber tabs, and pull the sock onto your foot. The Sock Horse does not stretch out socks like other sock aids because the sock is not stretched over the outside of the sock aid. By loading the sock onto the inside of the Sock Horse, with just the top of the sock over the tabs, your socks are not stretched out and your skin never touches the plastic. The easy to grip handle has ribbed thumb grips and contoured finger grips. This easy to use sock aid will work with sports socks, knee hi nylons, and many types of knee-hi compression stockings. Sock Horse Sock Aid Features: Long easy to grip handle. Does not stretch out socks. Easy to load for those with weaker hands. Skin never touches the hard plastic. Rubber grips are gentle on even the most delicate socks and nylons. Sock Horse Sock Aid Specifications: Measures: 18 x 4 x 6 inches. Weighs: 0.3 lbs. Color: Taupe. Made in: USA.", "The Planting Stick digs a round hole at the right depth and width which forms the perfect hole for planting. This gardening tool is designed to punch holes in difficult soils, such as wet soils, clay soils, ground covered by a thin layer of gravel or landscape fabric. Difficult planting situations in between shrubs or tree roots are no problem for The Planting Stick. Think of it as a stand-up trowel and multi-purpose gardening tool. No more burned out drills or bent and broken trowels. People of all ages, and those with disabilities find this landscaping tool easy to use. The Planting Stick?s shaft and auger are made of steel. At the crook, a foam handle cushions the turning crank. A plastic bearing inserted inside the foam handle keeps it from slipping down the shaft while turning. Topping it off is an easy to grip neoprene ball mounted on stainless steel ball-bearings. This adapted gardening tool is assembled using welded-steel construction, therefore there is nothing that can bend or break, and it is durable enough to last for many growing seasons. By turning the foam handle clockwise while pressing down on the ball, the auger will corkscrew into the ground to dig a planting hole. The Planting Stick also handles other garden chores such as weeding, turning the compost bin and starting holes for posts with ease. The Planting Stick Features: Instantly digs the perfect hole. Highly durable. Effective in compact soils. Works in difficult to reach places. The Planting Stick Specifications: Length: 45 inches long. Weight: 8 pounds shipping weight. Color: Red. Materials: Steel, foam rubber, neoprene. Made in: USA.", "The Easy Wheelchair Push Bar is an easy on, easy off bar that spans the push handles of a wheelchair and makes pushing the chair easier. With this stabilizing bar, a wheelchair can be pushed with one hand. The ergonomic design also allows the person pushing to place their hands in a variety of positions. When using both hands, the Easy Wheelchair Push Bar transfers power directly to the chair with less effort. This helps to make maneuvering steep ramps, inclines, uneven surfaces, soft ground, or carpets much easier. Children and the elderly will find that a wheelchair equipped with the Easy Wheelchair Push Bar is much easier to push and control. Very tall people and people with lower back pain will be able to stand straighter when pushing a wheelchair with the Easy Push Bar. The Easy Wheelchair Push Bar is available in two sizes to fit wheelchairs with handlebars from 12 to 19 inches or 17 to 26 inches apart. The kit consists of 2 L-shaped elbows and an adjustable center bar. The L-shaped elbows attach permanently to the handles of a manual wheelchair. The expandable center bar slips over the upright portion of the L-shaped elbow and is secured with a push pin. The center bar is quickly and easily removed from the L-shaped handles to allow the wheelchair to be stored or transported. Easy Wheelchair Push Bar Features: Designed to fit over the handles of a manual wheelchair. Helps reduce pain and fatigue from pushing a wheelchair. Allows you to push a wheelchair with one hand. Easy Wheelchair Push Bar Specifications: Includes: 2 L-shaped elbows with attaching bolts and nuts, adjustable center bar with foam handgrip, foam handgrip for inner tube. Kit 1 Fits: Wheelchairs with handgrips 12 to 19 inches apart. Kit 2 Fits: Wheelchairs with handgrips 17 to 26 inches apart. Made in: USA.", "The G-Tube Belt is intended to be used by people who have a feeding tube that extends from the skin surface. It was designed by a wife who disliked the way her husband?s gastronomy tube was constantly being taped to his body. The G-Tube Belt eliminates the need for clumsy pins and tape, and is by far the most comfortable way to secure all types of enteral feeding tubes including PEG tubes, gastrostomy tubes, and jejunostomy tubes. The G-Tube Belt increases the user?s level of tube control, helps to increase self-care, and helps to minimize the risk of accidental pull-out by combative patients and small children. Using the G-Tube Belt should be done after consultation with a physician. It is recommended that a sterile drain sponge with slit for tube entry be placed against the skin as a buffer. Wrap waist strap around waist and secure to a comfortable fit using the hook and loop closure for adjustment. Slide tube through slit to pouch and position pouch over tube accordingly. Secure tube while not in use by coiling onto pouch face and then close bottom flap securely over tube coil. Care Instructions: G-Tube Belt flannel center pouch and soft elastic fabric waistband are conveniently machine washable. Hand or machine wash with a mild disinfectant and hang dry. Be sure to engage the hook and loop fasteners before washing to prevent lint accumulation. G-Tube Belt Features: Secures Peg Tubes, G-tubes, and most other enteral feeding tubes. Soft, comfortable elastic waist band. Washable and reusable. Eliminates need for pins and tape. G-Tube Belt Specifications: Material: Latex free. Pouch measures: 5 x 5 1/2 inches overall, 4 x 4 inches inside opening. Standard size fits: 30 to 45 inch waist size. Large size fits: 46 to 60 inch waist size. Belt width: 2 inches.", "The 18 inch Moen Peened Grab Bar has a textured grip area which is ideal for bathroom safety. This 1-1/4 inch diameter stainless steel grab bar complies with ADA specifications. Moen Securemount™ patented mounting design allows for secure installation into a stud at any angle. They are tested to withstand 500 pounds pull when installed per instructions. 18 inch Moen Peened Grab Bar Features: Patented secure mounting design. Peened finish is textured and in gripping. ADA compliant. 18 inch Moen Peened Grab Bar Moen Specifications: Made in: USA Length: 18 inches. Bar Diameter: 1-1/4 inch. Distance from wall: 1-1/2 inch. Weight limit capacity: 500 pounds.", "The 12 inch Moen Peened Grab Bar offers an anti-slip textured grip area which enhances your grip and is ideal in for wet hands. These 12 inch stainless steel grab bars are ADA complaint. Moen Securemount™ patented design allows for secure installation of the grab bar into a stud at any angle. Mounting screws are concealed which provides a neat finished look. 12 inch Moen Peened Grab Bar Features: Textured surface aids in gripping. Patented secure mount design. ADA compliant. 12 inch Moen Peened Grab Bar Specifications: Made in: USA Length: 12 inches. Bar Diameter: 1-1/4 inch. Distance from wall: 1-1/2 inch. Weight limit capacity: 300 pounds.", "The Extra Large Clear Plate Guard is made of heavy duty clear plastic and fits plates up to 10 inches in diameter. This clear plate guard provides a clear edge for a person to push their food against, and can be used discreetly while dining out. Attach the guard to the plate by stretching open the plate guard, and place the rim of the plate into the \"V\" shaped groove of the plate guard. This type of attachment prevents food and liquids from going between the guard and the plate. The plate guard can easily be removed for cleaning, and is dishwasher safe up to 125 degrees F. Extra Large Clear Plate Guard Features: Dining aid for people who have difficulty keeping food on the plate. Easily removed for cleaning. Securely attaches to prevent liquids from going between the guard and the plate. Clear guard can be used discreetly when dining out. Heavy duty extra large model resists breaking. Extra Large Clear Plate Guard Specifications: Material: Clear high temperature polycarbonate plastic. Measures: 1 1/4 inches high. Fits: Plates up to 10 inch diameter. Cleaning: Dishwasher safe. Made in: USA.", "Cane Expressions Red Cane Cover is a decorative, removable cane sleeve that allows you to express yourself, your personality, your outfit, mood or holiday spirit. Cane Expressions Red Cane Cover Features: Stylish stretchy pull-on red fabric cane sleeve. Cover easily slips over the walking cane shaft. Fits both aluminum and wooden canes. Cane Expressions Red Cane Specifications: Length: Sleeve is 27 inches long. Material: Washable neoprene and spandex. Fabric Care: Cold wash and rinse, air dry. Color: Red.", "Cane Expressions Zebra Cane Cover is a stylish stretchy pull-on zebra fabric cane sleeve. This fun zebra print fabric cane cover dresses up an old and unadorned cane. Interchangeable fabric cane sleeves allow you to express yourself, your personality or your outfit. Cane Expressions Zebra Cover Features: Stylish stretchy pull-on zebra fabric cane sleeves. Sleeve easily slips over the walking cane shaft. Fits both aluminum and wooden canes. Cane Expressions Zebra Cane Cover Specifications: Length: 27 inches long. Material: Washable neoprene and spandex. Fabric Care: Cold wash and rinse, air dry. Color: Black and white zebra print. Made in: USA.", "Cane Expressions Leopard Print Cane Cover is a decorative fabric sleeve that slips easily over a standard-sized cane shaft. Fun leopard print fabric offers the cane user the ability to coordinate their walking cane with an outfit, activity or occasion. Fabric cane sleeve also protects the cane from scratches. Cane Expressions Leopard Print Cane Cover Features: Decorative leopard print fabric walking cane cover. Sleeve easily slip over the walking cane shaft. Fits both aluminum and wooden canes. Cane Expressions Leopard Print Cane Cover Specifications: Length: 27 inches long. Material: Made of washable neoprene and spandex. Fabric Care: Cold wash and rinse, air dry. Color: Leopard print, brown and black. Made in: USA.", "The Cane Expressions Beaded Cane Cover transforms your mobility aid into an eye-catching fashion accessory. This unique, beautiful cover is hand-beaded in a lovely floral pattern. Interchangeable cane sleeves help you express your style and individuality by matching outfits or holidays and activities. Cane Expressions Beaded Walking Cane Cover Features: Hand beaded floral pattern cane cover. Sleeve easily slip over the walking cane shaft. Fits both aluminum and wooden canes. Cane Expressions Beaded Walking Cane Cover Specifications: Length: 27 inches long. Material: Made of washable neoprene and spandex. Fabric Care: Cold wash and rinse, air dry. Color: Floral beaded fabric, black background.", "The Cane Expressions Bronze Shimmer Cane Cover dresses up walking canes with stylish stretchy pull-on bronze shimmer fabric. Interchangeable cane sleeve transforms your mobility aid into a fashion accessory. Cane Expressions Bronze Shimmer Walking Cane Cover Features: Helps to personalize walking cane with stylish bronze shimmer fabric. Cover easily slips over the walking cane shaft. Fits both wooden and aluminum canes. Cane Expressions Bronze Shimmer Walking Cane Cover Specifications: Length: 27 inches long. Material: washable neoprene and spandex. Fabric Care: cold wash and rinse, air dry. Color: Bronze Shimmer.", "Cane Expressions Silver Shimmer Cane Cover personalizes your walking cane. This silver metallic fabric cane sleeve adds shine and sparkle to your cane. This pretty cane cover transforms a mobility aid into an eye-catching fashion accessory. Cane Expressions Silver Shimmer Walking Cane Cover Features: Stylish stretchy pull-on cane silver shimmer fabric sleeve. Cover easily slips over the walking cane shaft. Fits both aluminum and wooden canes. Cane Expressions Silver Shimmer Walking Cane Cover Specifications: Length: Sleeve is 27 inches long. Material: Made of washable neoprene and spandex. Fabric Care: Cold wash and rinse, air dry. Color: Silver Metallic Shimmer.", "The Clear Flip Down Half Tray is made of 3/8 inch thick clear break resistant polycarbonate. This wheelchair half tray is convenient and easy to adjust with a simple flip. The double-hinge allows the tray to flip completely over, down and out of the way. The 9 inch long adjustable height bracket mounts on the armrest of the wheelchair. This pre-installed bracket adjusts to different arm rest pad heights, up to 1 1/2 inches high and 2 1/2 inches wide. The tray will clear most wheels so a wheelchair user can self propel without removing the tray. With the tray positioned out of the way, the wheelchair can slide better under a desk or table. The user friendly wraparound shape has a larger cutout. Clear Flip Down Half Tray Features: Provides upper body support. Double hinge allows tray to flip over, down and out of the way. User friendly cutout shape. Wraparound style larger cutout. Clear Flip Down Half Tray Specifications: Tray measures: 22 1/4 inches long and 13 3/8 inches wide overall. Material: 3/8 inch thick clear polycarbonate. Attachment: Pre-installed adjustable height bracket. Choose side: left or right.", "The Elasto-Gel Lumbar Wrap helps give relief to those with minor muscular backaches and pains of the lower back. This therapy wrap is designed to provide moist heat therapy or soothing cold therapy for relief of minor muscular and joint aches and pains. The hot or cold therapy will last 20 to 40 minutes per application. The Elasto Gel pack features hook and loop type closures, which allow the user to move about during therapy. Two sizes are available to ensure the best fit. The Lumbar Wrap is made with Elasto-Gel, a patented gel with exceptional properties for transferring heat or soothing cold. If punctured, it will not leak and will remain usable. The unique combination of four way stretch fabric and tough flexible gel provides an exceptional durable product for use on the athletic field, at home, work or in a health care facility. Elasto-Gel Lumbar Wrap Features: Can be used for both hot and cold treatment. Contours to the shape of the wearer. Specially selected 4 way stretch outer cover. Tough flexible gel. Retains temperatures for 20 ? 40 minutes. Made in USA. Elasto-Gel Lumbar Wrap Specifications: Large/Extra Large Size: fits waist sizes 36 - 52 inches. Weight: 4 pounds.", "The Woodgrain Flip Down Half Tray features a double hinge that allows the tray to flip completely over, down over the wheel and out of the way. This wooden half tray is made of 3/8 inch thick 7-ply natural birch with a wood grain melamine laminate top layer with a clear lacquer finish. The 9 inch long adjustable height bracket mounts on the armrest of the wheelchair. This pre-installed bracket adjusts to different arm rest pad heights, up to 1 1/2 inches high and 2 1/2 inches wide. When the tray is positioned down, it will clear most wheelchair wheels so the user can self propel without removing the tray. With the tray out of the way, the wheelchair can be positioned at a table. Woodgrain Flip Down Half Tray Features: Provides arm support. Double hinge design positions tray down and out of the way. Tray cutout fits around wheel. User friendly shape. Woodgrain Flip Down Half Tray Specifications: Tray measures: 22 1/4 inches long and 13 3/8 inches wide overall. Materials: 3/8 inch thick 7 ply birch with woodgrain melamine laminate top layer. Attachment: Pre-installed adjustable height flip down bracket. Choose: left or right side.", "TriDerma Pain Relief Cream combines two clinically proven pain relievers to provide fast relief for aches and pains. It is ideal for foot, heel and nerve pain, minor skin irritations, cuts, scrapes, arthritis, back ache, sore muscles and joints, and sprains. It also helps relieve itching, burning and pain caused by shingles. This specialized formula contains Lidocaine, plus a unique combination of AP4 ® Genuine Virgin Organic Aloe and Arnica, which are both known to contain anti-inflammatory properties to help relieve discomfort and inflammation. Lidocaine instantly soothes and helps relieve pain without stinging or burning like capsaicin creams. AP4 Genuine Virgin Organic Aloe is a proprietary natural botanical complex. Other active botanicals included are: St. John?s Wort, Amica and Boswellia. Each botanical ingredient was chosen for its natural pain relieving and anti-inflammatory properties which are recognized by the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States. Essential botanicals are added to provide maximum strength pain relief without burning, smell or irritating the skin. It also contains a touch of Menthol for extra pain relief. The light scent disappears quickly leaving no odor or fragrance. This soothing formula is non-greasy, contains no fragrance, no cortisone, and no parabens. It is safe for diabetics. TriDerma Pain Relief Cream Features: Provides immediate pain relief. Safe for diabetics. Non-greasy and fragrance free. TriDerma Pain Relief Cream Specifications: Size: 2.2 oz tube. Ingredients: Cortisone and Paraben free. Contains: AP4 ® Genuine Virgin Organic Aloe, Lidocaine, Arnica, St. John?s Wort, Boswellia, botanical ingredients. Directions: Apply externally to affected area 3 to 4 times daily.", "The Finger Loop Dinner Fork is equipped with a loop on the handle that slips onto the user?s thumb. The loop helps to stabilize the utensil and guide the user's hand into proper position. This adapted dinner fork was developed by an occupational therapist for people with little or no grip strength. The user places their thumb, or a finger, through the loop and rests the handle in the web of their hand. The handle is dipped in vinyl for a comfortable and secure feel. This stainless steel dinner fork is dishwasher safe. Finger Loop Dinner Fork Features: Vinyl coated handle. Handle loop provides leverage. Dishwasher safe. Finger Loop Dinner Fork Specifications: Loop measures (inside): 1 1/8 inch wide, 7/8 inch high. Fork measures: overall length 7 1/4 inches; tines are 2 inches long and 1 inch wide. Made of: stainless steel with vinyl coating.", "The Easy Grip Jar and Bottle Opener is a kitchen aid that easily opens jars and bottles. The cat-shaped device has a cone-shaped head designed for opening water and soda twist off bottles. The flexible rubber body is for opening caps and lids of various sizes. A packaging cutter is between the ears and is used for cutting through paper and plastic seals on bottles. On the back is a magnet for storing it on your refrigerator. Gripper Jar and Bottle Opener is a jar and bottle opener designed for use by individuals with grasping or upper extremity disabilities or arthritis. The cone shaped head is designed to allow those with arthritis or joint pain to open bottles and jars easily. The flexible body opens lids of all sizes. The Easy Grip Opener is perfect the the occupational therapist looking for an ADL to help patients open beverages and every day items. Easy Grip Jar and Bottle Opener Features: Open bottle caps with gripping cone. Push Out Cap After Opening. Flexible body grips jars and bottle caps. Cut seals on bottles w/ cutter. Easy Grip Jar and Bottle Opener Specifications: Length: 6 1/2 inches. Width: 4 inches. Depth: 1 1/4 inches.", "The Adjustable Head Pointer assists individuals with limited hand use in writing, drawing, turning pages, or activating switches or controls. This adaptive device can also help people with limited verbal communication skills to use communication boards. The head piece consists of adjustable lightweight plastic bands for fitting individual head sizes and shapes. The bands are secured with metal hardware, and topped with a 19 inch aluminum pointer rod. The bands are padded for comfort. The pointer rod is length and angle adjustable in any direction, and is fitted with a removable pencil holder. Adjustable Head Pointer Features: Includes a removable pencil holder. Can be used to turn pages in a book. Head bands are padded for comfort and adjustable. Pointer rod is fully angle adjustable. Adjustable Head Pointer Specifications: Length: 19 inch long aluminum rod. Weight: 8 oz.", "The Cravaat Dining Scarf is a stylish clothing protector that is worn over clothing just like a regular scarf. The Cravaat Dining Scarf is discreet and sophisticated, can be worn flat or tied for a little extra style, and no one will know why someone is wearing it. It was originally designed for seniors, but adults of all ages deal with the problem of food spills. The brushed microfiber material has the soft feel of suede and is stain resistant and machine washable. When something spills, it can just be wiped clean. It can also be washed with like colors, dried in a dryer, and it?s ready to go again. Whether you are dining challenged, dining out or at home, at the table or while riding in a car, train, or plane, or if you just want some assurance that you will complete your meal with clean clothes, this alternative dining aid will help you avoid staining your clothing. Diner Wear created the Cravaat Dining Scarf based on the origin of the cravat worn by French Mercenaries in the 17th Century ? a cloth worn around the neck to protect clothes from food spills, or cover food stained clothes. Diner Wear Black Cravaat Features: Stylish alternative to an adult bib. Stain and wrinkle resistant. Functional and fashionable clothing protector. Diner Wear Black Cravaat Specifications: Made in: USA. Material: Brushed microfiber Color: Black. Measures: 27 inches long, 8.5 inches wide, 17 inches wide when doubled. Fabric care: Machine washable.", "The Granny Jo Adjustable Napkin Clip features a black nylon cord and a locking slide to adjust the length to the size you need. Two easy to use clips are attached at each end of the cord. With this adjustable length cord you can easily make custom clothing protectors out of dish towels or napkins. The clips are not too difficult to use for someone with weak hands. Granny Jo Adjustable Napkin Clip Features: Use with napkins provided by restaurant Adjustable length allows you to customize bib clip to your size. Granny Jo Adjustable Napkin Clip Specifications: Length: 18 inches. Material: Nylon cord with locking slide. Color: black with grey flecks.", "The Granny Jo Jewel Napkin Clip is made of easy to use clips with a stretchable mono-filament and colored beads. This dining accessory is ideal for the lady looking to add some \"bling\" to her meal time wardrobe. Napkin clips are a better way to hold a napkin during meals. Instead of tucking your napkin into your shirt, just hang it from this handy clip. This pretty beaded napkin clip works with cloth or paper napkins; also holds eyeglasses. Granny Jo Jeweled Napkin Clip Features: Good way to stay clean when eating out. Pretty jeweled beads add \"bling\". Granny Jo Jewel Napkin Clip Specifications: Length: 18 inches. Material: plastic beads and mono-filament. Color: multi-colored.", "The Granny Jo Pearl Napkin Clip is perfect for a lady wanting a fashionable alternative to wearing and adult bib. Pretty faux pearls on a stretch mono-filament with two large metal clips easily attaches to napkins or small towels to make a custom clothing protector. The Peal Napkin Clip measures 18 inches long. Granny Jo Pearl Napkin Clip Features: Makes a napkin provided by a restaurant into a clothing protector. Pretty alternative to a traditional adult bib. Granny Jo Pearl Napkin Clip Specifications: Length: 18 inches. Material: faux pearl beads on stretch mono-filament. Color: white pearl beads.", "The Granny Jo Original Napkin Clip features a sliver toned metal chain. This is the original napkin clip to turn a napkin or hand towel into a clothing protector. If you or your loved one does not want to use a traditional adult bib to protect clothing, then the metal chain napkin clip provides a discreet solution. The two metal clips are easy to use and attach to a napkin or towel. Silver tone metal chain measures 18 inches long. Granny Jo Original Napkin Clip Features: Compact size easily fits in purse. Can use with napkins provided by restaurant. Granny Jo Original Napkin Clip Specifications: Length: 18 inches. Material: metal chain. Color: silver.", "The 36 inch Moen Peened Grab Bar features a anti-slip finish which provides increased safety for wet hands in the bathroom. These stainless steel grab bars are frequently recommended by physical therapists and occupational therapists. The 1-1/4 inch diameter design complies with Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) guidelines for size and spacing of grab bars. Moen Securemount™ patented design allows for secure installation. Mounting screws are concealed which provides a neat finished look. 36 inch Moen Peened Grab Bar Features: Peened textured surface aids in gripping. Concealed screws. Patented secure mount design. ADA compliant. 36 inch Moen Peened Grab Bar Specifications: Made in: USA Length: 36 inches. Bar Diameter: 1-1/4 inch. Distance from wall: 1-1/2 inch. Weight limit capacity: 500 pounds.", "The Core C-PAP Pillow provides proper neck support, comfort and compliance for C-PAP users. The unique shape is designed to accommodate C-PAP masks, hoses and headgear. Core Products has developed this pillow with a quilted side panel which creates a distinct edge that does not collapse, allowing the c-pap mask to comfortably hang over the side of the pillow. The quilted gusset prevents pillow collapse. The Core CPAP Pillow is durable enough to support the head and neck without losing its loft, yet soft enough to sleep on all night. This sleep apnea pillow also works well for oral or dental appliances, people with fibromyalgia and other chronic pain, or during pregnancy. This pillow accommodates both left and right side sleeping. A fitted pillowcase is included. The CPAP Pillow is available in 3 different side panel thicknesses. To choose correct size, measure the distance from your neck to the end of your shoulder: For 4-6 inches choose the petite loft 3 inch height. For 6-7 inches choose the standard loft 4 inch height. For 8+ inches choose the high loft 5 inch height. *Non-returnable hygiene item. Core C-PAP Pillow Features: Improves comfort and compliance for C-PAP users. Helps to prevent mask leaks and pressure point soreness. Core C-PAP Pillow Specifications: Pillow Material: Fiber Case Material: Cotton Includes: one pillow and fitted pillowcase Dimensions: 19.75 inches wide, 14 inches long. Made in: USA"]